   2009 Science Specifications
              for the
2010‐2011 Florida State Adoption
                of
     Instructional Materials


                                                     TABLE OF CONTENTS
Florida Perspective .............................................................................................................1
    Florida’s A++ Plan for Education ..................................................................................1
    Priorities for Discipline Specific Literacy......................................................................1
    Universal Design for Curriculum Access.......................................................................1
Florida’s Vision for Science Education.............................................................................3
Florida’s Call for Publishers’ Submissions ......................................................................5
General Description for Publishers’ Submissions ...........................................................8
Florida Course Descriptions for Science 2009.................................................................11
   Grades K-5 ......................................................................................................................19
   Grades 6-8 .......................................................................................................................31
   Grades 9-12 .....................................................................................................................77
Research Base and Major Priorities for Instructional Materials ................................239
   Content ...........................................................................................................................239
   Presentation ....................................................................................................................244
   Learning..........................................................................................................................251
Criteria for Evaluation .....................................................................................................265
Link to Curriculum Requirements/Sunshine State Standards.....................................266
Requirements for Braille Textbook Production.............................................................267
Federal Requirements for the
National Instructional Materials Accessibility Standard (NIMAS) ............................269
© State of Florida 2009
Florida Department of Education
Office of Instructional Materials
(850) 245-0425
Web Address: http://www.fldoe.org/bii/instruct_mat/


Florida Perspective
Florida’s A++ Plan for Education and Highest Quality Instructional Materials
The fundamental premise at the core of the state's education policy is unequivocal: every child can
learn and no child should be left behind. The goal of Florida’s A++ Plan for Education is to raise
student achievement to world-class levels by reaffirming high standards, developing assessments,
and ensuring accountability. Florida’s reform effort is based on a commitment to continuous quality
improvement in every school across the state. As such, it calls for schools to articulate a
fundamentally new direction for instruction and to re-examine the ways in which the day-to-day
business of schools is conducted.
Instructional Materials submitted for adoption in the State of Florida are correlated to Florida’s Next
Generation Sunshine State Standards and benchmarks to ensure alignment to the state’s assessment
and accountability measurements. The ultimate goal of Florida’s Adoption Process is to provide the
highest quality instructional materials to our teachers and students.
Priorities for Discipline-Specific Literacy
All instructional material programs submitted for adoption consideration must provide evidence of
integration with other areas of instruction by supporting the notion that students in grades K-2 are
learning to read, and students in grades 3-12 are reading to learn. Instructional materials for science
must reflect the demands of reading, writing, and oral language that are specific to science.
Throughout each of these grade levels, instructional materials should include vocabulary
development, cognitive reasoning, and reading acquisition skills specific to literacy in science. For
example, an essential literacy skill related to text type in science is interpreting informational or
technical text and diagrams. Additionally, reading is a complex process and highly utilized across all
content area assignments. Therefore, all submissions must integrate and carefully scaffold reading
and literacy instruction to directly align with the corresponding text within each lesson. Reading and
writing instruction and assignments must align with all content area instruction. Writing must also be
integrated across the curriculum.
Universal Design for Curriculum Access
Because Florida will not have a separate call for special education students, publishers who submit
material for consideration will be required to incorporate strategies, materials, activities, etc. that
consider the special needs of these students. In providing for students with special needs, Florida
evaluators will be guided by the research reported in the document Universal Design for Curriculum
Access. The following Web sites can be accessed for detailed information on this research:
http://www.trace.wisc.edu/
http://www.cast.org
Although Florida is not having a separate call for Exceptional Student Education (ESE), that is not to
say that all materials will be equally suitable for all children. Florida’s State Adoption Committees
may, as always, identify some submissions as “especially suitable” for a particular group of students.
Some groups may be reading below grade level or above grade level, may include reluctant readers
or students with disabilities. Committee comments appear with adopted titles in the Florida Catalog
of Adopted Materials and serve as a guide for teachers and/or administrators in search of materials.
                                                     1


Each State Adoption Committee has at least one member, though usually more than one, who is or
has been a certified teacher of ESE students.
Accommodations and Modifications The following summary of information from the Department of
Education guide Accommodations: Assisting Students with Disabilities (2003) is of help in
addressing the ways that materials may be developed or changed to meet the needs of students of
varied abilities:
Accommodations are changes that can be made in HOW students learn. Accommodations are really
“whatever it takes” to assure students with disabilities the opportunity to participate as fully as
possible in the general curriculum and ultimately earn a diploma.
Accommodations:
• do not lessen achievement expectations.
• are a wide range of techniques and support systems that help students with disabilities work
    around any limitations that result from their disability. Examples include Braille textbooks or
    books on tape.
• may be needed by one student but frequently can benefit many or most students in a classroom.
• should be enabling, necessary, and used congruently for both instruction and assessment
Accommodations may be provided in five general areas:
• Instructional methods and materials
• Assignments and classroom assessments
• Time demands and scheduling
• Learning environment
• Use of special communication systems
Specific suggestions for accommodations in instructional materials and methods based on area of
need are found in Chapter 3: What Can You Change.
Modifications, on the other hand, are changes that can be made to WHAT students are expected to
learn. They are used primarily for students who cannot meet the Sunshine State Standards for their
grade level and require a modified curriculum. Modifications change the goals and expectations for
students.
Modifications may include:
• partial completion of program or course requirements
• curriculum expectations below age or grade level
• alternate assessment criteria
• alternate curricular goals
                                                   2


Florida’s Vision for Science Education
                he increasing role of science in the modern world is resulting in more focused
                attention on K-12 science education. The inclusion of science, along with
                language arts and mathematics, in the No Child Left Behind Act is a reflection of
                the growing importance of science education in the nation.
Understanding scientific concepts is fundamental to improving quality of life, harnessing natural
resources, and preserving the environment. Developing a future workforce prepared to meet the
challenges of the 21st century requires proficiency in science for all students, not just for those
who will become critical contributors to the scientific enterprise, such as scientists, engineers,
and medical professionals. Developing a deep understanding of scientific concepts and skills in
scientific literacy is essential for all students in order to prepare our future workforce and to
prepare citizens to participate as critical thinkers and decision makers in society.
               Florida is Committed to Adopting Comprehensive, Focused
                         Science Education Instructional Materials
Florida intends to adopt instructional materials that reflect the philosophy of teaching a smaller
number of science concepts with a greater depth of understanding. This means focusing on the
Big Ideas and Supporting Ideas for each grade level in K-8 and focusing on standards in grades
9-12, incorporating the use of content from prior grades, and not requiring or including content
that is more appropriate at future grade levels or in other courses. Effective instructional
materials for science should support teaching and learning of science that includes moving
students from concrete ideas about the natural world to abstract thinking and provides multiple
methods and opportunities for students to construct their own science knowledge.
Florida’s Science Education Instructional Materials Must Include the Following
Critical Components of K-12 Science Teaching and Learning
•   Standards-Based Teaching and Learning: The Next Generation Sunshine State Standards
    provide the focus and foundation for science teaching and learning in Florida. All
    components of curriculum, instruction, and assessment should be developed from the
    standards. The new science standards are arranged within eighteen “Big Ideas” to allow for
    meaningful student learning progressions throughout grades K-12.
•   Integration of Science Content and Science Process: Science education in Florida is based
    on a framework of science as the integration of science content and science process skills.
    This framework goes beyond the distinction between the scientific body of knowledge (facts,
    theories, and laws) and science process skills (observation, experimental design, data
    collection and analysis, and drawing conclusions), and focuses on the inextricable link
    between science knowledge and science skills.
                                                    3


• Emphasis on the Nature of Science: Scientists use a wide variety of approaches and
  problem-solving methods in their work. There is no single “scientific method” used
  universally by all scientists. The practice of science is not carried out in isolation, but
  involves a network of scientists, and employs a wide array of technological tools and
  communication methods. All domains of science are based on data and evidence. Because
  hypotheses, models, and theories are based on empirical evidence, they are subject to
  revision. Effective teaching and learning of science should reflect the way that science is
  actually practiced and should model the way that scientists operate in the real world.
  Proficiency in science begins with understanding science as a process of building theories
  from evidence and developing the same skills that scientists demonstrate.
• Dynamic Data-Based Instruction: Effective teaching and learning of science occurs when
  teachers have the time and opportunity to evaluate and use the results of students’
  assessments to improve instruction. Formative assessments that are truly instructionally
  supportive are those which elicit information about students’ understanding of science
  concepts and have the ability to affect real and meaningful change in the classroom by
  providing data that empowers teachers to make judgments about how to continuously
  improve instruction.
• The Language and History of Science: It is important for students to have a clear
  understanding of the specific meanings of words in science that may differ from the words’
  everyday use, such as “theory,” “fact,” “observation,” “data,” “evidence,” and “conclusion.”
  It is also important for students to have many opportunities to explore the relationships
  among science concepts and the contributions of scientists in order to make connections
  between the process of doing science and the science content.
• Early Development of Science Knowledge and Skills: Recent research shows that young
  children have a more advanced ability to reason scientifically than previously assumed.
  When children as young as kindergarten age are challenged to reason about a problem or an
  observation, they begin to develop critical thinking skills and to develop the foundation and
  confidence needed for a natural progression to higher level scientific thinking.
• Focus on Understanding Concepts: Proficiency in science comes from understanding and
  applying a particular concept, rather than memorizing the definition. Students need the
  opportunity to reflect and reinforce their understanding of science concepts.
• Focus on Big Ideas: A deep understanding of a smaller number of learning targets builds
  science proficiency better than a broad memorization of several concepts. The new science
  standards are designed to allow more time for students to develop conceptual understanding
  through inquiry-based situations, projects, and laboratory experiments.
• Targeting Misconceptions: Students come to science classes with pre-conceived notions,
  and sometimes misconceptions, about the natural world. Effective science teaching takes
  these notions into account and enables students to make the journey from their understanding
  to a more scientific view. Instructional materials should reflect this philosophy and should
  take advantage of opportunities to target and re-direct common science misconceptions.
• Integration of Technology Skills and Tools: Effective teaching and learning of science
  includes engaging activities requiring skills in the use of calculators, laboratory apparatus,
  electronic data-collecting probe-ware, and computer software.
                                                4


Publisher Submissions for Florida’s 2010-2011
Science Adoption
    Florida will accept for consideration bids for science instructional materials configured as
    follows:
                                        Grades K-5
                            General Sciences, Grades K-5
                             Elementary Science: Series Only
  Course Code                                        Course Title
     5020010                                 Science – Grade Kindergarten
5020020           Science – Grade One
5020030           Science – Grade Two
5020040           Science – Grade Three
5020050           Science – Grade Four
5020060           Science – Grade Five
                                         Grades 6-8
                           Biological Sciences, Grades 6-8
    Course Code                                        Course Title
       2000010        M/J Life Science
       2000020        M/J Life Science, Advanced
                         Earth/Space Sciences, Grades 6-8
    Course Code                                        Course Title
       2001010        M/J Earth/Space Science
       2001020        M/J Earth/Space Science, Advanced
                            Physical Sciences, Grades 6-8
    Course Code                                        Course Title
       2003010        M/J Physical Science
       2003020        M/J Physical Science, Advanced
                            General Sciences, Grades 6-8
Middle/Junior Comprehensive Science: Series Only
       2002040        M/J Comprehensive Science I
       2002070        M/J Comprehensive Science II
       2002100        M/J Comprehensive Science III
Middle/Junior Comprehensive Advanced Science: Series Only
       2002050        M/J Comprehensive Science I, Advanced
       2002080        M/J Comprehensive Science II, Advanced
       2002110        M/J Comprehensive Science III, Advanced
                                                     5


                                  Grades 9-12
                    Biological Sciences, Grades 9-12
Course Code                                   Course Title
  2000310   Biology I
  2000320   Biology I Honors
  2000330   Biology II
  2000430   Biology Technology
  2000370   Botany
  2000380   Ecology
  2000440   Genetics
  2000390   Limnology
  2000410   Zoology
  2000350   Anatomy and Physiology
  2000360   Anatomy and Physiology Honors
  2000340   Advanced Placement Biology
                  Earth/Space Sciences, Grades 9-12
Course Code                                   Course Title
  2001310   Earth/Space Science
  2001320   Earth/Space Science Honors
  2001350   Astronomy Solar/Galactic Science
  2020910   Astronomy Solar/Galactic Science Honors
  2002330   Space Technology and Engineering
                      Physical Sciences, Grades 9-12
Course Code                                   Course Title
  2003340   Chemistry I
  2003350   Chemistry I Honors
  2003360   Chemistry II
  2003400   Nuclear Radiation
  2020710   Nuclear Radiation Honors
  2003310   Physical Science
  2003320   Physical Science Honors
  2003380   Physics I
  2003390   Physics I Honors
  2003410   Physics II
  2003600   Principles of Technology I
  2003610   Principles of Technology II
  2003370   Advanced Placement Chemistry
  2003420   Advanced Placement Physics B
  2003430   Advanced Placement Physics C
                                              6


                        Integrated Sciences, Grades 9-12
 Course Code                                    Course Title
   3027019      Biotechnology I
   3027020      Biotechnology II
   2001340      Environmental Science
   2002480      Forensic Science I
   2002490      Forensic Science II
   2002500      Marine Science I
   2002510      Marine Science I Honors
   2002520      Marine Science II
   2002530      Marine Science II Honors
   2002540      Solar Energy I
   2002550      Solar Energy II
   2001380      Advanced Placement Environmental Science
High School Integrated Science: Series Only (Series may be I-III, I-IV, or I-V)
   2002400      Integrated Science I
   2002420      Integrated Science II
   2002440      Integrated Science III
   2002460      Integrated Science IV
   2002470      Integrated Science V
High School Integrated Science Honors: Series Only
   2002410      Integrated Science I Honors
   2002430      Integrated Science II Honors
   2002450      Integrated Science III Honors
                                                7


General Description for Publishers’ Submissions
Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for Science
The Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for Science were approved and adopted by the
State Board of Education in February 2008. The revised science standards reflect a focus on
building a deeper understanding of a smaller number of topics for each science course. The
standards and benchmarks provide the focus for standards-based teaching and learning in
Florida’s K-12 schools. The Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for Science can be found
online at http://www.floridastandards.org/Standards/FLStandardSearch.aspx.
Features of the Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for Science:
    •   The 2008 revision of the Sunshine State Standards for Science resulted in standards that
        define a smaller number of learning targets. The new science standards are arranged
        within eighteen “Big Ideas” to foster student learning progressions that are developed
        from K-12. The new science standards are grouped into four Bodies of Knowledge:
            o Earth and Space Science
            o Life Science
            o Physical Science
            o Nature of Science
    •   The revised standards provide content specific benchmarks to guide instruction; these
        benchmarks have been aligned with each science course at each grade level.
    •   Grades K-8: The science benchmarks for grades K-8 are grade level specific and are built
        around 8-12 “Big Ideas” grouped within the four Bodies of Knowledge. The Big Ideas
        provide a framework for the development of essential concepts in science for each grade
        level.
    •   Grades 9-12: The science benchmarks for grades 9-12 are grade span specific and are
        built around standards which are grouped within the four Bodies of Knowledge. The
        standards provide a framework for the development of essential concepts in science in
        this grade span.
    •   The benchmark codes, standard numbers, and Big Idea numbers are intended for coding
        purposes only and are not intended to imply order of instruction or degree of importance.
    •   The average number of benchmarks for each grade in the K-8 grade band has been
        reduced by about 50%. The revised science standards are designed to allow teachers and
        students to focus on a smaller number of learning targets and to develop a greater depth
        of understanding. Instructional materials should reflect this focus and should not
        include material that goes beyond the scope of the concepts for a particular grade
        level or course.
    •   The revised science standards are designed to introduce science concepts and vocabulary
        at developmentally appropriate grade levels. Instructional materials should reflect this
        design and should not require the use of science concepts or vocabulary at a grade
        level earlier than that designated in the standards.
                                                 8


    •   Committees of educators evaluated each science benchmark for cognitive complexity
        using an adapted version of Dr. Norman Webb’s Depth of Knowledge classification
        system. Each science benchmark has been classified into one of three levels of cognitive
        complexity: high complexity, moderate complexity, or low complexity.
Science Benchmark Codes
Grades K-8
      SC               5                     E                        1                  1
    Subject         Grade           Body of Knowledge             Big Idea          Benchmark
Grades 9-12
      SC              912                    E                        1                  1
    Subject      Grade Span         Body of Knowledge             Standard          Benchmark
Florida Science Course Descriptions
Florida’s science course descriptions were evaluated and revised in 2008 by committees of
educators in order to ensure coherence, focus, and rigor for each course description and in order
to ensure alignment to the new science standards. The revised science course descriptions,
which reflect the emphasis on building a deeper understanding of a smaller number of learning
targets, can be found online at
http://www.floridastandards.org/Courses/CourseDescriptionSearch.aspx.
Please note that the science course descriptions are subject to State Board of Education
approval. The draft course descriptions are scheduled for submission to the State Board of
Education in July 2009.
Features of the revised Florida Science Course Descriptions:
    •   The Nature of Science Body of Knowledge benchmarks are embedded within each
        science course description at all grade levels. Instructional materials should reflect
        this approach and should integrate the Nature of Science benchmarks throughout
        the entire curriculum and not isolate the benchmarks into a separate unit.
    •   Each science course description for grades 6-12 includes two language arts benchmarks
        and two mathematics benchmarks. These benchmarks were identified by the committees
        as essential skills to be embedded in each science course. In addition, some science
        course descriptions include related health benchmarks. Instructional materials should
        reflect this emphasis on embedded language arts, mathematics, and health
        benchmarks.
    •   The order of the related benchmarks listed for each science course description is not
        intended to imply order of instruction or degree of importance.
    •   Access Points have been developed for each science benchmark in order to provide
        access to the general education curriculum for students with significant cognitive
                                                  9


         disabilities. The Access Points are learning targets that reflect the core intent of the
         standards with reduced levels of complexity. The three levels of complexity are
         participatory, supported, and independent. The Access Points are intended for use only
         for students with significant cognitive disabilities.
National Science Education Standards
If the publisher’s Science Instructional Materials are aligned with the National Science
Education Standards produced by the National Research Council, the Florida Department of
Education would like a copy of a correlation document showing the alignment. Please mail this
correlation document along with the other bidders’ documentation to 325 West Gaines Street,
Suite 424, Tallahassee, FL 32399-0400. The National Science Education Standards can be found
at http://www.nsta.org/publications/nses.aspx.
                                                   10


                                 Florida Course Descriptions
                                                 Science 2009
Structure of the Florida Science Course Descriptions
The Next Generation Sunshine State Standards provide the focus and foundation for Florida’s
science course descriptions for grades K-12. The science standards are grouped into four
Bodies of Knowledge:
    •Nature of Science *
    •Earth and Space Science
    •Physical Science
    •Life Science
*The benchmarks within the Nature of Science Body of Knowledge represent the global aspects
of science and should be combined with the science content benchmarks from the other three
Bodies of Knowledge. These benchmarks should not be taught and assessed in isolation, but
should be embedded within curriculum and instruction throughout the course.
Grades K-5
For grades K-5, each Body of Knowledge includes four or more Big Ideas which provide a
framework for the development of essential science concepts. Each Big Idea includes content-
specific benchmarks to guide instruction.
 Body of Knowledge: Nature of Science (N)
 Big Idea 1: The Practice of Science
    A. Scientific inquiry is a multifaceted activity; The processes of science include the formulation of
    scientifically investigable questions, construction of investigations into those questions, the collection of
    appropriate data, the evaluation of the meaning of those data, and the communication of this evaluation.
    B. The processes of science frequently do not correspond to the traditional portrayal of "the scientific
    method."
    C. Scientific argumentation is a necessary part of scientific inquiry and plays an important role in the
    generation and validation of scientific knowledge.
    D. Scientific knowledge is based on observation and inference; it is important to recognize that these are
    very different things. Not only does science require creativity in its methods and processes, but also in its
    questions and explanations.
 Big Idea 2: The Characteristics of Scientific Knowledge
    A. Scientific knowledge is based on empirical evidence, and is appropriate for understanding the natural
    world, but it provides only a limited understanding of the supernatural, aesthetic, or other ways of knowing,
    such as art, philosophy, or religion.
    B. Scientific knowledge is durable and robust, but open to change.
    C. Because science is based on empirical evidence it strives for objectivity, but as it is a human endeavor the
    processes, methods, and knowledge of science include subjectivity, as well as creativity and discovery.
 Big Idea 3: The Role of Theories, Laws, Hypotheses, and Models
    The terms that describe examples of scientific knowledge, for example; "theory," "law," "hypothesis," and
    "model" have very specific meanings and functions within science.
                                                              11


Body of Knowledge: Earth and Space Science (E)
Big Idea 5: Earth in Space and Time
   Humans continue to explore Earth's place in space. Gravity and energy influence the formation of galaxies,
   including our own Milky Way Galaxy, stars, the Solar System, and Earth. Humankind's need to explore
   continues to lead to the development of knowledge and understanding of our Solar System.
Big Idea 6: Earth Structures
   Humans continue to explore the composition and structure of the surface of the Earth. External sources of
   energy have continuously altered the features of Earth by means of both constructive and destructive forces.
   All life, including human civilization, is dependent on Earth's water and natural resources.
Big Idea 7: Earth Systems and Patterns
   Humans continue to explore the interactions among water, air, and land. Air and water are in constant
   motion that results in changing conditions that can be observed over time.
Body of Knowledge: Physical Science (P)
Big Idea 8: Properties of Matter
   A. All objects and substances in the world are made of matter. Matter has two fundamental properties:
   matter takes up space and matter has mass.
   B. Objects and substances can be classified by their physical and chemical properties.
   Mass is the amount of matter (or "stuff") in an object. Weight, on the other hand, is the measure of force of
   attraction (gravitational force) between an object and Earth.
   The concepts of mass and weight are complicated and potentially confusing to elementary students. Hence,
   the more familiar term of "weight" is recommended for use to stand for both mass and weight in grades K-5.
   By grades 6-8, students are expected to understand the distinction between mass and weight, and use them
   appropriately.
Big Idea 9: Changes in Matter
   A. Matter can undergo a variety of changes.
   B. Matter can be changed physically or chemically.
Big Idea 10: Forms of Energy
   A. Energy is involved in all physical processes and is a unifying concept in many areas of science.
   B. Energy exists in many forms and has the ability to do work or cause a change.
Big Idea 11: Energy Transfer and Transformations
   A. Waves involve a transfer of energy without a transfer of matter.
   B. Water and sound waves transfer energy through a material.
   C. Light waves can travel through a vacuum and through matter.
Big Idea 12: Motion of Objects
   A. Motion is a key characteristic of all matter that can be observed, described, and measured.
   B. The motion of objects can be changed by forces.
Big Idea 13: Forces and Changes in Motion
   A. It takes energy to change the motion of objects.
   B. Energy change is understood in terms of forces--pushes or pulls.
   C. Some forces act through physical contact, while others act at a distance.
Body of Knowledge: Life Science (L)
Big Idea 14: Organization and Development of Living Organisms
   A. All plants and animals, including humans, are alike in some ways and different in others.
   B. All plants and animals, including humans, have internal parts and external structures that function to keep
   them alive and help them grow and reproduce.
   C. Humans can better understand the natural world through careful observation.
                                                             12


 Big Idea 15: Diversity and Evolution of Living Organisms
    A. Earth is home to a great diversity of living things, but changes in the environment can affect their survival.
    B. Individuals of the same kind often differ in their characteristics and sometimes the differences give
    individuals an advantage in surviving and reproducing.
 Big Idea 16: Heredity and Reproduction
    A. Offspring of plants and animals are similar to, but not exactly like, their parents or each other.
    B. Life cycles vary among organisms, but reproduction is a major stage in the life cycle of all organisms.
 Big Idea 17: Interdependence
    A. Plants and animals, including humans, interact with and depend upon each other and their environment to
    satisfy their basic needs.B. Both human activities and natural events can have major impacts on the
    environment.C. Energy flows from the sun through producers to consumers.
Grades 6-8
For grades 6-8, each Body of Knowledge includes four or more Big Ideas which provide a
framework for the development of essential science concepts. Each Big Idea includes content-
specific benchmarks to guide instruction.
Body of Knowledge: Nature of Science (N)
Big Idea 1: The Practice of Science
   A. Scientific inquiry is a multifaceted activity; The processes of science include the formulation of
   scientifically investigable questions, construction of investigations into those questions, the collection of
   appropriate data, the evaluation of the meaning of those data, and the communication of this evaluation.
   B. The processes of science frequently do not correspond to the traditional portrayal of "the scientific
   method."
   C. Scientific argumentation is a necessary part of scientific inquiry and plays an important role in the
   generation and validation of scientific knowledge.
   D. Scientific knowledge is based on observation and inference; it is important to recognize that these are
   very different things. Not only does science require creativity in its methods and processes, but also in its
   questions and explanations.
Big Idea 2: The Characteristics of Scientific Knowledge
   A. Scientific knowledge is based on empirical evidence, and is appropriate for understanding the natural
   world, but it provides only a limited understanding of the supernatural, aesthetic, or other ways of knowing,
   such as art, philosophy, or religion.
   B. Scientific knowledge is durable and robust, but open to change.
   C. Because science is based on empirical evidence it strives for objectivity, but as it is a human endeavor the
   processes, methods, and knowledge of science include subjectivity, as well as creativity and discovery.
Big Idea 3: The Role of Theories, Laws, Hypotheses, and Models
   The terms that describe examples of scientific knowledge, for example; "theory," "law," "hypothesis," and
   "model" have very specific meanings and functions within science.
Big Idea 4: Science and Society
   As tomorrows citizens, students should be able to identify issues about which society could provide input,
   formulate scientifically investigable questions about those issues, construct investigations of their questions,
   collect and evaluate data from their investigations, and develop scientific recommendations based upon their
   findings.
                                                              13


Body of Knowledge: Earth and Space Science (E)
Big Idea 5: Earth in Space and Time
   The origin and eventual fate of the Universe still remains one of the greatest questions in science. Gravity
   and energy influence the formation of galaxies, including our own Milky Way Galaxy, stars, the planetary
   systems, and Earth. Humankind’s need to explore continues to lead to the development of knowledge and
   understanding of the nature of the Universe.
Big Idea 6: Earth Structures
   Over geologic time, internal and external sources of energy have continuously altered the features of Earth
   by means of both constructive and destructive forces. All life, including human civilization, is dependent on
   Earth's internal and external energy and material resources.
Big Idea 7: Earth Systems and Patterns
   The scientific theory of the evolution of Earth states that changes in our planet are driven by the flow of
   energy and the cycling of matter through dynamic interactions among the atmosphere, hydrosphere,
   cryosphere, geosphere, and biosphere, and the resources used to sustain human civilization on Earth.
Body of Knowledge: Physical Science (P)
Big Idea 8: Properties of Matter
   A. All objects and substances in the world are made of matter. Matter has two fundamental properties:
   matter takes up space and matter has mass which gives it inertia.
   B. Objects and substances can be classified by their physical and chemical properties.
   Mass is the amount of matter (or "stuff") in an object. Weight, on the other hand, is the measure of force of
   attraction (gravitational force) between an object and Earth.
   The concepts of mass and weight are complicated and potentially confusing to elementary students. Hence,
   the more familiar term of "weight" is recommended for use to stand for both mass and weight in grades K-5.
   By grades 6-8, students are expected to understand the distinction between mass and weight, and use them
   appropriately.
Big Idea 9: Changes in Matter
   A. Matter can undergo a variety of changes.
   B. When matter is changed physically, generally no changes occur in the structure of the atoms or molecules
   composing the matter.
   C. When matter changes chemically, a rearrangement of bonds between the atoms occurs. This results in
   new substances with new properties.
Big Idea 10: Energy
   A. Energy is involved in all physical and chemical processes. It is conserved, and can be transformed from
   one form to another and into work. At the atomic and nuclear levels energy is not continuous but exists in
   discrete amounts. Energy and mass are related through Einstein's equation E=mc<sup>2</sup>.
   B. The properties of atomic nuclei are responsible for energy-related phenomena such as radioactivity,
   fission and fusion.
   C. Changes in entropy and energy that accompany chemical reactions influence reaction paths. Chemical
   reactions result in the release or absorption of energy.
Big Idea 11: Energy Transfer and Transformations
   A. Waves involve a transfer of energy without a transfer of matter.
   B. Water and sound waves transfer energy through a material.
   C. Light waves can travel through a vacuum and through matter.
   D. The Law of Conservation of Energy: Energy is conserved as it transfers from one object to another and
   from one form to another.
Big Idea 12: Motion of Objects
   A. Motion is a key characteristic of all matter that can be observed, described, and measured.
   B. The motion of objects can be changed by forces.
                                                              14


Big Idea 13: Forces and Changes in Motion
   A. It takes energy to change the motion of objects.
   B. Energy change is understood in terms of forces--pushes or pulls.
   C. Some forces act through physical contact, while others act at a distance.
Body of Knowledge: Life Science (L)
Big Idea 14: Organization and Development of Living Organisms
   A. All living things share certain characteristics.
   B. The scientific theory of cells, also called cell theory, is a fundamental organizing principle of life on
   Earth.
   C. Life can be organized in a functional and structural hierarchy.
   D. Life is maintained by various physiological functions essential for growth, reproduction, and homeostasis.
Big Idea 15: Diversity and Evolution of Living Organisms
   A. The scientific theory of evolution is the organizing principle of life science.
   B. The scientific theory of evolution is supported by multiple forms of evidence.
   C. Natural Selection is a primary mechanism leading to change over time in organisms.
Big Idea 16: Heredity and Reproduction
   A. DNA stores and transmits genetic information. Genes are sets of instructions encoded in the structure of
   DNA.
   B. Genetic information is passed from generation to generation by DNA in all organisms and accounts for
   similarities in related individuals.
   C. Manipulation of DNA in organisms has led to commercial production of biological molecules on a large
   scale and genetically modified organisms.
   D. Reproduction is characteristic of living things and is essential for the survival of species.
Big Idea 17: Interdependence
   A. Plants and animals, including humans, interact with and depend upon each other and their environment to
   satisfy their basic needs.
   B. Both human activities and natural events can have major impacts on the environment.
   C. Energy flows from the sun through producers to consumers.
Big Idea 18: Matter and Energy Transformations
   A. Living things all share basic needs for life.
   B. Living organisms acquire the energy they need for life processes through various metabolic pathways
   (photosynthesis and cellular respiration).
   C. Matter and energy are recycled through cycles such as the carbon cycle.
                                                               15


Grades 9-12
For grades 9-12, each Body of Knowledge includes grade-span standards which provide a
framework for the development of essential science concepts. Each standard includes content-
specific benchmarks to guide instruction.
Body of Knowledge: Nature of Science (N)
Standard 1: The Practice of Science
   A. Scientific inquiry is a multifaceted activity; The processes of science include the formulation of
   scientifically investigable questions, construction of investigations into those questions, the collection of
   appropriate data, the evaluation of the meaning of those data, and the communication of this evaluation.
   B. The processes of science frequently do not correspond to the traditional portrayal of "the scientific
   method."
   C. Scientific argumentation is a necessary part of scientific inquiry and plays an important role in the
   generation and validation of scientific knowledge.
   D. Scientific knowledge is based on observation and inference; it is important to recognize that these are
   very different things. Not only does science require creativity in its methods and processes, but also in its
   questions and explanations.
Standard 2: The Characteristics of Scientific Knowledge
   A. Scientific knowledge is based on empirical evidence, and is appropriate for understanding the natural
   world, but it provides only a limited understanding of the supernatural, aesthetic, or other ways of knowing,
   such as art, philosophy, or religion.
   B. Scientific knowledge is durable and robust, but open to change.
   C. Because science is based on empirical evidence it strives for objectivity, but as it is a human endeavor the
   processes, methods, and knowledge of science include subjectivity, as well as creativity and discovery.
Standard 3: The Role of Theories, Laws, Hypotheses, and Models
   The terms that describe examples of scientific knowledge, for example: "theory," "law," "hypothesis" and
   "model" have very specific meanings and functions within science.
Standard 4: Science and Society
   As tomorrows citizens, students should be able to identify issues about which society could provide input,
   formulate scientifically investigable questions about those issues, construct investigations of their questions,
   collect and evaluate data from their investigations, and develop scientific recommendations based upon their
   findings.
Body of Knowledge: Earth and Space Science (E)
Standard 5: Earth in Space and Time
   The origin and eventual fate of the Universe still remains one of the greatest questions in science. Gravity
   and energy influence the development and life cycles of galaxies, including our own Milky Way Galaxy,
   stars, the planetary systems, Earth, and residual material left from the formation of the Solar System.
   Humankind’s need to explore continues to lead to the development of knowledge and understanding of the
   nature of the Universe.
Standard 6: Earth Structures
   The scientific theory of plate tectonics provides the framework for much of modern geology. Over geologic
   time, internal and external sources of energy have continuously altered the features of Earth by means of
   both constructive and destructive forces. All life, including human civilization, is dependent on Earth's
   internal and external energy and material resources.
Standard 7: Earth Systems and Patterns
   The scientific theory of the evolution of Earth states that changes in our planet are driven by the flow of
   energy and the cycling of matter through dynamic interactions among the atmosphere, hydrosphere,
   cryosphere, geosphere, and biosphere, and the resources used to sustain human civilization on Earth.
                                                              16


Body of Knowledge: Physical Science (P)
Standard 8: Matter
   A. A working definition of matter is that it takes up space, has mass, and has measurable properties. Matter
   is comprised of atomic, subatomic, and elementary particles.
   B. Electrons are key to defining chemical and some physical properties, reactivity, and molecular structures.
   Repeating (periodic) patterns of physical and chemical properties occur among elements that define groups
   of elements with similar properties. The periodic table displays the repeating patterns, which are related to
   the atom's outermost electrons. Atoms bond with each other to form compounds.
   C. In a chemical reaction, one or more reactants are transformed into one or more new products. Many
   factors shape the nature of products and the rates of reaction.
   D. Carbon-based compounds are building-blocks of known life forms on earth and numerous useful natural
   and synthetic products.
Standard 10: Energy
   A. Energy is involved in all physical and chemical processes. It is conserved, and can be transformed from
   one form to another and into work. At the atomic and nuclear levels energy is not continuous but exists in
   discrete amounts. Energy and mass are related through Einstein's equation E=mc<sup>2</sup>.
   B. The properties of atomic nuclei are responsible for energy-related phenomena such as radioactivity,
   fission and fusion.
   C. Changes in entropy and energy that accompany chemical reactions influence reaction paths. Chemical
   reactions result in the release or absorption of energy.
Standard 12: Motion
   A. Motion can be measured and described qualitatively and quantitatively. Net forces create a change in
   motion. When objects travel at speeds comparable to the speed of light, Einstein's special theory of relativity
   applies.
   B. Momentum is conserved under well-defined conditions. A change in momentum occurs when a net force
   is applied to an object over a time interval.
   C. The Law of Universal Gravitation states that gravitational forces act on all objects irrespective of their
   size and position.
   D. Gases consist of great numbers of molecules moving in all directions. The behavior of gases can be
   modeled by the kinetic molecular theory.
   E. Chemical reaction rates change with conditions under which they occur. Chemical equilibrium is a
   dynamic state in which forward and reverse processes occur at the same rates.
Body of Knowledge: Life Science (L)
Standard 14: Organization and Development of Living Organisms
   A. Cells have characteristic structures and functions that make them distinctive.
   B. Processes in a cell can be classified broadly as growth, maintenance, reproduction, and homeostasis.
   C. Life can be organized in a functional and structural hierarchy ranging from cells to the biosphere.
   D. Most multicellular organisms are composed of organ systems whose structures reflect their particular
   function.
Standard 15: Diversity and Evolution of Living Organisms
   A.  The scientific theory of evolution is the fundamental concept underlying all of biology.
   B.  The scientific theory of evolution is supported by multiple forms of scientific evidence.
   C.  Organisms are classified based on their evolutionary history.
   D.  Natural selection is a primary mechanism leading to evolutionary change.
                                                             17


Standard 16: Heredity and Reproduction
   A. DNA stores and transmits genetic information. Genes are sets of instructions encoded in the structure of
   DNA.
   B. Genetic information is passed from generation to generation by DNA in all organisms and accounts for
   similarities in related individuals.
   C. Manipulation of DNA in organisms has led to commercial production of biological molecules on a large
   scale and genetically modified organisms.
   D. Reproduction is characteristic of living things and is essential for the survival of species.
Standard 17: Interdependence
   A. The distribution and abundance of organisms is determined by the interactions between organisms, and
   between organisms and the non-living environment.
   B. Energy and nutrients move within and between biotic and abiotic components of ecosystems via physical,
   chemical and biological processes.
   C. Human activities and natural events can have profound effects on populations, biodiversity and
   ecosystem processes.
Standard 18: Matter and Energy Transformations
   A. All living things are composed of four basic categories of macromolecules and share the same basic
   needs for life.
   B. Living organisms acquire the energy they need for life processes through various metabolic pathways
   (primarily photosynthesis and cellular respiration).
   C. Chemical reactions in living things follow basic rules of chemistry and are usually regulated by enzymes.
   D. The unique chemical properties of carbon and water make life on Earth possible.
Laboratory Component for Grades 6-8 and 9-12
Laboratory investigations which include the use of scientific inquiry, research, measurement,
problem solving, laboratory apparatus and technologies, experimental procedures, and safety
procedures are an integral part of the science courses for grades 6-12.
Science Benchmark Codes
Grades K-8
         SC           5            E            5               1
      Subject Grade            Body of        Big         Benchmark
                             Knowledge       Idea
Grades 9-12
         SC            912              E           5              1
      Subject        Grade          Body of     Standard     Benchmark
                      Span        Knowledge
Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
The Access Points were developed to provide access to the general education curriculum for
students with significant cognitive disabilities. The Access Points reflect the core intent of the
standards with reduced levels of complexity. The three levels of complexity are participatory,
supported, and independent, with the participatory level being the least complex. The Florida
Alternate Assessment will measure achievement on the Access Points for students with
significant cognitive disabilities.
                                                             18


Science Access Point Codes
Grades K-8
     SC        5           E              1            1                In            a
  Subject Grade        Body of           Big     Benchmark       *Complexity       Access
                     Knowledge          Idea                          level         Point
Grades 9-12
    SC        912           E              1             1               In            a
  Subject    Grade      Body of        Standard    Benchmark *Complexity Access
             Span     Knowledge                                        level        Point
*The three levels of complexity for the Access Points are:
   •In – Independent
   •Su – Supported
   •Pa – Participatory
                            5020010 Science - Grade Kindergarten
Section: Basic and Adult Education                         Grade Group: Elementary Grades PreK-5
Subject: Science                                           Domain: General Sciences
Course Length: Year                                        Level: 0
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                 Benchmarks
                                                                                                    Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                 Knowledge
SC.K.N.1.1         Collaborate with a partner to collect information.                               Low
SC.K.N.1.2         Make observations of the natural world and know that they are descriptors        Moderate
                   collected using the five senses.
SC.K.N.1.3         Keep records as appropriate -- such as pictorial records -- of investigations    Moderate
                   conducted.
SC.K.N.1.4         Observe and create a visual representation of an object which includes its major High
                   features.
SC.K.N.1.5         Recognize that learning can come from careful observation.                       Moderate
SC.K.E.5.1         Explore the Law of Gravity by investigating how objects are pulled toward the    Moderate
                   ground unless something holds them up.
SC.K.E.5.2         Recognize the repeating pattern of day and night.                                Low
SC.K.E.5.3         Recognize that the Sun can only be seen in the daytime.                          Low
SC.K.E.5.4         Observe that sometimes the Moon can be seen at night and sometimes during the Moderate
                   day.
SC.K.E.5.5         Observe that things can be big and things can be small as seen from Earth.       High
SC.K.E.5.6         Observe that some objects are far away and some are nearby as seen from Earth. High
SC.K.P.8.1         Sort objects by observable properties, such as size, shape, color, temperature   Moderate
                   (hot or cold), weight (heavy or light) and texture.
SC.K.P.9.1         Recognize that the shape of materials such as paper and clay can be changed by Low
                   cutting, tearing, crumpling, smashing, or rolling.
SC.K.P.10.1        Observe that things that make sound vibrate.                                     Low
                                                           19


SC.K.P.12.1        Investigate that things move in different ways, such as fast, slow, etc.             High
SC.K.P.13.1        Observe that a push or a pull can change the way an object is moving.                Low
SC.K.L.14.1        Recognize the five senses and related body parts.                                    Low
SC.K.L.14.2        Recognize that some books and other media portray animals and plants with            Moderate
                   characteristics and behaviors they do not have in real life.
SC.K.L.14.3        Observe plants and animals, describe how they are alike and how they are             Moderate
                   different in the way they look and in the things they do.
               Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code     Access Point Descriptor
SC.K.N.1.In.a          Identify a partner to obtain information.
SC.K.N.1.Su.b          Identify information about objects in the natural world through observation.
SC.K.N.1.Su.c          Observe, explore, and match pictures to real objects.
SC.K.E.5.In.a          Identify that objects can fall to the ground unless something stops them.
SC.K.E.5.Su.b          Identify one common activity that occurs in the day and one that occurs in the night.
SC.K.E.5.Pa.c          Associate the Sun with daytime.
SC.K.P.8.In.a          Sort objects by observable properties, such as size, shape, or color.
SC.K.P.9.In.a          Recognize that the shape of objects, such as paper, changes when cut, torn, or crumpled.
SC.K.P.10.In.a         Identify objects that create specific sounds.
SC.K.P.12.In.a         Identify ways that things move, such as fast or slow.
SC.K.P.13.In.a         Demonstrate pushing or pulling of an object to make it move.
SC.K.L.14.In.a         Recognize the senses of sight, hearing, and smell and related body parts.
SC.K.L.14.Su.b         Distinguish a real animal and an animal that is not a living thing, such as a toy animal.
                                    5020020 Science - Grade One
Section: Basic and Adult Education                           Grade Group: Elementary Grades PreK-5
Subject: Science                                             Domain: General Sciences
Course Length: Year                                          Level: 0
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                  Benchmarks
                                                                                                        Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                     Knowledge
SC.1.N.1.1         Raise questions about the natural world, investigate them in teams through free      High
                   exploration, and generate appropriate explanations based on those explorations.
SC.1.N.1.2         Using the five senses as tools, make careful observations, describe objects in       Moderate
                   terms of number, shape, texture, size, weight, color, and motion, and compare
                   their observations with others.
SC.1.N.1.3         Keep records as appropriate - such as pictorial and written records - of             Moderate
                   investigations conducted.
SC.1.N.1.4         Ask "how do you know?" in appropriate situations.                                    Moderate
SC.1.E.5.1         Observe and discuss that there are more stars in the sky than anyone can easily      Moderate
                   count and that they are not scattered evenly in the sky.
SC.1.E.5.2         Explore the Law of Gravity by demonstrating that Earth's gravity pulls any           Moderate
                   object on or near Earth toward it even though nothing is touching the object.
                                                            20


SC.1.E.5.3        Investigate how magnifiers make things appear bigger and help people see             Moderate
                  things they could not see without them.
SC.1.E.5.4        Identify the beneficial and harmful properties of the Sun.                           Moderate
SC.1.E.6.1        Recognize that water, rocks, soil, and living organisms are found on Earth's         Low
                  surface.
SC.1.E.6.2        Describe the need for water and how to be safe around water.                         Moderate
SC.1.E.6.3        Recognize that some things in the world around us happen fast and some happen        High
                  slowly.
SC.1.P.8.1        Sort objects by observable properties, such as size, shape, color, temperature       Moderate
                  (hot or cold), weight (heavy or light), texture, and whether objects sink or float.
SC.1.P.12.1       Demonstrate and describe the various ways that objects can move, such as in a        Moderate
                  straight line, zigzag, back-and-forth, round-and-round, fast, and slow.
SC.1.P.13.1       Demonstrate that the way to change the motion of an object is by applying a          Moderate
                  push or a pull.
SC.1.L.14.1       Make observations of living things and their environment using the five senses.      Low
SC.1.L.14.2       Identify the major parts of plants, including stem, roots, leaves, and flowers.      Low
SC.1.L.14.3       Differentiate between living and nonliving things.                                   High
SC.1.L.16.1       Make observations that plants and animals closely resemble their parents, but        Low
                  variations exist among individuals within a population.
SC.1.L.17.1       Through observation, recognize that all plants and animals, including humans,        Low
                  need the basic necessities of air, water, food, and space.
               Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code    Access Point Descriptor
SC.1.N.1.In.a         Request information about the environment.
SC.1.N.1.Su.b         Recognize differences in objects through observation of size, shape, or color
SC.1.E.5.In.a         Identify that there are many stars in the sky.
SC.1.E.5.Su.b         Indicate the location of an object before and after it falls.
SC.1.E.5.Pa.c         Recognize a familiar object enlarged by magnification.
SC.1.E.6.In.a         Identify rocks, water, and living things in the environment.
SC.1.E.6.Su.b         Identify reasons people need water.
SC.1.E.6.Pa.c         Recognize an action as fast or slow.
SC.1.P.8.In.a         Sort objects by observable properties, such as size, shape, color, or texture.
SC.1.P.12.In.a        Demonstrate and identify that objects can move in different ways, such as up and down,
                      in a straight line, and back and forth.
SC.1.P.13.In.a        Identify the effect that a push or pull has on an object, such as changing the way an
                      object moves.
SC.1.L.14.In.a        Use sight, hearing, and smell to make observations.
SC.1.L.14.Su.b        Recognize the leaf and flower of a plant.
SC.1.L.14.Pa.c        Recognize self and others as living things.
SC.1.L.16.In.a        Match offspring of specific animals to adult animals.
SC.1.L.17.In.a        Observe and recognize that plants and animals need water and food.
                                                          21


                                   5020030 Science - Grade Two
Section: Basic and Adult Education                          Grade Group: Elementary Grades PreK-5
Subject: Science                                            Domain: General Sciences
Course Length: Year                                         Level: 0
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                   Benchmarks
                                                                                                          Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                       Knowledge
SC.2.N.1.1         Raise questions about the natural world, investigate them in teams through free        High
                   exploration and systematic observations, and generate appropriate explanations
                   based on those explorations.
SC.2.N.1.2         Compare the observations made by different groups using the same tools.                Moderate
SC.2.N.1.3         Ask "how do you know?" in appropriate situations and attempt reasonable                High
                   answers when asked the same question by others.
SC.2.N.1.4         Explain how particular scientific investigations should yield similar conclusions      High
                   when repeated.
SC.2.N.1.5         Distinguish between empirical observation (what you see, hear, feel, smell, or         Moderate
                   taste) and ideas or inferences (what you think).
SC.2.N.1.6         Explain how scientists alone or in groups are always investigating new ways to         Moderate
                   solve problems.
SC.2.E.6.1         Recognize that Earth is made up of rocks. Rocks come in many sizes and shapes.         Moderate
SC.2.E.6.2         Describe how small pieces of rock and dead plant and animal parts can be the           High
                   basis of soil and explain the process by which soil is formed.
SC.2.E.6.3         Classify soil types based on color, texture (size of particles), the ability to retain High
                   water, and the ability to support the growth of plants.
SC.2.E.7.1         Compare and describe changing patterns in nature that repeat themselves, such          Moderate
                   as weather conditions including temperature and precipitation, day to day and
                   season to season.
SC.2.E.7.2         Investigate by observing and measuring, that the Sun's energy directly and             High
                   indirectly warms the water, land, and air.
SC.2.E.7.3         Investigate, observe and describe how water left in an open container disappears       High
                   (evaporates), but water in a closed container does not disappear (evaporate).
SC.2.E.7.4         Investigate that air is all around us and that moving air is wind.                     High
SC.2.E.7.5         State the importance of preparing for severe weather, lightning, and other             Low
                   weather related events.
SC.2.P.8.1         Observe and measure objects in terms of their properties, including size, shape,       Low
                   color, temperature, weight, texture, sinking or floating in water, and attraction
                   and repulsion of magnets.
SC.2.P.8.2         Identify objects and materials as solid, liquid, or gas.                               Low
SC.2.P.8.3         Recognize that solids have a definite shape and that liquids and gases take the        Low
                   shape of their container.
SC.2.P.8.4         Observe and describe water in its solid, liquid, and gaseous states.                   Low
SC.2.P.8.5         Measure and compare temperatures taken every day at the same time.                     Moderate
SC.2.P.8.6         Measure and compare the volume of liquids using containers of various shapes           Moderate
                   and sizes.
SC.2.P.9.1         Investigate that materials can be altered to change some of their properties, but      High
                   not all materials respond the same way to any one alteration.
                                                            22


SC.2.P.10.1       Discuss that people use electricity or other forms of energy to cook their food,   Low
                  cool or warm their homes, and power their cars.
SC.2.P.13.1       Investigate the effect of applying various pushes and pulls on different objects.  High
SC.2.P.13.2       Demonstrate that magnets can be used to make some things move without              Low
                  touching them.
SC.2.P.13.3       Recognize that objects are pulled toward the ground unless something holds         Low
                  them up.
SC.2.P.13.4       Demonstrate that the greater the force (push or pull) applied to an object, the    Moderate
                  greater the change in motion of the object.
SC.2.L.14.1       Distinguish human body parts (brain, heart, lungs, stomach, muscles, and           Moderate
                  skeleton) and their basic functions.
SC.2.L.16.1       Observe and describe major stages in the life cycles of plants and animals,        Moderate
                  including beans and butterflies.
SC.2.L.17.1       Compare and contrast the basic needs that all living things, including humans,     Moderate
                  have for survival.
SC.2.L.17.2       Recognize and explain that living things are found all over Earth, but each is     Moderate
                  only able to live in habitats that meet its basic needs.
               Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code    Access Point Descriptor
SC.2.N.1.In.a         Ask questions and make observations about things in the natural world.
SC.2.N.1.Su.b         Identify characteristics of objects based on observation.
SC.2.N.1.Pa.c         Recognize common objects in different environments.
SC.2.E.6.In.a         Sort rocks according to size and shape.
SC.2.E.6.Su.b         Identify small pieces of rock in the soil.
SC.2.E.7.In.a         Identify common weather patterns associated with each season.
SC.2.E.7.Su.b         Recognize that items outside are heated by the Sun.
SC.2.E.7.Pa.c         Indicate awareness of air moving.
SC.2.P.8.In.a         Identify objects by observable properties, such as, size, shape, color,
SC.2.P.8.Su.b         Recognize water in solid or liquid states.
SC.2.P.8.Pa.c         Recognize different containers that hold liquids.
SC.2.P.9.In.a         Explore and identify that observable properties of materials can be changed.
SC.2.P.10.In.a        Identify ways people use electricity in their lives.
SC.2.P.13.In.a        Observe and identify that pushing or pulling an object can change the direction of
                      movement of the object.
SC.2.P.13.Su.b        Use magnets to cause objects to move.
SC.2.L.14.In.a        Identify major external body parts, such as hands and legs, and their uses.
SC.2.L.16.In.a        Observe and recognize the major stages in the life cycles of plants and animals.
SC.2.L.17.In.a        Identify the basic needs of living things, including water, food, and air.
SC.2.L.17.Su.b        Recognize that many kinds of living things are found in the environment.
                                                           23


                                  5020040 Science - Grade Three
Section: Basic and Adult Education                         Grade Group: Elementary Grades PreK-5
Subject: Science                                           Domain: General Sciences
Course Length: Year                                        Level: 0
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                  Benchmarks
                                                                                                       Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                    Knowledge
SC.3.N.1.1         Raise questions about the natural world, investigate them individually and in       High
                   teams through free exploration and systematic investigations, and generate
                   appropriate explanations based on those explorations.
SC.3.N.1.2         Compare the observations made by different groups using the same tools and          High
                   seek reasons to explain the differences across groups.
SC.3.N.1.3         Keep records as appropriate, such as pictorial, written, or simple charts and       Moderate
                   graphs, of investigations conducted.
SC.3.N.1.4         Recognize the importance of communication among scientists.                         Moderate
SC.3.N.1.5         Recognize that scientists question, discuss, and check each others' evidence and Moderate
                   explanations.
SC.3.N.1.6         Infer based on observation.                                                         High
SC.3.N.1.7         Explain that empirical evidence is information, such as observations or             High
                   measurements, that is used to help validate explanations of natural phenomena.
SC.3.N.3.1         Recognize that words in science can have different or more specific meanings        Moderate
                   than their use in everyday language; for example, energy, cell, heat/cold, and
                   evidence.
SC.3.N.3.2         Recognize that scientists use models to help understand and explain how things      Low
                   work.
SC.3.N.3.3         Recognize that all models are approximations of natural phenomena; as such,         Moderate
                   they do not perfectly account for all observations.
SC.3.E.5.1         Explain that stars can be different; some are smaller, some are larger, and some    High
                   appear brighter than others; all except the Sun are so far away that they look like
                   points of light.
SC.3.E.5.2         Identify the Sun as a star that emits energy; some of it in the form of light.      Moderate
SC.3.E.5.3         Recognize that the Sun appears large and bright because it is the closest star to   High
                   Earth.
SC.3.E.5.4         Explore the Law of Gravity by demonstrating that gravity is a force that can be     High
                   overcome.
SC.3.E.5.5         Investigate that the number of stars that can be seen through telescopes is         Moderate
                   dramatically greater than those seen by the unaided eye.
SC.3.E.6.1         Demonstrate that radiant energy from the Sun can heat objects and when the Sun      High
                   is not present, heat may be lost.
SC.3.P.8.1         Measure and compare temperatures of various samples of solids and liquids.          Moderate
SC.3.P.8.2         Measure and compare the mass and volume of solids and liquids.                      Moderate
SC.3.P.8.3         Compare materials and objects according to properties such as size, shape,          Moderate
                   color, texture, and hardness.
SC.3.P.9.1         Describe the changes water undergoes when it changes state through heating and Moderate
                   cooling by using familiar scientific terms such as melting, freezing, boiling,
                   evaporation, and condensation.
                                                           24


SC.3.P.10.1       Identify some basic forms of energy such as light, heat, sound, electrical, and         Low
                  mechanical.
SC.3.P.10.2       Recognize that energy has the ability to cause motion or create change.                 Low
SC.3.P.10.3       Demonstrate that light travels in a straight line until it strikes an object or travels Moderate
                  from one medium to another.
SC.3.P.10.4       Demonstrate that light can be reflected, refracted, and absorbed.                       Moderate
SC.3.P.11.1       Investigate, observe, and explain that things that give off light often also give off   High
                  heat.
SC.3.P.11.2       Investigate, observe, and explain that heat is produced when one object rubs            High
                  against another, such as rubbing one's hands together.
SC.3.L.14.1       Describe structures in plants and their roles in food production, support, water        Moderate
                  and nutrient transport, and reproduction.
SC.3.L.14.2       Investigate and describe how plants respond to stimuli (heat, light, gravity), such     High
                  as the way plant stems grow toward light and their roots grow downward in
                  response to gravity.
SC.3.L.15.1       Classify animals into major groups (mammals, birds, reptiles, amphibians, fish,         Moderate
                  arthropods, vertebrates and invertebrates, those having live births and those
                  which lay eggs) according to their physical characteristics and behaviors.
SC.3.L.15.2       Classify flowering and nonflowering plants into major groups such as those that         Moderate
                  produce seeds, or those like ferns and mosses that produce spores, according to
                  their physical characteristics.
SC.3.L.17.1       Describe how animals and plants respond to changing seasons.                            Moderate
SC.3.L.17.2       Recognize that plants use energy from the Sun, air, and water to make their own Low
                  food.
               Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code    Access Point Descriptor
SC.3.N.1.In.a         Ask questions, explore, observe, and identify outcomes.
SC.3.N.1.Su.b         Work with a partner to make observations.
SC.3.N.1.Pa.c         Recognize that people share information.
SC.3.N.3.In.a         Recognize meanings of words used in science, such as energy, temperature, and gravity.
SC.3.N.3.Su.b         Recognize that models represent real things.
SC.3.E.5.In.a         Recognize that stars in the sky look different from each other.
SC.3.E.5.Su.b         Recognize that the Sun gives off light.
SC.3.E.5.Pa.c         Recognize that an object can be stopped from falling.
SC.3.E.5.In.d         Observe and describe ways to keep an object from falling due to gravity.
SC.3.E.5.Su.e         Recognize a telescope as a tool to view stars in space.
SC.3.E.6.In.a         Identify that energy from the Sun heats objects.
SC.3.P.8.In.a         Observe and identify the colder/hotter temperature measured on a thermometer.
SC.3.P.8.Su.b         Sort solid objects by weight (heavy and light).
SC.3.P.8.Pa.c         Match objects by an observable property, such as size, shape, and color.
SC.3.P.9.In.a         Describe changes in the state of water as a result of freezing and melting.
SC.3.P.10.In.a        Recognize forms of energy, such as light, heat, electrical, and energy of motion.
SC.3.P.10.Su.b        Recognize examples of sources of light, such as the Sun or a flashlight.
SC.3.P.11.In.a        Identify that objects that give off light often give off heat.
SC.3.P.11.Su.b        Observe and recognize that rubbing objects together causes heat.
                                                           25


SC.3.L.14.In.a         Identify the major parts of a plant, including seed, root, stem, leaf, and flower, and their
                       functions.
SC.3.L.14.Su.b         Recognize that plants grow toward light and roots grow down in the soil.
SC.3.L.15.In.a         Classify animals by a similar physical characteristic, such as fur, feathers, and number of
                       legs.
SC.3.L.15.Su.b         Sort common plants by observable characteristics.
SC.3.L.17.In.a         Identify changes in the appearance of animals and plants throughout the year.
SC.3.L.17.Su.b         Recognize that plants need light to grow.
                                   5020050 Science - Grade Four
Section: Basic and Adult Education                          Grade Group: Elementary Grades PreK-5
Subject: Science                                            Domain: General Sciences
Course Length: Year                                         Level: 0
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                  Benchmarks
                                                                                                          Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                       Knowledge
SC.4.N.1.1         Raise questions about the natural world, use appropriate reference materials that      High
                   support understanding to obtain information (identifying the source), conduct
                   both individual and team investigations through free exploration and systematic
                   investigations,
SC.4.N.1.2         Compare the observations made by different groups using multiple tools and             High
                   seek reasons to explain the differences across groups.
SC.4.N.1.3         Explain that science does not always follow a rigidly defined method ("the             Moderate
                   scientific method") but that science does involve the use of observations and
                   empirical evidence.
SC.4.N.1.4         Attempt reasonable answers to scientific questions and cite evidence in support.       High
SC.4.N.1.5         Compare the methods and results of investigations done by other classmates.            Moderate
SC.4.N.1.6         Keep records that describe observations made, carefully distinguishing actual          High
                   observations from ideas and inferences about the observations.
SC.4.N.1.7         Recognize and explain that scientists base their explanations on evidence.             Moderate
SC.4.N.1.8         Recognize that science involves creativity in designing experiments.                   Moderate
SC.4.N.2.1         Explain that science focuses solely on the natural world.                              Moderate
SC.4.N.3.1         Explain that models can be three dimensional, two dimensional, an explanation Moderate
                   in your mind, or a computer model.
SC.4.E.5.1         Observe that the patterns of stars in the sky stay the same although they appear High
                   to shift across the sky nightly, and different stars can be seen in different seasons.
SC.4.E.5.2         Describe the changes in the observable shape of the moon over the course of            Moderate
                   about a month.
SC.4.E.5.3         Recognize that Earth revolves around the Sun in a year and rotates on its axis in Moderate
                   a 24-hour day.
SC.4.E.5.4         Relate that the rotation of Earth (day and night) and apparent movements of the High
                   Sun, Moon, and stars are connected.
SC.4.E.5.5         Investigate and report the effects of space research and exploration on the            High
                   economy and culture of Florida.
                                                            26


SC.4.E.6.1  Identify the three categories of rocks: igneous, (formed from molten rock);          Low
            sedimentary (pieces of other rocks and fossilized organisms); and metamorphic
            (formed from heat and pressure).
SC.4.E.6.2  Identify the physical properties of common earth-forming minerals, including         Moderate
            hardness, color, luster, cleavage, and streak color, and recognize the role of
            minerals in the formation of rocks.
SC.4.E.6.3  Recognize that humans need resources found on Earth and that these are either        Moderate
            renewable or nonrenewable.
SC.4.E.6.4  Describe the basic differences between physical weathering (breaking down of         Moderate
            rock by wind, water, ice, temperature change, and plants) and erosion
            (movement of rock by gravity, wind, water, and ice).
SC.4.E.6.5  Investigate how technology and tools help to extend the ability of humans to         High
            observe very small things and very large things.
SC.4.E.6.6  Identify resources available in Florida (water, phosphate, oil, limestone, silicon,  Low
            wind, and solar energy).
SC.4.P.8.1  Measure and compare objects and materials based on their physical properties         Moderate
            including: mass, shape, volume, color, hardness, texture, odor, taste, attraction to
            magnets.
SC.4.P.8.2  Identify properties and common uses of water in each of its states.                  Low
SC.4.P.8.3  Explore the Law of Conservation of Mass by demonstrating that the mass of a          Moderate
            whole object is always the same as the sum of the masses of its parts.
SC.4.P.8.4  Investigate and describe that magnets can attract magnetic materials and attract     High
            and repel other magnets.
SC.4.P.9.1  Identify some familiar changes in materials that result in other materials with      Low
            different characteristics, such as decaying animal or plant matter, burning,
            rusting, and cooking.
SC.4.P.10.1 Observe and describe some basic forms of energy, including light, heat, sound,       Moderate
            electrical, and the energy of motion.
SC.4.P.10.2 Investigate and describe that energy has the ability to cause motion or create       Moderate
            change.
SC.4.P.10.3 Investigate and explain that sound is produced by vibrating objects and that         High
            pitch depends on how fast or slow the object vibrates.
SC.4.P.10.4 Describe how moving water and air are sources of energy and can be used to           Moderate
            move things.
SC.4.P.11.1 Recognize that heat flows from a hot object to a cold object and that heat flow      Low
            may cause materials to change temperature.
SC.4.P.11.2 Identify common materials that conduct heat well or poorly.                          Low
SC.4.P.12.1 Recognize that an object in motion always changes its position and may change        Low
            its direction.
SC.4.P.12.2 Investigate and describe that the speed of an object is determined by the distance   Moderate
            it travels in a unit of time and that objects can move at different speeds.
SC.4.L.16.1 Identify processes of sexual reproduction in flowering plants, including             Moderate
            pollination, fertilization (seed production), seed dispersal, and germination.
SC.4.L.16.2 Explain that although characteristics of plants and animals are inherited, some      High
            characteristics can be affected by the environment.
SC.4.L.16.3 Recognize that animal behaviors may be shaped by heredity and learning.              High
SC.4.L.16.4 Compare and contrast the major stages in the life cycles of Florida plants and       Moderate
            animals, such as those that undergo incomplete and complete metamorphosis,
            and flowering and nonflowering seed-bearing plants.
SC.4.L.17.1 Compare the seasonal changes in Florida plants and animals to those in other         Moderate
            regions of the country.
                                                     27


SC.4.L.17.2       Explain that animals, including humans, cannot make their own food and that          Moderate
                  when animals eat plants or other animals, the energy stored in the food source is
                  passed to them.
SC.4.L.17.3       Trace the flow of energy from the Sun as it is transferred along the food chain      Moderate
                  through the producers to the consumers.
SC.4.L.17.4       Recognize ways plants and animals, including humans, can impact the                  High
                  environment.
               Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code    Access Point Descriptor
SC.4.N.1.In.a         Ask a question about the natural world and use selected reference material to find
                      information, observe, explore, and identify findings.
                      Identify that a hot object will make a cold object warm when they touch.
SC.4.N.1.Su.b         Identify information based on observations of self and others.
SC.4.N.1.Pa.c         Select an object or picture to represent observed events.
SC.4.N.2.In.a         Identify that science focuses on the natural world.
SC.4.N.3.In.a         Identify different types of models, such as a replica, a picture, or an animation.
SC.4.E.5.In.a         Identify that there are many stars in the sky with some that create patterns.
SC.4.E.5.Su.b         Identify a full moon and a half (quarter) moon.
SC.4.E.5.Pa.c         Identify morning, noon, and night.
SC.4.E.6.In.a         Recognize that rocks are classified by the way they are formed, such as sedimentary.
SC.4.E.6.Su.b         Sort common minerals, such as rock salt, talc, gold, and silver, by their physical
                      properties (luster and color).
SC.4.E.6.Pa.c         Recognize the universal symbol for recycling.
SC.4.P.8.In.a         Compare objects and materials based on physical properties, such as size, shape, color,
                      texture, weight, hardness, odor, taste, and temperature.
SC.4.P.8.Su.b         Identify uses of water in solid or liquid states.
SC.4.P.8.Pa.c         Recognize that some objects have parts.
SC.4.P.9.In.a         Observe and describe properties of materials that have been changed into other
                      materials, such as decayed leaves of a plant.
SC.4.P.10.In.a        Identify forms of energy, such as light, heat, electrical, and energy of motion.
SC.4.P.10.Su.b        Recognize the results of using electrical energy (turning on television); heat energy
                      (burning wood); and energy of motion (rolling ball).
SC.4.P.10.Pa.c        Recognize that moving air can move objects.
SC.4.P.11.Su.b        Recognize a common material that is a strong conductor of heat, such as metal.
SC.4.P.12.In.a        Identify that the position of an object changes when the object is in motion.
SC.4.P.12.Su.b        Identify objects that move at different speeds.
SC.4.L.16.In.a        Identify that insects spread pollen to help flowering plants make seeds.
SC.4.L.16.Su.b        Recognize behaviors of common animals.
SC.4.L.16.Pa.c        Match offspring of animals with parents.
SC.4.L.17.In.a        Identify seasonal changes in Florida plants and animals.
SC.4.L.17.Su.b        Recognize that animals (consumers) eat plants or other animals for their food.
SC.4.L.17.Pa.c        Recognize ways that people can help improve the immediate environment, such as
                      cleaning up trash.
                                                           28


                                    5020060 Science - Grade Five
Section: Basic and Adult Education                          Grade Group: Elementary Grades PreK-5
Subject: Science                                            Domain: General Sciences
Course Length: Year                                         Level: 0
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                  Benchmarks
                                                                                                       Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                    Knowledge
SC.5.N.1.1         Define a problem, use appropriate reference materials to support scientific         High
                   understanding, plan and carry out scientific investigations of various types such
                   as: systematic observations, experiments requiring the identification of variables,
                   collecting an
SC.5.N.1.2         Explain the difference between an experiment and other types of scientific          Moderate
                   investigation.
SC.5.N.1.3         Recognize and explain the need for repeated experimental trials.                    Moderate
SC.5.N.1.4         Identify a control group and explain its importance in an experiment.               Moderate
SC.5.N.1.5         Recognize and explain that authentic scientific investigation frequently does not   Moderate
                   parallel the steps of "the scientific method."
SC.5.N.1.6         Recognize and explain the difference between personal opinion/interpretation        Moderate
                   and verified observation.
SC.5.N.2.1         Recognize and explain that science is grounded in empirical observations that       Moderate
                   are testable; explanation must always be linked with evidence.
SC.5.N.2.2         Recognize and explain that when scientific investigations are carried out, the      Moderate
                   evidence produced by those investigations should be replicable by others.
SC.5.E.5.1         Recognize that a galaxy consists of gas, dust, and many stars, including any        Low
                   objects orbiting the stars. Identify our home galaxy as the Milky Way.
SC.5.E.5.2         Recognize the major common characteristics of all planets and compare/contrast      Moderate
                   the properties of inner and outer planets.
SC.5.E.5.3         Distinguish among the following objects of the Solar System -- Sun, planets,        High
                   moons, asteroids, comets -- and identify Earth's position in it.
SC.5.E.7.1         Create a model to explain the parts of the water cycle. Water can be a gas, a       High
                   liquid, or a solid and can go back and forth from one state to another.
SC.5.E.7.2         Recognize that the ocean is an integral part of the water cycle and is connected    Moderate
                   to all of Earth's water reservoirs via evaporation and precipitation processes.
SC.5.E.7.3         Recognize how air temperature, barometric pressure, humidity, wind speed and        Moderate
                   direction, and precipitation determine the weather in a particular place and time.
SC.5.E.7.4         Distinguish among the various forms of precipitation (rain, snow, sleet, and        High
                   hail), making connections to the weather in a particular place and time.
SC.5.E.7.5         Recognize that some of the weather-related differences, such as temperature and     Moderate
                   humidity, are found among different environments, such as swamps, deserts, and
                   mountains.
SC.5.E.7.6         Describe characteristics (temperature and precipitation) of different climate       High
                   zones as they relate to latitude, elevation, and proximity to bodies of water.
SC.5.E.7.7         Design a family preparedness plan for natural disasters and identify the reasons    Moderate
                   for having such a plan.
SC.5.P.8.1         Compare and contrast the basic properties of solids, liquids, and gases, such as    Moderate
                   mass, volume, color, texture, and temperature.
                                                            29


SC.5.P.8.2        Investigate and identify materials that will dissolve in water and those that will  High
                  not and identify the conditions that will speed up or slow down the dissolving
                  process.
SC.5.P.8.3        Demonstrate and explain that mixtures of solids can be separated based on           Moderate
                  observable properties of their parts such as particle size, shape, color, and
                  magnetic attraction.
SC.5.P.8.4        Explore the scientific theory of atoms (also called atomic theory) by recognizing   Low
                  that all matter is composed of parts that are too small to be seen without
                  magnification.
SC.5.P.9.1        Investigate and describe that many physical and chemical changes are affected       High
                  by temperature.
SC.5.P.10.1       Investigate and describe some basic forms of energy, including light, heat,         Moderate
                  sound, electrical, chemical, and mechanical.
SC.5.P.10.2       Investigate and explain that energy has the ability to cause motion or create       High
                  change.
SC.5.P.10.3       Investigate and explain that an electrically-charged object can attract an          High
                  uncharged object and can either attract or repel another charged object without
                  any contact between the objects.
SC.5.P.10.4       Investigate and explain that electrical energy can be transformed into heat, light, High
                  and sound energy, as well as the energy of motion.
SC.5.P.11.1       Investigate and illustrate the fact that the flow of electricity requires a closed  Moderate
                  circuit (a complete loop).
SC.5.P.11.2       Identify and classify materials that conduct electricity and materials that do not. Moderate
SC.5.P.13.1       Identify familiar forces that cause objects to move, such as pushes or pulls,       Low
                  including gravity acting on falling objects.
SC.5.P.13.2       Investigate and describe that the greater the force applied to it, the greater the  Moderate
                  change in motion of a given object.
SC.5.P.13.3       Investigate and describe that the more mass an object has, the less effect a given  Moderate
                  force will have on the object's motion.
SC.5.P.13.4       Investigate and explain that when a force is applied to an object but it does not   High
                  move, it is because another opposing force is being applied by something in the
                  environment so that the forces are balanced.
SC.5.L.14.1       Identify the organs in the human body and describe their functions, including the   Moderate
                  skin, brain, heart, lungs, stomach, liver, intestines, pancreas, muscles and
                  skeleton, reproductive organs, kidneys, bladder, and sensory organs.
SC.5.L.14.2       Compare and contrast the function of organs and other physical structures of        Moderate
                  plants and animals, including humans, for example: some animals have skeletons
                  for support -- some with internal skeletons others with exoskeletons -- while
                  some plants have stem
SC.5.L.15.1       Describe how, when the environment changes, differences between individuals         High
                  allow some plants and animals to survive and reproduce while others die or
                  move to new locations.
SC.5.L.17.1       Compare and contrast adaptations displayed by animals and plants that enable        Moderate
                  them to survive in different environments such as life cycles variations, animal
                  behaviors and physical characteristics.
              Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code    Access Point Descriptor
SC.5.N.1.In.a         Ask a question about the natural world, use selected reference materials to find
                      information, work with others to carry out a simple experiment, and share results.
                                                            30


SC.5.N.1.Su.b          Identify the result of a simple experiment.
SC.5.N.2.In.a          Identify that science knowledge is based on observations and evidence.
SC.5.N.2.Su.b          Recognize the importance of following correct procedures when carrying out science
                       experiments.
SC.5.E.5.In.a          Identify that a galaxy is made of a very large number of stars and the planets that orbit
                       them.
SC.5.E.5.Su.b          Recognize that surface of planet Earth is covered by water and land.
SC.5.E.7.In.a          Label the state of water in each stage of the water cycle.
SC.5.E.7.Su.b          Observe and recognize that water evaporates over time.
SC.5.E.7.Pa.c          Recognize the weather conditions including hot/cold and raining/not raining during the
                       day.
SC.5.P.8.In.a          Identify basic properties of solids, liquids, and gases, such as color, texture, and
                       temperature.
SC.5.P.8.Su.b          Recognize examples of materials that will dissolve in water.
SC.5.P.8.Pa.c          Separate a group of objects into its parts.
SC.5.P.9.In.a          Observe and identify that heating and cooling can change the properties of materials.
SC.5.P.10.In.a         Identify forms of energy, including heat, light, sound, electrical, and mechanical.
SC.5.P.10.Su.b         Recognize that energy is required to cause motion.
SC.5.P.10.Pa.c         Demonstrate pushing away (repulsion) and pulling (attraction).
SC.5.P.11.In.a         Identify the power source and wires (conductors) in an electrical circuit.
SC.5.P.11.Su.b         Recognize a material that conducts electricity.
SC.5.P.13.In.a         Distinguish between movement of an object caused by gravity and movement caused by
                       pushes and pulls.
SC.5.P.13.Su.b         Recognize that a heavier object is harder to move than a light one.
SC.5.L.15.In.a         Identify ways that plants and animals can be affected by changes in their habitats, such as
                       lack of food or water, disease, or reduced space.
SC.5.L.17.In.a         Identify features of common plants and animals that enable them to survive in different
                       habitats (environments).
                                      2000010 M/J Life Science
Section: Basic and Adult Education                          Grade Group: Middle School Grades 6-8
Subject: Science                                            Domain: Biological Sciences
Course Length: Year                                         Level: 2
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                   Benchmarks
                                                                                                          Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                       Knowledge
SC.6.N.1.1         Define a problem from the sixth grade curriculum, use appropriate reference            High
                   materials to support scientific understanding, plan and carry out scientific
                   investigation of various types, such as systematic observations or experiments,
                   identify variables, co
SC.6.N.1.2         Explain why scientific investigations should be replicable.                            High
SC.6.N.1.3         Explain the difference between an experiment and other types of scientific             High
                   investigation, and explain the relative benefits and limitations of each.
                                                           31


SC.6.N.1.4  Discuss, compare, and negotiate methods used, results obtained, and                 High
            explanations among groups of students conducting the same investigation.
SC.6.N.1.5  Recognize that science involves creativity, not just in designing experiments, but Moderate
            also in creating explanations that fit evidence.
SC.6.N.2.1  Distinguish science from other activities involving thought.                        Moderate
SC.6.N.2.2  Explain that scientific knowledge is durable because it is open to change as new    Moderate
            evidence or interpretations are encountered.
SC.6.N.2.3  Recognize that scientists who make contributions to scientific knowledge come       Low
            from all kinds of backgrounds and possess varied talents, interests, and goals.
SC.6.N.3.1  Recognize and explain that a scientific theory is a well-supported and widely       Moderate
            accepted explanation of nature and is not simply a claim posed by an
            individual. Thus, the use of the term theory in science is very different than
            how it is used in everyday
SC.6.N.3.2  Recognize and explain that a scientific law is a description of a specific          Moderate
            relationship under given conditions in the natural world. Thus, scientific laws are
            different from societal laws.
SC.6.N.3.3  Give several examples of scientific laws.                                           Low
SC.6.N.3.4  Identify the role of models in the context of the sixth grade science benchmarks. Moderate
SC.6.L.14.1 Describe and identify patterns in the hierarchical organization of organisms from   Low
            atoms to molecules and cells to tissues to organs to organ systems to organisms.
SC.6.L.14.2 Investigate and explain the components of the scientific theory of cells (cell      Moderate
            theory): all organisms are composed of cells (single-celled or multi-cellular), all
            cells come from pre-existing cells, and cells are the basic unit of life.
SC.6.L.14.3 Recognize and explore how cells of all organisms undergo similar processes to       Moderate
            maintain homeostasis, including extracting energy from food, getting rid of
            waste, and reproducing.
SC.6.L.14.4 Compare and contrast the structure and function of major organelles of plant and    Moderate
            animal cells, including cell wall, cell membrane, nucleus, cytoplasm,
            chloroplasts, mitochondria, and vacuoles.
SC.6.L.14.5 Identify and investigate the general functions of the major systems of the human    High
            body (digestive, respiratory, circulatory, reproductive, excretory, immune,
            nervous, and musculoskeletal) and describe ways these systems interact with
            each other to maintain
SC.6.L.14.6 Compare and contrast types of infectious agents that may infect the human body,     Moderate
            including viruses, bacteria, fungi, and parasites.
SC.6.L.15.1 Analyze and describe how and why organisms are classified according to shared       High
            characteristics with emphasis on the Linnaean system combined with the concept
            of Domains.
SC.7.N.1.1  Define a problem from the seventh grade curriculum, use appropriate reference       High
            materials to support scientific understanding, plan and carry out scientific
            investigation of various types, such as systematic observations or experiments,
            identify variables,
SC.7.N.1.2  Differentiate replication (by others) from repetition (multiple trials).            Moderate
SC.7.N.1.3  Distinguish between an experiment (which must involve the identification and        Moderate
            control of variables) and other forms of scientific investigation and explain that
            not all scientific knowledge is derived from experimentation.
SC.7.N.1.4  Identify test variables (independent variables) and outcome variables (dependent Low
            variables) in an experiment.
SC.7.N.1.5  Describe the methods used in the pursuit of a scientific explanation as seen in     Moderate
            different fields of science such as biology, geology, and physics.
                                                    32


SC.7.N.1.6  Explain that empirical evidence is the cumulative body of observations of a         Moderate
            natural phenomenon on which scientific explanations are based.
SC.7.N.1.7  Explain that scientific knowledge is the result of a great deal of debate and       Moderate
            confirmation within the science community.
SC.7.N.2.1  Identify an instance from the history of science in which scientific knowledge      Low
            has changed when new evidence or new interpretations are encountered.
SC.7.N.3.1  Recognize and explain the difference between theories and laws and give several     High
            examples of scientific theories and the evidence that supports them.
SC.7.N.3.2  Identify the benefits and limitations of the use of scientific models.              Moderate
SC.7.L.15.1 Recognize that fossil evidence is consistent with the scientific theory of          Moderate
            evolution that living things evolved from earlier species.
SC.7.L.15.2 Explore the scientific theory of evolution by recognizing and explaining ways in    High
            which genetic variation and environmental factors contribute to evolution by
            natural selection and diversity of organisms.
SC.7.L.15.3 Explore the scientific theory of evolution by relating how the inability of a       High
            species to adapt within a changing environment may contribute to the extinction
            of that species.
SC.7.L.16.1 Understand and explain that every organism requires a set of instructions that      High
            specifies its traits, that this hereditary information (DNA) contains genes located
            in the chromosomes of each cell, and that heredity is the passage of these
            instructions from
SC.7.L.16.2 Determine the probabilities for genotype and phenotype combinations using           Moderate
            Punnett Squares and pedigrees.
SC.7.L.16.3 Compare and contrast the general processes of sexual reproduction requiring         Moderate
            meiosis and asexual reproduction requiring mitosis.
SC.7.L.16.4 Recognize and explore the impact of biotechnology (cloning, genetic                 High
            engineering, artificial selection) on the individual, society and the environment.
SC.7.L.17.1 Explain and illustrate the roles of and relationships among producers,              High
            consumers, and decomposers in the process of energy transfer in a food web.
SC.7.L.17.2 Compare and contrast the relationships among organisms such as mutualism,           Moderate
            predation, parasitism, competition, and commensalism.
SC.7.L.17.3 Describe and investigate various limiting factors in the local ecosystem and their  High
            impact on native populations, including food, shelter, water, space, disease,
            parasitism, predation, and nesting sites.
SC.8.N.1.1  Define a problem from the eighth grade curriculum using appropriate reference       High
            materials to support scientific understanding, plan and carry out scientific
            investigations of various types, such as systematic observations or experiments,
            identify variables,
SC.8.N.1.2  Design and conduct a study using repeated trials and replication.                   High
SC.8.N.1.3  Use phrases such as "results support" or "fail to support" in science,              Moderate
            understanding that science does not offer conclusive 'proof' of a knowledge
            claim.
SC.8.N.1.4  Explain how hypotheses are valuable if they lead to further investigations, even    High
            if they turn out not to be supported by the data.
SC.8.N.1.5  Analyze the methods used to develop a scientific explanation as seen in different   High
            fields of science.
SC.8.N.1.6  Understand that scientific investigations involve the collection of relevant        Moderate
            empirical evidence, the use of logical reasoning, and the application of
            imagination in devising hypotheses, predictions, explanations and models to
            make sense of the collected e
SC.8.N.2.1  Distinguish between scientific and pseudoscientific ideas.                          Moderate
                                                       33


SC.8.N.2.2        Discuss what characterizes science and its methods.                                   Moderate
SC.8.N.3.1        Select models useful in relating the results of their own investigations.             High
SC.8.N.3.2        Explain why theories may be modified but are rarely discarded.                        High
SC.8.N.4.1        Explain that science is one of the processes that can be used to inform decision      Moderate
                  making at the community, state, national, and international levels.
SC.8.N.4.2        Explain how political, social, and economic concerns can affect science, and          High
                  vice versa.
SC.8.L.18.1       Describe and investigate the process of photosynthesis, such as the roles of light,   High
                  carbon dioxide, water and chlorophyll; production of food; release of oxygen.
SC.8.L.18.2       Describe and investigate how cellular respiration breaks down food to provide         High
                  energy and releases carbon dioxide.
SC.8.L.18.3       Construct a scientific model of the carbon cycle to show how matter and energy        High
                  are continuously transferred within and between organisms and their physical
                  environment.
SC.8.L.18.4       Cite evidence that living systems follow the Laws of Conservation of Mass and         High
                  Energy.
MA.6.S.6.2        Select and analyze the measures of central tendency or variability to represent,      High
                  describe, analyze, and/or summarize a data set for the purposes of answering
                  questions appropriately.
MA.6.A.3.6        Construct and analyze tables, graphs, and equations to describe linear functions      High
                  and other simple relations using both common language and algebraic notation.
LA.6.4.2.2        The student will record information (e.g., observations, notes, lists, charts,
                  legends) related to a topic, including visual aids to organize and record
                  information and include a list of sources used;
LA.6.2.2.3        The student will organize information to show understanding (e.g., representing
                  main ideas within text through charting, mapping, paraphrasing, summarizing, or
                  comparing/contrasting);
HE.6.C.1.4        Recognize how heredity can affect personal health.
HE.6.C.1.8        Explain how body systems are impacted by hereditary factors and infectious
                  agents.
               Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code    Access Point Descriptor
SC.6.N.1.In.a         Identify a problem from the sixth grade curriculum, use reference materials to gather
                      information, carry out an experiment, collect and record data, and report results.
SC.6.N.1.Su.b         Recognize that experiments involve procedures that can be repeated the same way by
                      others.
SC.6.N.1.Pa.c         Recognize that people conduct activities and share information about science.
SC.6.N.2.In.a         Identify familiar topics included in the study of science.
SC.6.N.2.Su.b         Recognize that scientific knowledge changes when new things are discovered.
SC.6.N.3.In.a         Identify that a scientific theory is an explanation of nature supported by evidence.
SC.6.N.3.Su.b         Recognize events that are based on scientific laws, such as the law of gravity.
SC.6.L.14.In.a        Identify how the major structures of plants and organs of animals work as parts of larger
                      systems, such as the heart is part of the circulatory system that pumps blood.
SC.6.L.14.Su.b        Recognize that there are smaller parts in all living things, too small to be seen without
                      magnification, called cells.
SC.6.L.14.Pa.c        Recognize body parts related to basic needs, such as mouth for eating.
SC.6.L.15.In.a        Classify animals into major groups, such as insects, fish, reptiles, mammals, and birds.
                                                            34


SC.7.N.1.In.a          Identify a problem from the seventh grade curriculum, use reference materials to gather
                       information, carry out an experiment, collect and record data, and report results.
SC.7.N.1.Su.b          Recognize what is tested in a simple experiment (dependent variable).
SC.7.N.1.Pa.c          Associate objects and activities with science.
SC.7.N.2.In.a          Identify an example of a change in scientific knowledge based on new evidence or new
                       interpretations.
SC.7.N.3.In.a          Identify that scientific theories are explanations and laws describe relationships, and both
                       are supported by evidence.
SC.7.N.3.Su.b          Recognize a benefit of using a model to explain how things work.
SC.7.L.15.In.a         Recognize that fossils help people learn about living things that lived a very long time
                       ago.
SC.7.L.15.Su.b         Recognize that common plants or animals have special features that enable them to live
                       in their environment, such as a as a fish has gills so it can live underwater.
SC.7.L.16.In.a         Explain that some characteristics are passed from parent to child (inherited).
SC.7.L.16.Su.b         Recognize that animals, including humans, inherit some characteristics from one parent
                       and some from the other.
SC.7.L.16.Pa.c         Recognize common products, such as medicine, developed through science.
SC.7.L.17.In.a         Identify that in a simple food chain, energy transfers from the Sun to plants (producers),
                       to animals (consumers), and to organisms that cause decay (decomposers).
SC.7.L.17.Su.b         Recognize how living things affect each other in their habitat (ecosystem).
SC.7.L.17.Pa.c         Recognize what happens when animals don’t get food and water.
SC.8.N.1.In.a          Identify a problem from the eighth grade curriculum, use reference materials to gather
                       information, carry out an experiment, collect and record data, and report results.
SC.8.N.1.Su.b          Recognize a possible explanation (hypothesis) for a science problem.
SC.8.N.2.In.a          Identify that scientific knowledge must be supported by evidence.
SC.8.N.3.In.a          Identify models used in the context of one’s own study of science.
SC.8.N.3.Su.b          Recognize that scientific theories can change.
SC.8.N.4.In.a          Identify ways that science processes can be used to make informed decisions in the
                       community, state, and nation.
SC.8.L.18.In.a         Identify structures in plants that enable them to use the energy from the Sun to make
                       their own food through a process called photosynthesis.
SC.8.L.18.Su.b         Recognize that plants and animals get energy from food.
                              2000020 M/J Life Science, Advanced
Section: Basic and Adult Education                           Grade Group: Middle School Grades 6-8
Subject: Science                                             Domain: Biological Sciences
Course Length: Year                                          Level: 3
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                   Benchmarks
                                                                                                        Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                     Knowledge
SC.6.N.1.1         Define a problem from the sixth grade curriculum, use appropriate reference          High
                   materials to support scientific understanding, plan and carry out scientific
                   investigation of various types, such as systematic observations or experiments,
                   identify variables, co
                                                            35


SC.6.N.1.2  Explain why scientific investigations should be replicable.                         High
SC.6.N.1.3  Explain the difference between an experiment and other types of scientific          High
            investigation, and explain the relative benefits and limitations of each.
SC.6.N.1.4  Discuss, compare, and negotiate methods used, results obtained, and                 High
            explanations among groups of students conducting the same investigation.
SC.6.N.1.5  Recognize that science involves creativity, not just in designing experiments, but  Moderate
            also in creating explanations that fit evidence.
SC.6.N.2.1  Distinguish science from other activities involving thought.                        Moderate
SC.6.N.2.2  Explain that scientific knowledge is durable because it is open to change as new    Moderate
            evidence or interpretations are encountered.
SC.6.N.2.3  Recognize that scientists who make contributions to scientific knowledge come       Low
            from all kinds of backgrounds and possess varied talents, interests, and goals.
SC.6.N.3.1  Recognize and explain that a scientific theory is a well-supported and widely       Moderate
            accepted explanation of nature and is not simply a claim posed by an
            individual. Thus, the use of the term theory in science is very different than
            how it is used in everyday
SC.6.N.3.2  Recognize and explain that a scientific law is a description of a specific          Moderate
            relationship under given conditions in the natural world. Thus, scientific laws are
            different from societal laws.
SC.6.N.3.3  Give several examples of scientific laws.                                           Low
SC.6.N.3.4  Identify the role of models in the context of the sixth grade science benchmarks.   Moderate
SC.6.L.14.1 Describe and identify patterns in the hierarchical organization of organisms from   Low
            atoms to molecules and cells to tissues to organs to organ systems to organisms.
SC.6.L.14.2 Investigate and explain the components of the scientific theory of cells (cell      Moderate
            theory): all organisms are composed of cells (single-celled or multi-cellular), all
            cells come from pre-existing cells, and cells are the basic unit of life.
SC.6.L.14.3 Recognize and explore how cells of all organisms undergo similar processes to       Moderate
            maintain homeostasis, including extracting energy from food, getting rid of
            waste, and reproducing.
SC.6.L.14.4 Compare and contrast the structure and function of major organelles of plant and    Moderate
            animal cells, including cell wall, cell membrane, nucleus, cytoplasm,
            chloroplasts, mitochondria, and vacuoles.
SC.6.L.14.5 Identify and investigate the general functions of the major systems of the human    High
            body (digestive, respiratory, circulatory, reproductive, excretory, immune,
            nervous, and musculoskeletal) and describe ways these systems interact with
            each other to maintain
SC.6.L.14.6 Compare and contrast types of infectious agents that may infect the human body,     Moderate
            including viruses, bacteria, fungi, and parasites.
SC.6.L.15.1 Analyze and describe how and why organisms are classified according to shared       High
            characteristics with emphasis on the Linnaean system combined with the concept
            of Domains.
SC.7.N.1.1  Define a problem from the seventh grade curriculum, use appropriate reference       High
            materials to support scientific understanding, plan and carry out scientific
            investigation of various types, such as systematic observations or experiments,
            identify variables,
SC.7.N.1.2  Differentiate replication (by others) from repetition (multiple trials).            Moderate
SC.7.N.1.3  Distinguish between an experiment (which must involve the identification and        Moderate
            control of variables) and other forms of scientific investigation and explain that
            not all scientific knowledge is derived from experimentation.
SC.7.N.1.4  Identify test variables (independent variables) and outcome variables (dependent    Low
            variables) in an experiment.
                                                    36


SC.7.N.1.5  Describe the methods used in the pursuit of a scientific explanation as seen in     Moderate
            different fields of science such as biology, geology, and physics.
SC.7.N.1.6  Explain that empirical evidence is the cumulative body of observations of a         Moderate
            natural phenomenon on which scientific explanations are based.
SC.7.N.1.7  Explain that scientific knowledge is the result of a great deal of debate and       Moderate
            confirmation within the science community.
SC.7.N.2.1  Identify an instance from the history of science in which scientific knowledge      Low
            has changed when new evidence or new interpretations are encountered.
SC.7.N.3.1  Recognize and explain the difference between theories and laws and give several     High
            examples of scientific theories and the evidence that supports them.
SC.7.N.3.2  Identify the benefits and limitations of the use of scientific models.              Moderate
SC.7.L.15.1 Recognize that fossil evidence is consistent with the scientific theory of          Moderate
            evolution that living things evolved from earlier species.
SC.7.L.15.2 Explore the scientific theory of evolution by recognizing and explaining ways in    High
            which genetic variation and environmental factors contribute to evolution by
            natural selection and diversity of organisms.
SC.7.L.15.3 Explore the scientific theory of evolution by relating how the inability of a       High
            species to adapt within a changing environment may contribute to the extinction
            of that species.
SC.7.L.16.1 Understand and explain that every organism requires a set of instructions that      High
            specifies its traits, that this hereditary information (DNA) contains genes located
            in the chromosomes of each cell, and that heredity is the passage of these
            instructions from
SC.7.L.16.2 Determine the probabilities for genotype and phenotype combinations using           Moderate
            Punnett Squares and pedigrees.
SC.7.L.16.3 Compare and contrast the general processes of sexual reproduction requiring         Moderate
            meiosis and asexual reproduction requiring mitosis.
SC.7.L.16.4 Recognize and explore the impact of biotechnology (cloning, genetic                 High
            engineering, artificial selection) on the individual, society and the environment.
SC.7.L.17.1 Explain and illustrate the roles of and relationships among producers,              High
            consumers, and decomposers in the process of energy transfer in a food web.
SC.7.L.17.2 Compare and contrast the relationships among organisms such as mutualism,           Moderate
            predation, parasitism, competition, and commensalism.
SC.7.L.17.3 Describe and investigate various limiting factors in the local ecosystem and their  High
            impact on native populations, including food, shelter, water, space, disease,
            parasitism, predation, and nesting sites.
SC.8.N.1.1  Define a problem from the eighth grade curriculum using appropriate reference       High
            materials to support scientific understanding, plan and carry out scientific
            investigations of various types, such as systematic observations or experiments,
            identify variables,
SC.8.N.1.2  Design and conduct a study using repeated trials and replication.                   High
SC.8.N.1.3  Use phrases such as "results support" or "fail to support" in science,              Moderate
            understanding that science does not offer conclusive 'proof' of a knowledge
            claim.
SC.8.N.1.4  Explain how hypotheses are valuable if they lead to further investigations, even High
            if they turn out not to be supported by the data.
SC.8.N.1.5  Analyze the methods used to develop a scientific explanation as seen in different High
            fields of science.
                                                       37


SC.8.N.1.6     Understand that scientific investigations involve the collection of relevant        Moderate
               empirical evidence, the use of logical reasoning, and the application of
               imagination in devising hypotheses, predictions, explanations and models to
               make sense of the collected e
SC.8.N.2.1     Distinguish between scientific and pseudoscientific ideas.                          Moderate
SC.8.N.2.2     Discuss what characterizes science and its methods.                                 Moderate
SC.8.N.3.1     Select models useful in relating the results of their own investigations.           High
SC.8.N.3.2     Explain why theories may be modified but are rarely discarded.                      High
SC.8.N.4.1     Explain that science is one of the processes that can be used to inform decision    Moderate
               making at the community, state, national, and international levels.
SC.8.N.4.2     Explain how political, social, and economic concerns can affect science, and        High
               vice versa.
SC.8.L.18.1    Describe and investigate the process of photosynthesis, such as the roles of light, High
               carbon dioxide, water and chlorophyll; production of food; release of oxygen.
SC.8.L.18.2    Describe and investigate how cellular respiration breaks down food to provide       High
               energy and releases carbon dioxide.
SC.8.L.18.3    Construct a scientific model of the carbon cycle to show how matter and energy      High
               are continuously transferred within and between organisms and their physical
               environment.
SC.8.L.18.4    Cite evidence that living systems follow the Laws of Conservation of Mass and       High
               Energy.
SC.912.L.14.2  Relate structure to function for the components of plant and animal cells.          Moderate
               Explain the role of cell membranes as a highly selective barrier (passive and
               active transport).
SC.912.L.14.3  Compare and contrast the general structures of plant and animal cells. Compare      Moderate
               and contrast the general structures of prokaryotic and eukaryotic cells.
SC.912.L.15.6  Discuss distinguishing characteristics of the domains and kingdoms of living        Moderate
               organisms.
SC.912.L.15.13 Describe the conditions required for natural selection, including: overproduction   Moderate
               of offspring, inherited variation, and the struggle to survive, which result in
               differential reproductive success.
SC.912.L.16.2  Discuss observed inheritance patterns caused by various modes of inheritance,       High
               including dominant, recessive, codominant, sex-linked, polygenic, and multiple
               alleles.
SC.912.L.16.14 Describe the cell cycle, including the process of mitosis. Explain the role of      Moderate
               mitosis in the formation of new cells and its importance in maintaining
               chromosome number during asexual reproduction.
SC.912.L.16.16 Describe the process of meiosis, including independent assortment and crossing      Moderate
               over. Explain how reduction division results in the formation of haploid gametes
               or spores.
SC.912.L.17.6  Compare and contrast the relationships among organisms, including predation,        Moderate
               parasitism, competition, commensalism, and mutualism.
SC.912.L.17.9  Use a food web to identify and distinguish producers, consumers, and                Moderate
               decomposers. Explain the pathway of energy transfer through trophic levels and
               the reduction of available energy at successive trophic levels.
SC.912.L.18.7  Identify the reactants, products, and basic functions of photosynthesis.            Moderate
SC.912.L.18.8  Identify the reactants, products, and basic functions of aerobic and anaerobic      Moderate
               cellular respiration.
SC.912.L.18.9  Explain the interrelated nature of photosynthesis and cellular respiration.         Moderate
                                                       38


MA.6.S.6.2        Select and analyze the measures of central tendency or variability to represent, High
                  describe, analyze, and/or summarize a data set for the purposes of answering
                  questions appropriately.
MA.6.A.3.6        Construct and analyze tables, graphs, and equations to describe linear functions High
                  and other simple relations using both common language and algebraic notation.
LA.6.4.2.2        The student will record information (e.g., observations, notes, lists, charts,
                  legends) related to a topic, including visual aids to organize and record
                  information and include a list of sources used;
LA.6.2.2.3        The student will organize information to show understanding (e.g., representing
                  main ideas within text through charting, mapping, paraphrasing, summarizing, or
                  comparing/contrasting);
HE.6.C.1.4        Recognize how heredity can affect personal health.
HE.6.C.1.8        Explain how body systems are impacted by hereditary factors and infectious
                  agents.
               Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code    Access Point Descriptor
SC.6.N.1.In.a         Identify a problem from the sixth grade curriculum, use reference materials to gather
                      information, carry out an experiment, collect and record data, and report results.
SC.6.N.1.Su.b         Recognize that experiments involve procedures that can be repeated the same way by
                      others.
SC.6.N.1.Pa.c         Recognize that people conduct activities and share information about science.
SC.6.N.2.In.a         Identify familiar topics included in the study of science.
SC.6.N.2.Su.b         Recognize that scientific knowledge changes when new things are discovered.
SC.6.N.3.In.a         Identify that a scientific theory is an explanation of nature supported by evidence.
SC.6.N.3.Su.b         Recognize events that are based on scientific laws, such as the law of gravity.
SC.6.L.14.In.a        Identify how the major structures of plants and organs of animals work as parts of larger
                      systems, such as the heart is part of the circulatory system that pumps blood.
SC.6.L.14.Su.b        Recognize that there are smaller parts in all living things, too small to be seen without
                      magnification, called cells.
SC.6.L.14.Pa.c        Recognize body parts related to basic needs, such as mouth for eating.
SC.6.L.15.In.a        Classify animals into major groups, such as insects, fish, reptiles, mammals, and birds.
SC.7.N.1.In.a         Identify a problem from the seventh grade curriculum, use reference materials to gather
                      information, carry out an experiment, collect and record data, and report results.
SC.7.N.1.Su.b         Recognize what is tested in a simple experiment (dependent variable).
SC.7.N.1.Pa.c         Associate objects and activities with science.
SC.7.N.2.In.a         Identify an example of a change in scientific knowledge based on new evidence or new
                      interpretations.
SC.7.N.3.In.a         Identify that scientific theories are explanations and laws describe relationships, and both
                      are supported by evidence.
SC.7.N.3.Su.b         Recognize a benefit of using a model to explain how things work.
SC.7.L.15.In.a        Recognize that fossils help people learn about living things that lived a very long time
                      ago.
SC.7.L.15.Su.b        Recognize that common plants or animals have special features that enable them to live
                      in their environment, such as a as a fish has gills so it can live underwater.
SC.7.L.16.In.a        Explain that some characteristics are passed from parent to child (inherited).
                                                            39


SC.7.L.16.Su.b   Recognize that animals, including humans, inherit some characteristics from one parent
                 and some from the other.
SC.7.L.16.Pa.c   Recognize common products, such as medicine, developed through science.
SC.7.L.17.In.a   Identify that in a simple food chain, energy transfers from the Sun to plants (producers),
                 to animals (consumers), and to organisms that cause decay (decomposers).
SC.7.L.17.Su.b   Recognize how living things affect each other in their habitat (ecosystem).
SC.7.L.17.Pa.c   Recognize what happens when animals don’t get food and water.
SC.8.N.1.In.a    Identify a problem from the eighth grade curriculum, use reference materials to gather
                 information, carry out an experiment, collect and record data, and report results.
SC.8.N.1.Su.b    Recognize a possible explanation (hypothesis) for a science problem.
SC.8.N.2.In.a    Identify that scientific knowledge must be supported by evidence.
SC.8.N.3.In.a    Identify models used in the context of one’s own study of science.
SC.8.N.3.Su.b    Recognize that scientific theories can change.
SC.8.N.4.In.a    Identify ways that science processes can be used to make informed decisions in the
                 community, state, and nation.
SC.8.L.18.In.a   Identify structures in plants that enable them to use the energy from the Sun to make
                 their own food through a process called photosynthesis.
SC.8.L.18.Su.b   Recognize that plants and animals get energy from food.
SC.912.L.14.In.a Identify that all living things are made of cells and cells function in similar ways (cell
                 theory).
SC.912.L.14.Su.b Recognize that cells have different parts and each has a function.
SC.912.L.14.Pa.c Identify ways to prevent infection from bacteria and viruses, such as hand washing and
                 first aid.
SC.912.L.15.In.a Identify that prehistoric plants and animals changed over time (evolved) or became
                 extinct.
SC.912.L.15.Su.b Match organisms to the animal, plant, and fungus kingdoms.
SC.912.L.15.Pa.c Recognize that animals produce offspring.
SC.912.L.16.In.a Identify that genes are sets of instructions that determine which characteristics are passed
                 from parent to offspring.
SC.912.L.16.Su.b Recognize that all organisms have a substance called DNA with unique information.
SC.912.L.16.Pa.c Recognize that illness can result when parts of our bodies are not working properly.
SC.912.L.17.In.a Recognize that living things in oceans and fresh water are affected by the location,
                 availability of light, depth of the water, and temperature.
SC.912.L.17.Su.b Recognize how animals and plants in an ecosystem may be affected by changes to the
                 food supply or climate.
SC.912.L.17.Pa.c Recognize examples of mutual relationships between people and other living things.
SC.912.L.18.In.a Identify that carbohydrates, fats, proteins, and nucleic acids (macromolecules) are
                 important for human organisms.
SC.912.L.18.Su.b Recognize that the function of photosynthesis is to produce food for plants.
SC.912.L.18.Pa.c Identify that food is a source of energy.
                                                      40


                                2001010 M/J Earth/Space Science
Section: Basic and Adult Education                          Grade Group: Middle School Grades 6-8
Subject: Science                                            Domain: Earth/Space Sciences
Course Length: Year                                         Level: 2
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                  Benchmarks
                                                                                                       Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                    Knowledge
SC.6.N.1.1         Define a problem from the sixth grade curriculum, use appropriate reference         High
                   materials to support scientific understanding, plan and carry out scientific
                   investigation of various types, such as systematic observations or experiments,
                   identify variables, co
SC.6.N.1.2         Explain why scientific investigations should be replicable.                         High
SC.6.N.1.3         Explain the difference between an experiment and other types of scientific          High
                   investigation, and explain the relative benefits and limitations of each.
SC.6.N.1.4         Discuss, compare, and negotiate methods used, results obtained, and                 High
                   explanations among groups of students conducting the same investigation.
SC.6.N.1.5         Recognize that science involves creativity, not just in designing experiments, but  Moderate
                   also in creating explanations that fit evidence.
SC.6.N.2.1         Distinguish science from other activities involving thought.                        Moderate
SC.6.N.2.2         Explain that scientific knowledge is durable because it is open to change as new    Moderate
                   evidence or interpretations are encountered.
SC.6.N.2.3         Recognize that scientists who make contributions to scientific knowledge come       Low
                   from all kinds of backgrounds and possess varied talents, interests, and goals.
SC.6.N.3.1         Recognize and explain that a scientific theory is a well-supported and widely       Moderate
                   accepted explanation of nature and is not simply a claim posed by an
                   individual. Thus, the use of the term theory in science is very different than
                   how it is used in everyday
SC.6.N.3.2         Recognize and explain that a scientific law is a description of a specific          Moderate
                   relationship under given conditions in the natural world. Thus, scientific laws are
                   different from societal laws.
SC.6.N.3.3         Give several examples of scientific laws.                                           Low
SC.6.N.3.4         Identify the role of models in the context of the sixth grade science benchmarks. Moderate
SC.6.E.6.1         Describe and give examples of ways in which Earth's surface is built up and torn    Moderate
                   down by physical and chemical weathering, erosion, and deposition.
SC.6.E.6.2         Recognize that there are a variety of different landforms on Earth's surface such   Moderate
                   as coastlines, dunes, rivers, mountains, glaciers, deltas, and lakes and relate
                   these landforms as they apply to Florida.
SC.6.E.7.1         Differentiate among radiation, conduction, and convection, the three                Moderate
                   mechanisms by which heat is transferred through Earth's system.
SC.6.E.7.2         Investigate and apply how the cycling of water between the atmosphere and           High
                   hydrosphere has an effect on weather patterns and climate.
SC.6.E.7.3         Describe how global patterns such as the jet stream and ocean currents influence    High
                   local weather in measurable terms such as temperature, air pressure, wind
                   direction and speed, and humidity and precipitation.
SC.6.E.7.4         Differentiate and show interactions among the geosphere, hydrosphere,               High
                   cryosphere, atmosphere, and biosphere.
                                                           41


SC.6.E.7.5 Explain how energy provided by the sun influences global patterns of                High
           atmospheric movement and the temperature differences between air, water, and
           land.
SC.6.E.7.6 Differentiate between weather and climate.                                          Moderate
SC.6.E.7.7 Investigate how natural disasters have affected human life in Florida.              High
SC.6.E.7.8 Describe ways human beings protect themselves from hazardous weather and            Moderate
           sun exposure.
SC.6.E.7.9 Describe how the composition and structure of the atmosphere protects life and      Moderate
           insulates the planet.
SC.7.N.1.1 Define a problem from the seventh grade curriculum, use appropriate reference       High
           materials to support scientific understanding, plan and carry out scientific
           investigation of various types, such as systematic observations or experiments,
           identify variables,
SC.7.N.1.2 Differentiate replication (by others) from repetition (multiple trials).            Moderate
SC.7.N.1.3 Distinguish between an experiment (which must involve the identification and        Moderate
           control of variables) and other forms of scientific investigation and explain that
           not all scientific knowledge is derived from experimentation.
SC.7.N.1.4 Identify test variables (independent variables) and outcome variables (dependent    Low
           variables) in an experiment.
SC.7.N.1.5 Describe the methods used in the pursuit of a scientific explanation as seen in     Moderate
           different fields of science such as biology, geology, and physics.
SC.7.N.1.6 Explain that empirical evidence is the cumulative body of observations of a         Moderate
           natural phenomenon on which scientific explanations are based.
SC.7.N.1.7 Explain that scientific knowledge is the result of a great deal of debate and       Moderate
           confirmation within the science community.
SC.7.N.2.1 Identify an instance from the history of science in which scientific knowledge      Low
           has changed when new evidence or new interpretations are encountered.
SC.7.N.3.1 Recognize and explain the difference between theories and laws and give several     High
           examples of scientific theories and the evidence that supports them.
SC.7.N.3.2 Identify the benefits and limitations of the use of scientific models.              Moderate
SC.7.E.6.1 Describe the layers of the solid Earth, including the lithosphere, the hot          Moderate
           convecting mantle, and the dense metallic liquid and solid cores.
SC.7.E.6.2 Identify the patterns within the rock cycle and relate them to surface events       High
           (weathering and erosion) and sub-surface events (plate tectonics and mountain
           building).
SC.7.E.6.3 Identify current methods for measuring the age of Earth and its parts, including    Moderate
           the law of superposition and radioactive dating.
SC.7.E.6.4 Explain and give examples of how physical evidence supports scientific theories     High
           that Earth has evolved over geologic time due to natural processes.
SC.7.E.6.5 Explore the scientific theory of plate tectonics by describing how the movement     Moderate
           of Earth's crustal plates causes both slow and rapid changes in Earth's surface,
           including volcanic eruptions, earthquakes, and mountain building.
SC.7.E.6.6 Identify the impact that humans have had on Earth, such as deforestation,           Moderate
           urbanization, desertification, erosion, air and water quality, changing the flow of
           water.
SC.7.E.6.7 Recognize that heat flow and movement of material within Earth causes               Moderate
           earthquakes and volcanic eruptions, and creates mountains and ocean basins.
SC.8.N.1.1 Define a problem from the eighth grade curriculum using appropriate reference       High
           materials to support scientific understanding, plan and carry out scientific
           investigations of various types, such as systematic observations or experiments,
           identify variables,
                                                   42


SC.8.N.1.2  Design and conduct a study using repeated trials and replication.                 High
SC.8.N.1.3  Use phrases such as "results support" or "fail to support" in science,            Moderate
            understanding that science does not offer conclusive 'proof' of a knowledge
            claim.
SC.8.N.1.4  Explain how hypotheses are valuable if they lead to further investigations, even  High
            if they turn out not to be supported by the data.
SC.8.N.1.5  Analyze the methods used to develop a scientific explanation as seen in different High
            fields of science.
SC.8.N.1.6  Understand that scientific investigations involve the collection of relevant      Moderate
            empirical evidence, the use of logical reasoning, and the application of
            imagination in devising hypotheses, predictions, explanations and models to
            make sense of the collected e
SC.8.N.2.1  Distinguish between scientific and pseudoscientific ideas.                        Moderate
SC.8.N.2.2  Discuss what characterizes science and its methods.                               Moderate
SC.8.N.3.1  Select models useful in relating the results of their own investigations.         High
SC.8.N.3.2  Explain why theories may be modified but are rarely discarded.                    High
SC.8.N.4.1  Explain that science is one of the processes that can be used to inform decision  Moderate
            making at the community, state, national, and international levels.
SC.8.N.4.2  Explain how political, social, and economic concerns can affect science, and      High
            vice versa.
SC.8.E.5.1  Recognize that there are enormous distances between objects in space and apply    Moderate
            our knowledge of light and space travel to understand this distance.
SC.8.E.5.2  Recognize that the universe contains many billions of galaxies and that each      Low
            galaxy contains many billions of stars.
SC.8.E.5.3  Distinguish the hierarchical relationships between planets and other              High
            astronomical bodies relative to solar system, galaxy, and universe, including
            distance, size, and composition.
SC.8.E.5.4  Explore the Law of Universal Gravitation by explaining the role that gravity      High
            plays in the formation of planets, stars, and solar systems and in determining
            their motions.
SC.8.E.5.5  Describe and classify specific physical properties of stars: apparent magnitude   Moderate
            (brightness), temperature (color), size, and luminosity (absolute brightness).
SC.8.E.5.6  Create models of solar properties including: rotation, structure of the Sun,      Low
            convection, sunspots, solar flares, and prominences.
SC.8.E.5.7  Compare and contrast the properties of objects in the Solar System including the  Moderate
            Sun, planets, and moons to those of Earth, such as gravitational force, distance
            from the Sun, speed, movement, temperature, and atmospheric conditions.
SC.8.E.5.8  Compare various historical models of the Solar System, including geocentric       Moderate
            and heliocentric.
SC.8.E.5.9  Explain the impact of objects in space on each other including:                   High
SC.8.E.5.10 Assess how technology is essential to science for such purposes as access to      High
            outer space and other remote locations, sample collection, measurement, data
            collection and storage, computation, and communication of information.
SC.8.E.5.11 Identify and compare characteristics of the electromagnetic spectrum such as      High
            wavelength, frequency, use, and hazards and recognize its application to an
            understanding of planetary images and satellite photographs.
SC.8.E.5.12 Summarize the effects of space exploration on the economy and culture of          Moderate
            Florida.
                                                    43


MA.6.S.6.2        Select and analyze the measures of central tendency or variability to represent, High
                  describe, analyze, and/or summarize a data set for the purposes of answering
                  questions appropriately.
MA.6.A.3.6        Construct and analyze tables, graphs, and equations to describe linear functions High
                  and other simple relations using both common language and algebraic notation.
LA.6.4.2.2        The student will record information (e.g., observations, notes, lists, charts,
                  legends) related to a topic, including visual aids to organize and record
                  information and include a list of sources used;
LA.6.2.2.3        The student will organize information to show understanding (e.g., representing
                  main ideas within text through charting, mapping, paraphrasing, summarizing, or
                  comparing/contrasting);
HE.6.C.1.3        Identify environmental factors that affect personal health.
              Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code    Access Point Descriptor
SC.6.N.1.In.a         Identify a problem from the sixth grade curriculum, use reference materials to gather
                      information, carry out an experiment, collect and record data, and report results.
SC.6.N.1.Su.b         Recognize that experiments involve procedures that can be repeated the same way by
                      others.
SC.6.N.1.Pa.c         Recognize that people conduct activities and share information about science.
SC.6.N.2.In.a         Identify familiar topics included in the study of science.
SC.6.N.2.Su.b         Recognize that scientific knowledge changes when new things are discovered.
SC.6.N.3.In.a         Identify that a scientific theory is an explanation of nature supported by evidence.
SC.6.N.3.Su.b         Recognize events that are based on scientific laws, such as the law of gravity.
SC.6.E.6.In.a         Describe how weathering and erosion reshape the Earth’s surface.
SC.6.E.6.Su.b         Recognize different landforms in Florida, including beaches (coastlines), rivers, and
                      lakes.
SC.6.E.7.In.a         Recognize that heat is a flow of energy that moves through Earth’s land, air, and water in
                      different ways, including conduction, convection, and radiation.
SC.6.E.7.Su.b         Recognize parts of the water cycle such as clouds (condensation), rain (precipitation),
                      and evaporation.
SC.6.E.7.Pa.c         Recognize different types of weather conditions, including hot/cold, raining/not raining,
                      and windy/calm.
SC.7.N.1.In.a         Identify a problem from the seventh grade curriculum, use reference materials to gather
                      information, carry out an experiment, collect and record data, and report results.
SC.7.N.1.Su.b         Recognize what is tested in a simple experiment (dependent variable).
SC.7.N.1.Pa.c         Associate objects and activities with science.
SC.7.N.2.In.a         Identify an example of a change in scientific knowledge based on new evidence or new
                      interpretations.
SC.7.N.3.In.a         Identify that scientific theories are explanations and laws describe relationships, and both
                      are supported by evidence.
SC.7.N.3.Su.b         Recognize a benefit of using a model to explain how things work.
SC.7.E.6.In.a         Identify that Earth has three layers (crust, mantle, and core) and describe the inside
                      (core) as the hottest layer.
SC.7.E.6.Su.b         Recognize that mountains change size and shape over a long period of time.
SC.7.E.6.Pa.c         Recognize that ground on the Earth’s surface changes over time.
                                                            44


SC.8.N.1.In.a          Identify a problem from the eighth grade curriculum, use reference materials to gather
                       information, carry out an experiment, collect and record data, and report results.
SC.8.N.1.Su.b          Recognize a possible explanation (hypothesis) for a science problem.
SC.8.N.2.In.a          Identify that scientific knowledge must be supported by evidence.
SC.8.N.3.In.a          Identify models used in the context of one’s own study of science.
SC.8.N.3.Su.b          Recognize that scientific theories can change.
SC.8.N.4.In.a          Identify ways that science processes can be used to make informed decisions in the
                       community, state, and nation.
SC.8.E.5.In.a          Compare the distances of the Moon, the Sun, and other stars from the Earth.
SC.8.E.5.In.b          Identify that the Earth and Sun are a part of the Milky Way galaxy.
SC.8.E.5.Su.b          Recognize that the Solar System is part of a galaxy.
SC.8.E.5.Pa.c          Recognize the four seasons.
SC.8.E.5.Su.c          Identify that there are planets and moons in the Solar System.
SC.8.E.5.Pa.d          Recognize a technology tool created for space exploration and adapted for personal use,
                       such as computers, telescopes, or satellites.
                       2001020 M/J Earth/Space Science, Advanced
Section: Basic and Adult Education                          Grade Group: Middle School Grades 6-8
Subject: Science                                            Domain: Earth/Space Sciences
Course Length: Year                                         Level: 3
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                  Benchmarks
                                                                                                       Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                    Knowledge
SC.6.N.1.1         Define a problem from the sixth grade curriculum, use appropriate reference         High
                   materials to support scientific understanding, plan and carry out scientific
                   investigation of various types, such as systematic observations or experiments,
                   identify variables, co
SC.6.N.1.2         Explain why scientific investigations should be replicable.                         High
SC.6.N.1.3         Explain the difference between an experiment and other types of scientific          High
                   investigation, and explain the relative benefits and limitations of each.
SC.6.N.1.4         Discuss, compare, and negotiate methods used, results obtained, and                 High
                   explanations among groups of students conducting the same investigation.
SC.6.N.1.5         Recognize that science involves creativity, not just in designing experiments, but  Moderate
                   also in creating explanations that fit evidence.
SC.6.N.2.1         Distinguish science from other activities involving thought.                        Moderate
SC.6.N.2.2         Explain that scientific knowledge is durable because it is open to change as new Moderate
                   evidence or interpretations are encountered.
SC.6.N.2.3         Recognize that scientists who make contributions to scientific knowledge come Low
                   from all kinds of backgrounds and possess varied talents, interests, and goals.
SC.6.N.3.1         Recognize and explain that a scientific theory is a well-supported and widely       Moderate
                   accepted explanation of nature and is not simply a claim posed by an
                   individual. Thus, the use of the term theory in science is very different than
                   how it is used in everyday
                                                           45


SC.6.N.3.2 Recognize and explain that a scientific law is a description of a specific          Moderate
           relationship under given conditions in the natural world. Thus, scientific laws are
           different from societal laws.
SC.6.N.3.3 Give several examples of scientific laws.                                           Low
SC.6.N.3.4 Identify the role of models in the context of the sixth grade science benchmarks. Moderate
SC.6.E.6.1 Describe and give examples of ways in which Earth's surface is built up and torn    Moderate
           down by physical and chemical weathering, erosion, and deposition.
SC.6.E.6.2 Recognize that there are a variety of different landforms on Earth's surface such   Moderate
           as coastlines, dunes, rivers, mountains, glaciers, deltas, and lakes and relate
           these landforms as they apply to Florida.
SC.6.E.7.1 Differentiate among radiation, conduction, and convection, the three                Moderate
           mechanisms by which heat is transferred through Earth's system.
SC.6.E.7.2 Investigate and apply how the cycling of water between the atmosphere and           High
           hydrosphere has an effect on weather patterns and climate.
SC.6.E.7.3 Describe how global patterns such as the jet stream and ocean currents influence    High
           local weather in measurable terms such as temperature, air pressure, wind
           direction and speed, and humidity and precipitation.
SC.6.E.7.4 Differentiate and show interactions among the geosphere, hydrosphere,               High
           cryosphere, atmosphere, and biosphere.
SC.6.E.7.5 Explain how energy provided by the sun influences global patterns of                High
           atmospheric movement and the temperature differences between air, water, and
           land.
SC.6.E.7.6 Differentiate between weather and climate.                                          Moderate
SC.6.E.7.7 Investigate how natural disasters have affected human life in Florida.              High
SC.6.E.7.8 Describe ways human beings protect themselves from hazardous weather and            Moderate
           sun exposure.
SC.6.E.7.9 Describe how the composition and structure of the atmosphere protects life and      Moderate
           insulates the planet.
SC.7.N.1.1 Define a problem from the seventh grade curriculum, use appropriate reference       High
           materials to support scientific understanding, plan and carry out scientific
           investigation of various types, such as systematic observations or experiments,
           identify variables,
SC.7.N.1.2 Differentiate replication (by others) from repetition (multiple trials).            Moderate
SC.7.N.1.3 Distinguish between an experiment (which must involve the identification and        Moderate
           control of variables) and other forms of scientific investigation and explain that
           not all scientific knowledge is derived from experimentation.
SC.7.N.1.4 Identify test variables (independent variables) and outcome variables (dependent    Low
           variables) in an experiment.
SC.7.N.1.5 Describe the methods used in the pursuit of a scientific explanation as seen in     Moderate
           different fields of science such as biology, geology, and physics.
SC.7.N.1.6 Explain that empirical evidence is the cumulative body of observations of a         Moderate
           natural phenomenon on which scientific explanations are based.
SC.7.N.1.7 Explain that scientific knowledge is the result of a great deal of debate and       Moderate
           confirmation within the science community.
SC.7.N.2.1 Identify an instance from the history of science in which scientific knowledge      Low
           has changed when new evidence or new interpretations are encountered.
SC.7.N.3.1 Recognize and explain the difference between theories and laws and give several     High
           examples of scientific theories and the evidence that supports them.
SC.7.N.3.2 Identify the benefits and limitations of the use of scientific models.              Moderate
                                                   46


SC.7.E.6.1 Describe the layers of the solid Earth, including the lithosphere, the hot          Moderate
           convecting mantle, and the dense metallic liquid and solid cores.
SC.7.E.6.2 Identify the patterns within the rock cycle and relate them to surface events       High
           (weathering and erosion) and sub-surface events (plate tectonics and mountain
           building).
SC.7.E.6.3 Identify current methods for measuring the age of Earth and its parts, including    Moderate
           the law of superposition and radioactive dating.
SC.7.E.6.4 Explain and give examples of how physical evidence supports scientific theories     High
           that Earth has evolved over geologic time due to natural processes.
SC.7.E.6.5 Explore the scientific theory of plate tectonics by describing how the movement     Moderate
           of Earth's crustal plates causes both slow and rapid changes in Earth's surface,
           including volcanic eruptions, earthquakes, and mountain building.
SC.7.E.6.6 Identify the impact that humans have had on Earth, such as deforestation,           Moderate
           urbanization, desertification, erosion, air and water quality, changing the flow of
           water.
SC.7.E.6.7 Recognize that heat flow and movement of material within Earth causes               Moderate
           earthquakes and volcanic eruptions, and creates mountains and ocean basins.
SC.8.N.1.1 Define a problem from the eighth grade curriculum using appropriate reference       High
           materials to support scientific understanding, plan and carry out scientific
           investigations of various types, such as systematic observations or experiments,
           identify variables,
SC.8.N.1.2 Design and conduct a study using repeated trials and replication.                   High
SC.8.N.1.3 Use phrases such as "results support" or "fail to support" in science,              Moderate
           understanding that science does not offer conclusive 'proof' of a knowledge
           claim.
SC.8.N.1.4 Explain how hypotheses are valuable if they lead to further investigations, even    High
           if they turn out not to be supported by the data.
SC.8.N.1.5 Analyze the methods used to develop a scientific explanation as seen in different   High
           fields of science.
SC.8.N.1.6 Understand that scientific investigations involve the collection of relevant        Moderate
           empirical evidence, the use of logical reasoning, and the application of
           imagination in devising hypotheses, predictions, explanations and models to
           make sense of the collected e
SC.8.N.2.1 Distinguish between scientific and pseudoscientific ideas.                          Moderate
SC.8.N.2.2 Discuss what characterizes science and its methods.                                 Moderate
SC.8.N.3.1 Select models useful in relating the results of their own investigations.           High
SC.8.N.3.2 Explain why theories may be modified but are rarely discarded.                      High
SC.8.N.4.1 Explain that science is one of the processes that can be used to inform decision    Moderate
           making at the community, state, national, and international levels.
SC.8.N.4.2 Explain how political, social, and economic concerns can affect science, and        High
           vice versa.
SC.8.E.5.1 Recognize that there are enormous distances between objects in space and apply      Moderate
           our knowledge of light and space travel to understand this distance.
SC.8.E.5.2 Recognize that the universe contains many billions of galaxies and that each        Low
           galaxy contains many billions of stars.
SC.8.E.5.3 Distinguish the hierarchical relationships between planets and other                High
           astronomical bodies relative to solar system, galaxy, and universe, including
           distance, size, and composition.
SC.8.E.5.4 Explore the Law of Universal Gravitation by explaining the role that gravity        High
           plays in the formation of planets, stars, and solar systems and in determining
           their motions.
                                                   47


SC.8.E.5.5        Describe and classify specific physical properties of stars: apparent magnitude     Moderate
                  (brightness), temperature (color), size, and luminosity (absolute brightness).
SC.8.E.5.6        Create models of solar properties including: rotation, structure of the Sun,        Low
                  convection, sunspots, solar flares, and prominences.
SC.8.E.5.7        Compare and contrast the properties of objects in the Solar System including the    Moderate
                  Sun, planets, and moons to those of Earth, such as gravitational force, distance
                  from the Sun, speed, movement, temperature, and atmospheric conditions.
SC.8.E.5.8        Compare various historical models of the Solar System, including geocentric         Moderate
                  and heliocentric.
SC.8.E.5.9        Explain the impact of objects in space on each other including:                     High
SC.8.E.5.10       Assess how technology is essential to science for such purposes as access to        High
                  outer space and other remote locations, sample collection, measurement, data
                  collection and storage, computation, and communication of information.
SC.8.E.5.11       Identify and compare characteristics of the electromagnetic spectrum such as        High
                  wavelength, frequency, use, and hazards and recognize its application to an
                  understanding of planetary images and satellite photographs.
SC.8.E.5.12       Summarize the effects of space exploration on the economy and culture of            Moderate
                  Florida.
SC.912.E.5.4      Explain the physical properties of the Sun and its dynamic nature and connect       High
                  them to conditions and events on Earth.
SC.912.E.6.1      Describe and differentiate the layers of Earth and the interactions among them.     Moderate
SC.912.E.6.2      Connect surface features to surface processes that are responsible for their        Moderate
                  formation.
SC.912.E.6.3      Analyze the scientific theory of plate tectonics and identify related major         High
                  processes and features as a result of moving plates.
SC.912.E.7.3      Differentiate and describe the various interactions among Earth systems,            High
                  including: atmosphere, hydrosphere, cryosphere, geosphere, and biosphere.
SC.912.E.7.5      Predict future weather conditions based on present observations and conceptual      High
                  models and recognize limitations and uncertainties of such predictions.
SC.912.E.7.6      Relate the formation of severe weather to the various physical factors.             Moderate
MA.6.S.6.2        Select and analyze the measures of central tendency or variability to represent, High
                  describe, analyze, and/or summarize a data set for the purposes of answering
                  questions appropriately.
MA.6.A.3.6        Construct and analyze tables, graphs, and equations to describe linear functions High
                  and other simple relations using both common language and algebraic notation.
LA.6.4.2.2        The student will record information (e.g., observations, notes, lists, charts,
                  legends) related to a topic, including visual aids to organize and record
                  information and include a list of sources used;
LA.6.2.2.3        The student will organize information to show understanding (e.g., representing
                  main ideas within text through charting, mapping, paraphrasing, summarizing, or
                  comparing/contrasting);
HE.6.C.1.3        Identify environmental factors that affect personal health.
              Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code    Access Point Descriptor
SC.6.N.1.In.a         Identify a problem from the sixth grade curriculum, use reference materials to gather
                      information, carry out an experiment, collect and record data, and report results.
SC.6.N.1.Su.b         Recognize that experiments involve procedures that can be repeated the same way by
                      others.
                                                          48


SC.6.N.1.Pa.c   Recognize that people conduct activities and share information about science.
SC.6.N.2.In.a   Identify familiar topics included in the study of science.
SC.6.N.2.Su.b   Recognize that scientific knowledge changes when new things are discovered.
SC.6.N.3.In.a   Identify that a scientific theory is an explanation of nature supported by evidence.
SC.6.N.3.Su.b   Recognize events that are based on scientific laws, such as the law of gravity.
SC.6.E.6.In.a   Describe how weathering and erosion reshape the Earth’s surface.
SC.6.E.6.Su.b   Recognize different landforms in Florida, including beaches (coastlines), rivers, and
                lakes.
SC.6.E.7.In.a   Recognize that heat is a flow of energy that moves through Earth’s land, air, and water in
                different ways, including conduction, convection, and radiation.
SC.6.E.7.Su.b   Recognize parts of the water cycle such as clouds (condensation), rain (precipitation),
                and evaporation.
SC.6.E.7.Pa.c   Recognize different types of weather conditions, including hot/cold, raining/not raining,
                and windy/calm.
SC.7.N.1.In.a   Identify a problem from the seventh grade curriculum, use reference materials to gather
                information, carry out an experiment, collect and record data, and report results.
SC.7.N.1.Su.b   Recognize what is tested in a simple experiment (dependent variable).
SC.7.N.1.Pa.c   Associate objects and activities with science.
SC.7.N.2.In.a   Identify an example of a change in scientific knowledge based on new evidence or new
                interpretations.
SC.7.N.3.In.a   Identify that scientific theories are explanations and laws describe relationships, and both
                are supported by evidence.
SC.7.N.3.Su.b   Recognize a benefit of using a model to explain how things work.
SC.7.E.6.In.a   Identify that Earth has three layers (crust, mantle, and core) and describe the inside
                (core) as the hottest layer.
SC.7.E.6.Su.b   Recognize that mountains change size and shape over a long period of time.
SC.7.E.6.Pa.c   Recognize that ground on the Earth’s surface changes over time.
SC.8.N.1.In.a   Identify a problem from the eighth grade curriculum, use reference materials to gather
                information, carry out an experiment, collect and record data, and report results.
SC.8.N.1.Su.b   Recognize a possible explanation (hypothesis) for a science problem.
SC.8.N.2.In.a   Identify that scientific knowledge must be supported by evidence.
SC.8.N.3.In.a   Identify models used in the context of one’s own study of science.
SC.8.N.3.Su.b   Recognize that scientific theories can change.
SC.8.N.4.In.a   Identify ways that science processes can be used to make informed decisions in the
                community, state, and nation.
SC.8.E.5.In.a   Compare the distances of the Moon, the Sun, and other stars from the Earth.
SC.8.E.5.In.b   Identify that the Earth and Sun are a part of the Milky Way galaxy.
SC.8.E.5.Su.b   Recognize that the Solar System is part of a galaxy.
SC.8.E.5.Pa.c   Recognize the four seasons.
SC.8.E.5.Su.c   Identify that there are planets and moons in the Solar System.
SC.8.E.5.Pa.d   Recognize a technology tool created for space exploration and adapted for personal use,
                such as computers, telescopes, or satellites.
SC.912.E.5.In.a Recognize that the Milky Way is part of the expanding universe.
SC.912.E.5.Su.b Recognize that stars are made of burning gases.
SC.912.E.5.Pa.c Observe and recognize effects of the Sun on Earth, such as temperature changes.
                                                      49


SC.912.E.6.In.a        Describe the three layers of Earth (core, mantle, and crust).
SC.912.E.6.Su.b        Identify types of surface features, such as hills and valleys.
SC.912.E.7.In.a        Identify cycles that occur on Earth, such as the water and carbon cycles, and the role
                       energy plays in them.
SC.912.E.7.Su.b        Recognize that currents move the ocean water around Earth.
SC.912.E.7.Pa.c        Recognize that humans, plants, and animals live on the Earth (biosphere).
                                   2003010 M/J Physical Science
Section: Basic and Adult Education                          Grade Group: Middle School Grades 6-8
Subject: Science                                            Domain: Physical Sciences
Course Length: Year                                         Level: 2
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                  Benchmarks
                                                                                                       Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                    Knowledge
SC.6.N.1.1         Define a problem from the sixth grade curriculum, use appropriate reference         High
                   materials to support scientific understanding, plan and carry out scientific
                   investigation of various types, such as systematic observations or experiments,
                   identify variables, co
SC.6.N.1.2         Explain why scientific investigations should be replicable.                         High
SC.6.N.1.3         Explain the difference between an experiment and other types of scientific          High
                   investigation, and explain the relative benefits and limitations of each.
SC.6.N.1.4         Discuss, compare, and negotiate methods used, results obtained, and                 High
                   explanations among groups of students conducting the same investigation.
SC.6.N.1.5         Recognize that science involves creativity, not just in designing experiments, but  Moderate
                   also in creating explanations that fit evidence.
SC.6.N.2.1         Distinguish science from other activities involving thought.                        Moderate
SC.6.N.2.2         Explain that scientific knowledge is durable because it is open to change as new    Moderate
                   evidence or interpretations are encountered.
SC.6.N.2.3         Recognize that scientists who make contributions to scientific knowledge come       Low
                   from all kinds of backgrounds and possess varied talents, interests, and goals.
SC.6.N.3.1         Recognize and explain that a scientific theory is a well-supported and widely       Moderate
                   accepted explanation of nature and is not simply a claim posed by an
                   individual. Thus, the use of the term theory in science is very different than
                   how it is used in everyday
SC.6.N.3.2         Recognize and explain that a scientific law is a description of a specific          Moderate
                   relationship under given conditions in the natural world. Thus, scientific laws are
                   different from societal laws.
SC.6.N.3.3         Give several examples of scientific laws.                                           Low
SC.6.N.3.4         Identify the role of models in the context of the sixth grade science benchmarks. Moderate
SC.6.P.11.1        Explore the Law of Conservation of Energy by differentiating between potential Moderate
                   and kinetic energy. Identify situations where kinetic energy is transformed into
                   potential energy and vice versa.
SC.6.P.12.1        Measure and graph distance versus time for an object moving at a constant           High
                   speed. Interpret this relationship.
SC.6.P.13.1        Investigate and describe types of forces including contact forces and forces        Moderate
                   acting at a distance, such as electrical, magnetic, and gravitational.
                                                            50


SC.6.P.13.2 Explore the Law of Gravity by recognizing that every object exerts gravitational   Low
            force on every other object and that the force depends on how much mass the
            objects have and how far apart they are.
SC.6.P.13.3 Investigate and describe that an unbalanced force acting on an object changes its  Moderate
            speed, or direction of motion, or both.
SC.7.N.1.1  Define a problem from the seventh grade curriculum, use appropriate reference      High
            materials to support scientific understanding, plan and carry out scientific
            investigation of various types, such as systematic observations or experiments,
            identify variables,
SC.7.N.1.2  Differentiate replication (by others) from repetition (multiple trials).           Moderate
SC.7.N.1.3  Distinguish between an experiment (which must involve the identification and       Moderate
            control of variables) and other forms of scientific investigation and explain that
            not all scientific knowledge is derived from experimentation.
SC.7.N.1.4  Identify test variables (independent variables) and outcome variables (dependent   Low
            variables) in an experiment.
SC.7.N.1.5  Describe the methods used in the pursuit of a scientific explanation as seen in    Moderate
            different fields of science such as biology, geology, and physics.
SC.7.N.1.6  Explain that empirical evidence is the cumulative body of observations of a        Moderate
            natural phenomenon on which scientific explanations are based.
SC.7.N.1.7  Explain that scientific knowledge is the result of a great deal of debate and      Moderate
            confirmation within the science community.
SC.7.N.2.1  Identify an instance from the history of science in which scientific knowledge     Low
            has changed when new evidence or new interpretations are encountered.
SC.7.N.3.1  Recognize and explain the difference between theories and laws and give several    High
            examples of scientific theories and the evidence that supports them.
SC.7.N.3.2  Identify the benefits and limitations of the use of scientific models.             Moderate
SC.7.P.10.1 Illustrate that the sun's energy arrives as radiation with a wide range of         Low
            wavelengths, including infrared, visible, and ultraviolet, and that white light is
            made up of a spectrum of many different colors.
SC.7.P.10.2 Observe and explain that light can be reflected, refracted, and/or absorbed.       High
SC.7.P.10.3 Recognize that light waves, sound waves, and other waves move at different         Low
            speeds in different materials.
SC.7.P.11.1 Recognize that adding heat to or removing heat from a system may result in a       Low
            temperature change and possibly a change of state.
SC.7.P.11.2 Investigate and describe the transformation of energy from one form to another. Moderate
SC.7.P.11.3 Cite evidence to explain that energy cannot be created nor destroyed, only         High
            changed from one form to another.
SC.7.P.11.4 Observe and describe that heat flows in predictable ways, moving from warmer       Moderate
            objects to cooler ones until they reach the same temperature.
SC.8.N.1.1  Define a problem from the eighth grade curriculum using appropriate reference      High
            materials to support scientific understanding, plan and carry out scientific
            investigations of various types, such as systematic observations or experiments,
            identify variables,
SC.8.N.1.2  Design and conduct a study using repeated trials and replication.                  High
SC.8.N.1.3  Use phrases such as "results support" or "fail to support" in science,             Moderate
            understanding that science does not offer conclusive 'proof' of a knowledge
            claim.
SC.8.N.1.4  Explain how hypotheses are valuable if they lead to further investigations, even   High
            if they turn out not to be supported by the data.
                                                     51


SC.8.N.1.5 Analyze the methods used to develop a scientific explanation as seen in different   High
           fields of science.
SC.8.N.1.6 Understand that scientific investigations involve the collection of relevant        Moderate
           empirical evidence, the use of logical reasoning, and the application of
           imagination in devising hypotheses, predictions, explanations and models to
           make sense of the collected e
SC.8.N.2.1 Distinguish between scientific and pseudoscientific ideas.                          Moderate
SC.8.N.2.2 Discuss what characterizes science and its methods.                                 Moderate
SC.8.N.3.1 Select models useful in relating the results of their own investigations.           High
SC.8.N.3.2 Explain why theories may be modified but are rarely discarded.                      High
SC.8.N.4.1 Explain that science is one of the processes that can be used to inform decision    Moderate
           making at the community, state, national, and international levels.
SC.8.N.4.2 Explain how political, social, and economic concerns can affect science, and        High
           vice versa.
SC.8.P.8.1 Explore the scientific theory of atoms (also known as atomic theory) by using       Moderate
           models to explain the motion of particles in solids, liquids, and gases.
SC.8.P.8.2 Differentiate between weight and mass recognizing that weight is the amount of      Moderate
           gravitational pull on an object and is distinct from, though proportional to, mass.
SC.8.P.8.3 Explore and describe the densities of various materials through measurement of      Moderate
           their masses and volumes.
SC.8.P.8.4 Classify and compare substances on the basis of characteristic physical             Moderate
           properties that can be demonstrated or measured; for example, density, thermal
           or electrical conductivity, solubility, magnetic properties, melting and boiling
           points, and know that t
SC.8.P.8.5 Recognize that there are a finite number of elements and that their atoms           Low
           combine in a multitude of ways to produce compounds that make up all of the
           living and nonliving things that we encounter.
SC.8.P.8.6 Recognize that elements are grouped in the periodic table according to              Low
           similarities of their properties.
SC.8.P.8.7 Explore the scientific theory of atoms (also known as atomic theory) by             Low
           recognizing that atoms are the smallest unit of an element and are composed of
           sub-atomic particles (electrons surrounding a nucleus containing protons and
           neutrons).
SC.8.P.8.8 Identify basic examples of and compare and classify the properties of               Moderate
           compounds, including acids, bases, and salts.
SC.8.P.8.9 Distinguish among mixtures (including solutions) and pure substances.               Moderate
SC.8.P.9.1 Explore the Law of Conservation of Mass by demonstrating and concluding that High
           mass is conserved when substances undergo physical and chemical changes.
SC.8.P.9.2 Differentiate between physical changes and chemical changes.                        Moderate
SC.8.P.9.3 Investigate and describe how temperature influences chemical changes.               High
MA.6.S.6.2 Select and analyze the measures of central tendency or variability to represent,    High
           describe, analyze, and/or summarize a data set for the purposes of answering
           questions appropriately.
MA.6.A.3.6 Construct and analyze tables, graphs, and equations to describe linear functions    High
           and other simple relations using both common language and algebraic notation.
LA.6.4.2.2 The student will record information (e.g., observations, notes, lists, charts,
           legends) related to a topic, including visual aids to organize and record
           information and include a list of sources used;
                                                    52


LA.6.2.2.3        The student will organize information to show understanding (e.g., representing
                  main ideas within text through charting, mapping, paraphrasing, summarizing, or
                  comparing/contrasting);
               Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code    Access Point Descriptor
SC.6.N.1.In.a         Identify a problem from the sixth grade curriculum, use reference materials to gather
                      information, carry out an experiment, collect and record data, and report results.
SC.6.N.1.Su.b         Recognize that experiments involve procedures that can be repeated the same way by
                      others.
SC.6.N.1.Pa.c         Recognize that people conduct activities and share information about science.
SC.6.N.2.In.a         Identify familiar topics included in the study of science.
SC.6.N.2.Su.b         Recognize that scientific knowledge changes when new things are discovered.
SC.6.N.3.In.a         Identify that a scientific theory is an explanation of nature supported by evidence.
SC.6.N.3.Su.b         Recognize events that are based on scientific laws, such as the law of gravity.
SC.6.P.11.In.a        Identify energy as stored (potential) or expressed in motion (kinetic).
SC.6.P.12.In.a        Identify that speed describes the distance and time in which an object is moving, such as
                      miles per hour.
SC.6.P.13.In.a        Identify examples of gravitational and contact forces, such as falling objects or push and
                      pull.
SC.6.P.13.Su.b        Recognize that force can change the speed and direction of an object in motion.
SC.6.P.13.Pa.c        Recognize the speed (fast or slow) of a moving object.
SC.7.N.1.In.a         Identify a problem from the seventh grade curriculum, use reference materials to gather
                      information, carry out an experiment, collect and record data, and report results.
SC.7.N.1.Su.b         Recognize what is tested in a simple experiment (dependent variable).
SC.7.N.1.Pa.c         Associate objects and activities with science.
SC.7.N.2.In.a         Identify an example of a change in scientific knowledge based on new evidence or new
                      interpretations.
SC.7.N.3.In.a         Identify that scientific theories are explanations and laws describe relationships, and both
                      are supported by evidence.
SC.7.N.3.Su.b         Recognize a benefit of using a model to explain how things work.
SC.7.P.10.In.a        Identify that white (visible) light has many colors, such as when viewed with a prism.
SC.7.P.10.Su.b        Recognize that light can be reflected.
SC.7.P.10.Pa.c        Match light and sound to their sources.
SC.7.P.11.In.a        Identify that when heat is added or taken away, a temperature change occurs.
SC.7.P.11.Su.b        Recognize that energy can change forms, such as electricity produces light and heat in a
                      lamp.
SC.8.N.1.In.a         Identify a problem from the eighth grade curriculum, use reference materials to gather
                      information, carry out an experiment, collect and record data, and report results.
SC.8.N.1.Su.b         Recognize a possible explanation (hypothesis) for a science problem.
SC.8.N.2.In.a         Identify that scientific knowledge must be supported by evidence.
SC.8.N.3.In.a         Identify models used in the context of one’s own study of science.
SC.8.N.3.Su.b         Recognize that scientific theories can change.
SC.8.N.4.In.a         Identify ways that science processes can be used to make informed decisions in the
                      community, state, and nation.
                                                            53


SC.8.P.8.In.a          Compare properties of solids, liquids, and gases.
SC.8.P.8.Su.b          Compare the weight of different sized objects.
SC.8.P.8.Pa.c          Recognize substances by physical properties, such as weight (heavy and light), size (big
                       and small), and temperature (hot and cold).
SC.8.P.9.In.a          Observe and classify changes in matter as physical (reversible) or chemical (irreversible).
SC.8.P.9.Su.b          Observe and recognize changes caused by heat on substances.
                          2003020 M/J Physical Science, Advanced
Section: Basic and Adult Education                          Grade Group: Middle School Grades 6-8
Subject: Science                                            Domain: Physical Sciences
Course Length: Year                                         Level: 3
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                  Benchmarks
                                                                                                       Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                    Knowledge
SC.6.N.1.1         Define a problem from the sixth grade curriculum, use appropriate reference         High
                   materials to support scientific understanding, plan and carry out scientific
                   investigation of various types, such as systematic observations or experiments,
                   identify variables, co
SC.6.N.1.2         Explain why scientific investigations should be replicable.                         High
SC.6.N.1.3         Explain the difference between an experiment and other types of scientific          High
                   investigation, and explain the relative benefits and limitations of each.
SC.6.N.1.4         Discuss, compare, and negotiate methods used, results obtained, and                 High
                   explanations among groups of students conducting the same investigation.
SC.6.N.1.5         Recognize that science involves creativity, not just in designing experiments, but  Moderate
                   also in creating explanations that fit evidence.
SC.6.N.2.1         Distinguish science from other activities involving thought.                        Moderate
SC.6.N.2.2         Explain that scientific knowledge is durable because it is open to change as new    Moderate
                   evidence or interpretations are encountered.
SC.6.N.2.3         Recognize that scientists who make contributions to scientific knowledge come       Low
                   from all kinds of backgrounds and possess varied talents, interests, and goals.
SC.6.N.3.1         Recognize and explain that a scientific theory is a well-supported and widely       Moderate
                   accepted explanation of nature and is not simply a claim posed by an
                   individual. Thus, the use of the term theory in science is very different than
                   how it is used in everyday
SC.6.N.3.2         Recognize and explain that a scientific law is a description of a specific          Moderate
                   relationship under given conditions in the natural world. Thus, scientific laws are
                   different from societal laws.
SC.6.N.3.3         Give several examples of scientific laws.                                           Low
SC.6.N.3.4         Identify the role of models in the context of the sixth grade science benchmarks. Moderate
SC.6.P.11.1        Explore the Law of Conservation of Energy by differentiating between potential Moderate
                   and kinetic energy. Identify situations where kinetic energy is transformed into
                   potential energy and vice versa.
SC.6.P.12.1        Measure and graph distance versus time for an object moving at a constant           High
                   speed. Interpret this relationship.
SC.6.P.13.1        Investigate and describe types of forces including contact forces and forces        Moderate
                   acting at a distance, such as electrical, magnetic, and gravitational.
                                                            54


SC.6.P.13.2 Explore the Law of Gravity by recognizing that every object exerts gravitational   Low
            force on every other object and that the force depends on how much mass the
            objects have and how far apart they are.
SC.6.P.13.3 Investigate and describe that an unbalanced force acting on an object changes its  Moderate
            speed, or direction of motion, or both.
SC.7.N.1.1  Define a problem from the seventh grade curriculum, use appropriate reference      High
            materials to support scientific understanding, plan and carry out scientific
            investigation of various types, such as systematic observations or experiments,
            identify variables,
SC.7.N.1.2  Differentiate replication (by others) from repetition (multiple trials).           Moderate
SC.7.N.1.3  Distinguish between an experiment (which must involve the identification and       Moderate
            control of variables) and other forms of scientific investigation and explain that
            not all scientific knowledge is derived from experimentation.
SC.7.N.1.4  Identify test variables (independent variables) and outcome variables (dependent   Low
            variables) in an experiment.
SC.7.N.1.5  Describe the methods used in the pursuit of a scientific explanation as seen in    Moderate
            different fields of science such as biology, geology, and physics.
SC.7.N.1.6  Explain that empirical evidence is the cumulative body of observations of a        Moderate
            natural phenomenon on which scientific explanations are based.
SC.7.N.1.7  Explain that scientific knowledge is the result of a great deal of debate and      Moderate
            confirmation within the science community.
SC.7.N.2.1  Identify an instance from the history of science in which scientific knowledge     Low
            has changed when new evidence or new interpretations are encountered.
SC.7.N.3.1  Recognize and explain the difference between theories and laws and give several    High
            examples of scientific theories and the evidence that supports them.
SC.7.N.3.2  Identify the benefits and limitations of the use of scientific models.             Moderate
SC.7.P.10.1 Illustrate that the sun's energy arrives as radiation with a wide range of         Low
            wavelengths, including infrared, visible, and ultraviolet, and that white light is
            made up of a spectrum of many different colors.
SC.7.P.10.2 Observe and explain that light can be reflected, refracted, and/or absorbed.       High
SC.7.P.10.3 Recognize that light waves, sound waves, and other waves move at different         Low
            speeds in different materials.
SC.7.P.11.1 Recognize that adding heat to or removing heat from a system may result in a       Low
            temperature change and possibly a change of state.
SC.7.P.11.2 Investigate and describe the transformation of energy from one form to another. Moderate
SC.7.P.11.3 Cite evidence to explain that energy cannot be created nor destroyed, only         High
            changed from one form to another.
SC.7.P.11.4 Observe and describe that heat flows in predictable ways, moving from warmer       Moderate
            objects to cooler ones until they reach the same temperature.
SC.8.N.1.1  Define a problem from the eighth grade curriculum using appropriate reference      High
            materials to support scientific understanding, plan and carry out scientific
            investigations of various types, such as systematic observations or experiments,
            identify variables,
SC.8.N.1.2  Design and conduct a study using repeated trials and replication.                  High
SC.8.N.1.3  Use phrases such as "results support" or "fail to support" in science,             Moderate
            understanding that science does not offer conclusive 'proof' of a knowledge
            claim.
SC.8.N.1.4  Explain how hypotheses are valuable if they lead to further investigations, even   High
            if they turn out not to be supported by the data.
                                                     55


SC.8.N.1.5   Analyze the methods used to develop a scientific explanation as seen in different   High
             fields of science.
SC.8.N.1.6   Understand that scientific investigations involve the collection of relevant        Moderate
             empirical evidence, the use of logical reasoning, and the application of
             imagination in devising hypotheses, predictions, explanations and models to
             make sense of the collected e
SC.8.N.2.1   Distinguish between scientific and pseudoscientific ideas.                          Moderate
SC.8.N.2.2   Discuss what characterizes science and its methods.                                 Moderate
SC.8.N.3.1   Select models useful in relating the results of their own investigations.           High
SC.8.N.3.2   Explain why theories may be modified but are rarely discarded.                      High
SC.8.N.4.1   Explain that science is one of the processes that can be used to inform decision    Moderate
             making at the community, state, national, and international levels.
SC.8.N.4.2   Explain how political, social, and economic concerns can affect science, and        High
             vice versa.
SC.8.P.8.1   Explore the scientific theory of atoms (also known as atomic theory) by using       Moderate
             models to explain the motion of particles in solids, liquids, and gases.
SC.8.P.8.2   Differentiate between weight and mass recognizing that weight is the amount of      Moderate
             gravitational pull on an object and is distinct from, though proportional to, mass.
SC.8.P.8.3   Explore and describe the densities of various materials through measurement of      Moderate
             their masses and volumes.
SC.8.P.8.4   Classify and compare substances on the basis of characteristic physical             Moderate
             properties that can be demonstrated or measured; for example, density, thermal
             or electrical conductivity, solubility, magnetic properties, melting and boiling
             points, and know that t
SC.8.P.8.5   Recognize that there are a finite number of elements and that their atoms           Low
             combine in a multitude of ways to produce compounds that make up all of the
             living and nonliving things that we encounter.
SC.8.P.8.6   Recognize that elements are grouped in the periodic table according to              Low
             similarities of their properties.
SC.8.P.8.7   Explore the scientific theory of atoms (also known as atomic theory) by             Low
             recognizing that atoms are the smallest unit of an element and are composed of
             sub-atomic particles (electrons surrounding a nucleus containing protons and
             neutrons).
SC.8.P.8.8   Identify basic examples of and compare and classify the properties of               Moderate
             compounds, including acids, bases, and salts.
SC.8.P.8.9   Distinguish among mixtures (including solutions) and pure substances.               Moderate
SC.8.P.9.1   Explore the Law of Conservation of Mass by demonstrating and concluding that High
             mass is conserved when substances undergo physical and chemical changes.
SC.8.P.9.2   Differentiate between physical changes and chemical changes.                        Moderate
SC.8.P.9.3   Investigate and describe how temperature influences chemical changes.               High
SC.912.P.8.1 Differentiate among the four states of matter.                                      Moderate
SC.912.P.8.2 Differentiate between physical and chemical properties and physical and             Moderate
             chemical changes of matter.
SC.912.P.8.4 Explore the scientific theory of atoms (also known as atomic theory) by             High
             describing the structure of atoms in terms of protons, neutrons and electrons, and
             differentiate among these particles in terms of their mass, electrical charges and
             locations within
SC.912.P.8.5 Relate properties of atoms and their position in the periodic table to the          Moderate
             arrangement of their electrons.
                                                      56


SC.912.P.8.7      Interpret formula representations of molecules and compounds in terms of             Moderate
                  composition and structure.
SC.912.P.8.11     Relate acidity and basicity to hydronium and hydroxyl ion concentration and pH. Moderate
SC.912.P.10.1     Differentiate among the various forms of energy and recognize that they can be       Moderate
                  transformed from one form to others.
SC.912.P.10.4     Describe heat as the energy transferred by convection, conduction, and               High
                  radiation, and explain the connection of heat to change in temperature or states
                  of matter.
SC.912.P.10.5     Relate temperature to the average molecular kinetic energy.                          Moderate
MA.6.S.6.2        Select and analyze the measures of central tendency or variability to represent, High
                  describe, analyze, and/or summarize a data set for the purposes of answering
                  questions appropriately.
MA.6.A.3.6        Construct and analyze tables, graphs, and equations to describe linear functions High
                  and other simple relations using both common language and algebraic notation.
LA.6.4.2.2        The student will record information (e.g., observations, notes, lists, charts,
                  legends) related to a topic, including visual aids to organize and record
                  information and include a list of sources used;
LA.6.2.2.3        The student will organize information to show understanding (e.g., representing
                  main ideas within text through charting, mapping, paraphrasing, summarizing, or
                  comparing/contrasting);
               Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code    Access Point Descriptor
SC.6.N.1.In.a         Identify a problem from the sixth grade curriculum, use reference materials to gather
                      information, carry out an experiment, collect and record data, and report results.
SC.6.N.1.Su.b         Recognize that experiments involve procedures that can be repeated the same way by
                      others.
SC.6.N.1.Pa.c         Recognize that people conduct activities and share information about science.
SC.6.N.2.In.a         Identify familiar topics included in the study of science.
SC.6.N.2.Su.b         Recognize that scientific knowledge changes when new things are discovered.
SC.6.N.3.In.a         Identify that a scientific theory is an explanation of nature supported by evidence.
SC.6.N.3.Su.b         Recognize events that are based on scientific laws, such as the law of gravity.
SC.6.P.11.In.a        Identify energy as stored (potential) or expressed in motion (kinetic).
SC.6.P.12.In.a        Identify that speed describes the distance and time in which an object is moving, such as
                      miles per hour.
SC.6.P.13.In.a        Identify examples of gravitational and contact forces, such as falling objects or push and
                      pull.
SC.6.P.13.Su.b        Recognize that force can change the speed and direction of an object in motion.
SC.6.P.13.Pa.c        Recognize the speed (fast or slow) of a moving object.
SC.7.N.1.In.a         Identify a problem from the seventh grade curriculum, use reference materials to gather
                      information, carry out an experiment, collect and record data, and report results.
SC.7.N.1.Su.b         Recognize what is tested in a simple experiment (dependent variable).
SC.7.N.1.Pa.c         Associate objects and activities with science.
SC.7.N.2.In.a         Identify an example of a change in scientific knowledge based on new evidence or new
                      interpretations.
SC.7.N.3.In.a         Identify that scientific theories are explanations and laws describe relationships, and both
                      are supported by evidence.
                                                            57


SC.7.N.3.Su.b          Recognize a benefit of using a model to explain how things work.
SC.7.P.10.In.a         Identify that white (visible) light has many colors, such as when viewed with a prism.
SC.7.P.10.Su.b         Recognize that light can be reflected.
SC.7.P.10.Pa.c         Match light and sound to their sources.
SC.7.P.11.In.a         Identify that when heat is added or taken away, a temperature change occurs.
SC.7.P.11.Su.b         Recognize that energy can change forms, such as electricity produces light and heat in a
                       lamp.
SC.8.N.1.In.a          Identify a problem from the eighth grade curriculum, use reference materials to gather
                       information, carry out an experiment, collect and record data, and report results.
SC.8.N.1.Su.b          Recognize a possible explanation (hypothesis) for a science problem.
SC.8.N.2.In.a          Identify that scientific knowledge must be supported by evidence.
SC.8.N.3.In.a          Identify models used in the context of one’s own study of science.
SC.8.N.3.Su.b          Recognize that scientific theories can change.
SC.8.N.4.In.a          Identify ways that science processes can be used to make informed decisions in the
                       community, state, and nation.
SC.8.P.8.In.a          Compare properties of solids, liquids, and gases.
SC.8.P.8.Su.b          Compare the weight of different sized objects.
SC.8.P.8.Pa.c          Recognize substances by physical properties, such as weight (heavy and light), size (big
                       and small), and temperature (hot and cold).
SC.8.P.9.In.a          Observe and classify changes in matter as physical (reversible) or chemical (irreversible).
SC.8.P.9.Su.b          Observe and recognize changes caused by heat on substances.
SC.912.P.8.In.a        Classify states of matter as solid, liquid, and gaseous.
SC.912.P.8.Su.b        Identify examples of physical and chemical changes.
SC.912.P.8.Pa.c        Recognize that the parts of an object can be put together to make a whole.
SC.912.P.10.In.a       Identify examples of energy being transformed from one form to another (conserved
                       quantity).
SC.912.P.10.Su.b       Recognize the relationship between work and power, such as power is the amount of
                       work a person or machine does.
SC.912.P.10.Pa.c       Recognize the source and recipient of heat transfer.
                           2002040 M/J Comprehensive Science 1
Section: Basic and Adult Education                           Grade Group: Middle School Grades 6-8
Subject: Science                                             Domain: Earth/Space Sciences
Course Length: Year                                          Level: 2
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                  Benchmarks
                                                                                                       Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                    Knowledge
SC.6.N.1.1         Define a problem from the sixth grade curriculum, use appropriate reference         High
                   materials to support scientific understanding, plan and carry out scientific
                   investigation of various types, such as systematic observations or experiments,
                   identify variables, co
SC.6.N.1.2         Explain why scientific investigations should be replicable.                         High
                                                            58


SC.6.N.1.3  Explain the difference between an experiment and other types of scientific          High
            investigation, and explain the relative benefits and limitations of each.
SC.6.N.1.4  Discuss, compare, and negotiate methods used, results obtained, and                 High
            explanations among groups of students conducting the same investigation.
SC.6.N.1.5  Recognize that science involves creativity, not just in designing experiments, but  Moderate
            also in creating explanations that fit evidence.
SC.6.N.2.1  Distinguish science from other activities involving thought.                        Moderate
SC.6.N.2.2  Explain that scientific knowledge is durable because it is open to change as new    Moderate
            evidence or interpretations are encountered.
SC.6.N.2.3  Recognize that scientists who make contributions to scientific knowledge come       Low
            from all kinds of backgrounds and possess varied talents, interests, and goals.
SC.6.N.3.1  Recognize and explain that a scientific theory is a well-supported and widely       Moderate
            accepted explanation of nature and is not simply a claim posed by an
            individual. Thus, the use of the term theory in science is very different than
            how it is used in everyday
SC.6.N.3.2  Recognize and explain that a scientific law is a description of a specific          Moderate
            relationship under given conditions in the natural world. Thus, scientific laws are
            different from societal laws.
SC.6.N.3.3  Give several examples of scientific laws.                                           Low
SC.6.N.3.4  Identify the role of models in the context of the sixth grade science benchmarks.   Moderate
SC.6.E.6.1  Describe and give examples of ways in which Earth's surface is built up and torn    Moderate
            down by physical and chemical weathering, erosion, and deposition.
SC.6.E.6.2  Recognize that there are a variety of different landforms on Earth's surface such   Moderate
            as coastlines, dunes, rivers, mountains, glaciers, deltas, and lakes and relate
            these landforms as they apply to Florida.
SC.6.E.7.1  Differentiate among radiation, conduction, and convection, the three                Moderate
            mechanisms by which heat is transferred through Earth's system.
SC.6.E.7.2  Investigate and apply how the cycling of water between the atmosphere and           High
            hydrosphere has an effect on weather patterns and climate.
SC.6.E.7.3  Describe how global patterns such as the jet stream and ocean currents influence    High
            local weather in measurable terms such as temperature, air pressure, wind
            direction and speed, and humidity and precipitation.
SC.6.E.7.4  Differentiate and show interactions among the geosphere, hydrosphere,               High
            cryosphere, atmosphere, and biosphere.
SC.6.E.7.5  Explain how energy provided by the sun influences global patterns of                High
            atmospheric movement and the temperature differences between air, water, and
            land.
SC.6.E.7.6  Differentiate between weather and climate.                                          Moderate
SC.6.E.7.7  Investigate how natural disasters have affected human life in Florida.              High
SC.6.E.7.8  Describe ways human beings protect themselves from hazardous weather and            Moderate
            sun exposure.
SC.6.E.7.9  Describe how the composition and structure of the atmosphere protects life and      Moderate
            insulates the planet.
SC.6.P.11.1 Explore the Law of Conservation of Energy by differentiating between potential      Moderate
            and kinetic energy. Identify situations where kinetic energy is transformed into
            potential energy and vice versa.
SC.6.P.12.1 Measure and graph distance versus time for an object moving at a constant           High
            speed. Interpret this relationship.
SC.6.P.13.1 Investigate and describe types of forces including contact forces and forces        Moderate
            acting at a distance, such as electrical, magnetic, and gravitational.
                                                     59


SC.6.P.13.2       Explore the Law of Gravity by recognizing that every object exerts gravitational    Low
                  force on every other object and that the force depends on how much mass the
                  objects have and how far apart they are.
SC.6.P.13.3       Investigate and describe that an unbalanced force acting on an object changes its   Moderate
                  speed, or direction of motion, or both.
SC.6.L.14.1       Describe and identify patterns in the hierarchical organization of organisms from   Low
                  atoms to molecules and cells to tissues to organs to organ systems to organisms.
SC.6.L.14.2       Investigate and explain the components of the scientific theory of cells (cell      Moderate
                  theory): all organisms are composed of cells (single-celled or multi-cellular), all
                  cells come from pre-existing cells, and cells are the basic unit of life.
SC.6.L.14.3       Recognize and explore how cells of all organisms undergo similar processes to       Moderate
                  maintain homeostasis, including extracting energy from food, getting rid of
                  waste, and reproducing.
SC.6.L.14.4       Compare and contrast the structure and function of major organelles of plant and    Moderate
                  animal cells, including cell wall, cell membrane, nucleus, cytoplasm,
                  chloroplasts, mitochondria, and vacuoles.
SC.6.L.14.5       Identify and investigate the general functions of the major systems of the human    High
                  body (digestive, respiratory, circulatory, reproductive, excretory, immune,
                  nervous, and musculoskeletal) and describe ways these systems interact with
                  each other to maintain
SC.6.L.14.6       Compare and contrast types of infectious agents that may infect the human body,     Moderate
                  including viruses, bacteria, fungi, and parasites.
SC.6.L.15.1       Analyze and describe how and why organisms are classified according to shared       High
                  characteristics with emphasis on the Linnaean system combined with the concept
                  of Domains.
MA.6.S.6.2        Select and analyze the measures of central tendency or variability to represent,    High
                  describe, analyze, and/or summarize a data set for the purposes of answering
                  questions appropriately.
MA.6.A.3.6        Construct and analyze tables, graphs, and equations to describe linear functions    High
                  and other simple relations using both common language and algebraic notation.
LA.6.4.2.2        The student will record information (e.g., observations, notes, lists, charts,
                  legends) related to a topic, including visual aids to organize and record
                  information and include a list of sources used;
LA.6.2.2.3        The student will organize information to show understanding (e.g., representing
                  main ideas within text through charting, mapping, paraphrasing, summarizing, or
                  comparing/contrasting);
HE.6.C.1.3        Identify environmental factors that affect personal health.
HE.6.C.1.8        Explain how body systems are impacted by hereditary factors and infectious
                  agents.
              Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code    Access Point Descriptor
SC.6.N.1.In.a         Identify a problem from the sixth grade curriculum, use reference materials to gather
                      information, carry out an experiment, collect and record data, and report results.
SC.6.N.1.Su.b         Recognize that experiments involve procedures that can be repeated the same way by
                      others.
SC.6.N.1.Pa.c         Recognize that people conduct activities and share information about science.
SC.6.N.2.In.a         Identify familiar topics included in the study of science.
SC.6.N.2.Su.b         Recognize that scientific knowledge changes when new things are discovered.
                                                          60


SC.6.N.3.In.a          Identify that a scientific theory is an explanation of nature supported by evidence.
SC.6.N.3.Su.b          Recognize events that are based on scientific laws, such as the law of gravity.
SC.6.E.6.In.a          Describe how weathering and erosion reshape the Earth’s surface.
SC.6.E.6.Su.b          Recognize different landforms in Florida, including beaches (coastlines), rivers, and
                       lakes.
SC.6.E.7.In.a          Recognize that heat is a flow of energy that moves through Earth’s land, air, and water in
                       different ways, including conduction, convection, and radiation.
SC.6.E.7.Su.b          Recognize parts of the water cycle such as clouds (condensation), rain (precipitation),
                       and evaporation.
SC.6.E.7.Pa.c          Recognize different types of weather conditions, including hot/cold, raining/not raining,
                       and windy/calm.
SC.6.P.11.In.a         Identify energy as stored (potential) or expressed in motion (kinetic).
SC.6.P.12.In.a         Identify that speed describes the distance and time in which an object is moving, such as
                       miles per hour.
SC.6.P.13.In.a         Identify examples of gravitational and contact forces, such as falling objects or push and
                       pull.
SC.6.P.13.Su.b         Recognize that force can change the speed and direction of an object in motion.
SC.6.P.13.Pa.c         Recognize the speed (fast or slow) of a moving object.
SC.6.L.14.In.a         Identify how the major structures of plants and organs of animals work as parts of larger
                       systems, such as the heart is part of the circulatory system that pumps blood.
SC.6.L.14.Su.b         Recognize that there are smaller parts in all living things, too small to be seen without
                       magnification, called cells.
SC.6.L.14.Pa.c         Recognize body parts related to basic needs, such as mouth for eating.
SC.6.L.15.In.a         Classify animals into major groups, such as insects, fish, reptiles, mammals, and birds.
                            2002070 M/J Comprehensive Science 2
Section: Basic and Adult Education                           Grade Group: Middle School Grades 6-8
Subject: Science                                             Domain: Earth/Space Sciences
Course Length: Year                                          Level: 2
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                   Benchmarks
                                                                                                         Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                      Knowledge
SC.7.N.1.1         Define a problem from the seventh grade curriculum, use appropriate reference         High
                   materials to support scientific understanding, plan and carry out scientific
                   investigation of various types, such as systematic observations or experiments,
                   identify variables,
SC.7.N.1.2         Differentiate replication (by others) from repetition (multiple trials).              Moderate
SC.7.N.1.3         Distinguish between an experiment (which must involve the identification and          Moderate
                   control of variables) and other forms of scientific investigation and explain that
                   not all scientific knowledge is derived from experimentation.
SC.7.N.1.4         Identify test variables (independent variables) and outcome variables (dependent Low
                   variables) in an experiment.
SC.7.N.1.5         Describe the methods used in the pursuit of a scientific explanation as seen in       Moderate
                   different fields of science such as biology, geology, and physics.
                                                             61


SC.7.N.1.6  Explain that empirical evidence is the cumulative body of observations of a         Moderate
            natural phenomenon on which scientific explanations are based.
SC.7.N.1.7  Explain that scientific knowledge is the result of a great deal of debate and       Moderate
            confirmation within the science community.
SC.7.N.2.1  Identify an instance from the history of science in which scientific knowledge      Low
            has changed when new evidence or new interpretations are encountered.
SC.7.N.3.1  Recognize and explain the difference between theories and laws and give several     High
            examples of scientific theories and the evidence that supports them.
SC.7.N.3.2  Identify the benefits and limitations of the use of scientific models.              Moderate
SC.7.E.6.1  Describe the layers of the solid Earth, including the lithosphere, the hot          Moderate
            convecting mantle, and the dense metallic liquid and solid cores.
SC.7.E.6.2  Identify the patterns within the rock cycle and relate them to surface events       High
            (weathering and erosion) and sub-surface events (plate tectonics and mountain
            building).
SC.7.E.6.3  Identify current methods for measuring the age of Earth and its parts, including    Moderate
            the law of superposition and radioactive dating.
SC.7.E.6.4  Explain and give examples of how physical evidence supports scientific theories     High
            that Earth has evolved over geologic time due to natural processes.
SC.7.E.6.5  Explore the scientific theory of plate tectonics by describing how the movement     Moderate
            of Earth's crustal plates causes both slow and rapid changes in Earth's surface,
            including volcanic eruptions, earthquakes, and mountain building.
SC.7.E.6.6  Identify the impact that humans have had on Earth, such as deforestation,           Moderate
            urbanization, desertification, erosion, air and water quality, changing the flow of
            water.
SC.7.E.6.7  Recognize that heat flow and movement of material within Earth causes               Moderate
            earthquakes and volcanic eruptions, and creates mountains and ocean basins.
SC.7.P.10.1 Illustrate that the sun's energy arrives as radiation with a wide range of          Low
            wavelengths, including infrared, visible, and ultraviolet, and that white light is
            made up of a spectrum of many different colors.
SC.7.P.10.2 Observe and explain that light can be reflected, refracted, and/or absorbed.        High
SC.7.P.10.3 Recognize that light waves, sound waves, and other waves move at different          Low
            speeds in different materials.
SC.7.P.11.1 Recognize that adding heat to or removing heat from a system may result in a        Low
            temperature change and possibly a change of state.
SC.7.P.11.2 Investigate and describe the transformation of energy from one form to another. Moderate
SC.7.P.11.3 Cite evidence to explain that energy cannot be created nor destroyed, only          High
            changed from one form to another.
SC.7.P.11.4 Observe and describe that heat flows in predictable ways, moving from warmer        Moderate
            objects to cooler ones until they reach the same temperature.
SC.7.L.15.1 Recognize that fossil evidence is consistent with the scientific theory of          Moderate
            evolution that living things evolved from earlier species.
SC.7.L.15.2 Explore the scientific theory of evolution by recognizing and explaining ways in    High
            which genetic variation and environmental factors contribute to evolution by
            natural selection and diversity of organisms.
SC.7.L.15.3 Explore the scientific theory of evolution by relating how the inability of a       High
            species to adapt within a changing environment may contribute to the extinction
            of that species.
SC.7.L.16.1 Understand and explain that every organism requires a set of instructions that      High
            specifies its traits, that this hereditary information (DNA) contains genes located
            in the chromosomes of each cell, and that heredity is the passage of these
            instructions from
                                                       62


SC.7.L.16.2       Determine the probabilities for genotype and phenotype combinations using            Moderate
                  Punnett Squares and pedigrees.
SC.7.L.16.3       Compare and contrast the general processes of sexual reproduction requiring          Moderate
                  meiosis and asexual reproduction requiring mitosis.
SC.7.L.16.4       Recognize and explore the impact of biotechnology (cloning, genetic                  High
                  engineering, artificial selection) on the individual, society and the environment.
SC.7.L.17.1       Explain and illustrate the roles of and relationships among producers,               High
                  consumers, and decomposers in the process of energy transfer in a food web.
SC.7.L.17.2       Compare and contrast the relationships among organisms such as mutualism,            Moderate
                  predation, parasitism, competition, and commensalism.
SC.7.L.17.3       Describe and investigate various limiting factors in the local ecosystem and their   High
                  impact on native populations, including food, shelter, water, space, disease,
                  parasitism, predation, and nesting sites.
MA.6.S.6.2        Select and analyze the measures of central tendency or variability to represent,     High
                  describe, analyze, and/or summarize a data set for the purposes of answering
                  questions appropriately.
MA.6.A.3.6        Construct and analyze tables, graphs, and equations to describe linear functions     High
                  and other simple relations using both common language and algebraic notation.
LA.7.4.2.2        The student will record information (e.g., observations, notes, lists, charts,
                  legends) related to a topic, including visual aids to organize and record
                  information, as appropriate, and attribute sources of information;
LA.7.2.2.3        The student will organize information to show understanding (e.g., representing
                  main ideas within text through charting, mapping, paraphrasing, summarizing, or
                  comparing/contrasting);
HE.7.C.1.4        Describe how heredity can affect personal health.
               Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code    Access Point Descriptor
SC.7.N.1.In.a         Identify a problem from the seventh grade curriculum, use reference materials to gather
                      information, carry out an experiment, collect and record data, and report results.
SC.7.N.1.Su.b         Recognize what is tested in a simple experiment (dependent variable).
SC.7.N.1.Pa.c         Associate objects and activities with science.
SC.7.N.2.In.a         Identify an example of a change in scientific knowledge based on new evidence or new
                      interpretations.
SC.7.N.3.In.a         Identify that scientific theories are explanations and laws describe relationships, and both
                      are supported by evidence.
SC.7.N.3.Su.b         Recognize a benefit of using a model to explain how things work.
SC.7.E.6.In.a         Identify that Earth has three layers (crust, mantle, and core) and describe the inside
                      (core) as the hottest layer.
SC.7.E.6.Su.b         Recognize that mountains change size and shape over a long period of time.
SC.7.E.6.Pa.c         Recognize that ground on the Earth’s surface changes over time.
SC.7.P.10.In.a        Identify that white (visible) light has many colors, such as when viewed with a prism.
SC.7.P.10.Su.b        Recognize that light can be reflected.
SC.7.P.10.Pa.c        Match light and sound to their sources.
SC.7.P.11.In.a        Identify that when heat is added or taken away, a temperature change occurs.
SC.7.P.11.Su.b        Recognize that energy can change forms, such as electricity produces light and heat in a
                      lamp.
                                                           63


SC.7.L.15.In.a          Recognize that fossils help people learn about living things that lived a very long time
                        ago.
SC.7.L.15.Su.b          Recognize that common plants or animals have special features that enable them to live
                        in their environment, such as a as a fish has gills so it can live underwater.
SC.7.L.16.In.a          Explain that some characteristics are passed from parent to child (inherited).
SC.7.L.16.Su.b          Recognize that animals, including humans, inherit some characteristics from one parent
                        and some from the other.
SC.7.L.16.Pa.c          Recognize common products, such as medicine, developed through science.
SC.7.L.17.In.a          Identify that in a simple food chain, energy transfers from the Sun to plants (producers),
                        to animals (consumers), and to organisms that cause decay (decomposers).
SC.7.L.17.Su.b          Recognize how living things affect each other in their habitat (ecosystem).
SC.7.L.17.Pa.c          Recognize what happens when animals don’t get food and water.
                             2002100 M/J Comprehensive Science 3
Section: Basic and Adult Education                          Grade Group: Middle School Grades 6-8
Subject: Science                                            Domain: Earth/Space Sciences
Course Length: Year                                         Level: 2
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                   Benchmarks
                                                                                                         Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                      Knowledge
SC.8.N.1.1         Define a problem from the eighth grade curriculum using appropriate reference         High
                   materials to support scientific understanding, plan and carry out scientific
                   investigations of various types, such as systematic observations or experiments,
                   identify variables,
SC.8.N.1.2         Design and conduct a study using repeated trials and replication.                     High
SC.8.N.1.3         Use phrases such as "results support" or "fail to support" in science,                Moderate
                   understanding that science does not offer conclusive 'proof' of a knowledge
                   claim.
SC.8.N.1.4         Explain how hypotheses are valuable if they lead to further investigations, even      High
                   if they turn out not to be supported by the data.
SC.8.N.1.5         Analyze the methods used to develop a scientific explanation as seen in different     High
                   fields of science.
SC.8.N.1.6         Understand that scientific investigations involve the collection of relevant          Moderate
                   empirical evidence, the use of logical reasoning, and the application of
                   imagination in devising hypotheses, predictions, explanations and models to
                   make sense of the collected e
SC.8.N.2.1         Distinguish between scientific and pseudoscientific ideas.                            Moderate
SC.8.N.2.2         Discuss what characterizes science and its methods.                                   Moderate
SC.8.N.3.1         Select models useful in relating the results of their own investigations.             High
SC.8.N.3.2         Explain why theories may be modified but are rarely discarded.                        High
SC.8.N.4.1         Explain that science is one of the processes that can be used to inform decision Moderate
                   making at the community, state, national, and international levels.
SC.8.N.4.2         Explain how political, social, and economic concerns can affect science, and          High
                   vice versa.
SC.8.E.5.1         Recognize that there are enormous distances between objects in space and apply Moderate
                   our knowledge of light and space travel to understand this distance.
                                                           64


SC.8.E.5.2  Recognize that the universe contains many billions of galaxies and that each        Low
            galaxy contains many billions of stars.
SC.8.E.5.3  Distinguish the hierarchical relationships between planets and other                High
            astronomical bodies relative to solar system, galaxy, and universe, including
            distance, size, and composition.
SC.8.E.5.4  Explore the Law of Universal Gravitation by explaining the role that gravity        High
            plays in the formation of planets, stars, and solar systems and in determining
            their motions.
SC.8.E.5.5  Describe and classify specific physical properties of stars: apparent magnitude     Moderate
            (brightness), temperature (color), size, and luminosity (absolute brightness).
SC.8.E.5.6  Create models of solar properties including: rotation, structure of the Sun,        Low
            convection, sunspots, solar flares, and prominences.
SC.8.E.5.7  Compare and contrast the properties of objects in the Solar System including the    Moderate
            Sun, planets, and moons to those of Earth, such as gravitational force, distance
            from the Sun, speed, movement, temperature, and atmospheric conditions.
SC.8.E.5.8  Compare various historical models of the Solar System, including geocentric         Moderate
            and heliocentric.
SC.8.E.5.9  Explain the impact of objects in space on each other including:                     High
SC.8.E.5.10 Assess how technology is essential to science for such purposes as access to        High
            outer space and other remote locations, sample collection, measurement, data
            collection and storage, computation, and communication of information.
SC.8.E.5.11 Identify and compare characteristics of the electromagnetic spectrum such as        High
            wavelength, frequency, use, and hazards and recognize its application to an
            understanding of planetary images and satellite photographs.
SC.8.E.5.12 Summarize the effects of space exploration on the economy and culture of            Moderate
            Florida.
SC.8.P.8.1  Explore the scientific theory of atoms (also known as atomic theory) by using       Moderate
            models to explain the motion of particles in solids, liquids, and gases.
SC.8.P.8.2  Differentiate between weight and mass recognizing that weight is the amount of      Moderate
            gravitational pull on an object and is distinct from, though proportional to, mass.
SC.8.P.8.3  Explore and describe the densities of various materials through measurement of      Moderate
            their masses and volumes.
SC.8.P.8.4  Classify and compare substances on the basis of characteristic physical             Moderate
            properties that can be demonstrated or measured; for example, density, thermal
            or electrical conductivity, solubility, magnetic properties, melting and boiling
            points, and know that t
SC.8.P.8.5  Recognize that there are a finite number of elements and that their atoms           Low
            combine in a multitude of ways to produce compounds that make up all of the
            living and nonliving things that we encounter.
SC.8.P.8.6  Recognize that elements are grouped in the periodic table according to              Low
            similarities of their properties.
SC.8.P.8.7  Explore the scientific theory of atoms (also known as atomic theory) by             Low
            recognizing that atoms are the smallest unit of an element and are composed of
            sub-atomic particles (electrons surrounding a nucleus containing protons and
            neutrons).
SC.8.P.8.8  Identify basic examples of and compare and classify the properties of               Moderate
            compounds, including acids, bases, and salts.
SC.8.P.8.9  Distinguish among mixtures (including solutions) and pure substances.               Moderate
SC.8.P.9.1  Explore the Law of Conservation of Mass by demonstrating and concluding that High
            mass is conserved when substances undergo physical and chemical changes.
SC.8.P.9.2  Differentiate between physical changes and chemical changes.                        Moderate
                                                     65


SC.8.P.9.3        Investigate and describe how temperature influences chemical changes.               High
SC.8.L.18.1       Describe and investigate the process of photosynthesis, such as the roles of light, High
                  carbon dioxide, water and chlorophyll; production of food; release of oxygen.
SC.8.L.18.2       Describe and investigate how cellular respiration breaks down food to provide       High
                  energy and releases carbon dioxide.
SC.8.L.18.3       Construct a scientific model of the carbon cycle to show how matter and energy      High
                  are continuously transferred within and between organisms and their physical
                  environment.
SC.8.L.18.4       Cite evidence that living systems follow the Laws of Conservation of Mass and       High
                  Energy.
MA.6.S.6.2        Select and analyze the measures of central tendency or variability to represent,    High
                  describe, analyze, and/or summarize a data set for the purposes of answering
                  questions appropriately.
MA.6.A.3.6        Construct and analyze tables, graphs, and equations to describe linear functions    High
                  and other simple relations using both common language and algebraic notation.
LA.8.4.2.2        The student will record information (e.g., observations, notes, lists, charts,
                  legends) related to a topic, including visual aids to organize and record
                  information, as appropriate, and attribute sources of information;
LA.8.2.2.3        The student will organize information to show understanding or relationships
                  among facts, ideas, and events (e.g., representing key points within text through
                  charting, mapping, paraphrasing, summarizing, or comparing/contrasting);
               Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code    Access Point Descriptor
SC.8.N.1.In.a         Identify a problem from the eighth grade curriculum, use reference materials to gather
                      information, carry out an experiment, collect and record data, and report results.
SC.8.N.1.Su.b         Recognize a possible explanation (hypothesis) for a science problem.
SC.8.N.2.In.a         Identify that scientific knowledge must be supported by evidence.
SC.8.N.3.In.a         Identify models used in the context of one’s own study of science.
SC.8.N.3.Su.b         Recognize that scientific theories can change.
SC.8.N.4.In.a         Identify ways that science processes can be used to make informed decisions in the
                      community, state, and nation.
SC.8.E.5.In.a         Compare the distances of the Moon, the Sun, and other stars from the Earth.
SC.8.E.5.In.b         Identify that the Earth and Sun are a part of the Milky Way galaxy.
SC.8.E.5.Su.b         Recognize that the Solar System is part of a galaxy.
SC.8.E.5.Pa.c         Recognize the four seasons.
SC.8.E.5.Su.c         Identify that there are planets and moons in the Solar System.
SC.8.E.5.Pa.d         Recognize a technology tool created for space exploration and adapted for personal use,
                      such as computers, telescopes, or satellites.
SC.8.P.8.In.a         Compare properties of solids, liquids, and gases.
SC.8.P.8.Su.b         Compare the weight of different sized objects.
SC.8.P.8.Pa.c         Recognize substances by physical properties, such as weight (heavy and light), size (big
                      and small), and temperature (hot and cold).
SC.8.P.9.In.a         Observe and classify changes in matter as physical (reversible) or chemical (irreversible).
SC.8.P.9.Su.b         Observe and recognize changes caused by heat on substances.
SC.8.L.18.In.a        Identify structures in plants that enable them to use the energy from the Sun to make
                      their own food through a process called photosynthesis.
                                                           66


SC.8.L.18.Su.b         Recognize that plants and animals get energy from food.
                   2002050 M/J Comprehensive Science 1, Advanced
Section: Basic and Adult Education                          Grade Group: Middle School Grades 6-8
Subject: Science                                            Domain: Earth/Space Sciences
Course Length: Year                                         Level: 3
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                  Benchmarks
                                                                                                       Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                    Knowledge
SC.6.N.1.1         Define a problem from the sixth grade curriculum, use appropriate reference         High
                   materials to support scientific understanding, plan and carry out scientific
                   investigation of various types, such as systematic observations or experiments,
                   identify variables, co
SC.6.N.1.2         Explain why scientific investigations should be replicable.                         High
SC.6.N.1.3         Explain the difference between an experiment and other types of scientific          High
                   investigation, and explain the relative benefits and limitations of each.
SC.6.N.1.4         Discuss, compare, and negotiate methods used, results obtained, and                 High
                   explanations among groups of students conducting the same investigation.
SC.6.N.1.5         Recognize that science involves creativity, not just in designing experiments, but  Moderate
                   also in creating explanations that fit evidence.
SC.6.N.2.1         Distinguish science from other activities involving thought.                        Moderate
SC.6.N.2.2         Explain that scientific knowledge is durable because it is open to change as new    Moderate
                   evidence or interpretations are encountered.
SC.6.N.2.3         Recognize that scientists who make contributions to scientific knowledge come       Low
                   from all kinds of backgrounds and possess varied talents, interests, and goals.
SC.6.N.3.1         Recognize and explain that a scientific theory is a well-supported and widely       Moderate
                   accepted explanation of nature and is not simply a claim posed by an
                   individual. Thus, the use of the term theory in science is very different than
                   how it is used in everyday
SC.6.N.3.2         Recognize and explain that a scientific law is a description of a specific          Moderate
                   relationship under given conditions in the natural world. Thus, scientific laws are
                   different from societal laws.
SC.6.N.3.3         Give several examples of scientific laws.                                           Low
SC.6.N.3.4         Identify the role of models in the context of the sixth grade science benchmarks. Moderate
SC.6.E.6.1         Describe and give examples of ways in which Earth's surface is built up and torn    Moderate
                   down by physical and chemical weathering, erosion, and deposition.
SC.6.E.6.2         Recognize that there are a variety of different landforms on Earth's surface such   Moderate
                   as coastlines, dunes, rivers, mountains, glaciers, deltas, and lakes and relate
                   these landforms as they apply to Florida.
SC.6.E.7.1         Differentiate among radiation, conduction, and convection, the three                Moderate
                   mechanisms by which heat is transferred through Earth's system.
SC.6.E.7.2         Investigate and apply how the cycling of water between the atmosphere and           High
                   hydrosphere has an effect on weather patterns and climate.
SC.6.E.7.3         Describe how global patterns such as the jet stream and ocean currents influence    High
                   local weather in measurable terms such as temperature, air pressure, wind
                   direction and speed, and humidity and precipitation.
                                                           67


SC.6.E.7.4    Differentiate and show interactions among the geosphere, hydrosphere,               High
              cryosphere, atmosphere, and biosphere.
SC.6.E.7.5    Explain how energy provided by the sun influences global patterns of                High
              atmospheric movement and the temperature differences between air, water, and
              land.
SC.6.E.7.6    Differentiate between weather and climate.                                          Moderate
SC.6.E.7.7    Investigate how natural disasters have affected human life in Florida.              High
SC.6.E.7.8    Describe ways human beings protect themselves from hazardous weather and            Moderate
              sun exposure.
SC.6.E.7.9    Describe how the composition and structure of the atmosphere protects life and      Moderate
              insulates the planet.
SC.6.P.11.1   Explore the Law of Conservation of Energy by differentiating between potential      Moderate
              and kinetic energy. Identify situations where kinetic energy is transformed into
              potential energy and vice versa.
SC.6.P.12.1   Measure and graph distance versus time for an object moving at a constant           High
              speed. Interpret this relationship.
SC.6.P.13.1   Investigate and describe types of forces including contact forces and forces        Moderate
              acting at a distance, such as electrical, magnetic, and gravitational.
SC.6.P.13.2   Explore the Law of Gravity by recognizing that every object exerts gravitational    Low
              force on every other object and that the force depends on how much mass the
              objects have and how far apart they are.
SC.6.P.13.3   Investigate and describe that an unbalanced force acting on an object changes its   Moderate
              speed, or direction of motion, or both.
SC.6.L.14.1   Describe and identify patterns in the hierarchical organization of organisms from   Low
              atoms to molecules and cells to tissues to organs to organ systems to organisms.
SC.6.L.14.2   Investigate and explain the components of the scientific theory of cells (cell      Moderate
              theory): all organisms are composed of cells (single-celled or multi-cellular), all
              cells come from pre-existing cells, and cells are the basic unit of life.
SC.6.L.14.3   Recognize and explore how cells of all organisms undergo similar processes to       Moderate
              maintain homeostasis, including extracting energy from food, getting rid of
              waste, and reproducing.
SC.6.L.14.4   Compare and contrast the structure and function of major organelles of plant and    Moderate
              animal cells, including cell wall, cell membrane, nucleus, cytoplasm,
              chloroplasts, mitochondria, and vacuoles.
SC.6.L.14.5   Identify and investigate the general functions of the major systems of the human    High
              body (digestive, respiratory, circulatory, reproductive, excretory, immune,
              nervous, and musculoskeletal) and describe ways these systems interact with
              each other to maintain
SC.6.L.14.6   Compare and contrast types of infectious agents that may infect the human body,     Moderate
              including viruses, bacteria, fungi, and parasites.
SC.6.L.15.1   Analyze and describe how and why organisms are classified according to shared       High
              characteristics with emphasis on the Linnaean system combined with the concept
              of Domains.
SC.912.E.7.3  Differentiate and describe the various interactions among Earth systems,            High
              including: atmosphere, hydrosphere, cryosphere, geosphere, and biosphere.
SC.912.E.7.5  Predict future weather conditions based on present observations and conceptual      High
              models and recognize limitations and uncertainties of such predictions.
SC.912.E.7.6  Relate the formation of severe weather to the various physical factors.             Moderate
SC.912.P.10.4 Describe heat as the energy transferred by convection, conduction, and              High
              radiation, and explain the connection of heat to change in temperature or states
              of matter.
                                                       68


SC.912.L.14.2     Relate structure to function for the components of plant and animal cells.           Moderate
                  Explain the role of cell membranes as a highly selective barrier (passive and
                  active transport).
SC.912.L.14.3     Compare and contrast the general structures of plant and animal cells. Compare       Moderate
                  and contrast the general structures of prokaryotic and eukaryotic cells.
SC.912.L.16.14    Describe the cell cycle, including the process of mitosis. Explain the role of       Moderate
                  mitosis in the formation of new cells and its importance in maintaining
                  chromosome number during asexual reproduction.
MA.6.S.6.2        Select and analyze the measures of central tendency or variability to represent,     High
                  describe, analyze, and/or summarize a data set for the purposes of answering
                  questions appropriately.
MA.6.A.3.6        Construct and analyze tables, graphs, and equations to describe linear functions     High
                  and other simple relations using both common language and algebraic notation.
LA.6.4.2.2        The student will record information (e.g., observations, notes, lists, charts,
                  legends) related to a topic, including visual aids to organize and record
                  information and include a list of sources used;
LA.6.2.2.3        The student will organize information to show understanding (e.g., representing
                  main ideas within text through charting, mapping, paraphrasing, summarizing, or
                  comparing/contrasting);
HE.6.C.1.3        Identify environmental factors that affect personal health.
HE.6.C.1.8        Explain how body systems are impacted by hereditary factors and infectious
                  agents.
               Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code    Access Point Descriptor
SC.6.N.1.In.a         Identify a problem from the sixth grade curriculum, use reference materials to gather
                      information, carry out an experiment, collect and record data, and report results.
SC.6.N.1.Su.b         Recognize that experiments involve procedures that can be repeated the same way by
                      others.
SC.6.N.1.Pa.c         Recognize that people conduct activities and share information about science.
SC.6.N.2.In.a         Identify familiar topics included in the study of science.
SC.6.N.2.Su.b         Recognize that scientific knowledge changes when new things are discovered.
SC.6.N.3.In.a         Identify that a scientific theory is an explanation of nature supported by evidence.
SC.6.N.3.Su.b         Recognize events that are based on scientific laws, such as the law of gravity.
SC.6.E.6.In.a         Describe how weathering and erosion reshape the Earth’s surface.
SC.6.E.6.Su.b         Recognize different landforms in Florida, including beaches (coastlines), rivers, and
                      lakes.
SC.6.E.7.In.a         Recognize that heat is a flow of energy that moves through Earth’s land, air, and water in
                      different ways, including conduction, convection, and radiation.
SC.6.E.7.Su.b         Recognize parts of the water cycle such as clouds (condensation), rain (precipitation),
                      and evaporation.
SC.6.E.7.Pa.c         Recognize different types of weather conditions, including hot/cold, raining/not raining,
                      and windy/calm.
SC.6.P.11.In.a        Identify energy as stored (potential) or expressed in motion (kinetic).
SC.6.P.12.In.a        Identify that speed describes the distance and time in which an object is moving, such as
                      miles per hour.
SC.6.P.13.In.a        Identify examples of gravitational and contact forces, such as falling objects or push and
                      pull.
                                                            69


SC.6.P.13.Su.b         Recognize that force can change the speed and direction of an object in motion.
SC.6.P.13.Pa.c         Recognize the speed (fast or slow) of a moving object.
SC.6.L.14.In.a         Identify how the major structures of plants and organs of animals work as parts of larger
                       systems, such as the heart is part of the circulatory system that pumps blood.
SC.6.L.14.Su.b         Recognize that there are smaller parts in all living things, too small to be seen without
                       magnification, called cells.
SC.6.L.14.Pa.c         Recognize body parts related to basic needs, such as mouth for eating.
SC.6.L.15.In.a         Classify animals into major groups, such as insects, fish, reptiles, mammals, and birds.
SC.912.E.7.In.a        Identify cycles that occur on Earth, such as the water and carbon cycles, and the role
                       energy plays in them.
SC.912.E.7.Su.b        Recognize that currents move the ocean water around Earth.
SC.912.E.7.Pa.c        Recognize that humans, plants, and animals live on the Earth (biosphere).
SC.912.P.10.In.a       Identify examples of energy being transformed from one form to another (conserved
                       quantity).
SC.912.P.10.Su.b       Recognize the relationship between work and power, such as power is the amount of
                       work a person or machine does.
SC.912.P.10.Pa.c       Recognize the source and recipient of heat transfer.
SC.912.L.14.In.a       Identify that all living things are made of cells and cells function in similar ways (cell
                       theory).
SC.912.L.14.Su.b       Recognize that cells have different parts and each has a function.
SC.912.L.14.Pa.c       Identify ways to prevent infection from bacteria and viruses, such as hand washing and
                       first aid.
SC.912.L.16.In.a       Identify that genes are sets of instructions that determine which characteristics are passed
                       from parent to offspring.
SC.912.L.16.Su.b       Recognize that all organisms have a substance called DNA with unique information.
SC.912.L.16.Pa.c       Recognize that illness can result when parts of our bodies are not working properly.
                   2002080 M/J Comprehensive Science 2, Advanced
Section: Basic and Adult Education                          Grade Group: Middle School Grades 6-8
Subject: Science                                            Domain: Earth/Space Sciences
Course Length: Year                                         Level: 3
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                   Benchmarks
                                                                                                         Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                      Knowledge
SC.7.N.1.1         Define a problem from the seventh grade curriculum, use appropriate reference         High
                   materials to support scientific understanding, plan and carry out scientific
                   investigation of various types, such as systematic observations or experiments,
                   identify variables,
SC.7.N.1.2         Differentiate replication (by others) from repetition (multiple trials).              Moderate
SC.7.N.1.3         Distinguish between an experiment (which must involve the identification and          Moderate
                   control of variables) and other forms of scientific investigation and explain that
                   not all scientific knowledge is derived from experimentation.
SC.7.N.1.4         Identify test variables (independent variables) and outcome variables (dependent Low
                   variables) in an experiment.
                                                            70


SC.7.N.1.5  Describe the methods used in the pursuit of a scientific explanation as seen in     Moderate
            different fields of science such as biology, geology, and physics.
SC.7.N.1.6  Explain that empirical evidence is the cumulative body of observations of a         Moderate
            natural phenomenon on which scientific explanations are based.
SC.7.N.1.7  Explain that scientific knowledge is the result of a great deal of debate and       Moderate
            confirmation within the science community.
SC.7.N.2.1  Identify an instance from the history of science in which scientific knowledge      Low
            has changed when new evidence or new interpretations are encountered.
SC.7.N.3.1  Recognize and explain the difference between theories and laws and give several     High
            examples of scientific theories and the evidence that supports them.
SC.7.N.3.2  Identify the benefits and limitations of the use of scientific models.              Moderate
SC.7.E.6.1  Describe the layers of the solid Earth, including the lithosphere, the hot          Moderate
            convecting mantle, and the dense metallic liquid and solid cores.
SC.7.E.6.2  Identify the patterns within the rock cycle and relate them to surface events       High
            (weathering and erosion) and sub-surface events (plate tectonics and mountain
            building).
SC.7.E.6.3  Identify current methods for measuring the age of Earth and its parts, including    Moderate
            the law of superposition and radioactive dating.
SC.7.E.6.4  Explain and give examples of how physical evidence supports scientific theories     High
            that Earth has evolved over geologic time due to natural processes.
SC.7.E.6.5  Explore the scientific theory of plate tectonics by describing how the movement     Moderate
            of Earth's crustal plates causes both slow and rapid changes in Earth's surface,
            including volcanic eruptions, earthquakes, and mountain building.
SC.7.E.6.6  Identify the impact that humans have had on Earth, such as deforestation,           Moderate
            urbanization, desertification, erosion, air and water quality, changing the flow of
            water.
SC.7.E.6.7  Recognize that heat flow and movement of material within Earth causes               Moderate
            earthquakes and volcanic eruptions, and creates mountains and ocean basins.
SC.7.P.10.1 Illustrate that the sun's energy arrives as radiation with a wide range of          Low
            wavelengths, including infrared, visible, and ultraviolet, and that white light is
            made up of a spectrum of many different colors.
SC.7.P.10.2 Observe and explain that light can be reflected, refracted, and/or absorbed.        High
SC.7.P.10.3 Recognize that light waves, sound waves, and other waves move at different          Low
            speeds in different materials.
SC.7.P.11.1 Recognize that adding heat to or removing heat from a system may result in a        Low
            temperature change and possibly a change of state.
SC.7.P.11.2 Investigate and describe the transformation of energy from one form to another. Moderate
SC.7.P.11.3 Cite evidence to explain that energy cannot be created nor destroyed, only          High
            changed from one form to another.
SC.7.P.11.4 Observe and describe that heat flows in predictable ways, moving from warmer        Moderate
            objects to cooler ones until they reach the same temperature.
SC.7.L.15.1 Recognize that fossil evidence is consistent with the scientific theory of          Moderate
            evolution that living things evolved from earlier species.
SC.7.L.15.2 Explore the scientific theory of evolution by recognizing and explaining ways in    High
            which genetic variation and environmental factors contribute to evolution by
            natural selection and diversity of organisms.
SC.7.L.15.3 Explore the scientific theory of evolution by relating how the inability of a       High
            species to adapt within a changing environment may contribute to the extinction
            of that species.
                                                     71


SC.7.L.16.1    Understand and explain that every organism requires a set of instructions that      High
               specifies its traits, that this hereditary information (DNA) contains genes located
               in the chromosomes of each cell, and that heredity is the passage of these
               instructions from
SC.7.L.16.2    Determine the probabilities for genotype and phenotype combinations using           Moderate
               Punnett Squares and pedigrees.
SC.7.L.16.3    Compare and contrast the general processes of sexual reproduction requiring         Moderate
               meiosis and asexual reproduction requiring mitosis.
SC.7.L.16.4    Recognize and explore the impact of biotechnology (cloning, genetic                 High
               engineering, artificial selection) on the individual, society and the environment.
SC.7.L.17.1    Explain and illustrate the roles of and relationships among producers,              High
               consumers, and decomposers in the process of energy transfer in a food web.
SC.7.L.17.2    Compare and contrast the relationships among organisms such as mutualism,           Moderate
               predation, parasitism, competition, and commensalism.
SC.7.L.17.3    Describe and investigate various limiting factors in the local ecosystem and their  High
               impact on native populations, including food, shelter, water, space, disease,
               parasitism, predation, and nesting sites.
SC.912.E.6.1   Describe and differentiate the layers of Earth and the interactions among them.     Moderate
SC.912.E.6.2   Connect surface features to surface processes that are responsible for their        Moderate
               formation.
SC.912.E.6.3   Analyze the scientific theory of plate tectonics and identify related major         High
               processes and features as a result of moving plates.
SC.912.P.10.1  Differentiate among the various forms of energy and recognize that they can be      Moderate
               transformed from one form to others.
SC.912.P.10.5  Relate temperature to the average molecular kinetic energy.                         Moderate
SC.912.L.15.6  Discuss distinguishing characteristics of the domains and kingdoms of living        Moderate
               organisms.
SC.912.L.15.13 Describe the conditions required for natural selection, including: overproduction   Moderate
               of offspring, inherited variation, and the struggle to survive, which result in
               differential reproductive success.
SC.912.L.16.2  Discuss observed inheritance patterns caused by various modes of inheritance,       High
               including dominant, recessive, codominant, sex-linked, polygenic, and multiple
               alleles.
SC.912.L.16.16 Describe the process of meiosis, including independent assortment and crossing      Moderate
               over. Explain how reduction division results in the formation of haploid gametes
               or spores.
SC.912.L.17.6  Compare and contrast the relationships among organisms, including predation,        Moderate
               parasitism, competition, commensalism, and mutualism.
SC.912.L.17.9  Use a food web to identify and distinguish producers, consumers, and                Moderate
               decomposers. Explain the pathway of energy transfer through trophic levels and
               the reduction of available energy at successive trophic levels.
MA.6.S.6.2     Select and analyze the measures of central tendency or variability to represent,    High
               describe, analyze, and/or summarize a data set for the purposes of answering
               questions appropriately.
MA.6.A.3.6     Construct and analyze tables, graphs, and equations to describe linear functions    High
               and other simple relations using both common language and algebraic notation.
LA.7.4.2.2     The student will record information (e.g., observations, notes, lists, charts,
               legends) related to a topic, including visual aids to organize and record
               information, as appropriate, and attribute sources of information;
                                                          72


LA.7.2.2.3        The student will organize information to show understanding (e.g., representing
                  main ideas within text through charting, mapping, paraphrasing, summarizing, or
                  comparing/contrasting);
HE.7.C.1.4        Describe how heredity can affect personal health.
               Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code    Access Point Descriptor
SC.7.N.1.In.a         Identify a problem from the seventh grade curriculum, use reference materials to gather
                      information, carry out an experiment, collect and record data, and report results.
SC.7.N.1.Su.b         Recognize what is tested in a simple experiment (dependent variable).
SC.7.N.1.Pa.c         Associate objects and activities with science.
SC.7.N.2.In.a         Identify an example of a change in scientific knowledge based on new evidence or new
                      interpretations.
SC.7.N.3.In.a         Identify that scientific theories are explanations and laws describe relationships, and both
                      are supported by evidence.
SC.7.N.3.Su.b         Recognize a benefit of using a model to explain how things work.
SC.7.E.6.In.a         Identify that Earth has three layers (crust, mantle, and core) and describe the inside
                      (core) as the hottest layer.
SC.7.E.6.Su.b         Recognize that mountains change size and shape over a long period of time.
SC.7.E.6.Pa.c         Recognize that ground on the Earth’s surface changes over time.
SC.7.P.10.In.a        Identify that white (visible) light has many colors, such as when viewed with a prism.
SC.7.P.10.Su.b        Recognize that light can be reflected.
SC.7.P.10.Pa.c        Match light and sound to their sources.
SC.7.P.11.In.a        Identify that when heat is added or taken away, a temperature change occurs.
SC.7.P.11.Su.b        Recognize that energy can change forms, such as electricity produces light and heat in a
                      lamp.
SC.7.L.15.In.a        Recognize that fossils help people learn about living things that lived a very long time
                      ago.
SC.7.L.15.Su.b        Recognize that common plants or animals have special features that enable them to live
                      in their environment, such as a as a fish has gills so it can live underwater.
SC.7.L.16.In.a        Explain that some characteristics are passed from parent to child (inherited).
SC.7.L.16.Su.b        Recognize that animals, including humans, inherit some characteristics from one parent
                      and some from the other.
SC.7.L.16.Pa.c        Recognize common products, such as medicine, developed through science.
SC.7.L.17.In.a        Identify that in a simple food chain, energy transfers from the Sun to plants (producers),
                      to animals (consumers), and to organisms that cause decay (decomposers).
SC.7.L.17.Su.b        Recognize how living things affect each other in their habitat (ecosystem).
SC.7.L.17.Pa.c        Recognize what happens when animals don’t get food and water.
SC.912.E.6.In.a       Describe the three layers of Earth (core, mantle, and crust).
SC.912.E.6.Su.b       Identify types of surface features, such as hills and valleys.
SC.912.P.10.In.a      Identify examples of energy being transformed from one form to another (conserved
                      quantity).
SC.912.P.10.Su.b      Recognize the relationship between work and power, such as power is the amount of
                      work a person or machine does.
SC.912.P.10.Pa.c      Recognize the source and recipient of heat transfer.
                                                           73


SC.912.L.15.In.a        Identify that prehistoric plants and animals changed over time (evolved) or became
                        extinct.
SC.912.L.15.Su.b        Match organisms to the animal, plant, and fungus kingdoms.
SC.912.L.15.Pa.c        Recognize that animals produce offspring.
SC.912.L.16.In.a        Identify that genes are sets of instructions that determine which characteristics are passed
                        from parent to offspring.
SC.912.L.16.Su.b        Recognize that all organisms have a substance called DNA with unique information.
SC.912.L.16.Pa.c        Recognize that illness can result when parts of our bodies are not working properly.
SC.912.L.17.In.a        Recognize that living things in oceans and fresh water are affected by the location,
                        availability of light, depth of the water, and temperature.
SC.912.L.17.Su.b        Recognize how animals and plants in an ecosystem may be affected by changes to the
                        food supply or climate.
SC.912.L.17.Pa.c        Recognize examples of mutual relationships between people and other living things.
                   2002110 M/J Comprehensive Science 3, Advanced
Section: Basic and Adult Education                           Grade Group: Middle School Grades 6-8
Subject: Science                                             Domain: Earth/Space Sciences
Course Length: Year                                          Level: 3
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                    Benchmarks
                                                                                                         Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                      Knowledge
SC.8.N.1.1         Define a problem from the eighth grade curriculum using appropriate reference         High
                   materials to support scientific understanding, plan and carry out scientific
                   investigations of various types, such as systematic observations or experiments,
                   identify variables,
SC.8.N.1.2         Design and conduct a study using repeated trials and replication.                     High
SC.8.N.1.3         Use phrases such as "results support" or "fail to support" in science,                Moderate
                   understanding that science does not offer conclusive 'proof' of a knowledge
                   claim.
SC.8.N.1.4         Explain how hypotheses are valuable if they lead to further investigations, even      High
                   if they turn out not to be supported by the data.
SC.8.N.1.5         Analyze the methods used to develop a scientific explanation as seen in different     High
                   fields of science.
SC.8.N.1.6         Understand that scientific investigations involve the collection of relevant          Moderate
                   empirical evidence, the use of logical reasoning, and the application of
                   imagination in devising hypotheses, predictions, explanations and models to
                   make sense of the collected e
SC.8.N.2.1         Distinguish between scientific and pseudoscientific ideas.                            Moderate
SC.8.N.2.2         Discuss what characterizes science and its methods.                                   Moderate
SC.8.N.3.1         Select models useful in relating the results of their own investigations.             High
SC.8.N.3.2         Explain why theories may be modified but are rarely discarded.                        High
SC.8.N.4.1         Explain that science is one of the processes that can be used to inform decision      Moderate
                   making at the community, state, national, and international levels.
SC.8.N.4.2         Explain how political, social, and economic concerns can affect science, and          High
                   vice versa.
                                                             74


SC.8.E.5.1  Recognize that there are enormous distances between objects in space and apply      Moderate
            our knowledge of light and space travel to understand this distance.
SC.8.E.5.2  Recognize that the universe contains many billions of galaxies and that each        Low
            galaxy contains many billions of stars.
SC.8.E.5.3  Distinguish the hierarchical relationships between planets and other                High
            astronomical bodies relative to solar system, galaxy, and universe, including
            distance, size, and composition.
SC.8.E.5.4  Explore the Law of Universal Gravitation by explaining the role that gravity        High
            plays in the formation of planets, stars, and solar systems and in determining
            their motions.
SC.8.E.5.5  Describe and classify specific physical properties of stars: apparent magnitude     Moderate
            (brightness), temperature (color), size, and luminosity (absolute brightness).
SC.8.E.5.6  Create models of solar properties including: rotation, structure of the Sun,        Low
            convection, sunspots, solar flares, and prominences.
SC.8.E.5.7  Compare and contrast the properties of objects in the Solar System including the    Moderate
            Sun, planets, and moons to those of Earth, such as gravitational force, distance
            from the Sun, speed, movement, temperature, and atmospheric conditions.
SC.8.E.5.8  Compare various historical models of the Solar System, including geocentric         Moderate
            and heliocentric.
SC.8.E.5.9  Explain the impact of objects in space on each other including:                     High
SC.8.E.5.10 Assess how technology is essential to science for such purposes as access to        High
            outer space and other remote locations, sample collection, measurement, data
            collection and storage, computation, and communication of information.
SC.8.E.5.11 Identify and compare characteristics of the electromagnetic spectrum such as        High
            wavelength, frequency, use, and hazards and recognize its application to an
            understanding of planetary images and satellite photographs.
SC.8.E.5.12 Summarize the effects of space exploration on the economy and culture of            Moderate
            Florida.
SC.8.P.8.1  Explore the scientific theory of atoms (also known as atomic theory) by using       Moderate
            models to explain the motion of particles in solids, liquids, and gases.
SC.8.P.8.2  Differentiate between weight and mass recognizing that weight is the amount of      Moderate
            gravitational pull on an object and is distinct from, though proportional to, mass.
SC.8.P.8.3  Explore and describe the densities of various materials through measurement of      Moderate
            their masses and volumes.
SC.8.P.8.4  Classify and compare substances on the basis of characteristic physical             Moderate
            properties that can be demonstrated or measured; for example, density, thermal
            or electrical conductivity, solubility, magnetic properties, melting and boiling
            points, and know that t
SC.8.P.8.5  Recognize that there are a finite number of elements and that their atoms           Low
            combine in a multitude of ways to produce compounds that make up all of the
            living and nonliving things that we encounter.
SC.8.P.8.6  Recognize that elements are grouped in the periodic table according to              Low
            similarities of their properties.
SC.8.P.8.7  Explore the scientific theory of atoms (also known as atomic theory) by             Low
            recognizing that atoms are the smallest unit of an element and are composed of
            sub-atomic particles (electrons surrounding a nucleus containing protons and
            neutrons).
SC.8.P.8.8  Identify basic examples of and compare and classify the properties of               Moderate
            compounds, including acids, bases, and salts.
SC.8.P.8.9  Distinguish among mixtures (including solutions) and pure substances.               Moderate
                                                     75


SC.8.P.9.1        Explore the Law of Conservation of Mass by demonstrating and concluding that High
                  mass is conserved when substances undergo physical and chemical changes.
SC.8.P.9.2        Differentiate between physical changes and chemical changes.                        Moderate
SC.8.P.9.3        Investigate and describe how temperature influences chemical changes.               High
SC.8.L.18.1       Describe and investigate the process of photosynthesis, such as the roles of light, High
                  carbon dioxide, water and chlorophyll; production of food; release of oxygen.
SC.8.L.18.2       Describe and investigate how cellular respiration breaks down food to provide       High
                  energy and releases carbon dioxide.
SC.8.L.18.3       Construct a scientific model of the carbon cycle to show how matter and energy      High
                  are continuously transferred within and between organisms and their physical
                  environment.
SC.8.L.18.4       Cite evidence that living systems follow the Laws of Conservation of Mass and       High
                  Energy.
SC.912.E.5.4      Explain the physical properties of the Sun and its dynamic nature and connect       High
                  them to conditions and events on Earth.
SC.912.P.8.1      Differentiate among the four states of matter.                                      Moderate
SC.912.P.8.2      Differentiate between physical and chemical properties and physical and             Moderate
                  chemical changes of matter.
SC.912.P.8.4      Explore the scientific theory of atoms (also known as atomic theory) by             High
                  describing the structure of atoms in terms of protons, neutrons and electrons, and
                  differentiate among these particles in terms of their mass, electrical charges and
                  locations within
SC.912.P.8.5      Relate properties of atoms and their position in the periodic table to the          Moderate
                  arrangement of their electrons.
SC.912.P.8.7      Interpret formula representations of molecules and compounds in terms of            Moderate
                  composition and structure.
SC.912.P.8.11     Relate acidity and basicity to hydronium and hydroxyl ion concentration and pH.     Moderate
SC.912.L.18.7     Identify the reactants, products, and basic functions of photosynthesis.            Moderate
SC.912.L.18.8     Identify the reactants, products, and basic functions of aerobic and anaerobic      Moderate
                  cellular respiration.
SC.912.L.18.9     Explain the interrelated nature of photosynthesis and cellular respiration.         Moderate
MA.6.S.6.2        Select and analyze the measures of central tendency or variability to represent, High
                  describe, analyze, and/or summarize a data set for the purposes of answering
                  questions appropriately.
MA.6.A.3.6        Construct and analyze tables, graphs, and equations to describe linear functions High
                  and other simple relations using both common language and algebraic notation.
LA.8.4.2.2        The student will record information (e.g., observations, notes, lists, charts,
                  legends) related to a topic, including visual aids to organize and record
                  information, as appropriate, and attribute sources of information;
LA.8.2.2.3        The student will organize information to show understanding or relationships
                  among facts, ideas, and events (e.g., representing key points within text through
                  charting, mapping, paraphrasing, summarizing, or comparing/contrasting);
              Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code    Access Point Descriptor
SC.8.N.1.In.a         Identify a problem from the eighth grade curriculum, use reference materials to gather
                      information, carry out an experiment, collect and record data, and report results.
SC.8.N.1.Su.b         Recognize a possible explanation (hypothesis) for a science problem.
SC.8.N.2.In.a         Identify that scientific knowledge must be supported by evidence.
                                                          76


SC.8.N.3.In.a          Identify models used in the context of one’s own study of science.
SC.8.N.3.Su.b          Recognize that scientific theories can change.
SC.8.N.4.In.a          Identify ways that science processes can be used to make informed decisions in the
                       community, state, and nation.
SC.8.E.5.In.a          Compare the distances of the Moon, the Sun, and other stars from the Earth.
SC.8.E.5.In.b          Identify that the Earth and Sun are a part of the Milky Way galaxy.
SC.8.E.5.Su.b          Recognize that the Solar System is part of a galaxy.
SC.8.E.5.Pa.c          Recognize the four seasons.
SC.8.E.5.Su.c          Identify that there are planets and moons in the Solar System.
SC.8.E.5.Pa.d          Recognize a technology tool created for space exploration and adapted for personal use,
                       such as computers, telescopes, or satellites.
SC.8.P.8.In.a          Compare properties of solids, liquids, and gases.
SC.8.P.8.Su.b          Compare the weight of different sized objects.
SC.8.P.8.Pa.c          Recognize substances by physical properties, such as weight (heavy and light), size (big
                       and small), and temperature (hot and cold).
SC.8.P.9.In.a          Observe and classify changes in matter as physical (reversible) or chemical (irreversible).
SC.8.P.9.Su.b          Observe and recognize changes caused by heat on substances.
SC.8.L.18.In.a         Identify structures in plants that enable them to use the energy from the Sun to make
                       their own food through a process called photosynthesis.
SC.8.L.18.Su.b         Recognize that plants and animals get energy from food.
SC.912.E.5.In.a        Recognize that the Milky Way is part of the expanding universe.
SC.912.E.5.Su.b        Recognize that stars are made of burning gases.
SC.912.E.5.Pa.c        Observe and recognize effects of the Sun on Earth, such as temperature changes.
SC.912.P.8.In.a        Classify states of matter as solid, liquid, and gaseous.
SC.912.P.8.Su.b        Identify examples of physical and chemical changes.
SC.912.P.8.Pa.c        Recognize that the parts of an object can be put together to make a whole.
SC.912.L.18.In.a       Identify that carbohydrates, fats, proteins, and nucleic acids (macromolecules) are
                       important for human organisms.
SC.912.L.18.Su.b       Recognize that the function of photosynthesis is to produce food for plants.
SC.912.L.18.Pa.c       Identify that food is a source of energy.
                                             2000310 Biology I
Section: Basic and Adult Education                           Grade Group: Secondary Grades 9-12
Subject: Science                                             Domain: Biological Sciences
Course Length: Year                                          Level: 2
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                  Benchmarks
                                                                                                       Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                    Knowledge
SC.912.N.1.1       Define a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, for example: biology, High
                   chemistry, physics, and earth/space science, and do the following:
                                                            77


SC.912.N.1.3   Recognize that the strength or usefulness of a scientific claim is evaluated         Low
               through scientific argumentation, which depends on critical and logical
               thinking, and the active consideration of alternative scientific explanations to
               explain the data present
SC.912.N.1.4   Identify sources of information and assess their reliability according to the strict High
               standards of scientific investigation.
SC.912.N.1.6   Describe how scientific inferences are drawn from scientific observations and        Moderate
               provide examples from the content being studied.
SC.912.N.2.1   Identify what is science, what clearly is not science, and what superficially        High
               resembles science (but fails to meet the criteria for science).
SC.912.N.2.2   Identify which questions can be answered through science and which questions         High
               are outside the boundaries of scientific investigation, such as questions
               addressed by other ways of knowing, such as art, philosophy, and religion.
SC.912.N.3.1   Explain that a scientific theory is the culmination of many scientific               High
               investigations drawing together all the current evidence concerning a substantial
               range of phenomena; thus, a scientific theory represents the most powerful
               explanation scientists have
SC.912.N.3.4   Recognize that theories do not become laws, nor do laws become theories;             Moderate
               theories are well supported explanations and laws are well supported
               descriptions.
SC.912.E.7.1   Analyze the movement of matter and energy through the different                      High
               biogeochemical cycles, including water and carbon.
SC.912.L.14.1  Describe the scientific theory of cells (cell theory) and relate the history of its  Moderate
               discovery to the process of science.
SC.912.L.14.2  Relate structure to function for the components of plant and animal cells.           Moderate
               Explain the role of cell membranes as a highly selective barrier (passive and
               active transport).
SC.912.L.14.3  Compare and contrast the general structures of plant and animal cells. Compare       Moderate
               and contrast the general structures of prokaryotic and eukaryotic cells.
SC.912.L.14.4  Compare and contrast structure and function of various types of microscopes.         Moderate
SC.912.L.14.6  Explain the significance of genetic factors, environmental factors, and              High
               pathogenic agents to health from the perspectives of both individual and public
               health.
SC.912.L.14.7  Relate the structure of each of the major plant organs and tissues to                Moderate
               physiological processes.
SC.912.L.14.26 Identify the major parts of the brain on diagrams or models.                         Low
SC.912.L.14.36 Describe the factors affecting blood flow through the cardiovascular system.         Moderate
SC.912.L.14.52 Explain the basic functions of the human immune system, including specific and       Moderate
               nonspecific immune response, vaccines, and antibiotics.
SC.912.L.15.1  Explain how the scientific theory of evolution is supported by the fossil record,    High
               comparative anatomy, comparative embryology, biogeography, molecular
               biology, and observed evolutionary change.
SC.912.L.15.4  Describe how and why organisms are hierarchically classified and based on            High
               evolutionary relationships.
SC.912.L.15.5  Explain the reasons for changes in how organisms are classified.                     High
SC.912.L.15.6  Discuss distinguishing characteristics of the domains and kingdoms of living         Moderate
               organisms.
SC.912.L.15.8  Describe the scientific explanations of the origin of life on Earth.                 Moderate
SC.912.L.15.10 Identify basic trends in hominid evolution from early ancestors six million years Moderate
               ago to modern humans, including brain size, jaw size, language, and
               manufacture of tools.
                                                        78


SC.912.L.15.13 Describe the conditions required for natural selection, including: overproduction Moderate
               of offspring, inherited variation, and the struggle to survive, which result in
               differential reproductive success.
SC.912.L.15.14 Discuss mechanisms of evolutionary change other than natural selection such as Moderate
               genetic drift and gene flow.
SC.912.L.15.15 Describe how mutation and genetic recombination increase genetic variation.       Moderate
SC.912.L.16.1  Use Mendel's laws of segregation and independent assortment to analyze            High
               patterns of inheritance.
SC.912.L.16.2  Discuss observed inheritance patterns caused by various modes of inheritance,     High
               including dominant, recessive, codominant, sex-linked, polygenic, and multiple
               alleles.
SC.912.L.16.3  Describe the basic process of DNA replication and how it relates to the           High
               transmission and conservation of the genetic information.
SC.912.L.16.4  Explain how mutations in the DNA sequence may or may not result in                High
               phenotypic change. Explain how mutations in gametes may result in phenotypic
               changes in offspring.
SC.912.L.16.5  Explain the basic processes of transcription and translation, and how they result High
               in the expression of genes.
SC.912.L.16.8  Explain the relationship between mutation, cell cycle, and uncontrolled cell      Moderate
               growth potentially resulting in cancer.
SC.912.L.16.9  Explain how and why the genetic code is universal and is common to almost all     Moderate
               organisms.
SC.912.L.16.10 Evaluate the impact of biotechnology on the individual, society and the           High
               environment, including medical and ethical issues.
SC.912.L.16.13 Describe the basic anatomy and physiology of the human reproductive system.       Moderate
               Describe the process of human development from fertilization to birth and major
               changes that occur in each trimester of pregnancy.
SC.912.L.16.14 Describe the cell cycle, including the process of mitosis. Explain the role of    Moderate
               mitosis in the formation of new cells and its importance in maintaining
               chromosome number during asexual reproduction.
SC.912.L.16.16 Describe the process of meiosis, including independent assortment and crossing    Moderate
               over. Explain how reduction division results in the formation of haploid gametes
               or spores.
SC.912.L.16.17 Compare and contrast mitosis and meiosis and relate to the processes of sexual    High
               and asexual reproduction and their consequences for genetic variation.
SC.912.L.17.2  Explain the general distribution of life in aquatic systems as a function of      High
               chemistry, geography, light, depth, salinity, and temperature.
SC.912.L.17.4  Describe changes in ecosystems resulting from seasonal variations, climate        Moderate
               change and succession.
SC.912.L.17.5  Analyze how population size is determined by births, deaths, immigration,         High
               emigration, and limiting factors (biotic and abiotic) that determine carrying
               capacity.
SC.912.L.17.8  Recognize the consequences of the losses of biodiversity due to catastrophic      High
               events, climate changes, human activity, and the introduction of invasive, non
               native species.
SC.912.L.17.9  Use a food web to identify and distinguish producers, consumers, and              Moderate
               decomposers. Explain the pathway of energy transfer through trophic levels and
               the reduction of available energy at successive trophic levels.
SC.912.L.17.11 Evaluate the costs and benefits of renewable and nonrenewable resources, such     High
               as water, energy, fossil fuels, wildlife, and forests.
                                                        79


SC.912.L.17.13    Discuss the need for adequate monitoring of environmental parameters when            High
                  making policy decisions.
SC.912.L.17.20    Predict the impact of individuals on environmental systems and examine how           High
                  human lifestyles affect sustainability.
SC.912.L.18.1     Describe the basic molecular structures and primary functions of the four major      Moderate
                  categories of biological macromolecules.
SC.912.L.18.7     Identify the reactants, products, and basic functions of photosynthesis.             Moderate
SC.912.L.18.8     Identify the reactants, products, and basic functions of aerobic and anaerobic       Moderate
                  cellular respiration.
SC.912.L.18.9     Explain the interrelated nature of photosynthesis and cellular respiration.          Moderate
SC.912.L.18.10    Connect the role of adenosine triphosphate (ATP) to energy transfers within a        High
                  cell.
SC.912.L.18.11    Explain the role of enzymes as catalysts that lower the activation energy of         Moderate
                  biochemical reactions. Identify factors, such as pH and temperature, and their
                  effect on enzyme activity.
SC.912.L.18.12    Discuss the special properties of water that contribute to Earth's suitability as an Moderate
                  environment for life: cohesive behavior, ability to moderate temperature,
                  expansion upon freezing, and versatility as a solvent.
MA.912.S.1.2      Determine appropriate and consistent standards of measurement for the data to        Moderate
                  be collected in a survey or experiment.
MA.912.S.3.2      Collect, organize, and analyze data sets, determine the best format for the data     High
                  and present visual summaries from the following:
LA.910.4.2.2      The student will record information and ideas from primary and/or secondary
                  sources accurately and coherently, noting the validity and reliability of these
                  sources and attributing sources of information;
LA.910.2.2.3      The student will organize information to show understanding or relationships
                  among facts, ideas, and events (e.g., representing key points within text through
                  charting, mapping, paraphrasing, summarizing, comparing, contrasting, or
                  outlining);
HE.912.C.1.3      Evaluate how environment and personal health are interrelated.
HE.912.C.1.4      Analyze how heredity and family history can impact personal health.
HE.912.C.1.8      Analyze strategies for prevention, detection, and treatment of communicable and
                  chronic diseases.
               Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code    Access Point Descriptor
SC.912.N.1.In.a       Identify a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, including life science, earth
                      and space science, or physical science, and do the following: 1. Identify a scientific
                      question 2. Examine reliable sources of informtion to identify what is already k
SC.912.N.1.Su.b       Identify the basic process used in scientific investigations, including questioning,
                      observing, recording, determining, and sharing results.
SC.912.N.1.Pa.c       Recognize that when a variety of common activities are repeated the same way, the
                      outcomes are the same.
SC.912.N.2.In.a       Identify examples of investigations that involve science.
SC.912.N.2.Su.b       Recognize that what is known about science can change based on new information.
SC.912.N.3.In.a       Recognize that a scientific theory is developed by repeated investigations of many
                      scientists and agreement on the likely explanation.
SC.912.N.3.In.b       Identify examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in the natural world, such
                      as Newton’s laws.
                                                          80


SC.912.N.3.Su.b        Recognize examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in nature, such as
                       Newton’s laws.
SC.912.N.3.Su.c        Recognize ways models are used in the study of science.
SC.912.E.7.In.a        Identify cycles that occur on Earth, such as the water and carbon cycles, and the role
                       energy plays in them.
SC.912.E.7.Su.b        Recognize that currents move the ocean water around Earth.
SC.912.E.7.Pa.c        Recognize that humans, plants, and animals live on the Earth (biosphere).
SC.912.L.14.In.a       Identify that all living things are made of cells and cells function in similar ways (cell
                       theory).
SC.912.L.14.Su.b       Recognize that cells have different parts and each has a function.
SC.912.L.14.Pa.c       Identify ways to prevent infection from bacteria and viruses, such as hand washing and
                       first aid.
SC.912.L.15.In.a       Identify that prehistoric plants and animals changed over time (evolved) or became
                       extinct.
SC.912.L.15.Su.b       Match organisms to the animal, plant, and fungus kingdoms.
SC.912.L.15.Pa.c       Recognize that animals produce offspring.
SC.912.L.16.In.a       Identify that genes are sets of instructions that determine which characteristics are passed
                       from parent to offspring.
SC.912.L.16.Su.b       Recognize that all organisms have a substance called DNA with unique information.
SC.912.L.16.Pa.c       Recognize that illness can result when parts of our bodies are not working properly.
SC.912.L.17.In.a       Recognize that living things in oceans and fresh water are affected by the location,
                       availability of light, depth of the water, and temperature.
SC.912.L.17.Su.b       Recognize how animals and plants in an ecosystem may be affected by changes to the
                       food supply or climate.
SC.912.L.17.Pa.c       Recognize examples of mutual relationships between people and other living things.
SC.912.L.18.In.a       Identify that carbohydrates, fats, proteins, and nucleic acids (macromolecules) are
                       important for human organisms.
SC.912.L.18.Su.b       Recognize that the function of photosynthesis is to produce food for plants.
SC.912.L.18.Pa.c       Identify that food is a source of energy.
                                      2000320 Biology I Honors
Section: Basic and Adult Education                          Grade Group: Secondary Grades 9-12
Subject: Science                                            Domain: Biological Sciences
Course Length: Year                                         Level: 3
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                   Benchmarks
                                                                                                         Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                      Knowledge
SC.912.N.1.1       Define a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, for example: biology, High
                   chemistry, physics, and earth/space science, and do the following:
SC.912.N.1.3       Recognize that the strength or usefulness of a scientific claim is evaluated          Low
                   through scientific argumentation, which depends on critical and logical
                   thinking, and the active consideration of alternative scientific explanations to
                   explain the data present
                                                            81


SC.912.N.1.4   Identify sources of information and assess their reliability according to the strict High
               standards of scientific investigation.
SC.912.N.1.6   Describe how scientific inferences are drawn from scientific observations and        Moderate
               provide examples from the content being studied.
SC.912.N.1.7   Recognize the role of creativity in constructing scientific questions, methods and   Low
               explanations.
SC.912.N.2.1   Identify what is science, what clearly is not science, and what superficially        High
               resembles science (but fails to meet the criteria for science).
SC.912.N.2.2   Identify which questions can be answered through science and which questions         High
               are outside the boundaries of scientific investigation, such as questions
               addressed by other ways of knowing, such as art, philosophy, and religion.
SC.912.N.3.1   Explain that a scientific theory is the culmination of many scientific               High
               investigations drawing together all the current evidence concerning a substantial
               range of phenomena; thus, a scientific theory represents the most powerful
               explanation scientists have
SC.912.N.3.4   Recognize that theories do not become laws, nor do laws become theories;             Moderate
               theories are well supported explanations and laws are well supported
               descriptions.
SC.912.P.8.7   Interpret formula representations of molecules and compounds in terms of             Moderate
               composition and structure.
SC.912.P.8.12  Describe the properties of the carbon atom that make the diversity of carbon         Moderate
               compounds possible.
SC.912.P.10.1  Differentiate among the various forms of energy and recognize that they can be       Moderate
               transformed from one form to others.
SC.912.L.14.1  Describe the scientific theory of cells (cell theory) and relate the history of its  Moderate
               discovery to the process of science.
SC.912.L.14.2  Relate structure to function for the components of plant and animal cells.           Moderate
               Explain the role of cell membranes as a highly selective barrier (passive and
               active transport).
SC.912.L.14.3  Compare and contrast the general structures of plant and animal cells. Compare       Moderate
               and contrast the general structures of prokaryotic and eukaryotic cells.
SC.912.L.14.5  Explain the evidence supporting the scientific theory of the origin of eukaryotic    High
               cells (endosymbiosis).
SC.912.L.14.6  Explain the significance of genetic factors, environmental factors, and              High
               pathogenic agents to health from the perspectives of both individual and public
               health.
SC.912.L.14.7  Relate the structure of each of the major plant organs and tissues to                Moderate
               physiological processes.
SC.912.L.14.53 Discuss basic classification and characteristics of plants. Identify bryophytes,     Moderate
               pteridophytes, gymnosperms, and angiosperms.
SC.912.L.15.1  Explain how the scientific theory of evolution is supported by the fossil record,    High
               comparative anatomy, comparative embryology, biogeography, molecular
               biology, and observed evolutionary change.
SC.912.L.15.2  Discuss the use of molecular clocks to estimate how long ago various groups of       Moderate
               organisms diverged evolutionarily from one another.
SC.912.L.15.3  Describe how biological diversity is increased by the origin of new species and      Moderate
               how it is decreased by the natural process of extinction.
SC.912.L.15.4  Describe how and why organisms are hierarchically classified and based on            High
               evolutionary relationships.
SC.912.L.15.5  Explain the reasons for changes in how organisms are classified.                     High
                                                        82


SC.912.L.15.6  Discuss distinguishing characteristics of the domains and kingdoms of living      Moderate
               organisms.
SC.912.L.15.8  Describe the scientific explanations of the origin of life on Earth.              Moderate
SC.912.L.15.10 Identify basic trends in hominid evolution from early ancestors six million years Moderate
               ago to modern humans, including brain size, jaw size, language, and
               manufacture of tools.
SC.912.L.15.12 List the conditions for Hardy-Weinberg equilibrium in a population and why        High
               these conditions are not likely to appear in nature. Use the Hardy-Weinberg
               equation to predict genotypes in a population from observed phenotypes.
SC.912.L.15.13 Describe the conditions required for natural selection, including: overproduction Moderate
               of offspring, inherited variation, and the struggle to survive, which result in
               differential reproductive success.
SC.912.L.15.14 Discuss mechanisms of evolutionary change other than natural selection such as    Moderate
               genetic drift and gene flow.
SC.912.L.15.15 Describe how mutation and genetic recombination increase genetic variation.       Moderate
SC.912.L.16.1  Use Mendel's laws of segregation and independent assortment to analyze            High
               patterns of inheritance.
SC.912.L.16.2  Discuss observed inheritance patterns caused by various modes of inheritance,     High
               including dominant, recessive, codominant, sex-linked, polygenic, and multiple
               alleles.
SC.912.L.16.3  Describe the basic process of DNA replication and how it relates to the           High
               transmission and conservation of the genetic information.
SC.912.L.16.4  Explain how mutations in the DNA sequence may or may not result in                High
               phenotypic change. Explain how mutations in gametes may result in phenotypic
               changes in offspring.
SC.912.L.16.5  Explain the basic processes of transcription and translation, and how they result High
               in the expression of genes.
SC.912.L.16.8  Explain the relationship between mutation, cell cycle, and uncontrolled cell      Moderate
               growth potentially resulting in cancer.
SC.912.L.16.9  Explain how and why the genetic code is universal and is common to almost all     Moderate
               organisms.
SC.912.L.16.10 Evaluate the impact of biotechnology on the individual, society and the           High
               environment, including medical and ethical issues.
SC.912.L.16.13 Describe the basic anatomy and physiology of the human reproductive system.       Moderate
               Describe the process of human development from fertilization to birth and major
               changes that occur in each trimester of pregnancy.
SC.912.L.16.14 Describe the cell cycle, including the process of mitosis. Explain the role of    Moderate
               mitosis in the formation of new cells and its importance in maintaining
               chromosome number during asexual reproduction.
SC.912.L.16.15 Compare and contrast binary fission and mitotic cell division.                    Moderate
SC.912.L.16.16 Describe the process of meiosis, including independent assortment and crossing    Moderate
               over. Explain how reduction division results in the formation of haploid gametes
               or spores.
SC.912.L.16.17 Compare and contrast mitosis and meiosis and relate to the processes of sexual    High
               and asexual reproduction and their consequences for genetic variation.
SC.912.L.17.2  Explain the general distribution of life in aquatic systems as a function of      High
               chemistry, geography, light, depth, salinity, and temperature.
SC.912.L.17.4  Describe changes in ecosystems resulting from seasonal variations, climate        Moderate
               change and succession.
                                                       83


SC.912.L.17.5  Analyze how population size is determined by births, deaths, immigration,            High
               emigration, and limiting factors (biotic and abiotic) that determine carrying
               capacity.
SC.912.L.17.8  Recognize the consequences of the losses of biodiversity due to catastrophic         High
               events, climate changes, human activity, and the introduction of invasive, non
               native species.
SC.912.L.17.9  Use a food web to identify and distinguish producers, consumers, and                 Moderate
               decomposers. Explain the pathway of energy transfer through trophic levels and
               the reduction of available energy at successive trophic levels.
SC.912.L.17.10 Diagram and explain the biogeochemical cycles of an ecosystem, including             Moderate
               water, carbon, and nitrogen cycle.
SC.912.L.17.11 Evaluate the costs and benefits of renewable and nonrenewable resources, such        High
               as water, energy, fossil fuels, wildlife, and forests.
SC.912.L.17.20 Predict the impact of individuals on environmental systems and examine how           High
               human lifestyles affect sustainability.
SC.912.L.18.2  Describe the important structural characteristics of monosaccharides,                Moderate
               disaccharides, and polysaccharides and explain the functions of carbohydrates in
               living things.
SC.912.L.18.3  Describe the structures of fatty acids, triglycerides, phospholipids, and steroids.  Moderate
               Explain the functions of lipids in living organisms. Identify some reactions that
               fatty acids undergo. Relate the structure and function of cell membranes.
SC.912.L.18.4  Describe the structures of proteins and amino acids. Explain the functions of        Moderate
               proteins in living organisms. Identify some reactions that amino acids undergo.
               Relate the structure and function of enzymes.
SC.912.L.18.6  Discuss the role of anaerobic respiration in living things and in human society.     Moderate
SC.912.L.18.7  Identify the reactants, products, and basic functions of photosynthesis.             Moderate
SC.912.L.18.8  Identify the reactants, products, and basic functions of aerobic and anaerobic       Moderate
               cellular respiration.
SC.912.L.18.9  Explain the interrelated nature of photosynthesis and cellular respiration.          Moderate
SC.912.L.18.10 Connect the role of adenosine triphosphate (ATP) to energy transfers within a        High
               cell.
SC.912.L.18.11 Explain the role of enzymes as catalysts that lower the activation energy of         Moderate
               biochemical reactions. Identify factors, such as pH and temperature, and their
               effect on enzyme activity.
SC.912.L.18.12 Discuss the special properties of water that contribute to Earth's suitability as an Moderate
               environment for life: cohesive behavior, ability to moderate temperature,
               expansion upon freezing, and versatility as a solvent.
MA.912.S.1.2   Determine appropriate and consistent standards of measurement for the data to        Moderate
               be collected in a survey or experiment.
MA.912.S.3.2   Collect, organize, and analyze data sets, determine the best format for the data     High
               and present visual summaries from the following:
LA.910.4.2.2   The student will record information and ideas from primary and/or secondary
               sources accurately and coherently, noting the validity and reliability of these
               sources and attributing sources of information;
LA.910.2.2.3   The student will organize information to show understanding or relationships
               among facts, ideas, and events (e.g., representing key points within text through
               charting, mapping, paraphrasing, summarizing, comparing, contrasting, or
               outlining);
HE.912.C.1.3   Evaluate how environment and personal health are interrelated.
HE.912.C.1.4   Analyze how heredity and family history can impact personal health.
                                                        84


               Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code    Access Point Descriptor
SC.912.N.1.In.a       Identify a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, including life science, earth
                      and space science, or physical science, and do the following: 1. Identify a scientific
                      question 2. Examine reliable sources of informtion to identify what is already k
SC.912.N.1.Su.b       Identify the basic process used in scientific investigations, including questioning,
                      observing, recording, determining, and sharing results.
SC.912.N.1.Pa.c       Recognize that when a variety of common activities are repeated the same way, the
                      outcomes are the same.
SC.912.N.2.In.a       Identify examples of investigations that involve science.
SC.912.N.2.Su.b       Recognize that what is known about science can change based on new information.
SC.912.N.3.In.a       Recognize that a scientific theory is developed by repeated investigations of many
                      scientists and agreement on the likely explanation.
SC.912.N.3.In.b       Identify examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in the natural world, such
                      as Newton’s laws.
SC.912.N.3.Su.b       Recognize examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in nature, such as
                      Newton’s laws.
SC.912.N.3.Su.c       Recognize ways models are used in the study of science.
SC.912.P.8.In.a       Classify states of matter as solid, liquid, and gaseous.
SC.912.P.8.Su.b       Identify examples of physical and chemical changes.
SC.912.P.8.Pa.c       Recognize that the parts of an object can be put together to make a whole.
SC.912.P.10.In.a      Identify examples of energy being transformed from one form to another (conserved
                      quantity).
SC.912.P.10.Su.b      Recognize the relationship between work and power, such as power is the amount of
                      work a person or machine does.
SC.912.P.10.Pa.c      Recognize the source and recipient of heat transfer.
SC.912.L.14.In.a      Identify that all living things are made of cells and cells function in similar ways (cell
                      theory).
SC.912.L.14.Su.b      Recognize that cells have different parts and each has a function.
SC.912.L.14.Pa.c      Identify ways to prevent infection from bacteria and viruses, such as hand washing and
                      first aid.
SC.912.L.15.In.a      Identify that prehistoric plants and animals changed over time (evolved) or became
                      extinct.
SC.912.L.15.Su.b      Match organisms to the animal, plant, and fungus kingdoms.
SC.912.L.15.Pa.c      Recognize that animals produce offspring.
SC.912.L.16.In.a      Identify that genes are sets of instructions that determine which characteristics are passed
                      from parent to offspring.
SC.912.L.16.Su.b      Recognize that all organisms have a substance called DNA with unique information.
SC.912.L.16.Pa.c      Recognize that illness can result when parts of our bodies are not working properly.
SC.912.L.17.In.a      Recognize that living things in oceans and fresh water are affected by the location,
                      availability of light, depth of the water, and temperature.
SC.912.L.17.Su.b      Recognize how animals and plants in an ecosystem may be affected by changes to the
                      food supply or climate.
SC.912.L.17.Pa.c      Recognize examples of mutual relationships between people and other living things.
                                                           85


SC.912.L.18.In.a       Identify that carbohydrates, fats, proteins, and nucleic acids (macromolecules) are
                       important for human organisms.
SC.912.L.18.Su.b       Recognize that the function of photosynthesis is to produce food for plants.
SC.912.L.18.Pa.c       Identify that food is a source of energy.
                                           2000330 Biology II
Section: Basic and Adult Education                          Grade Group: Secondary Grades 9-12
Subject: Science                                            Domain: Biological Sciences
Course Length: Year                                         Level: 3
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                  Benchmarks
                                                                                                        Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                     Knowledge
SC.912.N.1.1       Define a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, for example: biology,        High
                   chemistry, physics, and earth/space science, and do the following:
SC.912.N.1.4       Identify sources of information and assess their reliability according to the strict High
                   standards of scientific investigation.
SC.912.N.1.5       Describe and provide examples of how similar investigations conducted in many        Moderate
                   parts of the world result in the same outcome.
SC.912.N.1.7       Recognize the role of creativity in constructing scientific questions, methods and   Low
                   explanations.
SC.912.N.2.1       Identify what is science, what clearly is not science, and what superficially        High
                   resembles science (but fails to meet the criteria for science).
SC.912.N.2.2       Identify which questions can be answered through science and which questions         High
                   are outside the boundaries of scientific investigation, such as questions
                   addressed by other ways of knowing, such as art, philosophy, and religion.
SC.912.N.2.4       Explain that scientific knowledge is both durable and robust and open to change.     High
                   Scientific knowledge can change because it is often examined and re-examined
                   by new investigations and scientific argumentation. Because of these frequent
                   examinations, scien
SC.912.N.2.5       Describe instances in which scientists' varied backgrounds, talents, interests, and  High
                   goals influence the inferences and thus the explanations that they make about
                   observations of natural phenomena and describe that competing interpretations
                   (explanations)
SC.912.N.3.1       Explain that a scientific theory is the culmination of many scientific               High
                   investigations drawing together all the current evidence concerning a substantial
                   range of phenomena; thus, a scientific theory represents the most powerful
                   explanation scientists have
SC.912.N.3.2       Describe the role consensus plays in the historical development of a theory in       Moderate
                   any one of the disciplines of science.
SC.912.N.4.2       Weigh the merits of alternative strategies for solving a specific societal problem   High
                   by comparing a number of different costs and benefits, such as human,
                   economic, and environmental.
SC.912.E.7.4       Summarize the conditions that contribute to the climate of a geographic area,        Moderate
                   including the relationships to lakes and oceans.
SC.912.E.7.7       Identify, analyze, and relate the internal (Earth system) and external               High
                   (astronomical) conditions that contribute to global climate change.
                                                            86


SC.912.E.7.9   Cite evidence that the ocean has had a significant influence on climate change by High
               absorbing, storing, and moving heat, carbon, and water.
SC.912.P.8.10  Describe oxidation-reduction reactions in living and non-living systems.          Moderate
SC.912.P.10.1  Differentiate among the various forms of energy and recognize that they can be    Moderate
               transformed from one form to others.
SC.912.L.14.6  Explain the significance of genetic factors, environmental factors, and           High
               pathogenic agents to health from the perspectives of both individual and public
               health.
SC.912.L.14.8  Explain alternation of generations in plants.                                     Moderate
SC.912.L.14.9  Relate the major structure of fungi to their functions.                           Moderate
SC.912.L.14.50 Describe the structure of vertebrate sensory organs. Relate structure to function Moderate
               in vertebrate sensory systems.
SC.912.L.14.53 Discuss basic classification and characteristics of plants. Identify bryophytes,  Moderate
               pteridophytes, gymnosperms, and angiosperms.
SC.912.L.15.1  Explain how the scientific theory of evolution is supported by the fossil record, High
               comparative anatomy, comparative embryology, biogeography, molecular
               biology, and observed evolutionary change.
SC.912.L.15.4  Describe how and why organisms are hierarchically classified and based on         High
               evolutionary relationships.
SC.912.L.15.5  Explain the reasons for changes in how organisms are classified.                  High
SC.912.L.15.7  Discuss distinguishing characteristics of vertebrate and representative           Moderate
               invertebrate phyla, and chordate classes using typical examples.
SC.912.L.15.8  Describe the scientific explanations of the origin of life on Earth.              Moderate
SC.912.L.15.9  Explain the role of reproductive isolation in the process of speciation.          Moderate
SC.912.L.15.11 Discuss specific fossil hominids and what they show about human evolution.        Moderate
SC.912.L.16.6  Discuss the mechanisms for regulation of gene expression in prokaryotes and       High
               eukaryotes at transcription and translation level.
SC.912.L.16.7  Describe how viruses and bacteria transfer genetic material between cells and     High
               the role of this process in biotechnology.
SC.912.L.16.11 Discuss the technologies associated with forensic medicine and DNA                High
               identification, including restriction fragment length polymorphism (RFLP)
               analysis.
SC.912.L.16.12 Describe how basic DNA technology (restriction digestion by endonucleases,        Moderate
               gel electrophoresis, polymerase chain reaction, ligation, and transformation) is
               used to construct recombinant DNA molecules (DNA cloning).
SC.912.L.16.15 Compare and contrast binary fission and mitotic cell division.                    Moderate
SC.912.L.17.1  Discuss the characteristics of populations, such as number of individuals, age    Moderate
               structure, density, and pattern of distribution.
SC.912.L.17.3  Discuss how various oceanic and freshwater processes, such as currents, tides,    Moderate
               and waves, affect the abundance of aquatic organisms.
SC.912.L.17.6  Compare and contrast the relationships among organisms, including predation,      Moderate
               parasitism, competition, commensalism, and mutualism.
SC.912.L.17.7  Characterize the biotic and abiotic components that define freshwater systems,    Moderate
               marine systems and terrestrial systems.
SC.912.L.17.8  Recognize the consequences of the losses of biodiversity due to catastrophic      High
               events, climate changes, human activity, and the introduction of invasive, non
               native species.
SC.912.L.17.9  Use a food web to identify and distinguish producers, consumers, and              Moderate
               decomposers. Explain the pathway of energy transfer through trophic levels and
               the reduction of available energy at successive trophic levels.
                                                        87


SC.912.L.17.10 Diagram and explain the biogeochemical cycles of an ecosystem, including             Moderate
               water, carbon, and nitrogen cycle.
SC.912.L.17.11 Evaluate the costs and benefits of renewable and nonrenewable resources, such        High
               as water, energy, fossil fuels, wildlife, and forests.
SC.912.L.17.12 Discuss the political, social, and environmental consequences of sustainable use     High
               of land.
SC.912.L.17.13 Discuss the need for adequate monitoring of environmental parameters when            High
               making policy decisions.
SC.912.L.17.14 Assess the need for adequate waste management strategies.                            High
SC.912.L.17.15 Discuss the effects of technology on environmental quality.                          Moderate
SC.912.L.17.16 Discuss the large-scale environmental impacts resulting from human activity,         High
               including waste spills, oil spills, runoff, greenhouse gases, ozone depletion, and
               surface and groundwater pollution.
SC.912.L.17.17 Assess the effectiveness of innovative methods of protecting the environment.        High
SC.912.L.17.18 Describe how human population size and resource use relate to environmental          Moderate
               quality.
SC.912.L.17.19 Describe how different natural resources are produced and how their rates of use     Moderate
               and renewal limit availability.
SC.912.L.17.20 Predict the impact of individuals on environmental systems and examine how           High
               human lifestyles affect sustainability.
SC.912.L.18.1  Describe the basic molecular structures and primary functions of the four major      Moderate
               categories of biological macromolecules.
SC.912.L.18.5  Discuss the use of chemiosmotic gradients for ATP production in chloroplasts         Moderate
               and mitochondria.
SC.912.L.18.7  Identify the reactants, products, and basic functions of photosynthesis.             Moderate
SC.912.L.18.8  Identify the reactants, products, and basic functions of aerobic and anaerobic       Moderate
               cellular respiration.
SC.912.L.18.9  Explain the interrelated nature of photosynthesis and cellular respiration.          Moderate
SC.912.L.18.10 Connect the role of adenosine triphosphate (ATP) to energy transfers within a        High
               cell.
SC.912.L.18.11 Explain the role of enzymes as catalysts that lower the activation energy of         Moderate
               biochemical reactions. Identify factors, such as pH and temperature, and their
               effect on enzyme activity.
SC.912.L.18.12 Discuss the special properties of water that contribute to Earth's suitability as an Moderate
               environment for life: cohesive behavior, ability to moderate temperature,
               expansion upon freezing, and versatility as a solvent.
MA.912.S.1.2   Determine appropriate and consistent standards of measurement for the data to        Moderate
               be collected in a survey or experiment.
MA.912.S.3.2   Collect, organize, and analyze data sets, determine the best format for the data     High
               and present visual summaries from the following:
LA.910.4.2.2   The student will record information and ideas from primary and/or secondary
               sources accurately and coherently, noting the validity and reliability of these
               sources and attributing sources of information;
LA.910.2.2.3   The student will organize information to show understanding or relationships
               among facts, ideas, and events (e.g., representing key points within text through
               charting, mapping, paraphrasing, summarizing, comparing, contrasting, or
               outlining);
HE.912.C.1.3   Evaluate how environment and personal health are interrelated.
HE.912.C.1.4   Analyze how heredity and family history can impact personal health.
                                                        88


               Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code    Access Point Descriptor
SC.912.N.1.In.a       Identify a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, including life science, earth
                      and space science, or physical science, and do the following: 1. Identify a scientific
                      question 2. Examine reliable sources of informtion to identify what is already k
SC.912.N.1.Su.b       Identify the basic process used in scientific investigations, including questioning,
                      observing, recording, determining, and sharing results.
SC.912.N.1.Pa.c       Recognize that when a variety of common activities are repeated the same way, the
                      outcomes are the same.
SC.912.N.2.In.a       Identify examples of investigations that involve science.
SC.912.N.2.Su.b       Recognize that what is known about science can change based on new information.
SC.912.N.3.In.a       Recognize that a scientific theory is developed by repeated investigations of many
                      scientists and agreement on the likely explanation.
SC.912.N.3.Su.b       Recognize examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in nature, such as
                      Newton’s laws.
SC.912.N.4.In.a       Identify ways scientific knowledge and problem solving benefit people.
SC.912.N.4.Su.b       Recognize that some strategies may cost more to solve a problem.
SC.912.E.7.In.a       Identify cycles that occur on Earth, such as the water and carbon cycles, and the role
                      energy plays in them.
SC.912.E.7.Su.b       Recognize that currents move the ocean water around Earth.
SC.912.E.7.Pa.c       Recognize that humans, plants, and animals live on the Earth (biosphere).
SC.912.P.8.In.a       Classify states of matter as solid, liquid, and gaseous.
SC.912.P.8.Su.b       Identify examples of physical and chemical changes.
SC.912.P.8.Pa.c       Recognize that the parts of an object can be put together to make a whole.
SC.912.P.10.In.a      Identify examples of energy being transformed from one form to another (conserved
                      quantity).
SC.912.P.10.Su.b      Recognize the relationship between work and power, such as power is the amount of
                      work a person or machine does.
SC.912.P.10.Pa.c      Recognize the source and recipient of heat transfer.
SC.912.L.14.In.a      Identify that all living things are made of cells and cells function in similar ways (cell
                      theory).
SC.912.L.14.Su.b      Recognize that cells have different parts and each has a function.
SC.912.L.14.Pa.c      Identify ways to prevent infection from bacteria and viruses, such as hand washing and
                      first aid.
SC.912.L.15.In.a      Identify that prehistoric plants and animals changed over time (evolved) or became
                      extinct.
SC.912.L.15.Su.b      Match organisms to the animal, plant, and fungus kingdoms.
SC.912.L.15.Pa.c      Recognize that animals produce offspring.
SC.912.L.17.In.a      Recognize that living things in oceans and fresh water are affected by the location,
                      availability of light, depth of the water, and temperature.
SC.912.L.17.Su.b      Recognize how animals and plants in an ecosystem may be affected by changes to the
                      food supply or climate.
SC.912.L.17.Pa.c      Recognize examples of mutual relationships between people and other living things.
SC.912.L.18.In.a      Identify that carbohydrates, fats, proteins, and nucleic acids (macromolecules) are
                      important for human organisms.
                                                           89


SC.912.L.18.Su.b       Recognize that the function of photosynthesis is to produce food for plants.
SC.912.L.18.Pa.c       Identify that food is a source of energy.
                                    2000430 Biology Technology
Section: Basic and Adult Education                          Grade Group: Secondary Grades 9-12
Subject: Science                                            Domain: Biological Sciences
Course Length: Year                                         Level: 2
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                   Benchmarks
                                                                                                        Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                     Knowledge
SC.912.N.1.1       Define a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, for example: biology,        High
                   chemistry, physics, and earth/space science, and do the following:
SC.912.N.1.3       Recognize that the strength or usefulness of a scientific claim is evaluated         Low
                   through scientific argumentation, which depends on critical and logical
                   thinking, and the active consideration of alternative scientific explanations to
                   explain the data present
SC.912.N.1.4       Identify sources of information and assess their reliability according to the strict High
                   standards of scientific investigation.
SC.912.N.1.6       Describe how scientific inferences are drawn from scientific observations and        Moderate
                   provide examples from the content being studied.
SC.912.N.2.1       Identify what is science, what clearly is not science, and what superficially        High
                   resembles science (but fails to meet the criteria for science).
SC.912.N.2.2       Identify which questions can be answered through science and which questions         High
                   are outside the boundaries of scientific investigation, such as questions
                   addressed by other ways of knowing, such as art, philosophy, and religion.
SC.912.N.3.1       Explain that a scientific theory is the culmination of many scientific               High
                   investigations drawing together all the current evidence concerning a substantial
                   range of phenomena; thus, a scientific theory represents the most powerful
                   explanation scientists have
SC.912.N.3.4       Recognize that theories do not become laws, nor do laws become theories;             Moderate
                   theories are well supported explanations and laws are well supported
                   descriptions.
SC.912.N.4.1       Explain how scientific knowledge and reasoning provide an empirically-based          Moderate
                   perspective to inform society's decision making.
SC.912.N.4.2       Weigh the merits of alternative strategies for solving a specific societal problem   High
                   by comparing a number of different costs and benefits, such as human,
                   economic, and environmental.
SC.912.E.6.6       Analyze past, present, and potential future consequences to the environment          High
                   resulting from various energy production technologies.
SC.912.E.7.1       Analyze the movement of matter and energy through the different                      High
                   biogeochemical cycles, including water and carbon.
SC.912.P.12.12     Explain how various factors, such as concentration, temperature, and presence of     High
                   a catalyst affect the rate of a chemical reaction.
SC.912.L.14.1      Describe the scientific theory of cells (cell theory) and relate the history of its  Moderate
                   discovery to the process of science.
SC.912.L.14.2      Relate structure to function for the components of plant and animal cells.           Moderate
                   Explain the role of cell membranes as a highly selective barrier (passive and
                   active transport).
                                                            90


SC.912.L.14.3  Compare and contrast the general structures of plant and animal cells. Compare    Moderate
               and contrast the general structures of prokaryotic and eukaryotic cells.
SC.912.L.14.4  Compare and contrast structure and function of various types of microscopes.      Moderate
SC.912.L.14.6  Explain the significance of genetic factors, environmental factors, and           High
               pathogenic agents to health from the perspectives of both individual and public
               health.
SC.912.L.14.7  Relate the structure of each of the major plant organs and tissues to             Moderate
               physiological processes.
SC.912.L.14.26 Identify the major parts of the brain on diagrams or models.                      Low
SC.912.L.14.36 Describe the factors affecting blood flow through the cardiovascular system.      Moderate
SC.912.L.14.52 Explain the basic functions of the human immune system, including specific and    Moderate
               nonspecific immune response, vaccines, and antibiotics.
SC.912.L.15.1  Explain how the scientific theory of evolution is supported by the fossil record, High
               comparative anatomy, comparative embryology, biogeography, molecular
               biology, and observed evolutionary change.
SC.912.L.15.4  Describe how and why organisms are hierarchically classified and based on         High
               evolutionary relationships.
SC.912.L.15.5  Explain the reasons for changes in how organisms are classified.                  High
SC.912.L.15.6  Discuss distinguishing characteristics of the domains and kingdoms of living      Moderate
               organisms.
SC.912.L.15.8  Describe the scientific explanations of the origin of life on Earth.              Moderate
SC.912.L.15.10 Identify basic trends in hominid evolution from early ancestors six million years Moderate
               ago to modern humans, including brain size, jaw size, language, and
               manufacture of tools.
SC.912.L.15.13 Describe the conditions required for natural selection, including: overproduction Moderate
               of offspring, inherited variation, and the struggle to survive, which result in
               differential reproductive success.
SC.912.L.15.14 Discuss mechanisms of evolutionary change other than natural selection such as    Moderate
               genetic drift and gene flow.
SC.912.L.15.15 Describe how mutation and genetic recombination increase genetic variation.       Moderate
SC.912.L.16.1  Use Mendel's laws of segregation and independent assortment to analyze            High
               patterns of inheritance.
SC.912.L.16.2  Discuss observed inheritance patterns caused by various modes of inheritance,     High
               including dominant, recessive, codominant, sex-linked, polygenic, and multiple
               alleles.
SC.912.L.16.3  Describe the basic process of DNA replication and how it relates to the           High
               transmission and conservation of the genetic information.
SC.912.L.16.4  Explain how mutations in the DNA sequence may or may not result in                High
               phenotypic change. Explain how mutations in gametes may result in phenotypic
               changes in offspring.
SC.912.L.16.5  Explain the basic processes of transcription and translation, and how they result High
               in the expression of genes.
SC.912.L.16.6  Discuss the mechanisms for regulation of gene expression in prokaryotes and       High
               eukaryotes at transcription and translation level.
SC.912.L.16.7  Describe how viruses and bacteria transfer genetic material between cells and     High
               the role of this process in biotechnology.
SC.912.L.16.8  Explain the relationship between mutation, cell cycle, and uncontrolled cell      Moderate
               growth potentially resulting in cancer.
SC.912.L.16.9  Explain how and why the genetic code is universal and is common to almost all     Moderate
               organisms.
                                                       91


SC.912.L.16.10 Evaluate the impact of biotechnology on the individual, society and the          High
               environment, including medical and ethical issues.
SC.912.L.16.11 Discuss the technologies associated with forensic medicine and DNA               High
               identification, including restriction fragment length polymorphism (RFLP)
               analysis.
SC.912.L.16.12 Describe how basic DNA technology (restriction digestion by endonucleases,       Moderate
               gel electrophoresis, polymerase chain reaction, ligation, and transformation) is
               used to construct recombinant DNA molecules (DNA cloning).
SC.912.L.16.13 Describe the basic anatomy and physiology of the human reproductive system.      Moderate
               Describe the process of human development from fertilization to birth and major
               changes that occur in each trimester of pregnancy.
SC.912.L.16.14 Describe the cell cycle, including the process of mitosis. Explain the role of   Moderate
               mitosis in the formation of new cells and its importance in maintaining
               chromosome number during asexual reproduction.
SC.912.L.16.16 Describe the process of meiosis, including independent assortment and crossing   Moderate
               over. Explain how reduction division results in the formation of haploid gametes
               or spores.
SC.912.L.16.17 Compare and contrast mitosis and meiosis and relate to the processes of sexual   High
               and asexual reproduction and their consequences for genetic variation.
SC.912.L.17.2  Explain the general distribution of life in aquatic systems as a function of     High
               chemistry, geography, light, depth, salinity, and temperature.
SC.912.L.17.4  Describe changes in ecosystems resulting from seasonal variations, climate       Moderate
               change and succession.
SC.912.L.17.5  Analyze how population size is determined by births, deaths, immigration,        High
               emigration, and limiting factors (biotic and abiotic) that determine carrying
               capacity.
SC.912.L.17.8  Recognize the consequences of the losses of biodiversity due to catastrophic     High
               events, climate changes, human activity, and the introduction of invasive, non
               native species.
SC.912.L.17.9  Use a food web to identify and distinguish producers, consumers, and             Moderate
               decomposers. Explain the pathway of energy transfer through trophic levels and
               the reduction of available energy at successive trophic levels.
SC.912.L.17.11 Evaluate the costs and benefits of renewable and nonrenewable resources, such    High
               as water, energy, fossil fuels, wildlife, and forests.
SC.912.L.17.13 Discuss the need for adequate monitoring of environmental parameters when        High
               making policy decisions.
SC.912.L.17.20 Predict the impact of individuals on environmental systems and examine how       High
               human lifestyles affect sustainability.
SC.912.L.18.1  Describe the basic molecular structures and primary functions of the four major  Moderate
               categories of biological macromolecules.
SC.912.L.18.6  Discuss the role of anaerobic respiration in living things and in human society. Moderate
SC.912.L.18.7  Identify the reactants, products, and basic functions of photosynthesis.         Moderate
SC.912.L.18.8  Identify the reactants, products, and basic functions of aerobic and anaerobic   Moderate
               cellular respiration.
SC.912.L.18.9  Explain the interrelated nature of photosynthesis and cellular respiration.      Moderate
SC.912.L.18.10 Connect the role of adenosine triphosphate (ATP) to energy transfers within a    High
               cell.
SC.912.L.18.11 Explain the role of enzymes as catalysts that lower the activation energy of     Moderate
               biochemical reactions. Identify factors, such as pH and temperature, and their
               effect on enzyme activity.
                                                        92


SC.912.L.18.12    Discuss the special properties of water that contribute to Earth's suitability as an Moderate
                  environment for life: cohesive behavior, ability to moderate temperature,
                  expansion upon freezing, and versatility as a solvent.
MA.912.S.1.2      Determine appropriate and consistent standards of measurement for the data to Moderate
                  be collected in a survey or experiment.
MA.912.S.3.2      Collect, organize, and analyze data sets, determine the best format for the data      High
                  and present visual summaries from the following:
LA.910.4.2.2      The student will record information and ideas from primary and/or secondary
                  sources accurately and coherently, noting the validity and reliability of these
                  sources and attributing sources of information;
LA.910.2.2.3      The student will organize information to show understanding or relationships
                  among facts, ideas, and events (e.g., representing key points within text through
                  charting, mapping, paraphrasing, summarizing, comparing, contrasting, or
                  outlining);
HE.912.C.1.3      Evaluate how environment and personal health are interrelated.
HE.912.C.1.4      Analyze how heredity and family history can impact personal health.
HE.912.C.1.8      Analyze strategies for prevention, detection, and treatment of communicable and
                  chronic diseases.
               Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code    Access Point Descriptor
SC.912.N.1.In.a       Identify a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, including life science, earth
                      and space science, or physical science, and do the following: 1. Identify a scientific
                      question 2. Examine reliable sources of informtion to identify what is already k
SC.912.N.1.Su.b       Identify the basic process used in scientific investigations, including questioning,
                      observing, recording, determining, and sharing results.
SC.912.N.1.Pa.c       Recognize that when a variety of common activities are repeated the same way, the
                      outcomes are the same.
SC.912.N.2.In.a       Identify examples of investigations that involve science.
SC.912.N.2.Su.b       Recognize that what is known about science can change based on new information.
SC.912.N.3.In.a       Recognize that a scientific theory is developed by repeated investigations of many
                      scientists and agreement on the likely explanation.
SC.912.N.3.In.b       Identify examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in the natural world, such
                      as Newton’s laws.
SC.912.N.3.Su.b       Recognize examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in nature, such as
                      Newton’s laws.
SC.912.N.3.Su.c       Recognize ways models are used in the study of science.
SC.912.N.4.In.a       Identify ways scientific knowledge and problem solving benefit people.
SC.912.N.4.Su.b       Recognize that some strategies may cost more to solve a problem.
SC.912.E.7.In.a       Identify cycles that occur on Earth, such as the water and carbon cycles, and the role
                      energy plays in them.
SC.912.E.7.Su.b       Recognize that currents move the ocean water around Earth.
SC.912.E.7.Pa.c       Recognize that humans, plants, and animals live on the Earth (biosphere).
SC.912.L.14.In.a      Identify that all living things are made of cells and cells function in similar ways (cell
                      theory).
SC.912.L.14.Su.b      Recognize that cells have different parts and each has a function.
                                                           93


SC.912.L.14.Pa.c       Identify ways to prevent infection from bacteria and viruses, such as hand washing and
                       first aid.
SC.912.L.15.In.a       Identify that prehistoric plants and animals changed over time (evolved) or became
                       extinct.
SC.912.L.15.Su.b       Match organisms to the animal, plant, and fungus kingdoms.
SC.912.L.15.Pa.c       Recognize that animals produce offspring.
SC.912.L.16.In.a       Identify that genes are sets of instructions that determine which characteristics are passed
                       from parent to offspring.
SC.912.L.16.Su.b       Recognize that all organisms have a substance called DNA with unique information.
SC.912.L.16.Pa.c       Recognize that illness can result when parts of our bodies are not working properly.
SC.912.L.17.In.a       Recognize that living things in oceans and fresh water are affected by the location,
                       availability of light, depth of the water, and temperature.
SC.912.L.17.Su.b       Recognize how animals and plants in an ecosystem may be affected by changes to the
                       food supply or climate.
SC.912.L.17.Pa.c       Recognize examples of mutual relationships between people and other living things.
SC.912.L.18.In.a       Identify that carbohydrates, fats, proteins, and nucleic acids (macromolecules) are
                       important for human organisms.
SC.912.L.18.Su.b       Recognize that the function of photosynthesis is to produce food for plants.
SC.912.L.18.Pa.c       Identify that food is a source of energy.
                                               2000370 Botany
Section: Basic and Adult Education                          Grade Group: Secondary Grades 9-12
Subject: Science                                            Domain: Biological Sciences
Course Length: Year                                         Level: 2
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                   Benchmarks
                                                                                                        Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                     Knowledge
SC.912.N.1.1       Define a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, for example: biology, High
                   chemistry, physics, and earth/space science, and do the following:
SC.912.N.1.2       Describe and explain what characterizes science and its methods.                     Moderate
SC.912.N.2.4       Explain that scientific knowledge is both durable and robust and open to change.     High
                   Scientific knowledge can change because it is often examined and re-examined
                   by new investigations and scientific argumentation. Because of these frequent
                   examinations, scien
SC.912.E.7.1       Analyze the movement of matter and energy through the different                      High
                   biogeochemical cycles, including water and carbon.
SC.912.P.8.12      Describe the properties of the carbon atom that make the diversity of carbon         Moderate
                   compounds possible.
SC.912.P.10.1      Differentiate among the various forms of energy and recognize that they can be       Moderate
                   transformed from one form to others.
SC.912.P.10.18     Explore the theory of electromagnetism by comparing and contrasting the              High
                   different parts of the electromagnetic spectrum in terms of wavelength,
                   frequency, and energy, and relate them to phenomena and applications.
SC.912.P.12.12     Explain how various factors, such as concentration, temperature, and presence of     High
                   a catalyst affect the rate of a chemical reaction.
                                                            94


SC.912.L.14.1  Describe the scientific theory of cells (cell theory) and relate the history of its Moderate
               discovery to the process of science.
SC.912.L.14.2  Relate structure to function for the components of plant and animal cells.          Moderate
               Explain the role of cell membranes as a highly selective barrier (passive and
               active transport).
SC.912.L.14.3  Compare and contrast the general structures of plant and animal cells. Compare      Moderate
               and contrast the general structures of prokaryotic and eukaryotic cells.
SC.912.L.14.5  Explain the evidence supporting the scientific theory of the origin of eukaryotic   High
               cells (endosymbiosis).
SC.912.L.14.7  Relate the structure of each of the major plant organs and tissues to               Moderate
               physiological processes.
SC.912.L.14.8  Explain alternation of generations in plants.                                       Moderate
SC.912.L.14.9  Relate the major structure of fungi to their functions.                             Moderate
SC.912.L.14.10 Discuss the relationship between the evolution of land plants and their anatomy. High
SC.912.L.14.53 Discuss basic classification and characteristics of plants. Identify bryophytes,    Moderate
               pteridophytes, gymnosperms, and angiosperms.
SC.912.L.15.1  Explain how the scientific theory of evolution is supported by the fossil record,   High
               comparative anatomy, comparative embryology, biogeography, molecular
               biology, and observed evolutionary change.
SC.912.L.15.3  Describe how biological diversity is increased by the origin of new species and     Moderate
               how it is decreased by the natural process of extinction.
SC.912.L.15.4  Describe how and why organisms are hierarchically classified and based on           High
               evolutionary relationships.
SC.912.L.15.5  Explain the reasons for changes in how organisms are classified.                    High
SC.912.L.15.6  Discuss distinguishing characteristics of the domains and kingdoms of living        Moderate
               organisms.
SC.912.L.16.1  Use Mendel's laws of segregation and independent assortment to analyze              High
               patterns of inheritance.
SC.912.L.16.2  Discuss observed inheritance patterns caused by various modes of inheritance,       High
               including dominant, recessive, codominant, sex-linked, polygenic, and multiple
               alleles.
SC.912.L.17.4  Describe changes in ecosystems resulting from seasonal variations, climate          Moderate
               change and succession.
SC.912.L.17.6  Compare and contrast the relationships among organisms, including predation,        Moderate
               parasitism, competition, commensalism, and mutualism.
SC.912.L.17.7  Characterize the biotic and abiotic components that define freshwater systems,      Moderate
               marine systems and terrestrial systems.
SC.912.L.17.8  Recognize the consequences of the losses of biodiversity due to catastrophic        High
               events, climate changes, human activity, and the introduction of invasive, non
               native species.
SC.912.L.17.9  Use a food web to identify and distinguish producers, consumers, and                Moderate
               decomposers. Explain the pathway of energy transfer through trophic levels and
               the reduction of available energy at successive trophic levels.
SC.912.L.17.10 Diagram and explain the biogeochemical cycles of an ecosystem, including            Moderate
               water, carbon, and nitrogen cycle.
SC.912.L.18.1  Describe the basic molecular structures and primary functions of the four major     Moderate
               categories of biological macromolecules.
SC.912.L.18.5  Discuss the use of chemiosmotic gradients for ATP production in chloroplasts        Moderate
               and mitochondria.
SC.912.L.18.7  Identify the reactants, products, and basic functions of photosynthesis.            Moderate
                                                       95


SC.912.L.18.8     Identify the reactants, products, and basic functions of aerobic and anaerobic        Moderate
                  cellular respiration.
SC.912.L.18.9     Explain the interrelated nature of photosynthesis and cellular respiration.           Moderate
SC.912.L.18.10    Connect the role of adenosine triphosphate (ATP) to energy transfers within a         High
                  cell.
SC.912.L.18.11    Explain the role of enzymes as catalysts that lower the activation energy of          Moderate
                  biochemical reactions. Identify factors, such as pH and temperature, and their
                  effect on enzyme activity.
SC.912.L.18.12    Discuss the special properties of water that contribute to Earth's suitability as an  Moderate
                  environment for life: cohesive behavior, ability to moderate temperature,
                  expansion upon freezing, and versatility as a solvent.
MA.912.S.1.2      Determine appropriate and consistent standards of measurement for the data to         Moderate
                  be collected in a survey or experiment.
MA.912.S.3.2      Collect, organize, and analyze data sets, determine the best format for the data      High
                  and present visual summaries from the following:
LA.910.4.2.2      The student will record information and ideas from primary and/or secondary
                  sources accurately and coherently, noting the validity and reliability of these
                  sources and attributing sources of information;
LA.910.2.2.3      The student will organize information to show understanding or relationships
                  among facts, ideas, and events (e.g., representing key points within text through
                  charting, mapping, paraphrasing, summarizing, comparing, contrasting, or
                  outlining);
               Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code    Access Point Descriptor
SC.912.N.1.In.a       Identify a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, including life science, earth
                      and space science, or physical science, and do the following: 1. Identify a scientific
                      question 2. Examine reliable sources of informtion to identify what is already k
SC.912.N.1.Su.b       Identify the basic process used in scientific investigations, including questioning,
                      observing, recording, determining, and sharing results.
SC.912.N.1.Pa.c       Recognize that when a variety of common activities are repeated the same way, the
                      outcomes are the same.
SC.912.N.2.In.a       Identify examples of investigations that involve science.
SC.912.N.2.Su.b       Recognize that what is known about science can change based on new information.
SC.912.E.7.In.a       Identify cycles that occur on Earth, such as the water and carbon cycles, and the role
                      energy plays in them.
SC.912.E.7.Su.b       Recognize that currents move the ocean water around Earth.
SC.912.E.7.Pa.c       Recognize that humans, plants, and animals live on the Earth (biosphere).
SC.912.P.8.In.a       Classify states of matter as solid, liquid, and gaseous.
SC.912.P.8.Su.b       Identify examples of physical and chemical changes.
SC.912.P.8.Pa.c       Recognize that the parts of an object can be put together to make a whole.
SC.912.P.10.In.a      Identify examples of energy being transformed from one form to another (conserved
                      quantity).
SC.912.P.10.Su.b      Recognize the relationship between work and power, such as power is the amount of
                      work a person or machine does.
SC.912.P.10.Pa.c      Recognize the source and recipient of heat transfer.
SC.912.L.14.In.a      Identify that all living things are made of cells and cells function in similar ways (cell
                      theory).
                                                           96


SC.912.L.14.Su.b       Recognize that cells have different parts and each has a function.
SC.912.L.14.Pa.c       Identify ways to prevent infection from bacteria and viruses, such as hand washing and
                       first aid.
SC.912.L.15.In.a       Identify that prehistoric plants and animals changed over time (evolved) or became
                       extinct.
SC.912.L.15.Su.b       Match organisms to the animal, plant, and fungus kingdoms.
SC.912.L.15.Pa.c       Recognize that animals produce offspring.
SC.912.L.16.In.a       Identify that genes are sets of instructions that determine which characteristics are passed
                       from parent to offspring.
SC.912.L.16.Su.b       Recognize that all organisms have a substance called DNA with unique information.
SC.912.L.16.Pa.c       Recognize that illness can result when parts of our bodies are not working properly.
SC.912.L.17.In.a       Recognize that living things in oceans and fresh water are affected by the location,
                       availability of light, depth of the water, and temperature.
SC.912.L.17.Su.b       Recognize how animals and plants in an ecosystem may be affected by changes to the
                       food supply or climate.
SC.912.L.17.Pa.c       Recognize examples of mutual relationships between people and other living things.
SC.912.L.18.In.a       Identify that carbohydrates, fats, proteins, and nucleic acids (macromolecules) are
                       important for human organisms.
SC.912.L.18.Su.b       Recognize that the function of photosynthesis is to produce food for plants.
SC.912.L.18.Pa.c       Identify that food is a source of energy.
                                              2000380 Ecology
Section: Basic and Adult Education                          Grade Group: Secondary Grades 9-12
Subject: Science                                            Domain: Biological Sciences
Course Length: Year                                         Level: 2
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                   Benchmarks
                                                                                                        Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                     Knowledge
SC.912.N.1.1       Define a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, for example: biology, High
                   chemistry, physics, and earth/space science, and do the following:
SC.912.N.1.2       Describe and explain what characterizes science and its methods.                     Moderate
SC.912.N.1.3       Recognize that the strength or usefulness of a scientific claim is evaluated         Low
                   through scientific argumentation, which depends on critical and logical
                   thinking, and the active consideration of alternative scientific explanations to
                   explain the data present
SC.912.N.1.4       Identify sources of information and assess their reliability according to the strict High
                   standards of scientific investigation.
SC.912.N.1.5       Describe and provide examples of how similar investigations conducted in many        Moderate
                   parts of the world result in the same outcome.
SC.912.N.1.6       Describe how scientific inferences are drawn from scientific observations and        Moderate
                   provide examples from the content being studied.
SC.912.N.1.7       Recognize the role of creativity in constructing scientific questions, methods and   Low
                   explanations.
SC.912.N.2.1       Identify what is science, what clearly is not science, and what superficially        High
                   resembles science (but fails to meet the criteria for science).
                                                            97


SC.912.N.2.4   Explain that scientific knowledge is both durable and robust and open to change.    High
               Scientific knowledge can change because it is often examined and re-examined
               by new investigations and scientific argumentation. Because of these frequent
               examinations, scien
SC.912.N.2.5   Describe instances in which scientists' varied backgrounds, talents, interests, and High
               goals influence the inferences and thus the explanations that they make about
               observations of natural phenomena and describe that competing interpretations
               (explanations)
SC.912.N.3.1   Explain that a scientific theory is the culmination of many scientific              High
               investigations drawing together all the current evidence concerning a substantial
               range of phenomena; thus, a scientific theory represents the most powerful
               explanation scientists have
SC.912.N.3.5   Describe the function of models in science, and identify the wide range of          Moderate
               models used in science.
SC.912.N.4.1   Explain how scientific knowledge and reasoning provide an empirically-based         Moderate
               perspective to inform society's decision making.
SC.912.N.4.2   Weigh the merits of alternative strategies for solving a specific societal problem  High
               by comparing a number of different costs and benefits, such as human,
               economic, and environmental.
SC.912.E.7.3   Differentiate and describe the various interactions among Earth systems,            High
               including: atmosphere, hydrosphere, cryosphere, geosphere, and biosphere.
SC.912.E.7.4   Summarize the conditions that contribute to the climate of a geographic area,       Moderate
               including the relationships to lakes and oceans.
SC.912.P.10.1  Differentiate among the various forms of energy and recognize that they can be      Moderate
               transformed from one form to others.
SC.912.P.10.2  Explore the Law of Conservation of Energy by differentiating among open,            High
               closed, and isolated systems and explain that the total energy in an isolated
               system is a conserved quantity.
SC.912.L.15.3  Describe how biological diversity is increased by the origin of new species and     Moderate
               how it is decreased by the natural process of extinction.
SC.912.L.15.12 List the conditions for Hardy-Weinberg equilibrium in a population and why          High
               these conditions are not likely to appear in nature. Use the Hardy-Weinberg
               equation to predict genotypes in a population from observed phenotypes.
SC.912.L.15.13 Describe the conditions required for natural selection, including: overproduction   Moderate
               of offspring, inherited variation, and the struggle to survive, which result in
               differential reproductive success.
SC.912.L.15.14 Discuss mechanisms of evolutionary change other than natural selection such as      Moderate
               genetic drift and gene flow.
SC.912.L.15.15 Describe how mutation and genetic recombination increase genetic variation.         Moderate
SC.912.L.17.1  Discuss the characteristics of populations, such as number of individuals, age      Moderate
               structure, density, and pattern of distribution.
SC.912.L.17.2  Explain the general distribution of life in aquatic systems as a function of        High
               chemistry, geography, light, depth, salinity, and temperature.
SC.912.L.17.3  Discuss how various oceanic and freshwater processes, such as currents, tides,      Moderate
               and waves, affect the abundance of aquatic organisms.
SC.912.L.17.4  Describe changes in ecosystems resulting from seasonal variations, climate          Moderate
               change and succession.
SC.912.L.17.5  Analyze how population size is determined by births, deaths, immigration,           High
               emigration, and limiting factors (biotic and abiotic) that determine carrying
               capacity.
                                                        98


SC.912.L.17.6     Compare and contrast the relationships among organisms, including predation,         Moderate
                  parasitism, competition, commensalism, and mutualism.
SC.912.L.17.7     Characterize the biotic and abiotic components that define freshwater systems,       Moderate
                  marine systems and terrestrial systems.
SC.912.L.17.8     Recognize the consequences of the losses of biodiversity due to catastrophic         High
                  events, climate changes, human activity, and the introduction of invasive, non
                  native species.
SC.912.L.17.9     Use a food web to identify and distinguish producers, consumers, and                 Moderate
                  decomposers. Explain the pathway of energy transfer through trophic levels and
                  the reduction of available energy at successive trophic levels.
SC.912.L.17.10    Diagram and explain the biogeochemical cycles of an ecosystem, including             Moderate
                  water, carbon, and nitrogen cycle.
SC.912.L.17.11    Evaluate the costs and benefits of renewable and nonrenewable resources, such        High
                  as water, energy, fossil fuels, wildlife, and forests.
SC.912.L.17.16    Discuss the large-scale environmental impacts resulting from human activity,         High
                  including waste spills, oil spills, runoff, greenhouse gases, ozone depletion, and
                  surface and groundwater pollution.
SC.912.L.17.17    Assess the effectiveness of innovative methods of protecting the environment.        High
SC.912.L.17.19    Describe how different natural resources are produced and how their rates of use Moderate
                  and renewal limit availability.
MA.912.S.1.2      Determine appropriate and consistent standards of measurement for the data to Moderate
                  be collected in a survey or experiment.
MA.912.S.3.2      Collect, organize, and analyze data sets, determine the best format for the data     High
                  and present visual summaries from the following:
LA.910.4.2.2      The student will record information and ideas from primary and/or secondary
                  sources accurately and coherently, noting the validity and reliability of these
                  sources and attributing sources of information;
LA.910.2.2.3      The student will organize information to show understanding or relationships
                  among facts, ideas, and events (e.g., representing key points within text through
                  charting, mapping, paraphrasing, summarizing, comparing, contrasting, or
                  outlining);
               Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code    Access Point Descriptor
SC.912.N.1.In.a       Identify a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, including life science, earth
                      and space science, or physical science, and do the following: 1. Identify a scientific
                      question 2. Examine reliable sources of informtion to identify what is already k
SC.912.N.1.Su.b       Identify the basic process used in scientific investigations, including questioning,
                      observing, recording, determining, and sharing results.
SC.912.N.1.Pa.c       Recognize that when a variety of common activities are repeated the same way, the
                      outcomes are the same.
SC.912.N.2.In.a       Identify examples of investigations that involve science.
SC.912.N.2.Su.b       Recognize that what is known about science can change based on new information.
SC.912.N.3.In.a       Recognize that a scientific theory is developed by repeated investigations of many
                      scientists and agreement on the likely explanation.
SC.912.N.3.Su.b       Recognize examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in nature, such as
                      Newton’s laws.
SC.912.N.4.In.a       Identify ways scientific knowledge and problem solving benefit people.
SC.912.N.4.Su.b       Recognize that some strategies may cost more to solve a problem.
                                                           99


SC.912.E.7.In.a        Identify cycles that occur on Earth, such as the water and carbon cycles, and the role
                       energy plays in them.
SC.912.E.7.Su.b        Recognize that currents move the ocean water around Earth.
SC.912.E.7.Pa.c        Recognize that humans, plants, and animals live on the Earth (biosphere).
SC.912.P.10.In.a       Identify examples of energy being transformed from one form to another (conserved
                       quantity).
SC.912.P.10.Su.b       Recognize the relationship between work and power, such as power is the amount of
                       work a person or machine does.
SC.912.P.10.Pa.c       Recognize the source and recipient of heat transfer.
SC.912.L.15.In.a       Identify that prehistoric plants and animals changed over time (evolved) or became
                       extinct.
SC.912.L.15.Su.b       Match organisms to the animal, plant, and fungus kingdoms.
SC.912.L.15.Pa.c       Recognize that animals produce offspring.
SC.912.L.17.In.a       Recognize that living things in oceans and fresh water are affected by the location,
                       availability of light, depth of the water, and temperature.
SC.912.L.17.Su.b       Recognize how animals and plants in an ecosystem may be affected by changes to the
                       food supply or climate.
SC.912.L.17.Pa.c       Recognize examples of mutual relationships between people and other living things.
                                              2000440 Genetics
Section: Basic and Adult Education                          Grade Group: Secondary Grades 9-12
Subject: Science                                            Domain: Biological Sciences
Course Length: Year                                         Level: 3
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                   Benchmarks
                                                                                                       Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                    Knowledge
SC.912.N.1.1       Define a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, for example: biology, High
                   chemistry, physics, and earth/space science, and do the following:
SC.912.N.1.2       Describe and explain what characterizes science and its methods.                    Moderate
SC.912.N.2.1       Identify what is science, what clearly is not science, and what superficially       High
                   resembles science (but fails to meet the criteria for science).
SC.912.N.2.2       Identify which questions can be answered through science and which questions        High
                   are outside the boundaries of scientific investigation, such as questions
                   addressed by other ways of knowing, such as art, philosophy, and religion.
SC.912.N.3.5       Describe the function of models in science, and identify the wide range of          Moderate
                   models used in science.
SC.912.P.12.12     Explain how various factors, such as concentration, temperature, and presence of    High
                   a catalyst affect the rate of a chemical reaction.
SC.912.L.14.1      Describe the scientific theory of cells (cell theory) and relate the history of its Moderate
                   discovery to the process of science.
SC.912.L.14.6      Explain the significance of genetic factors, environmental factors, and             High
                   pathogenic agents to health from the perspectives of both individual and public
                   health.
SC.912.L.15.8      Describe the scientific explanations of the origin of life on Earth.                Moderate
SC.912.L.15.9      Explain the role of reproductive isolation in the process of speciation.            Moderate
                                                           100


SC.912.L.15.12 List the conditions for Hardy-Weinberg equilibrium in a population and why        High
               these conditions are not likely to appear in nature. Use the Hardy-Weinberg
               equation to predict genotypes in a population from observed phenotypes.
SC.912.L.15.13 Describe the conditions required for natural selection, including: overproduction Moderate
               of offspring, inherited variation, and the struggle to survive, which result in
               differential reproductive success.
SC.912.L.15.14 Discuss mechanisms of evolutionary change other than natural selection such as    Moderate
               genetic drift and gene flow.
SC.912.L.15.15 Describe how mutation and genetic recombination increase genetic variation.       Moderate
SC.912.L.16.1  Use Mendel's laws of segregation and independent assortment to analyze            High
               patterns of inheritance.
SC.912.L.16.2  Discuss observed inheritance patterns caused by various modes of inheritance,     High
               including dominant, recessive, codominant, sex-linked, polygenic, and multiple
               alleles.
SC.912.L.16.3  Describe the basic process of DNA replication and how it relates to the           High
               transmission and conservation of the genetic information.
SC.912.L.16.4  Explain how mutations in the DNA sequence may or may not result in                High
               phenotypic change. Explain how mutations in gametes may result in phenotypic
               changes in offspring.
SC.912.L.16.5  Explain the basic processes of transcription and translation, and how they result High
               in the expression of genes.
SC.912.L.16.6  Discuss the mechanisms for regulation of gene expression in prokaryotes and       High
               eukaryotes at transcription and translation level.
SC.912.L.16.7  Describe how viruses and bacteria transfer genetic material between cells and     High
               the role of this process in biotechnology.
SC.912.L.16.8  Explain the relationship between mutation, cell cycle, and uncontrolled cell      Moderate
               growth potentially resulting in cancer.
SC.912.L.16.9  Explain how and why the genetic code is universal and is common to almost all     Moderate
               organisms.
SC.912.L.16.10 Evaluate the impact of biotechnology on the individual, society and the           High
               environment, including medical and ethical issues.
SC.912.L.16.11 Discuss the technologies associated with forensic medicine and DNA                High
               identification, including restriction fragment length polymorphism (RFLP)
               analysis.
SC.912.L.16.12 Describe how basic DNA technology (restriction digestion by endonucleases,        Moderate
               gel electrophoresis, polymerase chain reaction, ligation, and transformation) is
               used to construct recombinant DNA molecules (DNA cloning).
SC.912.L.16.14 Describe the cell cycle, including the process of mitosis. Explain the role of    Moderate
               mitosis in the formation of new cells and its importance in maintaining
               chromosome number during asexual reproduction.
SC.912.L.16.16 Describe the process of meiosis, including independent assortment and crossing    Moderate
               over. Explain how reduction division results in the formation of haploid gametes
               or spores.
SC.912.L.16.17 Compare and contrast mitosis and meiosis and relate to the processes of sexual    High
               and asexual reproduction and their consequences for genetic variation.
SC.912.L.17.1  Discuss the characteristics of populations, such as number of individuals, age    Moderate
               structure, density, and pattern of distribution.
SC.912.L.17.8  Recognize the consequences of the losses of biodiversity due to catastrophic      High
               events, climate changes, human activity, and the introduction of invasive, non
               native species.
                                                       101


SC.912.L.18.1     Describe the basic molecular structures and primary functions of the four major       Moderate
                  categories of biological macromolecules.
SC.912.L.18.11    Explain the role of enzymes as catalysts that lower the activation energy of          Moderate
                  biochemical reactions. Identify factors, such as pH and temperature, and their
                  effect on enzyme activity.
MA.912.S.1.2      Determine appropriate and consistent standards of measurement for the data to         Moderate
                  be collected in a survey or experiment.
MA.912.S.3.2      Collect, organize, and analyze data sets, determine the best format for the data      High
                  and present visual summaries from the following:
LA.910.4.2.2      The student will record information and ideas from primary and/or secondary
                  sources accurately and coherently, noting the validity and reliability of these
                  sources and attributing sources of information;
LA.910.2.2.3      The student will organize information to show understanding or relationships
                  among facts, ideas, and events (e.g., representing key points within text through
                  charting, mapping, paraphrasing, summarizing, comparing, contrasting, or
                  outlining);
HE.912.C.1.3      Evaluate how environment and personal health are interrelated.
HE.912.C.1.4      Analyze how heredity and family history can impact personal health.
               Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code    Access Point Descriptor
SC.912.N.1.In.a       Identify a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, including life science, earth
                      and space science, or physical science, and do the following: 1. Identify a scientific
                      question 2. Examine reliable sources of informtion to identify what is already k
SC.912.N.1.Su.b       Identify the basic process used in scientific investigations, including questioning,
                      observing, recording, determining, and sharing results.
SC.912.N.1.Pa.c       Recognize that when a variety of common activities are repeated the same way, the
                      outcomes are the same.
SC.912.N.2.In.a       Identify examples of investigations that involve science.
SC.912.N.2.Su.b       Recognize that what is known about science can change based on new information.
SC.912.N.3.In.a       Recognize that a scientific theory is developed by repeated investigations of many
                      scientists and agreement on the likely explanation.
SC.912.N.3.Su.b       Recognize examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in nature, such as
                      Newton’s laws.
SC.912.L.14.In.a      Identify that all living things are made of cells and cells function in similar ways (cell
                      theory).
SC.912.L.14.Su.b      Recognize that cells have different parts and each has a function.
SC.912.L.14.Pa.c      Identify ways to prevent infection from bacteria and viruses, such as hand washing and
                      first aid.
SC.912.L.15.In.a      Identify that prehistoric plants and animals changed over time (evolved) or became
                      extinct.
SC.912.L.15.Su.b      Match organisms to the animal, plant, and fungus kingdoms.
SC.912.L.15.Pa.c      Recognize that animals produce offspring.
SC.912.L.16.In.a      Identify that genes are sets of instructions that determine which characteristics are passed
                      from parent to offspring.
SC.912.L.16.Su.b      Recognize that all organisms have a substance called DNA with unique information.
SC.912.L.16.Pa.c      Recognize that illness can result when parts of our bodies are not working properly.
                                                          102


SC.912.L.17.In.a       Recognize that living things in oceans and fresh water are affected by the location,
                       availability of light, depth of the water, and temperature.
SC.912.L.17.Su.b       Recognize how animals and plants in an ecosystem may be affected by changes to the
                       food supply or climate.
SC.912.L.17.Pa.c       Recognize examples of mutual relationships between people and other living things.
SC.912.L.18.In.a       Identify that carbohydrates, fats, proteins, and nucleic acids (macromolecules) are
                       important for human organisms.
SC.912.L.18.Su.b       Recognize that the function of photosynthesis is to produce food for plants.
SC.912.L.18.Pa.c       Identify that food is a source of energy.
                                              2000410 Zoology
Section: Basic and Adult Education                          Grade Group: Secondary Grades 9-12
Subject: Science                                            Domain: Biological Sciences
Course Length: Year                                         Level: 2
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                   Benchmarks
                                                                                                       Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                    Knowledge
SC.912.N.1.1       Define a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, for example: biology, High
                   chemistry, physics, and earth/space science, and do the following:
SC.912.N.1.2       Describe and explain what characterizes science and its methods.                    Moderate
SC.912.N.2.4       Explain that scientific knowledge is both durable and robust and open to change.    High
                   Scientific knowledge can change because it is often examined and re-examined
                   by new investigations and scientific argumentation. Because of these frequent
                   examinations, scien
SC.912.L.14.1      Describe the scientific theory of cells (cell theory) and relate the history of its Moderate
                   discovery to the process of science.
SC.912.L.14.2      Relate structure to function for the components of plant and animal cells.          Moderate
                   Explain the role of cell membranes as a highly selective barrier (passive and
                   active transport).
SC.912.L.14.3      Compare and contrast the general structures of plant and animal cells. Compare      Moderate
                   and contrast the general structures of prokaryotic and eukaryotic cells.
SC.912.L.14.5      Explain the evidence supporting the scientific theory of the origin of eukaryotic   High
                   cells (endosymbiosis).
SC.912.L.14.12     Describe the anatomy and histology of bone tissue.                                  Low
SC.912.L.14.26     Identify the major parts of the brain on diagrams or models.                        Low
SC.912.L.14.36     Describe the factors affecting blood flow through the cardiovascular system.        Moderate
SC.912.L.14.44     Describe the physiology of the respiratory system including the mechanisms of       Moderate
                   ventilation, gas exchange, gas transport and the mechanisms that control the rate
                   of ventilation.
SC.912.L.14.50     Describe the structure of vertebrate sensory organs. Relate structure to function   Moderate
                   in vertebrate sensory systems.
SC.912.L.14.51     Describe the function of the vertebrate integumentary system.                       Low
SC.912.L.15.1      Explain how the scientific theory of evolution is supported by the fossil record,   High
                   comparative anatomy, comparative embryology, biogeography, molecular
                   biology, and observed evolutionary change.
                                                           103


SC.912.L.15.3     Describe how biological diversity is increased by the origin of new species and      Moderate
                  how it is decreased by the natural process of extinction.
SC.912.L.15.4     Describe how and why organisms are hierarchically classified and based on            High
                  evolutionary relationships.
SC.912.L.15.5     Explain the reasons for changes in how organisms are classified.                     High
SC.912.L.15.6     Discuss distinguishing characteristics of the domains and kingdoms of living         Moderate
                  organisms.
SC.912.L.15.7     Discuss distinguishing characteristics of vertebrate and representative              Moderate
                  invertebrate phyla, and chordate classes using typical examples.
SC.912.L.15.11    Discuss specific fossil hominids and what they show about human evolution.           Moderate
SC.912.L.15.13    Describe the conditions required for natural selection, including: overproduction Moderate
                  of offspring, inherited variation, and the struggle to survive, which result in
                  differential reproductive success.
SC.912.L.15.14    Discuss mechanisms of evolutionary change other than natural selection such as Moderate
                  genetic drift and gene flow.
SC.912.L.15.15    Describe how mutation and genetic recombination increase genetic variation.          Moderate
SC.912.L.17.6     Compare and contrast the relationships among organisms, including predation,         Moderate
                  parasitism, competition, commensalism, and mutualism.
SC.912.L.17.7     Characterize the biotic and abiotic components that define freshwater systems,       Moderate
                  marine systems and terrestrial systems.
SC.912.L.17.8     Recognize the consequences of the losses of biodiversity due to catastrophic         High
                  events, climate changes, human activity, and the introduction of invasive, non
                  native species.
SC.912.L.17.9     Use a food web to identify and distinguish producers, consumers, and                 Moderate
                  decomposers. Explain the pathway of energy transfer through trophic levels and
                  the reduction of available energy at successive trophic levels.
SC.912.L.18.1     Describe the basic molecular structures and primary functions of the four major      Moderate
                  categories of biological macromolecules.
SC.912.L.18.9     Explain the interrelated nature of photosynthesis and cellular respiration.          Moderate
MA.912.S.1.2      Determine appropriate and consistent standards of measurement for the data to Moderate
                  be collected in a survey or experiment.
MA.912.S.3.2      Collect, organize, and analyze data sets, determine the best format for the data     High
                  and present visual summaries from the following:
LA.910.4.2.2      The student will record information and ideas from primary and/or secondary
                  sources accurately and coherently, noting the validity and reliability of these
                  sources and attributing sources of information;
LA.910.2.2.3      The student will organize information to show understanding or relationships
                  among facts, ideas, and events (e.g., representing key points within text through
                  charting, mapping, paraphrasing, summarizing, comparing, contrasting, or
                  outlining);
               Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code    Access Point Descriptor
SC.912.N.1.In.a       Identify a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, including life science, earth
                      and space science, or physical science, and do the following: 1. Identify a scientific
                      question 2. Examine reliable sources of informtion to identify what is already k
SC.912.N.1.Su.b       Identify the basic process used in scientific investigations, including questioning,
                      observing, recording, determining, and sharing results.
                                                          104


SC.912.N.1.Pa.c        Recognize that when a variety of common activities are repeated the same way, the
                       outcomes are the same.
SC.912.N.2.In.a        Identify examples of investigations that involve science.
SC.912.N.2.Su.b        Recognize that what is known about science can change based on new information.
SC.912.L.14.In.a       Identify that all living things are made of cells and cells function in similar ways (cell
                       theory).
SC.912.L.14.Su.b       Recognize that cells have different parts and each has a function.
SC.912.L.14.Pa.c       Identify ways to prevent infection from bacteria and viruses, such as hand washing and
                       first aid.
SC.912.L.15.In.a       Identify that prehistoric plants and animals changed over time (evolved) or became
                       extinct.
SC.912.L.15.Su.b       Match organisms to the animal, plant, and fungus kingdoms.
SC.912.L.15.Pa.c       Recognize that animals produce offspring.
SC.912.L.17.In.a       Recognize that living things in oceans and fresh water are affected by the location,
                       availability of light, depth of the water, and temperature.
SC.912.L.17.Su.b       Recognize how animals and plants in an ecosystem may be affected by changes to the
                       food supply or climate.
SC.912.L.17.Pa.c       Recognize examples of mutual relationships between people and other living things.
SC.912.L.18.In.a       Identify that carbohydrates, fats, proteins, and nucleic acids (macromolecules) are
                       important for human organisms.
SC.912.L.18.Su.b       Recognize that the function of photosynthesis is to produce food for plants.
SC.912.L.18.Pa.c       Identify that food is a source of energy.
                                2000350 Anatomy and Physiology
Section: Basic and Adult Education                           Grade Group: Secondary Grades 9-12
Subject: Science                                             Domain: Biological Sciences
Course Length: Year                                          Level: 2
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                   Benchmarks
                                                                                                         Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                      Knowledge
SC.912.N.1.1       Define a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, for example: biology, High
                   chemistry, physics, and earth/space science, and do the following:
SC.912.N.1.2       Describe and explain what characterizes science and its methods.                      Moderate
SC.912.L.14.2      Relate structure to function for the components of plant and animal cells.            Moderate
                   Explain the role of cell membranes as a highly selective barrier (passive and
                   active transport).
SC.912.L.14.6      Explain the significance of genetic factors, environmental factors, and               High
                   pathogenic agents to health from the perspectives of both individual and public
                   health.
SC.912.L.14.11     Classify and state the defining characteristics of epithelial tissue, connective      Moderate
                   tissue, muscle tissue, and nervous tissue.
SC.912.L.14.12     Describe the anatomy and histology of bone tissue.                                    Low
SC.912.L.14.13     Distinguish between bones of the axial skeleton and the appendicular skeleton.        Low
SC.912.L.14.14     Identify the major bones of the axial and appendicular skeleton.                      Low
                                                            105


SC.912.L.14.16 Describe the anatomy and histology, including ultrastructure, of muscle tissue.   Moderate
SC.912.L.14.17 List the steps involved in the sliding filament of muscle contraction.            Moderate
SC.912.L.14.18 Describe signal transmission across a myoneural junction.                         Moderate
SC.912.L.14.20 Identify the major muscles of the human on a model or diagram.                    Low
SC.912.L.14.21 Describe the anatomy, histology, and physiology of the central and peripheral     Moderate
               nervous systems and name the major divisions of the nervous system.
SC.912.L.14.23 Identify the parts of a reflex arc.                                               Low
SC.912.L.14.24 Identify the general parts of a synapse and describe the physiology of signal     Moderate
               transmission across a synapse.
SC.912.L.14.25 Identify the major parts of a cross section through the spinal cord.              Low
SC.912.L.14.26 Identify the major parts of the brain on diagrams or models.                      Low
SC.912.L.14.28 Identify the major functions of the spinal cord.                                  Low
SC.912.L.14.29 Define the terms endocrine and exocrine.                                          Low
SC.912.L.14.30 Compare endocrine and neural controls of physiology.                              Moderate
SC.912.L.14.32 Describe the anatomy and physiology of the endocrine system.                      Moderate
SC.912.L.14.33 Describe the basic anatomy and physiology of the reproductive system.             Moderate
SC.912.L.14.34 Describe the composition and physiology of blood, including that of the plasma Moderate
               and the formed elements.
SC.912.L.14.35 Describe the steps in hemostasis, including the mechanism of coagulation.         Moderate
               Include the basis for blood typing and transfusion reactions.
SC.912.L.14.36 Describe the factors affecting blood flow through the cardiovascular system.      Moderate
SC.912.L.14.38 Describe normal heart sounds and what they mean.                                  Moderate
SC.912.L.14.39 Describe hypertension and some of the factors that produce it.                    Moderate
SC.912.L.14.41 Describe fetal circulation and changes that occur to the circulatory system at    Moderate
               birth.
SC.912.L.14.42 Describe the anatomy and the physiology of the lymph system.                      Moderate
SC.912.L.14.44 Describe the physiology of the respiratory system including the mechanisms of Moderate
               ventilation, gas exchange, gas transport and the mechanisms that control the rate
               of ventilation.
SC.912.L.14.46 Describe the physiology of the digestive system, including mechanical digestion, Moderate
               chemical digestion, absorption and the neural and hormonal mechanisms of
               control.
SC.912.L.14.47 Describe the physiology of urine formation by the kidney.                         Moderate
SC.912.L.14.49 Identify the major functions associated with the sympathetic and                  Moderate
               parasympathetic nervous systems.
SC.912.L.14.50 Describe the structure of vertebrate sensory organs. Relate structure to function Moderate
               in vertebrate sensory systems.
SC.912.L.14.51 Describe the function of the vertebrate integumentary system.                     Low
SC.912.L.14.52 Explain the basic functions of the human immune system, including specific and    Moderate
               nonspecific immune response, vaccines, and antibiotics.
SC.912.L.16.8  Explain the relationship between mutation, cell cycle, and uncontrolled cell      Moderate
               growth potentially resulting in cancer.
SC.912.L.18.1  Describe the basic molecular structures and primary functions of the four major   Moderate
               categories of biological macromolecules.
SC.912.L.18.11 Explain the role of enzymes as catalysts that lower the activation energy of      Moderate
               biochemical reactions. Identify factors, such as pH and temperature, and their
               effect on enzyme activity.
                                                       106


MA.912.S.1.2      Determine appropriate and consistent standards of measurement for the data to Moderate
                  be collected in a survey or experiment.
MA.912.S.3.2      Collect, organize, and analyze data sets, determine the best format for the data      High
                  and present visual summaries from the following:
LA.910.4.2.2      The student will record information and ideas from primary and/or secondary
                  sources accurately and coherently, noting the validity and reliability of these
                  sources and attributing sources of information;
LA.910.2.2.3      The student will organize information to show understanding or relationships
                  among facts, ideas, and events (e.g., representing key points within text through
                  charting, mapping, paraphrasing, summarizing, comparing, contrasting, or
                  outlining);
HE.912.C.1.3      Evaluate how environment and personal health are interrelated.
HE.912.C.1.4      Analyze how heredity and family history can impact personal health.
               Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code    Access Point Descriptor
SC.912.N.1.In.a       Identify a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, including life science, earth
                      and space science, or physical science, and do the following: 1. Identify a scientific
                      question 2. Examine reliable sources of informtion to identify what is already k
SC.912.N.1.Su.b       Identify the basic process used in scientific investigations, including questioning,
                      observing, recording, determining, and sharing results.
SC.912.N.1.Pa.c       Recognize that when a variety of common activities are repeated the same way, the
                      outcomes are the same.
SC.912.L.14.In.a      Identify that all living things are made of cells and cells function in similar ways (cell
                      theory).
SC.912.L.14.Su.b      Recognize that cells have different parts and each has a function.
SC.912.L.14.Pa.c      Identify ways to prevent infection from bacteria and viruses, such as hand washing and
                      first aid.
SC.912.L.16.In.a      Identify that genes are sets of instructions that determine which characteristics are passed
                      from parent to offspring.
SC.912.L.16.Su.b      Recognize that all organisms have a substance called DNA with unique information.
SC.912.L.16.Pa.c      Recognize that illness can result when parts of our bodies are not working properly.
SC.912.L.18.In.a      Identify that carbohydrates, fats, proteins, and nucleic acids (macromolecules) are
                      important for human organisms.
SC.912.L.18.Su.b      Recognize that the function of photosynthesis is to produce food for plants.
SC.912.L.18.Pa.c      Identify that food is a source of energy.
                                                          107


                         2000360 Anatomy and Physiology Honors
Section: Basic and Adult Education                          Grade Group: Secondary Grades 9-12
Subject: Science                                            Domain: Biological Sciences
Course Length: Year                                         Level: 3
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                   Benchmarks
                                                                                                      Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                   Knowledge
SC.912.N.1.1       Define a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, for example: biology, High
                   chemistry, physics, and earth/space science, and do the following:
SC.912.N.1.2       Describe and explain what characterizes science and its methods.                   Moderate
SC.912.L.14.2      Relate structure to function for the components of plant and animal cells.         Moderate
                   Explain the role of cell membranes as a highly selective barrier (passive and
                   active transport).
SC.912.L.14.6      Explain the significance of genetic factors, environmental factors, and            High
                   pathogenic agents to health from the perspectives of both individual and public
                   health.
SC.912.L.14.11     Classify and state the defining characteristics of epithelial tissue, connective   Moderate
                   tissue, muscle tissue, and nervous tissue.
SC.912.L.14.12     Describe the anatomy and histology of bone tissue.                                 Low
SC.912.L.14.13     Distinguish between bones of the axial skeleton and the appendicular skeleton.     Low
SC.912.L.14.14     Identify the major bones of the axial and appendicular skeleton.                   Low
SC.912.L.14.15     Identify major markings (such as foramina, fossae, tubercles, etc.) on a skeleton. Moderate
                   Explain why these markings are important.
SC.912.L.14.16     Describe the anatomy and histology, including ultrastructure, of muscle tissue. Moderate
SC.912.L.14.17     List the steps involved in the sliding filament of muscle contraction.             Moderate
SC.912.L.14.18     Describe signal transmission across a myoneural junction.                          Moderate
SC.912.L.14.19     Explain the physiology of skeletal muscle.                                         Moderate
SC.912.L.14.20     Identify the major muscles of the human on a model or diagram.                     Low
SC.912.L.14.21     Describe the anatomy, histology, and physiology of the central and peripheral      Moderate
                   nervous systems and name the major divisions of the nervous system.
SC.912.L.14.22     Describe the physiology of nerve conduction, including the generator potential,    Moderate
                   action potential, and the synapse.
SC.912.L.14.23     Identify the parts of a reflex arc.                                                Low
SC.912.L.14.25     Identify the major parts of a cross section through the spinal cord.               Low
SC.912.L.14.27     Identify the functions of the major parts of the brain, including the meninges,    Low
                   medulla, pons, midbrain, hypothalamus, thalamus, cerebellum and cerebrum.
SC.912.L.14.28     Identify the major functions of the spinal cord.                                   Low
SC.912.L.14.29     Define the terms endocrine and exocrine.                                           Low
SC.912.L.14.30     Compare endocrine and neural controls of physiology.                               Moderate
SC.912.L.14.31     Describe the physiology of hormones including the different types and the          Moderate
                   mechanisms of their action.
SC.912.L.14.34     Describe the composition and physiology of blood, including that of the plasma Moderate
                   and the formed elements.
                                                           108


SC.912.L.14.35 Describe the steps in hemostasis, including the mechanism of coagulation.           Moderate
               Include the basis for blood typing and transfusion reactions.
SC.912.L.14.36 Describe the factors affecting blood flow through the cardiovascular system.        Moderate
SC.912.L.14.37 Explain the components of an electrocardiogram.                                     Low
SC.912.L.14.38 Describe normal heart sounds and what they mean.                                    Moderate
SC.912.L.14.39 Describe hypertension and some of the factors that produce it.                      Moderate
SC.912.L.14.40 Describe the histology of the major arteries and veins of systemic, pulmonary,      Moderate
               hepatic portal, and coronary circulation.
SC.912.L.14.41 Describe fetal circulation and changes that occur to the circulatory system at      Moderate
               birth.
SC.912.L.14.42 Describe the anatomy and the physiology of the lymph system.                        Moderate
SC.912.L.14.43 Describe the histology of the respiratory system.                                   Moderate
SC.912.L.14.44 Describe the physiology of the respiratory system including the mechanisms of       Moderate
               ventilation, gas exchange, gas transport and the mechanisms that control the rate
               of ventilation.
SC.912.L.14.45 Describe the histology of the alimentary canal and its associated accessory         Moderate
               organs.
SC.912.L.14.46 Describe the physiology of the digestive system, including mechanical digestion,    Moderate
               chemical digestion, absorption and the neural and hormonal mechanisms of
               control.
SC.912.L.14.47 Describe the physiology of urine formation by the kidney.                           Moderate
SC.912.L.14.48 Describe the anatomy, histology, and physiology of the ureters, the urinary         Moderate
               bladder and the urethra.
SC.912.L.14.49 Identify the major functions associated with the sympathetic and                    Moderate
               parasympathetic nervous systems.
SC.912.L.14.50 Describe the structure of vertebrate sensory organs. Relate structure to function   Moderate
               in vertebrate sensory systems.
SC.912.L.14.51 Describe the function of the vertebrate integumentary system.                       Low
SC.912.L.14.52 Explain the basic functions of the human immune system, including specific and      Moderate
               nonspecific immune response, vaccines, and antibiotics.
SC.912.L.16.8  Explain the relationship between mutation, cell cycle, and uncontrolled cell        Moderate
               growth potentially resulting in cancer.
SC.912.L.16.10 Evaluate the impact of biotechnology on the individual, society and the             High
               environment, including medical and ethical issues.
SC.912.L.16.13 Describe the basic anatomy and physiology of the human reproductive system.         Moderate
               Describe the process of human development from fertilization to birth and major
               changes that occur in each trimester of pregnancy.
SC.912.L.18.2  Describe the important structural characteristics of monosaccharides,               Moderate
               disaccharides, and polysaccharides and explain the functions of carbohydrates in
               living things.
SC.912.L.18.3  Describe the structures of fatty acids, triglycerides, phospholipids, and steroids. Moderate
               Explain the functions of lipids in living organisms. Identify some reactions that
               fatty acids undergo. Relate the structure and function of cell membranes.
SC.912.L.18.4  Describe the structures of proteins and amino acids. Explain the functions of       Moderate
               proteins in living organisms. Identify some reactions that amino acids undergo.
               Relate the structure and function of enzymes.
SC.912.L.18.6  Discuss the role of anaerobic respiration in living things and in human society.    Moderate
SC.912.L.18.8  Identify the reactants, products, and basic functions of aerobic and anaerobic      Moderate
               cellular respiration.
                                                       109


SC.912.L.18.11    Explain the role of enzymes as catalysts that lower the activation energy of          Moderate
                  biochemical reactions. Identify factors, such as pH and temperature, and their
                  effect on enzyme activity.
MA.912.S.1.2      Determine appropriate and consistent standards of measurement for the data to Moderate
                  be collected in a survey or experiment.
MA.912.S.3.2      Collect, organize, and analyze data sets, determine the best format for the data      High
                  and present visual summaries from the following:
LA.910.4.2.2      The student will record information and ideas from primary and/or secondary
                  sources accurately and coherently, noting the validity and reliability of these
                  sources and attributing sources of information;
LA.910.2.2.3      The student will organize information to show understanding or relationships
                  among facts, ideas, and events (e.g., representing key points within text through
                  charting, mapping, paraphrasing, summarizing, comparing, contrasting, or
                  outlining);
HE.912.C.1.3      Evaluate how environment and personal health are interrelated.
HE.912.C.1.4      Analyze how heredity and family history can impact personal health.
               Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code    Access Point Descriptor
SC.912.N.1.In.a       Identify a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, including life science, earth
                      and space science, or physical science, and do the following: 1. Identify a scientific
                      question 2. Examine reliable sources of informtion to identify what is already k
SC.912.N.1.Su.b       Identify the basic process used in scientific investigations, including questioning,
                      observing, recording, determining, and sharing results.
SC.912.N.1.Pa.c       Recognize that when a variety of common activities are repeated the same way, the
                      outcomes are the same.
SC.912.L.14.In.a      Identify that all living things are made of cells and cells function in similar ways (cell
                      theory).
SC.912.L.14.Su.b      Recognize that cells have different parts and each has a function.
SC.912.L.14.Pa.c      Identify ways to prevent infection from bacteria and viruses, such as hand washing and
                      first aid.
SC.912.L.16.In.a      Identify that genes are sets of instructions that determine which characteristics are passed
                      from parent to offspring.
SC.912.L.16.Su.b      Recognize that all organisms have a substance called DNA with unique information.
SC.912.L.16.Pa.c      Recognize that illness can result when parts of our bodies are not working properly.
SC.912.L.18.In.a      Identify that carbohydrates, fats, proteins, and nucleic acids (macromolecules) are
                      important for human organisms.
SC.912.L.18.Su.b      Recognize that the function of photosynthesis is to produce food for plants.
SC.912.L.18.Pa.c      Identify that food is a source of energy.
                                                          110


                                   2001310 Earth/Space Science
Section: Basic and Adult Education                          Grade Group: Secondary Grades 9-12
Subject: Science                                            Domain: Earth/Space Sciences
Course Length: Year                                         Level: 2
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                  Benchmarks
                                                                                                        Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                     Knowledge
SC.912.N.1.1       Define a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, for example: biology, High
                   chemistry, physics, and earth/space science, and do the following:
SC.912.N.1.2       Describe and explain what characterizes science and its methods.                     Moderate
SC.912.N.1.3       Recognize that the strength or usefulness of a scientific claim is evaluated         Low
                   through scientific argumentation, which depends on critical and logical
                   thinking, and the active consideration of alternative scientific explanations to
                   explain the data present
SC.912.N.1.4       Identify sources of information and assess their reliability according to the strict High
                   standards of scientific investigation.
SC.912.N.1.5       Describe and provide examples of how similar investigations conducted in many        Moderate
                   parts of the world result in the same outcome.
SC.912.N.1.6       Describe how scientific inferences are drawn from scientific observations and        Moderate
                   provide examples from the content being studied.
SC.912.N.1.7       Recognize the role of creativity in constructing scientific questions, methods and   Low
                   explanations.
SC.912.N.2.1       Identify what is science, what clearly is not science, and what superficially        High
                   resembles science (but fails to meet the criteria for science).
SC.912.N.2.2       Identify which questions can be answered through science and which questions         High
                   are outside the boundaries of scientific investigation, such as questions
                   addressed by other ways of knowing, such as art, philosophy, and religion.
SC.912.N.2.3       Identify examples of pseudoscience (such as astrology, phrenology) in society.       Low
SC.912.N.2.4       Explain that scientific knowledge is both durable and robust and open to change.     High
                   Scientific knowledge can change because it is often examined and re-examined
                   by new investigations and scientific argumentation. Because of these frequent
                   examinations, scien
SC.912.N.2.5       Describe instances in which scientists' varied backgrounds, talents, interests, and  High
                   goals influence the inferences and thus the explanations that they make about
                   observations of natural phenomena and describe that competing interpretations
                   (explanations)
SC.912.N.3.1       Explain that a scientific theory is the culmination of many scientific               High
                   investigations drawing together all the current evidence concerning a substantial
                   range of phenomena; thus, a scientific theory represents the most powerful
                   explanation scientists have
SC.912.N.3.2       Describe the role consensus plays in the historical development of a theory in       Moderate
                   any one of the disciplines of science.
SC.912.N.3.3       Explain that scientific laws are descriptions of specific relationships under given  Moderate
                   conditions in nature, but do not offer explanations for those relationships.
SC.912.N.3.4       Recognize that theories do not become laws, nor do laws become theories;             Moderate
                   theories are well supported explanations and laws are well supported
                   descriptions.
                                                           111


SC.912.N.3.5  Describe the function of models in science, and identify the wide range of       Moderate
              models used in science.
SC.912.N.4.1  Explain how scientific knowledge and reasoning provide an empirically-based      Moderate
              perspective to inform society's decision making.
SC.912.E.5.1  Cite evidence used to develop and verify the scientific theory of the Big Bang   High
              (also known as the Big Bang Theory) of the origin of the universe.
SC.912.E.5.2  Identify patterns in the organization and distribution of matter in the universe Moderate
              and the forces that determine them.
SC.912.E.5.3  Describe and predict how the initial mass of a star determines its evolution.    Moderate
SC.912.E.5.4  Explain the physical properties of the Sun and its dynamic nature and connect    High
              them to conditions and events on Earth.
SC.912.E.5.5  Explain the formation of planetary systems based on our knowledge of our Solar   High
              System and apply this knowledge to newly discovered planetary systems.
SC.912.E.5.6  Develop logical connections through physical principles, including Kepler's and  High
              Newton's Laws about the relationships and the effects of Earth, Moon, and Sun
              on each other.
SC.912.E.5.7  Relate the history of and explain the justification for future space exploration High
              and continuing technology development.
SC.912.E.5.8  Connect the concepts of radiation and the electromagnetic spectrum to the use of High
              historical and newly-developed observational tools.
SC.912.E.5.9  Analyze the broad effects of space exploration on the economy and culture of     High
              Florida.
SC.912.E.5.11 Distinguish the various methods of measuring astronomical distances and apply    High
              each in appropriate situations.
SC.912.E.6.1  Describe and differentiate the layers of Earth and the interactions among them.  Moderate
SC.912.E.6.2  Connect surface features to surface processes that are responsible for their     Moderate
              formation.
SC.912.E.6.3  Analyze the scientific theory of plate tectonics and identify related major      High
              processes and features as a result of moving plates.
SC.912.E.6.4  Analyze how specific geologic processes and features are expressed in Florida    High
              and elsewhere.
SC.912.E.6.5  Describe the geologic development of the present day oceans and identify         Moderate
              commonly found features.
SC.912.E.7.1  Analyze the movement of matter and energy through the different                  High
              biogeochemical cycles, including water and carbon.
SC.912.E.7.2  Analyze the causes of the various kinds of surface and deep water motion within  High
              the oceans and their impacts on the transfer of energy between the poles and the
              equator.
SC.912.E.7.3  Differentiate and describe the various interactions among Earth systems,         High
              including: atmosphere, hydrosphere, cryosphere, geosphere, and biosphere.
SC.912.E.7.4  Summarize the conditions that contribute to the climate of a geographic area,    Moderate
              including the relationships to lakes and oceans.
SC.912.E.7.5  Predict future weather conditions based on present observations and conceptual   High
              models and recognize limitations and uncertainties of such predictions.
SC.912.E.7.6  Relate the formation of severe weather to the various physical factors.          Moderate
SC.912.E.7.7  Identify, analyze, and relate the internal (Earth system) and external           High
              (astronomical) conditions that contribute to global climate change.
SC.912.E.7.8  Explain how various atmospheric, oceanic, and hydrologic conditions in Florida High
              have influenced and can influence human behavior, both individually and
              collectively.
                                                      112


SC.912.E.7.9      Cite evidence that the ocean has had a significant influence on climate change by High
                  absorbing, storing, and moving heat, carbon, and water.
SC.912.P.8.1      Differentiate among the four states of matter.                                     Moderate
SC.912.P.8.4      Explore the scientific theory of atoms (also known as atomic theory) by            High
                  describing the structure of atoms in terms of protons, neutrons and electrons, and
                  differentiate among these particles in terms of their mass, electrical charges and
                  locations within
SC.912.P.10.4     Describe heat as the energy transferred by convection, conduction, and             High
                  radiation, and explain the connection of heat to change in temperature or states
                  of matter.
SC.912.P.10.10    Compare the magnitude and range of the four fundamental forces (gravitational,     Moderate
                  electromagnetic, weak nuclear, strong nuclear).
SC.912.P.10.11    Explain and compare nuclear reactions (radioactive decay, fission and fusion),     High
                  the energy changes associated with them and their associated safety issues.
SC.912.P.10.16    Explain the relationship between moving charges and magnetic fields, as well as    High
                  changing magnetic fields and electric fields, and their application to modern
                  technologies.
SC.912.P.10.18    Explore the theory of electromagnetism by comparing and contrasting the            High
                  different parts of the electromagnetic spectrum in terms of wavelength,
                  frequency, and energy, and relate them to phenomena and applications.
SC.912.P.10.19    Explain that all objects emit and absorb electromagnetic radiation and             High
                  distinguish between objects that are blackbody radiators and those that are not.
SC.912.P.10.20    Describe the measurable properties of waves and explain the relationships          High
                  among them and how these properties change when the wave moves from one
                  medium to another.
SC.912.P.12.2     Analyze the motion of an object in terms of its position, velocity, and            High
                  acceleration (with respect to a frame of reference) as functions of time.
SC.912.P.12.4     Describe how the gravitational force between two objects depends on their          Moderate
                  masses and the distance between them.
SC.912.P.12.7     Recognize that nothing travels faster than the speed of light in vacuum which is   Low
                  the same for all observers no matter how they or the light source are moving.
SC.912.L.15.1     Explain how the scientific theory of evolution is supported by the fossil record,  High
                  comparative anatomy, comparative embryology, biogeography, molecular
                  biology, and observed evolutionary change.
SC.912.L.15.8     Describe the scientific explanations of the origin of life on Earth.               Moderate
MA.912.S.1.2      Determine appropriate and consistent standards of measurement for the data to Moderate
                  be collected in a survey or experiment.
MA.912.S.3.2      Collect, organize, and analyze data sets, determine the best format for the data   High
                  and present visual summaries from the following:
LA.910.4.2.2      The student will record information and ideas from primary and/or secondary
                  sources accurately and coherently, noting the validity and reliability of these
                  sources and attributing sources of information;
LA.910.2.2.3      The student will organize information to show understanding or relationships
                  among facts, ideas, and events (e.g., representing key points within text through
                  charting, mapping, paraphrasing, summarizing, comparing, contrasting, or
                  outlining);
               Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code    Access Point Descriptor
SC.912.N.1.In.a       Identify a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, including life science, earth
                                                         113


                 and space science, or physical science, and do the following: 1. Identify a scientific
                 question 2. Examine reliable sources of informtion to identify what is already k
SC.912.N.1.Su.b  Identify the basic process used in scientific investigations, including questioning,
                 observing, recording, determining, and sharing results.
SC.912.N.1.Pa.c  Recognize that when a variety of common activities are repeated the same way, the
                 outcomes are the same.
SC.912.N.2.In.a  Identify examples of investigations that involve science.
SC.912.N.2.Su.b  Recognize that what is known about science can change based on new information.
SC.912.N.3.In.a  Recognize that a scientific theory is developed by repeated investigations of many
                 scientists and agreement on the likely explanation.
SC.912.N.3.In.b  Identify examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in the natural world, such
                 as Newton’s laws.
SC.912.N.3.Su.b  Recognize examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in nature, such as
                 Newton’s laws.
SC.912.N.3.Su.c  Recognize ways models are used in the study of science.
SC.912.N.4.In.a  Identify ways scientific knowledge and problem solving benefit people.
SC.912.N.4.Su.b  Recognize that some strategies may cost more to solve a problem.
SC.912.E.5.In.a  Recognize that the Milky Way is part of the expanding universe.
SC.912.E.5.Su.b  Recognize that stars are made of burning gases.
SC.912.E.5.Pa.c  Observe and recognize effects of the Sun on Earth, such as temperature changes.
SC.912.E.6.In.a  Describe the three layers of Earth (core, mantle, and crust).
SC.912.E.6.Su.b  Identify types of surface features, such as hills and valleys.
SC.912.E.7.In.a  Identify cycles that occur on Earth, such as the water and carbon cycles, and the role
                 energy plays in them.
SC.912.E.7.Su.b  Recognize that currents move the ocean water around Earth.
SC.912.E.7.Pa.c  Recognize that humans, plants, and animals live on the Earth (biosphere).
SC.912.P.8.In.a  Classify states of matter as solid, liquid, and gaseous.
SC.912.P.8.Su.b  Identify examples of physical and chemical changes.
SC.912.P.8.Pa.c  Recognize that the parts of an object can be put together to make a whole.
SC.912.P.10.In.a Identify examples of energy being transformed from one form to another (conserved
                 quantity).
SC.912.P.10.Su.b Recognize the relationship between work and power, such as power is the amount of
                 work a person or machine does.
SC.912.P.10.Pa.c Recognize the source and recipient of heat transfer.
SC.912.P.12.In.a Recognize that scalar quantities describe the magnitude of the measurement, such as
                 size, weight, volume, area, temperature, or speed.
SC.912.P.12.Su.b Recognize that acceleration generally involves a change in speed.
SC.912.P.12.Pa.c Identify the source of the force moving an object.
SC.912.L.15.In.a Identify that prehistoric plants and animals changed over time (evolved) or became
                 extinct.
SC.912.L.15.Su.b Match organisms to the animal, plant, and fungus kingdoms.
SC.912.L.15.Pa.c Recognize that animals produce offspring.
                                                     114


                             2001320 Earth/Space Science Honors
Section: Basic and Adult Education                          Grade Group: Secondary Grades 9-12
Subject: Science                                            Domain: Earth/Space Sciences
Course Length: Year                                         Level: 3
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                  Benchmarks
                                                                                                        Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                     Knowledge
SC.912.N.1.1       Define a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, for example: biology, High
                   chemistry, physics, and earth/space science, and do the following:
SC.912.N.1.2       Describe and explain what characterizes science and its methods.                     Moderate
SC.912.N.1.3       Recognize that the strength or usefulness of a scientific claim is evaluated         Low
                   through scientific argumentation, which depends on critical and logical
                   thinking, and the active consideration of alternative scientific explanations to
                   explain the data present
SC.912.N.1.4       Identify sources of information and assess their reliability according to the strict High
                   standards of scientific investigation.
SC.912.N.1.5       Describe and provide examples of how similar investigations conducted in many        Moderate
                   parts of the world result in the same outcome.
SC.912.N.1.6       Describe how scientific inferences are drawn from scientific observations and        Moderate
                   provide examples from the content being studied.
SC.912.N.1.7       Recognize the role of creativity in constructing scientific questions, methods and   Low
                   explanations.
SC.912.N.2.1       Identify what is science, what clearly is not science, and what superficially        High
                   resembles science (but fails to meet the criteria for science).
SC.912.N.2.2       Identify which questions can be answered through science and which questions         High
                   are outside the boundaries of scientific investigation, such as questions
                   addressed by other ways of knowing, such as art, philosophy, and religion.
SC.912.N.2.3       Identify examples of pseudoscience (such as astrology, phrenology) in society.       Low
SC.912.N.2.4       Explain that scientific knowledge is both durable and robust and open to change.     High
                   Scientific knowledge can change because it is often examined and re-examined
                   by new investigations and scientific argumentation. Because of these frequent
                   examinations, scien
SC.912.N.2.5       Describe instances in which scientists' varied backgrounds, talents, interests, and  High
                   goals influence the inferences and thus the explanations that they make about
                   observations of natural phenomena and describe that competing interpretations
                   (explanations)
SC.912.N.3.1       Explain that a scientific theory is the culmination of many scientific               High
                   investigations drawing together all the current evidence concerning a substantial
                   range of phenomena; thus, a scientific theory represents the most powerful
                   explanation scientists have
SC.912.N.3.2       Describe the role consensus plays in the historical development of a theory in       Moderate
                   any one of the disciplines of science.
SC.912.N.3.3       Explain that scientific laws are descriptions of specific relationships under given  Moderate
                   conditions in nature, but do not offer explanations for those relationships.
SC.912.N.3.4       Recognize that theories do not become laws, nor do laws become theories;             Moderate
                   theories are well supported explanations and laws are well supported
                   descriptions.
                                                           115


SC.912.N.3.5  Describe the function of models in science, and identify the wide range of         Moderate
              models used in science.
SC.912.N.4.1  Explain how scientific knowledge and reasoning provide an empirically-based        Moderate
              perspective to inform society's decision making.
SC.912.N.4.2  Weigh the merits of alternative strategies for solving a specific societal problem High
              by comparing a number of different costs and benefits, such as human,
              economic, and environmental.
SC.912.E.5.1  Cite evidence used to develop and verify the scientific theory of the Big Bang     High
              (also known as the Big Bang Theory) of the origin of the universe.
SC.912.E.5.2  Identify patterns in the organization and distribution of matter in the universe   Moderate
              and the forces that determine them.
SC.912.E.5.3  Describe and predict how the initial mass of a star determines its evolution.      Moderate
SC.912.E.5.4  Explain the physical properties of the Sun and its dynamic nature and connect      High
              them to conditions and events on Earth.
SC.912.E.5.5  Explain the formation of planetary systems based on our knowledge of our Solar     High
              System and apply this knowledge to newly discovered planetary systems.
SC.912.E.5.6  Develop logical connections through physical principles, including Kepler's and    High
              Newton's Laws about the relationships and the effects of Earth, Moon, and Sun
              on each other.
SC.912.E.5.7  Relate the history of and explain the justification for future space exploration   High
              and continuing technology development.
SC.912.E.5.8  Connect the concepts of radiation and the electromagnetic spectrum to the use of   High
              historical and newly-developed observational tools.
SC.912.E.5.9  Analyze the broad effects of space exploration on the economy and culture of       High
              Florida.
SC.912.E.5.10 Describe and apply the coordinate system used to locate objects in the sky.        Moderate
SC.912.E.5.11 Distinguish the various methods of measuring astronomical distances and apply      High
              each in appropriate situations.
SC.912.E.6.1  Describe and differentiate the layers of Earth and the interactions among them.    Moderate
SC.912.E.6.2  Connect surface features to surface processes that are responsible for their       Moderate
              formation.
SC.912.E.6.3  Analyze the scientific theory of plate tectonics and identify related major        High
              processes and features as a result of moving plates.
SC.912.E.6.4  Analyze how specific geologic processes and features are expressed in Florida      High
              and elsewhere.
SC.912.E.6.5  Describe the geologic development of the present day oceans and identify           Moderate
              commonly found features.
SC.912.E.6.6  Analyze past, present, and potential future consequences to the environment        High
              resulting from various energy production technologies.
SC.912.E.7.1  Analyze the movement of matter and energy through the different                    High
              biogeochemical cycles, including water and carbon.
SC.912.E.7.2  Analyze the causes of the various kinds of surface and deep water motion within    High
              the oceans and their impacts on the transfer of energy between the poles and the
              equator.
SC.912.E.7.3  Differentiate and describe the various interactions among Earth systems,           High
              including: atmosphere, hydrosphere, cryosphere, geosphere, and biosphere.
SC.912.E.7.4  Summarize the conditions that contribute to the climate of a geographic area,      Moderate
              including the relationships to lakes and oceans.
SC.912.E.7.5  Predict future weather conditions based on present observations and conceptual     High
              models and recognize limitations and uncertainties of such predictions.
                                                     116


SC.912.E.7.6   Relate the formation of severe weather to the various physical factors.            Moderate
SC.912.E.7.7   Identify, analyze, and relate the internal (Earth system) and external             High
               (astronomical) conditions that contribute to global climate change.
SC.912.E.7.8   Explain how various atmospheric, oceanic, and hydrologic conditions in Florida     High
               have influenced and can influence human behavior, both individually and
               collectively.
SC.912.E.7.9   Cite evidence that the ocean has had a significant influence on climate change by  High
               absorbing, storing, and moving heat, carbon, and water.
SC.912.P.8.1   Differentiate among the four states of matter.                                     Moderate
SC.912.P.8.4   Explore the scientific theory of atoms (also known as atomic theory) by            High
               describing the structure of atoms in terms of protons, neutrons and electrons, and
               differentiate among these particles in terms of their mass, electrical charges and
               locations within
SC.912.P.10.4  Describe heat as the energy transferred by convection, conduction, and             High
               radiation, and explain the connection of heat to change in temperature or states
               of matter.
SC.912.P.10.10 Compare the magnitude and range of the four fundamental forces (gravitational,     Moderate
               electromagnetic, weak nuclear, strong nuclear).
SC.912.P.10.11 Explain and compare nuclear reactions (radioactive decay, fission and fusion),     High
               the energy changes associated with them and their associated safety issues.
SC.912.P.10.16 Explain the relationship between moving charges and magnetic fields, as well as    High
               changing magnetic fields and electric fields, and their application to modern
               technologies.
SC.912.P.10.18 Explore the theory of electromagnetism by comparing and contrasting the            High
               different parts of the electromagnetic spectrum in terms of wavelength,
               frequency, and energy, and relate them to phenomena and applications.
SC.912.P.10.19 Explain that all objects emit and absorb electromagnetic radiation and             High
               distinguish between objects that are blackbody radiators and those that are not.
SC.912.P.10.20 Describe the measurable properties of waves and explain the relationships          High
               among them and how these properties change when the wave moves from one
               medium to another.
SC.912.P.12.2  Analyze the motion of an object in terms of its position, velocity, and            High
               acceleration (with respect to a frame of reference) as functions of time.
SC.912.P.12.4  Describe how the gravitational force between two objects depends on their          Moderate
               masses and the distance between them.
SC.912.P.12.7  Recognize that nothing travels faster than the speed of light in vacuum which is   Low
               the same for all observers no matter how they or the light source are moving.
SC.912.L.15.1  Explain how the scientific theory of evolution is supported by the fossil record,  High
               comparative anatomy, comparative embryology, biogeography, molecular
               biology, and observed evolutionary change.
SC.912.L.15.8  Describe the scientific explanations of the origin of life on Earth.               Moderate
MA.912.S.1.2   Determine appropriate and consistent standards of measurement for the data to      Moderate
               be collected in a survey or experiment.
MA.912.S.3.2   Collect, organize, and analyze data sets, determine the best format for the data   High
               and present visual summaries from the following:
LA.910.4.2.2   The student will record information and ideas from primary and/or secondary
               sources accurately and coherently, noting the validity and reliability of these
               sources and attributing sources of information;
                                                       117


LA.910.2.2.3      The student will organize information to show understanding or relationships
                  among facts, ideas, and events (e.g., representing key points within text through
                  charting, mapping, paraphrasing, summarizing, comparing, contrasting, or
                  outlining);
               Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code    Access Point Descriptor
SC.912.N.1.In.a       Identify a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, including life science, earth
                      and space science, or physical science, and do the following: 1. Identify a scientific
                      question 2. Examine reliable sources of informtion to identify what is already k
SC.912.N.1.Su.b       Identify the basic process used in scientific investigations, including questioning,
                      observing, recording, determining, and sharing results.
SC.912.N.1.Pa.c       Recognize that when a variety of common activities are repeated the same way, the
                      outcomes are the same.
SC.912.N.2.In.a       Identify examples of investigations that involve science.
SC.912.N.2.Su.b       Recognize that what is known about science can change based on new information.
SC.912.N.3.In.a       Recognize that a scientific theory is developed by repeated investigations of many
                      scientists and agreement on the likely explanation.
SC.912.N.3.In.b       Identify examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in the natural world, such
                      as Newton’s laws.
SC.912.N.3.Su.b       Recognize examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in nature, such as
                      Newton’s laws.
SC.912.N.3.Su.c       Recognize ways models are used in the study of science.
SC.912.N.4.In.a       Identify ways scientific knowledge and problem solving benefit people.
SC.912.N.4.Su.b       Recognize that some strategies may cost more to solve a problem.
SC.912.E.5.In.a       Recognize that the Milky Way is part of the expanding universe.
SC.912.E.5.Su.b       Recognize that stars are made of burning gases.
SC.912.E.5.Pa.c       Observe and recognize effects of the Sun on Earth, such as temperature changes.
SC.912.E.6.In.a       Describe the three layers of Earth (core, mantle, and crust).
SC.912.E.6.Su.b       Identify types of surface features, such as hills and valleys.
SC.912.E.7.In.a       Identify cycles that occur on Earth, such as the water and carbon cycles, and the role
                      energy plays in them.
SC.912.E.7.Su.b       Recognize that currents move the ocean water around Earth.
SC.912.E.7.Pa.c       Recognize that humans, plants, and animals live on the Earth (biosphere).
SC.912.P.8.In.a       Classify states of matter as solid, liquid, and gaseous.
SC.912.P.8.Su.b       Identify examples of physical and chemical changes.
SC.912.P.8.Pa.c       Recognize that the parts of an object can be put together to make a whole.
SC.912.P.10.In.a      Identify examples of energy being transformed from one form to another (conserved
                      quantity).
SC.912.P.10.Su.b      Recognize the relationship between work and power, such as power is the amount of
                      work a person or machine does.
SC.912.P.10.Pa.c      Recognize the source and recipient of heat transfer.
SC.912.P.12.In.a      Recognize that scalar quantities describe the magnitude of the measurement, such as
                      size, weight, volume, area, temperature, or speed.
SC.912.P.12.Su.b      Recognize that acceleration generally involves a change in speed.
                                                          118


SC.912.P.12.Pa.c       Identify the source of the force moving an object.
SC.912.L.15.In.a       Identify that prehistoric plants and animals changed over time (evolved) or became
                       extinct.
SC.912.L.15.Su.b       Match organisms to the animal, plant, and fungus kingdoms.
SC.912.L.15.Pa.c       Recognize that animals produce offspring.
                              2001350 Astronomy Solar/Galactic
Section: Basic and Adult Education                          Grade Group: Secondary Grades 9-12
Subject: Science                                            Domain: Earth/Space Sciences
Course Length: Year                                         Level: 3
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                  Benchmarks
                                                                                                        Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                     Knowledge
SC.912.N.1.1       Define a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, for example: biology,        High
                   chemistry, physics, and earth/space science, and do the following:
SC.912.N.1.2       Describe and explain what characterizes science and its methods.                     Moderate
SC.912.N.1.3       Recognize that the strength or usefulness of a scientific claim is evaluated         Low
                   through scientific argumentation, which depends on critical and logical
                   thinking, and the active consideration of alternative scientific explanations to
                   explain the data present
SC.912.N.1.4       Identify sources of information and assess their reliability according to the strict High
                   standards of scientific investigation.
SC.912.N.1.5       Describe and provide examples of how similar investigations conducted in many        Moderate
                   parts of the world result in the same outcome.
SC.912.N.1.6       Describe how scientific inferences are drawn from scientific observations and        Moderate
                   provide examples from the content being studied.
SC.912.N.1.7       Recognize the role of creativity in constructing scientific questions, methods and   Low
                   explanations.
SC.912.N.2.1       Identify what is science, what clearly is not science, and what superficially        High
                   resembles science (but fails to meet the criteria for science).
SC.912.N.2.2       Identify which questions can be answered through science and which questions         High
                   are outside the boundaries of scientific investigation, such as questions
                   addressed by other ways of knowing, such as art, philosophy, and religion.
SC.912.N.2.3       Identify examples of pseudoscience (such as astrology, phrenology) in society.       Low
SC.912.N.2.4       Explain that scientific knowledge is both durable and robust and open to change. High
                   Scientific knowledge can change because it is often examined and re-examined
                   by new investigations and scientific argumentation. Because of these frequent
                   examinations, scien
SC.912.N.2.5       Describe instances in which scientists' varied backgrounds, talents, interests, and High
                   goals influence the inferences and thus the explanations that they make about
                   observations of natural phenomena and describe that competing interpretations
                   (explanations)
SC.912.N.3.1       Explain that a scientific theory is the culmination of many scientific               High
                   investigations drawing together all the current evidence concerning a substantial
                   range of phenomena; thus, a scientific theory represents the most powerful
                   explanation scientists have
                                                           119


SC.912.N.3.2   Describe the role consensus plays in the historical development of a theory in      Moderate
               any one of the disciplines of science.
SC.912.N.3.3   Explain that scientific laws are descriptions of specific relationships under given Moderate
               conditions in nature, but do not offer explanations for those relationships.
SC.912.N.3.4   Recognize that theories do not become laws, nor do laws become theories;            Moderate
               theories are well supported explanations and laws are well supported
               descriptions.
SC.912.N.3.5   Describe the function of models in science, and identify the wide range of          Moderate
               models used in science.
SC.912.N.4.1   Explain how scientific knowledge and reasoning provide an empirically-based         Moderate
               perspective to inform society's decision making.
SC.912.E.5.1   Cite evidence used to develop and verify the scientific theory of the Big Bang      High
               (also known as the Big Bang Theory) of the origin of the universe.
SC.912.E.5.2   Identify patterns in the organization and distribution of matter in the universe    Moderate
               and the forces that determine them.
SC.912.E.5.3   Describe and predict how the initial mass of a star determines its evolution.       Moderate
SC.912.E.5.4   Explain the physical properties of the Sun and its dynamic nature and connect       High
               them to conditions and events on Earth.
SC.912.E.5.5   Explain the formation of planetary systems based on our knowledge of our Solar      High
               System and apply this knowledge to newly discovered planetary systems.
SC.912.E.5.6   Develop logical connections through physical principles, including Kepler's and     High
               Newton's Laws about the relationships and the effects of Earth, Moon, and Sun
               on each other.
SC.912.E.5.7   Relate the history of and explain the justification for future space exploration    High
               and continuing technology development.
SC.912.E.5.8   Connect the concepts of radiation and the electromagnetic spectrum to the use of    High
               historical and newly-developed observational tools.
SC.912.E.5.9   Analyze the broad effects of space exploration on the economy and culture of        High
               Florida.
SC.912.E.5.11  Distinguish the various methods of measuring astronomical distances and apply       High
               each in appropriate situations.
SC.912.E.6.2   Connect surface features to surface processes that are responsible for their        Moderate
               formation.
SC.912.E.7.7   Identify, analyze, and relate the internal (Earth system) and external              High
               (astronomical) conditions that contribute to global climate change.
SC.912.P.8.1   Differentiate among the four states of matter.                                      Moderate
SC.912.P.8.4   Explore the scientific theory of atoms (also known as atomic theory) by             High
               describing the structure of atoms in terms of protons, neutrons and electrons, and
               differentiate among these particles in terms of their mass, electrical charges and
               locations within
SC.912.P.10.4  Describe heat as the energy transferred by convection, conduction, and              High
               radiation, and explain the connection of heat to change in temperature or states
               of matter.
SC.912.P.10.9  Describe the quantization of energy at the atomic level.                            Moderate
SC.912.P.10.11 Explain and compare nuclear reactions (radioactive decay, fission and fusion),      High
               the energy changes associated with them and their associated safety issues.
SC.912.P.10.18 Explore the theory of electromagnetism by comparing and contrasting the             High
               different parts of the electromagnetic spectrum in terms of wavelength,
               frequency, and energy, and relate them to phenomena and applications.
SC.912.P.10.19 Explain that all objects emit and absorb electromagnetic radiation and              High
               distinguish between objects that are blackbody radiators and those that are not.
                                                       120


SC.912.P.10.20    Describe the measurable properties of waves and explain the relationships            High
                  among them and how these properties change when the wave moves from one
                  medium to another.
SC.912.P.10.21    Qualitatively describe the shift in frequency in sound or electromagnetic waves      Moderate
                  due to the relative motion of a source or a receiver.
SC.912.P.10.22    Construct ray diagrams and use thin lens and mirror equations to locate the          High
                  images formed by lenses and mirrors.
SC.912.P.12.2     Analyze the motion of an object in terms of its position, velocity, and              High
                  acceleration (with respect to a frame of reference) as functions of time.
SC.912.P.12.4     Describe how the gravitational force between two objects depends on their            Moderate
                  masses and the distance between them.
SC.912.P.12.6     Qualitatively apply the concept of angular momentum.                                 High
SC.912.P.12.7     Recognize that nothing travels faster than the speed of light in vacuum which is Low
                  the same for all observers no matter how they or the light source are moving.
MA.912.S.1.2      Determine appropriate and consistent standards of measurement for the data to Moderate
                  be collected in a survey or experiment.
MA.912.S.3.2      Collect, organize, and analyze data sets, determine the best format for the data     High
                  and present visual summaries from the following:
LA.910.4.2.2      The student will record information and ideas from primary and/or secondary
                  sources accurately and coherently, noting the validity and reliability of these
                  sources and attributing sources of information;
LA.910.2.2.3      The student will organize information to show understanding or relationships
                  among facts, ideas, and events (e.g., representing key points within text through
                  charting, mapping, paraphrasing, summarizing, comparing, contrasting, or
                  outlining);
               Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code    Access Point Descriptor
SC.912.N.1.In.a       Identify a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, including life science, earth
                      and space science, or physical science, and do the following: 1. Identify a scientific
                      question 2. Examine reliable sources of informtion to identify what is already k
SC.912.N.1.Su.b       Identify the basic process used in scientific investigations, including questioning,
                      observing, recording, determining, and sharing results.
SC.912.N.1.Pa.c       Recognize that when a variety of common activities are repeated the same way, the
                      outcomes are the same.
SC.912.N.2.In.a       Identify examples of investigations that involve science.
SC.912.N.2.Su.b       Recognize that what is known about science can change based on new information.
SC.912.N.3.In.a       Recognize that a scientific theory is developed by repeated investigations of many
                      scientists and agreement on the likely explanation.
SC.912.N.3.In.b       Identify examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in the natural world, such
                      as Newton’s laws.
SC.912.N.3.Su.b       Recognize examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in nature, such as
                      Newton’s laws.
SC.912.N.3.Su.c       Recognize ways models are used in the study of science.
SC.912.N.4.In.a       Identify ways scientific knowledge and problem solving benefit people.
SC.912.N.4.Su.b       Recognize that some strategies may cost more to solve a problem.
SC.912.E.5.In.a       Recognize that the Milky Way is part of the expanding universe.
SC.912.E.5.Su.b       Recognize that stars are made of burning gases.
                                                          121


SC.912.E.5.Pa.c        Observe and recognize effects of the Sun on Earth, such as temperature changes.
SC.912.E.6.In.a        Describe the three layers of Earth (core, mantle, and crust).
SC.912.E.6.Su.b        Identify types of surface features, such as hills and valleys.
SC.912.E.7.In.a        Identify cycles that occur on Earth, such as the water and carbon cycles, and the role
                       energy plays in them.
SC.912.E.7.Su.b        Recognize that currents move the ocean water around Earth.
SC.912.E.7.Pa.c        Recognize that humans, plants, and animals live on the Earth (biosphere).
SC.912.P.8.In.a        Classify states of matter as solid, liquid, and gaseous.
SC.912.P.8.Su.b        Identify examples of physical and chemical changes.
SC.912.P.8.Pa.c        Recognize that the parts of an object can be put together to make a whole.
SC.912.P.10.In.a       Identify examples of energy being transformed from one form to another (conserved
                       quantity).
SC.912.P.10.Su.b       Recognize the relationship between work and power, such as power is the amount of
                       work a person or machine does.
SC.912.P.10.Pa.c       Recognize the source and recipient of heat transfer.
SC.912.P.12.In.a       Recognize that scalar quantities describe the magnitude of the measurement, such as
                       size, weight, volume, area, temperature, or speed.
SC.912.P.12.Su.b       Recognize that acceleration generally involves a change in speed.
SC.912.P.12.Pa.c       Identify the source of the force moving an object.
                        2020910 Astronomy Solar/Galactic Honors
Section: Basic and Adult Education                           Grade Group: Secondary Grades 9-12
Subject: Science                                             Domain: Earth/Space Sciences
Course Length: Year                                          Level: 3
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                  Benchmarks
                                                                                                        Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                     Knowledge
SC.912.N.1.1       Define a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, for example: biology, High
                   chemistry, physics, and earth/space science, and do the following:
SC.912.N.1.2       Describe and explain what characterizes science and its methods.                     Moderate
SC.912.N.1.3       Recognize that the strength or usefulness of a scientific claim is evaluated         Low
                   through scientific argumentation, which depends on critical and logical
                   thinking, and the active consideration of alternative scientific explanations to
                   explain the data present
SC.912.N.1.4       Identify sources of information and assess their reliability according to the strict High
                   standards of scientific investigation.
SC.912.N.1.5       Describe and provide examples of how similar investigations conducted in many        Moderate
                   parts of the world result in the same outcome.
SC.912.N.1.6       Describe how scientific inferences are drawn from scientific observations and        Moderate
                   provide examples from the content being studied.
SC.912.N.1.7       Recognize the role of creativity in constructing scientific questions, methods and   Low
                   explanations.
SC.912.N.2.1       Identify what is science, what clearly is not science, and what superficially        High
                   resembles science (but fails to meet the criteria for science).
                                                           122


SC.912.N.2.2  Identify which questions can be answered through science and which questions        High
              are outside the boundaries of scientific investigation, such as questions
              addressed by other ways of knowing, such as art, philosophy, and religion.
SC.912.N.2.3  Identify examples of pseudoscience (such as astrology, phrenology) in society.      Low
SC.912.N.2.4  Explain that scientific knowledge is both durable and robust and open to change.    High
              Scientific knowledge can change because it is often examined and re-examined
              by new investigations and scientific argumentation. Because of these frequent
              examinations, scien
SC.912.N.2.5  Describe instances in which scientists' varied backgrounds, talents, interests, and High
              goals influence the inferences and thus the explanations that they make about
              observations of natural phenomena and describe that competing interpretations
              (explanations)
SC.912.N.3.1  Explain that a scientific theory is the culmination of many scientific              High
              investigations drawing together all the current evidence concerning a substantial
              range of phenomena; thus, a scientific theory represents the most powerful
              explanation scientists have
SC.912.N.3.2  Describe the role consensus plays in the historical development of a theory in      Moderate
              any one of the disciplines of science.
SC.912.N.3.3  Explain that scientific laws are descriptions of specific relationships under given Moderate
              conditions in nature, but do not offer explanations for those relationships.
SC.912.N.3.4  Recognize that theories do not become laws, nor do laws become theories;            Moderate
              theories are well supported explanations and laws are well supported
              descriptions.
SC.912.N.3.5  Describe the function of models in science, and identify the wide range of          Moderate
              models used in science.
SC.912.N.4.1  Explain how scientific knowledge and reasoning provide an empirically-based         Moderate
              perspective to inform society's decision making.
SC.912.N.4.2  Weigh the merits of alternative strategies for solving a specific societal problem  High
              by comparing a number of different costs and benefits, such as human,
              economic, and environmental.
SC.912.E.5.1  Cite evidence used to develop and verify the scientific theory of the Big Bang      High
              (also known as the Big Bang Theory) of the origin of the universe.
SC.912.E.5.2  Identify patterns in the organization and distribution of matter in the universe    Moderate
              and the forces that determine them.
SC.912.E.5.3  Describe and predict how the initial mass of a star determines its evolution.       Moderate
SC.912.E.5.4  Explain the physical properties of the Sun and its dynamic nature and connect       High
              them to conditions and events on Earth.
SC.912.E.5.5  Explain the formation of planetary systems based on our knowledge of our Solar      High
              System and apply this knowledge to newly discovered planetary systems.
SC.912.E.5.6  Develop logical connections through physical principles, including Kepler's and     High
              Newton's Laws about the relationships and the effects of Earth, Moon, and Sun
              on each other.
SC.912.E.5.7  Relate the history of and explain the justification for future space exploration    High
              and continuing technology development.
SC.912.E.5.8  Connect the concepts of radiation and the electromagnetic spectrum to the use of    High
              historical and newly-developed observational tools.
SC.912.E.5.9  Analyze the broad effects of space exploration on the economy and culture of        High
              Florida.
SC.912.E.5.10 Describe and apply the coordinate system used to locate objects in the sky.         Moderate
SC.912.E.5.11 Distinguish the various methods of measuring astronomical distances and apply High
              each in appropriate situations.
                                                      123


SC.912.E.6.2   Connect surface features to surface processes that are responsible for their       Moderate
               formation.
SC.912.E.7.7   Identify, analyze, and relate the internal (Earth system) and external             High
               (astronomical) conditions that contribute to global climate change.
SC.912.P.8.1   Differentiate among the four states of matter.                                     Moderate
SC.912.P.8.4   Explore the scientific theory of atoms (also known as atomic theory) by            High
               describing the structure of atoms in terms of protons, neutrons and electrons, and
               differentiate among these particles in terms of their mass, electrical charges and
               locations within
SC.912.P.10.4  Describe heat as the energy transferred by convection, conduction, and             High
               radiation, and explain the connection of heat to change in temperature or states
               of matter.
SC.912.P.10.9  Describe the quantization of energy at the atomic level.                           Moderate
SC.912.P.10.10 Compare the magnitude and range of the four fundamental forces (gravitational,     Moderate
               electromagnetic, weak nuclear, strong nuclear).
SC.912.P.10.11 Explain and compare nuclear reactions (radioactive decay, fission and fusion),     High
               the energy changes associated with them and their associated safety issues.
SC.912.P.10.18 Explore the theory of electromagnetism by comparing and contrasting the            High
               different parts of the electromagnetic spectrum in terms of wavelength,
               frequency, and energy, and relate them to phenomena and applications.
SC.912.P.10.19 Explain that all objects emit and absorb electromagnetic radiation and             High
               distinguish between objects that are blackbody radiators and those that are not.
SC.912.P.10.20 Describe the measurable properties of waves and explain the relationships          High
               among them and how these properties change when the wave moves from one
               medium to another.
SC.912.P.10.21 Qualitatively describe the shift in frequency in sound or electromagnetic waves    Moderate
               due to the relative motion of a source or a receiver.
SC.912.P.10.22 Construct ray diagrams and use thin lens and mirror equations to locate the        High
               images formed by lenses and mirrors.
SC.912.P.12.2  Analyze the motion of an object in terms of its position, velocity, and            High
               acceleration (with respect to a frame of reference) as functions of time.
SC.912.P.12.3  Interpret and apply Newton's three laws of motion.                                 High
SC.912.P.12.4  Describe how the gravitational force between two objects depends on their          Moderate
               masses and the distance between them.
SC.912.P.12.6  Qualitatively apply the concept of angular momentum.                               High
SC.912.P.12.7  Recognize that nothing travels faster than the speed of light in vacuum which is   Low
               the same for all observers no matter how they or the light source are moving.
SC.912.P.12.8  Recognize that Newton's Laws are a limiting case of Einstein's Special Theory      Low
               of Relativity at speeds that are much smaller than the speed of light.
SC.912.P.12.9  Recognize that time, length, and energy depend on the frame of reference.          Low
MA.912.S.1.2   Determine appropriate and consistent standards of measurement for the data to      Moderate
               be collected in a survey or experiment.
MA.912.S.3.2   Collect, organize, and analyze data sets, determine the best format for the data   High
               and present visual summaries from the following:
LA.910.4.2.2   The student will record information and ideas from primary and/or secondary
               sources accurately and coherently, noting the validity and reliability of these
               sources and attributing sources of information;
                                                       124


LA.910.2.2.3      The student will organize information to show understanding or relationships
                  among facts, ideas, and events (e.g., representing key points within text through
                  charting, mapping, paraphrasing, summarizing, comparing, contrasting, or
                  outlining);
               Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code    Access Point Descriptor
SC.912.N.1.In.a       Identify a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, including life science, earth
                      and space science, or physical science, and do the following: 1. Identify a scientific
                      question 2. Examine reliable sources of informtion to identify what is already k
SC.912.N.1.Su.b       Identify the basic process used in scientific investigations, including questioning,
                      observing, recording, determining, and sharing results.
SC.912.N.1.Pa.c       Recognize that when a variety of common activities are repeated the same way, the
                      outcomes are the same.
SC.912.N.2.In.a       Identify examples of investigations that involve science.
SC.912.N.2.Su.b       Recognize that what is known about science can change based on new information.
SC.912.N.3.In.a       Recognize that a scientific theory is developed by repeated investigations of many
                      scientists and agreement on the likely explanation.
SC.912.N.3.In.b       Identify examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in the natural world, such
                      as Newton’s laws.
SC.912.N.3.Su.b       Recognize examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in nature, such as
                      Newton’s laws.
SC.912.N.3.Su.c       Recognize ways models are used in the study of science.
SC.912.N.4.In.a       Identify ways scientific knowledge and problem solving benefit people.
SC.912.N.4.Su.b       Recognize that some strategies may cost more to solve a problem.
SC.912.E.5.In.a       Recognize that the Milky Way is part of the expanding universe.
SC.912.E.5.Su.b       Recognize that stars are made of burning gases.
SC.912.E.5.Pa.c       Observe and recognize effects of the Sun on Earth, such as temperature changes.
SC.912.E.6.In.a       Describe the three layers of Earth (core, mantle, and crust).
SC.912.E.6.Su.b       Identify types of surface features, such as hills and valleys.
SC.912.E.7.In.a       Identify cycles that occur on Earth, such as the water and carbon cycles, and the role
                      energy plays in them.
SC.912.E.7.Su.b       Recognize that currents move the ocean water around Earth.
SC.912.E.7.Pa.c       Recognize that humans, plants, and animals live on the Earth (biosphere).
SC.912.P.8.In.a       Classify states of matter as solid, liquid, and gaseous.
SC.912.P.8.Su.b       Identify examples of physical and chemical changes.
SC.912.P.8.Pa.c       Recognize that the parts of an object can be put together to make a whole.
SC.912.P.10.In.a      Identify examples of energy being transformed from one form to another (conserved
                      quantity).
SC.912.P.10.Su.b      Recognize the relationship between work and power, such as power is the amount of
                      work a person or machine does.
SC.912.P.10.Pa.c      Recognize the source and recipient of heat transfer.
SC.912.P.12.In.a      Recognize that scalar quantities describe the magnitude of the measurement, such as
                      size, weight, volume, area, temperature, or speed.
SC.912.P.12.Su.b      Recognize that acceleration generally involves a change in speed.
                                                          125


SC.912.P.12.Pa.c       Identify the source of the force moving an object.
                       2002330 Space Technology and Engineering
Section: Basic and Adult Education                          Grade Group: Secondary Grades 9-12
Subject: Science                                            Domain: General Sciences
Course Length: Year                                         Level: 2
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                  Benchmarks
                                                                                                        Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                     Knowledge
SC.912.N.1.1       Define a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, for example: biology, High
                   chemistry, physics, and earth/space science, and do the following:
SC.912.N.1.2       Describe and explain what characterizes science and its methods.                     Moderate
SC.912.N.1.3       Recognize that the strength or usefulness of a scientific claim is evaluated         Low
                   through scientific argumentation, which depends on critical and logical
                   thinking, and the active consideration of alternative scientific explanations to
                   explain the data present
SC.912.N.1.4       Identify sources of information and assess their reliability according to the strict High
                   standards of scientific investigation.
SC.912.N.1.5       Describe and provide examples of how similar investigations conducted in many        Moderate
                   parts of the world result in the same outcome.
SC.912.N.1.6       Describe how scientific inferences are drawn from scientific observations and        Moderate
                   provide examples from the content being studied.
SC.912.N.1.7       Recognize the role of creativity in constructing scientific questions, methods and   Low
                   explanations.
SC.912.N.2.1       Identify what is science, what clearly is not science, and what superficially        High
                   resembles science (but fails to meet the criteria for science).
SC.912.N.2.2       Identify which questions can be answered through science and which questions         High
                   are outside the boundaries of scientific investigation, such as questions
                   addressed by other ways of knowing, such as art, philosophy, and religion.
SC.912.N.2.3       Identify examples of pseudoscience (such as astrology, phrenology) in society.       Low
SC.912.N.2.4       Explain that scientific knowledge is both durable and robust and open to change.     High
                   Scientific knowledge can change because it is often examined and re-examined
                   by new investigations and scientific argumentation. Because of these frequent
                   examinations, scien
SC.912.N.2.5       Describe instances in which scientists' varied backgrounds, talents, interests, and  High
                   goals influence the inferences and thus the explanations that they make about
                   observations of natural phenomena and describe that competing interpretations
                   (explanations)
SC.912.N.3.1       Explain that a scientific theory is the culmination of many scientific               High
                   investigations drawing together all the current evidence concerning a substantial
                   range of phenomena; thus, a scientific theory represents the most powerful
                   explanation scientists have
SC.912.N.3.2       Describe the role consensus plays in the historical development of a theory in       Moderate
                   any one of the disciplines of science.
SC.912.N.3.3       Explain that scientific laws are descriptions of specific relationships under given  Moderate
                   conditions in nature, but do not offer explanations for those relationships.
                                                           126


SC.912.N.3.4   Recognize that theories do not become laws, nor do laws become theories;           Moderate
               theories are well supported explanations and laws are well supported
               descriptions.
SC.912.N.3.5   Describe the function of models in science, and identify the wide range of         Moderate
               models used in science.
SC.912.N.4.1   Explain how scientific knowledge and reasoning provide an empirically-based        Moderate
               perspective to inform society's decision making.
SC.912.N.4.2   Weigh the merits of alternative strategies for solving a specific societal problem High
               by comparing a number of different costs and benefits, such as human,
               economic, and environmental.
SC.912.E.5.6   Develop logical connections through physical principles, including Kepler's and    High
               Newton's Laws about the relationships and the effects of Earth, Moon, and Sun
               on each other.
SC.912.E.5.7   Relate the history of and explain the justification for future space exploration   High
               and continuing technology development.
SC.912.E.5.8   Connect the concepts of radiation and the electromagnetic spectrum to the use of   High
               historical and newly-developed observational tools.
SC.912.E.5.9   Analyze the broad effects of space exploration on the economy and culture of       High
               Florida.
SC.912.E.5.10  Describe and apply the coordinate system used to locate objects in the sky.        Moderate
SC.912.E.5.11  Distinguish the various methods of measuring astronomical distances and apply      High
               each in appropriate situations.
SC.912.E.7.6   Relate the formation of severe weather to the various physical factors.            Moderate
SC.912.P.10.1  Differentiate among the various forms of energy and recognize that they can be     Moderate
               transformed from one form to others.
SC.912.P.10.2  Explore the Law of Conservation of Energy by differentiating among open,           High
               closed, and isolated systems and explain that the total energy in an isolated
               system is a conserved quantity.
SC.912.P.10.4  Describe heat as the energy transferred by convection, conduction, and             High
               radiation, and explain the connection of heat to change in temperature or states
               of matter.
SC.912.P.10.11 Explain and compare nuclear reactions (radioactive decay, fission and fusion),     High
               the energy changes associated with them and their associated safety issues.
SC.912.P.10.14 Differentiate among conductors, semiconductors, and insulators.                    Moderate
SC.912.P.10.15 Investigate and explain the relationships among current, voltage, resistance, and  High
               power.
SC.912.P.10.16 Explain the relationship between moving charges and magnetic fields, as well as    High
               changing magnetic fields and electric fields, and their application to modern
               technologies.
SC.912.P.10.19 Explain that all objects emit and absorb electromagnetic radiation and             High
               distinguish between objects that are blackbody radiators and those that are not.
SC.912.P.12.3  Interpret and apply Newton's three laws of motion.                                 High
SC.912.P.12.4  Describe how the gravitational force between two objects depends on their          Moderate
               masses and the distance between them.
SC.912.P.12.7  Recognize that nothing travels faster than the speed of light in vacuum which is   Low
               the same for all observers no matter how they or the light source are moving.
SC.912.P.12.8  Recognize that Newton's Laws are a limiting case of Einstein's Special Theory      Low
               of Relativity at speeds that are much smaller than the speed of light.
MA.912.S.1.2   Determine appropriate and consistent standards of measurement for the data to      Moderate
               be collected in a survey or experiment.
                                                      127


MA.912.S.3.2      Collect, organize, and analyze data sets, determine the best format for the data     High
                  and present visual summaries from the following:
LA.910.4.2.2      The student will record information and ideas from primary and/or secondary
                  sources accurately and coherently, noting the validity and reliability of these
                  sources and attributing sources of information;
LA.910.2.2.3      The student will organize information to show understanding or relationships
                  among facts, ideas, and events (e.g., representing key points within text through
                  charting, mapping, paraphrasing, summarizing, comparing, contrasting, or
                  outlining);
               Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code    Access Point Descriptor
SC.912.N.1.In.a       Identify a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, including life science, earth
                      and space science, or physical science, and do the following: 1. Identify a scientific
                      question 2. Examine reliable sources of informtion to identify what is already k
SC.912.N.1.Su.b       Identify the basic process used in scientific investigations, including questioning,
                      observing, recording, determining, and sharing results.
SC.912.N.1.Pa.c       Recognize that when a variety of common activities are repeated the same way, the
                      outcomes are the same.
SC.912.N.2.In.a       Identify examples of investigations that involve science.
SC.912.N.2.Su.b       Recognize that what is known about science can change based on new information.
SC.912.N.3.In.a       Recognize that a scientific theory is developed by repeated investigations of many
                      scientists and agreement on the likely explanation.
SC.912.N.3.In.b       Identify examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in the natural world, such
                      as Newton’s laws.
SC.912.N.3.Su.b       Recognize examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in nature, such as
                      Newton’s laws.
SC.912.N.3.Su.c       Recognize ways models are used in the study of science.
SC.912.N.4.In.a       Identify ways scientific knowledge and problem solving benefit people.
SC.912.N.4.Su.b       Recognize that some strategies may cost more to solve a problem.
SC.912.E.5.In.a       Recognize that the Milky Way is part of the expanding universe.
SC.912.E.5.Su.b       Recognize that stars are made of burning gases.
SC.912.E.5.Pa.c       Observe and recognize effects of the Sun on Earth, such as temperature changes.
SC.912.E.7.In.a       Identify cycles that occur on Earth, such as the water and carbon cycles, and the role
                      energy plays in them.
SC.912.E.7.Su.b       Recognize that currents move the ocean water around Earth.
SC.912.E.7.Pa.c       Recognize that humans, plants, and animals live on the Earth (biosphere).
SC.912.P.10.In.a      Identify examples of energy being transformed from one form to another (conserved
                      quantity).
SC.912.P.10.Su.b      Recognize the relationship between work and power, such as power is the amount of
                      work a person or machine does.
SC.912.P.10.Pa.c      Recognize the source and recipient of heat transfer.
SC.912.P.12.In.a      Recognize that scalar quantities describe the magnitude of the measurement, such as
                      size, weight, volume, area, temperature, or speed.
SC.912.P.12.Su.b      Recognize that acceleration generally involves a change in speed.
SC.912.P.12.Pa.c      Identify the source of the force moving an object.
                                                         128


                                         2003340 Chemistry I
Section: Basic and Adult Education                          Grade Group: Secondary Grades 9-12
Subject: Science                                            Domain: Physical Sciences
Course Length: Year                                         Level: 2
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                  Benchmarks
                                                                                                        Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                     Knowledge
SC.912.N.1.1       Define a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, for example: biology, High
                   chemistry, physics, and earth/space science, and do the following:
SC.912.N.1.2       Describe and explain what characterizes science and its methods.                     Moderate
SC.912.N.1.3       Recognize that the strength or usefulness of a scientific claim is evaluated         Low
                   through scientific argumentation, which depends on critical and logical
                   thinking, and the active consideration of alternative scientific explanations to
                   explain the data present
SC.912.N.1.4       Identify sources of information and assess their reliability according to the strict High
                   standards of scientific investigation.
SC.912.N.1.5       Describe and provide examples of how similar investigations conducted in many        Moderate
                   parts of the world result in the same outcome.
SC.912.N.1.6       Describe how scientific inferences are drawn from scientific observations and        Moderate
                   provide examples from the content being studied.
SC.912.N.1.7       Recognize the role of creativity in constructing scientific questions, methods and   Low
                   explanations.
SC.912.N.2.1       Identify what is science, what clearly is not science, and what superficially        High
                   resembles science (but fails to meet the criteria for science).
SC.912.N.2.2       Identify which questions can be answered through science and which questions         High
                   are outside the boundaries of scientific investigation, such as questions
                   addressed by other ways of knowing, such as art, philosophy, and religion.
SC.912.N.2.3       Identify examples of pseudoscience (such as astrology, phrenology) in society.       Low
SC.912.N.2.4       Explain that scientific knowledge is both durable and robust and open to change.     High
                   Scientific knowledge can change because it is often examined and re-examined
                   by new investigations and scientific argumentation. Because of these frequent
                   examinations, scien
SC.912.N.2.5       Describe instances in which scientists' varied backgrounds, talents, interests, and  High
                   goals influence the inferences and thus the explanations that they make about
                   observations of natural phenomena and describe that competing interpretations
                   (explanations)
SC.912.N.3.1       Explain that a scientific theory is the culmination of many scientific               High
                   investigations drawing together all the current evidence concerning a substantial
                   range of phenomena; thus, a scientific theory represents the most powerful
                   explanation scientists have
SC.912.N.3.2       Describe the role consensus plays in the historical development of a theory in       Moderate
                   any one of the disciplines of science.
SC.912.N.3.3       Explain that scientific laws are descriptions of specific relationships under given  Moderate
                   conditions in nature, but do not offer explanations for those relationships.
SC.912.N.3.4       Recognize that theories do not become laws, nor do laws become theories;             Moderate
                   theories are well supported explanations and laws are well supported
                   descriptions.
                                                           129


SC.912.N.3.5   Describe the function of models in science, and identify the wide range of         Moderate
               models used in science.
SC.912.N.4.1   Explain how scientific knowledge and reasoning provide an empirically-based        Moderate
               perspective to inform society's decision making.
SC.912.N.4.2   Weigh the merits of alternative strategies for solving a specific societal problem High
               by comparing a number of different costs and benefits, such as human,
               economic, and environmental.
SC.912.E.5.1   Cite evidence used to develop and verify the scientific theory of the Big Bang     High
               (also known as the Big Bang Theory) of the origin of the universe.
SC.912.P.8.1   Differentiate among the four states of matter.                                     Moderate
SC.912.P.8.2   Differentiate between physical and chemical properties and physical and            Moderate
               chemical changes of matter.
SC.912.P.8.3   Explore the scientific theory of atoms (also known as atomic theory) by            High
               describing changes in the atomic model over time and why those changes were
               necessitated by experimental evidence.
SC.912.P.8.4   Explore the scientific theory of atoms (also known as atomic theory) by            High
               describing the structure of atoms in terms of protons, neutrons and electrons, and
               differentiate among these particles in terms of their mass, electrical charges and
               locations within
SC.912.P.8.5   Relate properties of atoms and their position in the periodic table to the         Moderate
               arrangement of their electrons.
SC.912.P.8.6   Distinguish between bonding forces holding compounds together and other            Moderate
               attractive forces, including hydrogen bonding and van der Waals forces.
SC.912.P.8.7   Interpret formula representations of molecules and compounds in terms of           Moderate
               composition and structure.
SC.912.P.8.8   Characterize types of chemical reactions, for example: redox, acid-base,           Moderate
               synthesis, and single and double replacement reactions.
SC.912.P.8.9   Apply the mole concept and the law of conservation of mass to calculate            High
               quantities of chemicals participating in reactions.
SC.912.P.8.11  Relate acidity and basicity to hydronium and hydroxyl ion concentration and pH.    Moderate
SC.912.P.8.12  Describe the properties of the carbon atom that make the diversity of carbon       Moderate
               compounds possible.
SC.912.P.10.1  Differentiate among the various forms of energy and recognize that they can be     Moderate
               transformed from one form to others.
SC.912.P.10.2  Explore the Law of Conservation of Energy by differentiating among open,           High
               closed, and isolated systems and explain that the total energy in an isolated
               system is a conserved quantity.
SC.912.P.10.5  Relate temperature to the average molecular kinetic energy.                        Moderate
SC.912.P.10.6  Create and interpret potential energy diagrams, for example: chemical reactions, High
               orbits around a central body, motion of a pendulum.
SC.912.P.10.7  Distinguish between endothermic and exothermic chemical processes.                 Moderate
SC.912.P.10.9  Describe the quantization of energy at the atomic level.                           Moderate
SC.912.P.10.10 Compare the magnitude and range of the four fundamental forces (gravitational, Moderate
               electromagnetic, weak nuclear, strong nuclear).
SC.912.P.10.11 Explain and compare nuclear reactions (radioactive decay, fission and fusion), High
               the energy changes associated with them and their associated safety issues.
SC.912.P.10.12 Differentiate between chemical and nuclear reactions.                              Moderate
SC.912.P.10.18 Explore the theory of electromagnetism by comparing and contrasting the            High
               different parts of the electromagnetic spectrum in terms of wavelength,
               frequency, and energy, and relate them to phenomena and applications.
                                                      130


SC.912.P.12.10    Interpret the behavior of ideal gases in terms of kinetic molecular theory.          High
SC.912.P.12.11    Describe phase transitions in terms of kinetic molecular theory.                     Moderate
SC.912.P.12.12    Explain how various factors, such as concentration, temperature, and presence of     High
                  a catalyst affect the rate of a chemical reaction.
SC.912.P.12.13    Explain the concept of dynamic equilibrium in terms of reversible processes          High
                  occurring at the same rates.
SC.912.L.15.2     Discuss the use of molecular clocks to estimate how long ago various groups of       Moderate
                  organisms diverged evolutionarily from one another.
SC.912.L.16.10    Evaluate the impact of biotechnology on the individual, society and the              High
                  environment, including medical and ethical issues.
SC.912.L.17.11    Evaluate the costs and benefits of renewable and nonrenewable resources, such        High
                  as water, energy, fossil fuels, wildlife, and forests.
SC.912.L.17.15    Discuss the effects of technology on environmental quality.                          Moderate
SC.912.L.17.16    Discuss the large-scale environmental impacts resulting from human activity,         High
                  including waste spills, oil spills, runoff, greenhouse gases, ozone depletion, and
                  surface and groundwater pollution.
SC.912.L.17.19    Describe how different natural resources are produced and how their rates of use     Moderate
                  and renewal limit availability.
SC.912.L.17.20    Predict the impact of individuals on environmental systems and examine how           High
                  human lifestyles affect sustainability.
SC.912.L.18.12    Discuss the special properties of water that contribute to Earth's suitability as an Moderate
                  environment for life: cohesive behavior, ability to moderate temperature,
                  expansion upon freezing, and versatility as a solvent.
MA.912.S.1.2      Determine appropriate and consistent standards of measurement for the data to        Moderate
                  be collected in a survey or experiment.
MA.912.S.3.2      Collect, organize, and analyze data sets, determine the best format for the data     High
                  and present visual summaries from the following:
LA.910.4.2.2      The student will record information and ideas from primary and/or secondary
                  sources accurately and coherently, noting the validity and reliability of these
                  sources and attributing sources of information;
LA.910.2.2.3      The student will organize information to show understanding or relationships
                  among facts, ideas, and events (e.g., representing key points within text through
                  charting, mapping, paraphrasing, summarizing, comparing, contrasting, or
                  outlining);
               Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code    Access Point Descriptor
SC.912.N.1.In.a       Identify a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, including life science, earth
                      and space science, or physical science, and do the following: 1. Identify a scientific
                      question 2. Examine reliable sources of informtion to identify what is already k
SC.912.N.1.Su.b       Identify the basic process used in scientific investigations, including questioning,
                      observing, recording, determining, and sharing results.
SC.912.N.1.Pa.c       Recognize that when a variety of common activities are repeated the same way, the
                      outcomes are the same.
SC.912.N.2.In.a       Identify examples of investigations that involve science.
SC.912.N.2.Su.b       Recognize that what is known about science can change based on new information.
SC.912.N.3.In.a       Recognize that a scientific theory is developed by repeated investigations of many
                      scientists and agreement on the likely explanation.
                                                          131


SC.912.N.3.In.b  Identify examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in the natural world, such
                 as Newton’s laws.
SC.912.N.3.Su.b  Recognize examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in nature, such as
                 Newton’s laws.
SC.912.N.3.Su.c  Recognize ways models are used in the study of science.
SC.912.N.4.In.a  Identify ways scientific knowledge and problem solving benefit people.
SC.912.N.4.Su.b  Recognize that some strategies may cost more to solve a problem.
SC.912.E.5.In.a  Recognize that the Milky Way is part of the expanding universe.
SC.912.E.5.Su.b  Recognize that stars are made of burning gases.
SC.912.E.5.Pa.c  Observe and recognize effects of the Sun on Earth, such as temperature changes.
SC.912.P.8.In.a  Classify states of matter as solid, liquid, and gaseous.
SC.912.P.8.Su.b  Identify examples of physical and chemical changes.
SC.912.P.8.Pa.c  Recognize that the parts of an object can be put together to make a whole.
SC.912.P.10.In.a Identify examples of energy being transformed from one form to another (conserved
                 quantity).
SC.912.P.10.Su.b Recognize the relationship between work and power, such as power is the amount of
                 work a person or machine does.
SC.912.P.10.Pa.c Recognize the source and recipient of heat transfer.
SC.912.P.12.In.a Recognize that scalar quantities describe the magnitude of the measurement, such as
                 size, weight, volume, area, temperature, or speed.
SC.912.P.12.Su.b Recognize that acceleration generally involves a change in speed.
SC.912.P.12.Pa.c Identify the source of the force moving an object.
SC.912.L.16.In.a Identify that genes are sets of instructions that determine which characteristics are passed
                 from parent to offspring.
SC.912.L.16.Su.b Recognize that all organisms have a substance called DNA with unique information.
SC.912.L.16.Pa.c Recognize that illness can result when parts of our bodies are not working properly.
SC.912.L.17.In.a Recognize that living things in oceans and fresh water are affected by the location,
                 availability of light, depth of the water, and temperature.
SC.912.L.17.Su.b Recognize how animals and plants in an ecosystem may be affected by changes to the
                 food supply or climate.
SC.912.L.17.Pa.c Recognize examples of mutual relationships between people and other living things.
SC.912.L.18.In.a Identify that carbohydrates, fats, proteins, and nucleic acids (macromolecules) are
                 important for human organisms.
SC.912.L.18.Su.b Recognize that the function of photosynthesis is to produce food for plants.
SC.912.L.18.Pa.c Identify that food is a source of energy.
                                                     132


                                   2003350 Chemistry I Honors
Section: Basic and Adult Education                          Grade Group: Secondary Grades 9-12
Subject: Science                                            Domain: Physical Sciences
Course Length: Year                                         Level: 3
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                  Benchmarks
                                                                                                        Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                     Knowledge
SC.912.N.1.1       Define a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, for example: biology, High
                   chemistry, physics, and earth/space science, and do the following:
SC.912.N.1.2       Describe and explain what characterizes science and its methods.                     Moderate
SC.912.N.1.3       Recognize that the strength or usefulness of a scientific claim is evaluated         Low
                   through scientific argumentation, which depends on critical and logical
                   thinking, and the active consideration of alternative scientific explanations to
                   explain the data present
SC.912.N.1.4       Identify sources of information and assess their reliability according to the strict High
                   standards of scientific investigation.
SC.912.N.1.5       Describe and provide examples of how similar investigations conducted in many        Moderate
                   parts of the world result in the same outcome.
SC.912.N.1.6       Describe how scientific inferences are drawn from scientific observations and        Moderate
                   provide examples from the content being studied.
SC.912.N.1.7       Recognize the role of creativity in constructing scientific questions, methods and   Low
                   explanations.
SC.912.N.2.1       Identify what is science, what clearly is not science, and what superficially        High
                   resembles science (but fails to meet the criteria for science).
SC.912.N.2.2       Identify which questions can be answered through science and which questions         High
                   are outside the boundaries of scientific investigation, such as questions
                   addressed by other ways of knowing, such as art, philosophy, and religion.
SC.912.N.2.3       Identify examples of pseudoscience (such as astrology, phrenology) in society.       Low
SC.912.N.2.4       Explain that scientific knowledge is both durable and robust and open to change.     High
                   Scientific knowledge can change because it is often examined and re-examined
                   by new investigations and scientific argumentation. Because of these frequent
                   examinations, scien
SC.912.N.2.5       Describe instances in which scientists' varied backgrounds, talents, interests, and  High
                   goals influence the inferences and thus the explanations that they make about
                   observations of natural phenomena and describe that competing interpretations
                   (explanations)
SC.912.N.3.1       Explain that a scientific theory is the culmination of many scientific               High
                   investigations drawing together all the current evidence concerning a substantial
                   range of phenomena; thus, a scientific theory represents the most powerful
                   explanation scientists have
SC.912.N.3.2       Describe the role consensus plays in the historical development of a theory in       Moderate
                   any one of the disciplines of science.
SC.912.N.3.3       Explain that scientific laws are descriptions of specific relationships under given  Moderate
                   conditions in nature, but do not offer explanations for those relationships.
SC.912.N.3.4       Recognize that theories do not become laws, nor do laws become theories;             Moderate
                   theories are well supported explanations and laws are well supported
                   descriptions.
                                                           133


SC.912.N.3.5   Describe the function of models in science, and identify the wide range of         Moderate
               models used in science.
SC.912.N.4.1   Explain how scientific knowledge and reasoning provide an empirically-based        Moderate
               perspective to inform society's decision making.
SC.912.N.4.2   Weigh the merits of alternative strategies for solving a specific societal problem High
               by comparing a number of different costs and benefits, such as human,
               economic, and environmental.
SC.912.E.5.1   Cite evidence used to develop and verify the scientific theory of the Big Bang     High
               (also known as the Big Bang Theory) of the origin of the universe.
SC.912.P.8.1   Differentiate among the four states of matter.                                     Moderate
SC.912.P.8.2   Differentiate between physical and chemical properties and physical and            Moderate
               chemical changes of matter.
SC.912.P.8.3   Explore the scientific theory of atoms (also known as atomic theory) by            High
               describing changes in the atomic model over time and why those changes were
               necessitated by experimental evidence.
SC.912.P.8.4   Explore the scientific theory of atoms (also known as atomic theory) by            High
               describing the structure of atoms in terms of protons, neutrons and electrons, and
               differentiate among these particles in terms of their mass, electrical charges and
               locations within
SC.912.P.8.5   Relate properties of atoms and their position in the periodic table to the         Moderate
               arrangement of their electrons.
SC.912.P.8.6   Distinguish between bonding forces holding compounds together and other            Moderate
               attractive forces, including hydrogen bonding and van der Waals forces.
SC.912.P.8.7   Interpret formula representations of molecules and compounds in terms of           Moderate
               composition and structure.
SC.912.P.8.8   Characterize types of chemical reactions, for example: redox, acid-base,           Moderate
               synthesis, and single and double replacement reactions.
SC.912.P.8.9   Apply the mole concept and the law of conservation of mass to calculate            High
               quantities of chemicals participating in reactions.
SC.912.P.8.10  Describe oxidation-reduction reactions in living and non-living systems.           Moderate
SC.912.P.8.11  Relate acidity and basicity to hydronium and hydroxyl ion concentration and pH. Moderate
SC.912.P.8.12  Describe the properties of the carbon atom that make the diversity of carbon       Moderate
               compounds possible.
SC.912.P.10.1  Differentiate among the various forms of energy and recognize that they can be     Moderate
               transformed from one form to others.
SC.912.P.10.2  Explore the Law of Conservation of Energy by differentiating among open,           High
               closed, and isolated systems and explain that the total energy in an isolated
               system is a conserved quantity.
SC.912.P.10.5  Relate temperature to the average molecular kinetic energy.                        Moderate
SC.912.P.10.6  Create and interpret potential energy diagrams, for example: chemical reactions,   High
               orbits around a central body, motion of a pendulum.
SC.912.P.10.7  Distinguish between endothermic and exothermic chemical processes.                 Moderate
SC.912.P.10.9  Describe the quantization of energy at the atomic level.                           Moderate
SC.912.P.10.10 Compare the magnitude and range of the four fundamental forces (gravitational, Moderate
               electromagnetic, weak nuclear, strong nuclear).
SC.912.P.10.11 Explain and compare nuclear reactions (radioactive decay, fission and fusion), High
               the energy changes associated with them and their associated safety issues.
SC.912.P.10.12 Differentiate between chemical and nuclear reactions.                              Moderate
                                                      134


SC.912.P.10.18    Explore the theory of electromagnetism by comparing and contrasting the              High
                  different parts of the electromagnetic spectrum in terms of wavelength,
                  frequency, and energy, and relate them to phenomena and applications.
SC.912.P.12.10    Interpret the behavior of ideal gases in terms of kinetic molecular theory.          High
SC.912.P.12.11    Describe phase transitions in terms of kinetic molecular theory.                     Moderate
SC.912.P.12.12    Explain how various factors, such as concentration, temperature, and presence of     High
                  a catalyst affect the rate of a chemical reaction.
SC.912.P.12.13    Explain the concept of dynamic equilibrium in terms of reversible processes          High
                  occurring at the same rates.
SC.912.L.15.2     Discuss the use of molecular clocks to estimate how long ago various groups of       Moderate
                  organisms diverged evolutionarily from one another.
SC.912.L.16.10    Evaluate the impact of biotechnology on the individual, society and the              High
                  environment, including medical and ethical issues.
SC.912.L.17.11    Evaluate the costs and benefits of renewable and nonrenewable resources, such        High
                  as water, energy, fossil fuels, wildlife, and forests.
SC.912.L.17.15    Discuss the effects of technology on environmental quality.                          Moderate
SC.912.L.17.16    Discuss the large-scale environmental impacts resulting from human activity,         High
                  including waste spills, oil spills, runoff, greenhouse gases, ozone depletion, and
                  surface and groundwater pollution.
SC.912.L.17.19    Describe how different natural resources are produced and how their rates of use     Moderate
                  and renewal limit availability.
SC.912.L.17.20    Predict the impact of individuals on environmental systems and examine how           High
                  human lifestyles affect sustainability.
SC.912.L.18.12    Discuss the special properties of water that contribute to Earth's suitability as an Moderate
                  environment for life: cohesive behavior, ability to moderate temperature,
                  expansion upon freezing, and versatility as a solvent.
MA.912.S.1.2      Determine appropriate and consistent standards of measurement for the data to        Moderate
                  be collected in a survey or experiment.
MA.912.S.3.2      Collect, organize, and analyze data sets, determine the best format for the data     High
                  and present visual summaries from the following:
LA.910.4.2.2      The student will record information and ideas from primary and/or secondary
                  sources accurately and coherently, noting the validity and reliability of these
                  sources and attributing sources of information;
LA.910.2.2.3      The student will organize information to show understanding or relationships
                  among facts, ideas, and events (e.g., representing key points within text through
                  charting, mapping, paraphrasing, summarizing, comparing, contrasting, or
                  outlining);
               Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code    Access Point Descriptor
SC.912.N.1.In.a       Identify a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, including life science, earth
                      and space science, or physical science, and do the following: 1. Identify a scientific
                      question 2. Examine reliable sources of informtion to identify what is already k
SC.912.N.1.Su.b       Identify the basic process used in scientific investigations, including questioning,
                      observing, recording, determining, and sharing results.
SC.912.N.1.Pa.c       Recognize that when a variety of common activities are repeated the same way, the
                      outcomes are the same.
SC.912.N.2.In.a       Identify examples of investigations that involve science.
SC.912.N.2.Su.b       Recognize that what is known about science can change based on new information.
                                                          135


SC.912.N.3.In.a  Recognize that a scientific theory is developed by repeated investigations of many
                 scientists and agreement on the likely explanation.
SC.912.N.3.In.b  Identify examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in the natural world, such
                 as Newton’s laws.
SC.912.N.3.Su.b  Recognize examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in nature, such as
                 Newton’s laws.
SC.912.N.3.Su.c  Recognize ways models are used in the study of science.
SC.912.N.4.In.a  Identify ways scientific knowledge and problem solving benefit people.
SC.912.N.4.Su.b  Recognize that some strategies may cost more to solve a problem.
SC.912.E.5.In.a  Recognize that the Milky Way is part of the expanding universe.
SC.912.E.5.Su.b  Recognize that stars are made of burning gases.
SC.912.E.5.Pa.c  Observe and recognize effects of the Sun on Earth, such as temperature changes.
SC.912.P.8.In.a  Classify states of matter as solid, liquid, and gaseous.
SC.912.P.8.Su.b  Identify examples of physical and chemical changes.
SC.912.P.8.Pa.c  Recognize that the parts of an object can be put together to make a whole.
SC.912.P.10.In.a Identify examples of energy being transformed from one form to another (conserved
                 quantity).
SC.912.P.10.Su.b Recognize the relationship between work and power, such as power is the amount of
                 work a person or machine does.
SC.912.P.10.Pa.c Recognize the source and recipient of heat transfer.
SC.912.P.12.In.a Recognize that scalar quantities describe the magnitude of the measurement, such as
                 size, weight, volume, area, temperature, or speed.
SC.912.P.12.Su.b Recognize that acceleration generally involves a change in speed.
SC.912.P.12.Pa.c Identify the source of the force moving an object.
SC.912.L.16.In.a Identify that genes are sets of instructions that determine which characteristics are passed
                 from parent to offspring.
SC.912.L.16.Su.b Recognize that all organisms have a substance called DNA with unique information.
SC.912.L.16.Pa.c Recognize that illness can result when parts of our bodies are not working properly.
SC.912.L.17.In.a Recognize that living things in oceans and fresh water are affected by the location,
                 availability of light, depth of the water, and temperature.
SC.912.L.17.Su.b Recognize how animals and plants in an ecosystem may be affected by changes to the
                 food supply or climate.
SC.912.L.17.Pa.c Recognize examples of mutual relationships between people and other living things.
SC.912.L.18.In.a Identify that carbohydrates, fats, proteins, and nucleic acids (macromolecules) are
                 important for human organisms.
SC.912.L.18.Su.b Recognize that the function of photosynthesis is to produce food for plants.
SC.912.L.18.Pa.c Identify that food is a source of energy.
                                                     136


                                         2003360 Chemistry II
Section: Basic and Adult Education                          Grade Group: Secondary Grades 9-12
Subject: Science                                            Domain: Physical Sciences
Course Length: Year                                         Level: 3
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                  Benchmarks
                                                                                                        Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                     Knowledge
SC.912.N.1.1       Define a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, for example: biology, High
                   chemistry, physics, and earth/space science, and do the following:
SC.912.N.1.2       Describe and explain what characterizes science and its methods.                     Moderate
SC.912.N.1.3       Recognize that the strength or usefulness of a scientific claim is evaluated         Low
                   through scientific argumentation, which depends on critical and logical
                   thinking, and the active consideration of alternative scientific explanations to
                   explain the data present
SC.912.N.1.4       Identify sources of information and assess their reliability according to the strict High
                   standards of scientific investigation.
SC.912.N.1.5       Describe and provide examples of how similar investigations conducted in many        Moderate
                   parts of the world result in the same outcome.
SC.912.N.1.6       Describe how scientific inferences are drawn from scientific observations and        Moderate
                   provide examples from the content being studied.
SC.912.N.1.7       Recognize the role of creativity in constructing scientific questions, methods and   Low
                   explanations.
SC.912.N.2.1       Identify what is science, what clearly is not science, and what superficially        High
                   resembles science (but fails to meet the criteria for science).
SC.912.N.2.2       Identify which questions can be answered through science and which questions         High
                   are outside the boundaries of scientific investigation, such as questions
                   addressed by other ways of knowing, such as art, philosophy, and religion.
SC.912.N.2.3       Identify examples of pseudoscience (such as astrology, phrenology) in society.       Low
SC.912.N.2.4       Explain that scientific knowledge is both durable and robust and open to change.     High
                   Scientific knowledge can change because it is often examined and re-examined
                   by new investigations and scientific argumentation. Because of these frequent
                   examinations, scien
SC.912.N.2.5       Describe instances in which scientists' varied backgrounds, talents, interests, and  High
                   goals influence the inferences and thus the explanations that they make about
                   observations of natural phenomena and describe that competing interpretations
                   (explanations)
SC.912.N.3.1       Explain that a scientific theory is the culmination of many scientific               High
                   investigations drawing together all the current evidence concerning a substantial
                   range of phenomena; thus, a scientific theory represents the most powerful
                   explanation scientists have
SC.912.N.3.2       Describe the role consensus plays in the historical development of a theory in       Moderate
                   any one of the disciplines of science.
SC.912.N.3.3       Explain that scientific laws are descriptions of specific relationships under given  Moderate
                   conditions in nature, but do not offer explanations for those relationships.
SC.912.N.3.4       Recognize that theories do not become laws, nor do laws become theories;             Moderate
                   theories are well supported explanations and laws are well supported
                   descriptions.
                                                           137


SC.912.N.3.5   Describe the function of models in science, and identify the wide range of           Moderate
               models used in science.
SC.912.N.4.1   Explain how scientific knowledge and reasoning provide an empirically-based          Moderate
               perspective to inform society's decision making.
SC.912.N.4.2   Weigh the merits of alternative strategies for solving a specific societal problem   High
               by comparing a number of different costs and benefits, such as human,
               economic, and environmental.
SC.912.P.8.10  Describe oxidation-reduction reactions in living and non-living systems.             Moderate
SC.912.P.8.12  Describe the properties of the carbon atom that make the diversity of carbon         Moderate
               compounds possible.
SC.912.P.8.13  Identify selected functional groups and relate how they contribute to properties     High
               of carbon compounds.
SC.912.P.10.6  Create and interpret potential energy diagrams, for example: chemical reactions,     High
               orbits around a central body, motion of a pendulum.
SC.912.P.10.8  Explain entropy's role in determining the efficiency of processes that convert       High
               energy to work.
SC.912.L.16.10 Evaluate the impact of biotechnology on the individual, society and the              High
               environment, including medical and ethical issues.
SC.912.L.17.10 Diagram and explain the biogeochemical cycles of an ecosystem, including             Moderate
               water, carbon, and nitrogen cycle.
SC.912.L.17.11 Evaluate the costs and benefits of renewable and nonrenewable resources, such        High
               as water, energy, fossil fuels, wildlife, and forests.
SC.912.L.17.13 Discuss the need for adequate monitoring of environmental parameters when            High
               making policy decisions.
SC.912.L.17.15 Discuss the effects of technology on environmental quality.                          Moderate
SC.912.L.17.16 Discuss the large-scale environmental impacts resulting from human activity,         High
               including waste spills, oil spills, runoff, greenhouse gases, ozone depletion, and
               surface and groundwater pollution.
SC.912.L.17.17 Assess the effectiveness of innovative methods of protecting the environment.        High
SC.912.L.17.19 Describe how different natural resources are produced and how their rates of use     Moderate
               and renewal limit availability.
SC.912.L.17.20 Predict the impact of individuals on environmental systems and examine how           High
               human lifestyles affect sustainability.
SC.912.L.18.1  Describe the basic molecular structures and primary functions of the four major      Moderate
               categories of biological macromolecules.
SC.912.L.18.2  Describe the important structural characteristics of monosaccharides,                Moderate
               disaccharides, and polysaccharides and explain the functions of carbohydrates in
               living things.
SC.912.L.18.3  Describe the structures of fatty acids, triglycerides, phospholipids, and steroids.  Moderate
               Explain the functions of lipids in living organisms. Identify some reactions that
               fatty acids undergo. Relate the structure and function of cell membranes.
SC.912.L.18.4  Describe the structures of proteins and amino acids. Explain the functions of        Moderate
               proteins in living organisms. Identify some reactions that amino acids undergo.
               Relate the structure and function of enzymes.
SC.912.L.18.11 Explain the role of enzymes as catalysts that lower the activation energy of         Moderate
               biochemical reactions. Identify factors, such as pH and temperature, and their
               effect on enzyme activity.
SC.912.L.18.12 Discuss the special properties of water that contribute to Earth's suitability as an Moderate
               environment for life: cohesive behavior, ability to moderate temperature,
               expansion upon freezing, and versatility as a solvent.
                                                       138


MA.912.S.1.2      Determine appropriate and consistent standards of measurement for the data to Moderate
                  be collected in a survey or experiment.
MA.912.S.3.2      Collect, organize, and analyze data sets, determine the best format for the data     High
                  and present visual summaries from the following:
LA.910.4.2.2      The student will record information and ideas from primary and/or secondary
                  sources accurately and coherently, noting the validity and reliability of these
                  sources and attributing sources of information;
LA.910.2.2.3      The student will organize information to show understanding or relationships
                  among facts, ideas, and events (e.g., representing key points within text through
                  charting, mapping, paraphrasing, summarizing, comparing, contrasting, or
                  outlining);
               Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code    Access Point Descriptor
SC.912.N.1.In.a       Identify a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, including life science, earth
                      and space science, or physical science, and do the following: 1. Identify a scientific
                      question 2. Examine reliable sources of informtion to identify what is already k
SC.912.N.1.Su.b       Identify the basic process used in scientific investigations, including questioning,
                      observing, recording, determining, and sharing results.
SC.912.N.1.Pa.c       Recognize that when a variety of common activities are repeated the same way, the
                      outcomes are the same.
SC.912.N.2.In.a       Identify examples of investigations that involve science.
SC.912.N.2.Su.b       Recognize that what is known about science can change based on new information.
SC.912.N.3.In.a       Recognize that a scientific theory is developed by repeated investigations of many
                      scientists and agreement on the likely explanation.
SC.912.N.3.In.b       Identify examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in the natural world, such
                      as Newton’s laws.
SC.912.N.3.Su.b       Recognize examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in nature, such as
                      Newton’s laws.
SC.912.N.3.Su.c       Recognize ways models are used in the study of science.
SC.912.N.4.In.a       Identify ways scientific knowledge and problem solving benefit people.
SC.912.N.4.Su.b       Recognize that some strategies may cost more to solve a problem.
SC.912.P.8.In.a       Classify states of matter as solid, liquid, and gaseous.
SC.912.P.8.Su.b       Identify examples of physical and chemical changes.
SC.912.P.8.Pa.c       Recognize that the parts of an object can be put together to make a whole.
SC.912.P.10.In.a      Identify examples of energy being transformed from one form to another (conserved
                      quantity).
SC.912.P.10.Su.b      Recognize the relationship between work and power, such as power is the amount of
                      work a person or machine does.
SC.912.P.10.Pa.c      Recognize the source and recipient of heat transfer.
SC.912.L.16.In.a      Identify that genes are sets of instructions that determine which characteristics are passed
                      from parent to offspring.
SC.912.L.16.Su.b      Recognize that all organisms have a substance called DNA with unique information.
SC.912.L.16.Pa.c      Recognize that illness can result when parts of our bodies are not working properly.
SC.912.L.17.In.a      Recognize that living things in oceans and fresh water are affected by the location,
                      availability of light, depth of the water, and temperature.
                                                          139


SC.912.L.17.Su.b       Recognize how animals and plants in an ecosystem may be affected by changes to the
                       food supply or climate.
SC.912.L.17.Pa.c       Recognize examples of mutual relationships between people and other living things.
SC.912.L.18.In.a       Identify that carbohydrates, fats, proteins, and nucleic acids (macromolecules) are
                       important for human organisms.
SC.912.L.18.Su.b       Recognize that the function of photosynthesis is to produce food for plants.
SC.912.L.18.Pa.c       Identify that food is a source of energy.
                                     2003400 Nuclear Radiation
Section: Basic and Adult Education                          Grade Group: Secondary Grades 9-12
Subject: Science                                            Domain: Physical Sciences
Course Length: Year                                         Level: 2
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                  Benchmarks
                                                                                                        Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                     Knowledge
SC.912.N.1.1       Define a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, for example: biology, High
                   chemistry, physics, and earth/space science, and do the following:
SC.912.N.1.2       Describe and explain what characterizes science and its methods.                     Moderate
SC.912.N.1.3       Recognize that the strength or usefulness of a scientific claim is evaluated         Low
                   through scientific argumentation, which depends on critical and logical
                   thinking, and the active consideration of alternative scientific explanations to
                   explain the data present
SC.912.N.1.4       Identify sources of information and assess their reliability according to the strict High
                   standards of scientific investigation.
SC.912.N.1.5       Describe and provide examples of how similar investigations conducted in many        Moderate
                   parts of the world result in the same outcome.
SC.912.N.1.6       Describe how scientific inferences are drawn from scientific observations and        Moderate
                   provide examples from the content being studied.
SC.912.N.1.7       Recognize the role of creativity in constructing scientific questions, methods and   Low
                   explanations.
SC.912.N.2.1       Identify what is science, what clearly is not science, and what superficially        High
                   resembles science (but fails to meet the criteria for science).
SC.912.N.2.2       Identify which questions can be answered through science and which questions         High
                   are outside the boundaries of scientific investigation, such as questions
                   addressed by other ways of knowing, such as art, philosophy, and religion.
SC.912.N.2.3       Identify examples of pseudoscience (such as astrology, phrenology) in society.       Low
SC.912.N.2.4       Explain that scientific knowledge is both durable and robust and open to change.     High
                   Scientific knowledge can change because it is often examined and re-examined
                   by new investigations and scientific argumentation. Because of these frequent
                   examinations, scien
SC.912.N.2.5       Describe instances in which scientists' varied backgrounds, talents, interests, and  High
                   goals influence the inferences and thus the explanations that they make about
                   observations of natural phenomena and describe that competing interpretations
                   (explanations)
                                                           140


SC.912.N.3.1   Explain that a scientific theory is the culmination of many scientific              High
               investigations drawing together all the current evidence concerning a substantial
               range of phenomena; thus, a scientific theory represents the most powerful
               explanation scientists have
SC.912.N.3.2   Describe the role consensus plays in the historical development of a theory in      Moderate
               any one of the disciplines of science.
SC.912.N.3.3   Explain that scientific laws are descriptions of specific relationships under given Moderate
               conditions in nature, but do not offer explanations for those relationships.
SC.912.N.3.4   Recognize that theories do not become laws, nor do laws become theories;            Moderate
               theories are well supported explanations and laws are well supported
               descriptions.
SC.912.N.3.5   Describe the function of models in science, and identify the wide range of          Moderate
               models used in science.
SC.912.N.4.1   Explain how scientific knowledge and reasoning provide an empirically-based         Moderate
               perspective to inform society's decision making.
SC.912.N.4.2   Weigh the merits of alternative strategies for solving a specific societal problem  High
               by comparing a number of different costs and benefits, such as human,
               economic, and environmental.
SC.912.E.5.1   Cite evidence used to develop and verify the scientific theory of the Big Bang      High
               (also known as the Big Bang Theory) of the origin of the universe.
SC.912.E.5.2   Identify patterns in the organization and distribution of matter in the universe    Moderate
               and the forces that determine them.
SC.912.E.5.3   Describe and predict how the initial mass of a star determines its evolution.       Moderate
SC.912.E.5.4   Explain the physical properties of the Sun and its dynamic nature and connect       High
               them to conditions and events on Earth.
SC.912.E.5.7   Relate the history of and explain the justification for future space exploration    High
               and continuing technology development.
SC.912.E.5.8   Connect the concepts of radiation and the electromagnetic spectrum to the use of    High
               historical and newly-developed observational tools.
SC.912.E.6.6   Analyze past, present, and potential future consequences to the environment         High
               resulting from various energy production technologies.
SC.912.E.7.1   Analyze the movement of matter and energy through the different                     High
               biogeochemical cycles, including water and carbon.
SC.912.P.8.3   Explore the scientific theory of atoms (also known as atomic theory) by             High
               describing changes in the atomic model over time and why those changes were
               necessitated by experimental evidence.
SC.912.P.8.4   Explore the scientific theory of atoms (also known as atomic theory) by             High
               describing the structure of atoms in terms of protons, neutrons and electrons, and
               differentiate among these particles in terms of their mass, electrical charges and
               locations within
SC.912.P.8.5   Relate properties of atoms and their position in the periodic table to the          Moderate
               arrangement of their electrons.
SC.912.P.10.2  Explore the Law of Conservation of Energy by differentiating among open,            High
               closed, and isolated systems and explain that the total energy in an isolated
               system is a conserved quantity.
SC.912.P.10.9  Describe the quantization of energy at the atomic level.                            Moderate
SC.912.P.10.10 Compare the magnitude and range of the four fundamental forces (gravitational, Moderate
               electromagnetic, weak nuclear, strong nuclear).
SC.912.P.10.11 Explain and compare nuclear reactions (radioactive decay, fission and fusion), High
               the energy changes associated with them and their associated safety issues.
SC.912.P.10.12 Differentiate between chemical and nuclear reactions.                               Moderate
                                                       141


SC.912.P.10.16    Explain the relationship between moving charges and magnetic fields, as well as      High
                  changing magnetic fields and electric fields, and their application to modern
                  technologies.
SC.912.P.10.18    Explore the theory of electromagnetism by comparing and contrasting the              High
                  different parts of the electromagnetic spectrum in terms of wavelength,
                  frequency, and energy, and relate them to phenomena and applications.
SC.912.P.12.5     Apply the law of conservation of linear momentum to interactions, such as            High
                  collisions between objects.
SC.912.L.14.6     Explain the significance of genetic factors, environmental factors, and              High
                  pathogenic agents to health from the perspectives of both individual and public
                  health.
SC.912.L.15.2     Discuss the use of molecular clocks to estimate how long ago various groups of       Moderate
                  organisms diverged evolutionarily from one another.
SC.912.L.16.10    Evaluate the impact of biotechnology on the individual, society and the              High
                  environment, including medical and ethical issues.
SC.912.L.17.13    Discuss the need for adequate monitoring of environmental parameters when            High
                  making policy decisions.
SC.912.L.17.14    Assess the need for adequate waste management strategies.                            High
SC.912.L.17.15    Discuss the effects of technology on environmental quality.                          Moderate
SC.912.L.17.16    Discuss the large-scale environmental impacts resulting from human activity,         High
                  including waste spills, oil spills, runoff, greenhouse gases, ozone depletion, and
                  surface and groundwater pollution.
SC.912.L.17.17    Assess the effectiveness of innovative methods of protecting the environment.        High
MA.912.S.1.2      Determine appropriate and consistent standards of measurement for the data to Moderate
                  be collected in a survey or experiment.
MA.912.S.3.2      Collect, organize, and analyze data sets, determine the best format for the data     High
                  and present visual summaries from the following:
LA.910.4.2.2      The student will record information and ideas from primary and/or secondary
                  sources accurately and coherently, noting the validity and reliability of these
                  sources and attributing sources of information;
LA.910.2.2.3      The student will organize information to show understanding or relationships
                  among facts, ideas, and events (e.g., representing key points within text through
                  charting, mapping, paraphrasing, summarizing, comparing, contrasting, or
                  outlining);
               Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code    Access Point Descriptor
SC.912.N.1.In.a       Identify a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, including life science, earth
                      and space science, or physical science, and do the following: 1. Identify a scientific
                      question 2. Examine reliable sources of informtion to identify what is already k
SC.912.N.1.Su.b       Identify the basic process used in scientific investigations, including questioning,
                      observing, recording, determining, and sharing results.
SC.912.N.1.Pa.c       Recognize that when a variety of common activities are repeated the same way, the
                      outcomes are the same.
SC.912.N.2.In.a       Identify examples of investigations that involve science.
SC.912.N.2.Su.b       Recognize that what is known about science can change based on new information.
SC.912.N.3.In.a       Recognize that a scientific theory is developed by repeated investigations of many
                      scientists and agreement on the likely explanation.
                                                          142


SC.912.N.3.In.b  Identify examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in the natural world, such
                 as Newton’s laws.
SC.912.N.3.Su.b  Recognize examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in nature, such as
                 Newton’s laws.
SC.912.N.3.Su.c  Recognize ways models are used in the study of science.
SC.912.N.4.In.a  Identify ways scientific knowledge and problem solving benefit people.
SC.912.N.4.Su.b  Recognize that some strategies may cost more to solve a problem.
SC.912.E.5.In.a  Recognize that the Milky Way is part of the expanding universe.
SC.912.E.5.Su.b  Recognize that stars are made of burning gases.
SC.912.E.5.Pa.c  Observe and recognize effects of the Sun on Earth, such as temperature changes.
SC.912.E.7.In.a  Identify cycles that occur on Earth, such as the water and carbon cycles, and the role
                 energy plays in them.
SC.912.E.7.Su.b  Recognize that currents move the ocean water around Earth.
SC.912.E.7.Pa.c  Recognize that humans, plants, and animals live on the Earth (biosphere).
SC.912.P.8.In.a  Classify states of matter as solid, liquid, and gaseous.
SC.912.P.8.Su.b  Identify examples of physical and chemical changes.
SC.912.P.8.Pa.c  Recognize that the parts of an object can be put together to make a whole.
SC.912.P.10.In.a Identify examples of energy being transformed from one form to another (conserved
                 quantity).
SC.912.P.10.Su.b Recognize the relationship between work and power, such as power is the amount of
                 work a person or machine does.
SC.912.P.10.Pa.c Recognize the source and recipient of heat transfer.
SC.912.P.12.In.a Recognize that scalar quantities describe the magnitude of the measurement, such as
                 size, weight, volume, area, temperature, or speed.
SC.912.P.12.Su.b Recognize that acceleration generally involves a change in speed.
SC.912.P.12.Pa.c Identify the source of the force moving an object.
SC.912.L.14.In.a Identify that all living things are made of cells and cells function in similar ways (cell
                 theory).
SC.912.L.14.Su.b Recognize that cells have different parts and each has a function.
SC.912.L.14.Pa.c Identify ways to prevent infection from bacteria and viruses, such as hand washing and
                 first aid.
SC.912.L.16.In.a Identify that genes are sets of instructions that determine which characteristics are passed
                 from parent to offspring.
SC.912.L.16.Su.b Recognize that all organisms have a substance called DNA with unique information.
SC.912.L.16.Pa.c Recognize that illness can result when parts of our bodies are not working properly.
                                                     143


               2020710 Nuclear Radiation Honors (formerly 202071A)
Section: Basic and Adult Education                          Grade Group: Secondary Grades 9-12
Subject: Science                                            Domain: Physical Sciences
Course Length: Year                                         Level: 3
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                  Benchmarks
                                                                                                        Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                     Knowledge
SC.912.N.1.1       Define a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, for example: biology, High
                   chemistry, physics, and earth/space science, and do the following:
SC.912.N.1.2       Describe and explain what characterizes science and its methods.                     Moderate
SC.912.N.1.3       Recognize that the strength or usefulness of a scientific claim is evaluated         Low
                   through scientific argumentation, which depends on critical and logical
                   thinking, and the active consideration of alternative scientific explanations to
                   explain the data present
SC.912.N.1.4       Identify sources of information and assess their reliability according to the strict High
                   standards of scientific investigation.
SC.912.N.1.5       Describe and provide examples of how similar investigations conducted in many        Moderate
                   parts of the world result in the same outcome.
SC.912.N.1.6       Describe how scientific inferences are drawn from scientific observations and        Moderate
                   provide examples from the content being studied.
SC.912.N.1.7       Recognize the role of creativity in constructing scientific questions, methods and   Low
                   explanations.
SC.912.N.2.1       Identify what is science, what clearly is not science, and what superficially        High
                   resembles science (but fails to meet the criteria for science).
SC.912.N.2.2       Identify which questions can be answered through science and which questions         High
                   are outside the boundaries of scientific investigation, such as questions
                   addressed by other ways of knowing, such as art, philosophy, and religion.
SC.912.N.2.3       Identify examples of pseudoscience (such as astrology, phrenology) in society.       Low
SC.912.N.2.4       Explain that scientific knowledge is both durable and robust and open to change.     High
                   Scientific knowledge can change because it is often examined and re-examined
                   by new investigations and scientific argumentation. Because of these frequent
                   examinations, scien
SC.912.N.2.5       Describe instances in which scientists' varied backgrounds, talents, interests, and  High
                   goals influence the inferences and thus the explanations that they make about
                   observations of natural phenomena and describe that competing interpretations
                   (explanations)
SC.912.N.3.1       Explain that a scientific theory is the culmination of many scientific               High
                   investigations drawing together all the current evidence concerning a substantial
                   range of phenomena; thus, a scientific theory represents the most powerful
                   explanation scientists have
SC.912.N.3.2       Describe the role consensus plays in the historical development of a theory in       Moderate
                   any one of the disciplines of science.
SC.912.N.3.3       Explain that scientific laws are descriptions of specific relationships under given  Moderate
                   conditions in nature, but do not offer explanations for those relationships.
SC.912.N.3.4       Recognize that theories do not become laws, nor do laws become theories;             Moderate
                   theories are well supported explanations and laws are well supported
                   descriptions.
                                                           144


SC.912.N.3.5   Describe the function of models in science, and identify the wide range of         Moderate
               models used in science.
SC.912.N.4.1   Explain how scientific knowledge and reasoning provide an empirically-based        Moderate
               perspective to inform society's decision making.
SC.912.N.4.2   Weigh the merits of alternative strategies for solving a specific societal problem High
               by comparing a number of different costs and benefits, such as human,
               economic, and environmental.
SC.912.E.5.1   Cite evidence used to develop and verify the scientific theory of the Big Bang     High
               (also known as the Big Bang Theory) of the origin of the universe.
SC.912.E.5.2   Identify patterns in the organization and distribution of matter in the universe   Moderate
               and the forces that determine them.
SC.912.E.5.3   Describe and predict how the initial mass of a star determines its evolution.      Moderate
SC.912.E.5.4   Explain the physical properties of the Sun and its dynamic nature and connect      High
               them to conditions and events on Earth.
SC.912.E.5.7   Relate the history of and explain the justification for future space exploration   High
               and continuing technology development.
SC.912.E.5.8   Connect the concepts of radiation and the electromagnetic spectrum to the use of   High
               historical and newly-developed observational tools.
SC.912.E.6.6   Analyze past, present, and potential future consequences to the environment        High
               resulting from various energy production technologies.
SC.912.E.7.1   Analyze the movement of matter and energy through the different                    High
               biogeochemical cycles, including water and carbon.
SC.912.P.8.3   Explore the scientific theory of atoms (also known as atomic theory) by            High
               describing changes in the atomic model over time and why those changes were
               necessitated by experimental evidence.
SC.912.P.8.4   Explore the scientific theory of atoms (also known as atomic theory) by            High
               describing the structure of atoms in terms of protons, neutrons and electrons, and
               differentiate among these particles in terms of their mass, electrical charges and
               locations within
SC.912.P.8.5   Relate properties of atoms and their position in the periodic table to the         Moderate
               arrangement of their electrons.
SC.912.P.10.2  Explore the Law of Conservation of Energy by differentiating among open,           High
               closed, and isolated systems and explain that the total energy in an isolated
               system is a conserved quantity.
SC.912.P.10.8  Explain entropy's role in determining the efficiency of processes that convert     High
               energy to work.
SC.912.P.10.9  Describe the quantization of energy at the atomic level.                           Moderate
SC.912.P.10.10 Compare the magnitude and range of the four fundamental forces (gravitational, Moderate
               electromagnetic, weak nuclear, strong nuclear).
SC.912.P.10.11 Explain and compare nuclear reactions (radioactive decay, fission and fusion), High
               the energy changes associated with them and their associated safety issues.
SC.912.P.10.12 Differentiate between chemical and nuclear reactions.                              Moderate
SC.912.P.10.16 Explain the relationship between moving charges and magnetic fields, as well as High
               changing magnetic fields and electric fields, and their application to modern
               technologies.
SC.912.P.10.18 Explore the theory of electromagnetism by comparing and contrasting the            High
               different parts of the electromagnetic spectrum in terms of wavelength,
               frequency, and energy, and relate them to phenomena and applications.
SC.912.P.12.5  Apply the law of conservation of linear momentum to interactions, such as          High
               collisions between objects.
                                                      145


SC.912.P.12.7     Recognize that nothing travels faster than the speed of light in vacuum which is     Low
                  the same for all observers no matter how they or the light source are moving.
SC.912.P.12.9     Recognize that time, length, and energy depend on the frame of reference.            Low
SC.912.L.14.6     Explain the significance of genetic factors, environmental factors, and              High
                  pathogenic agents to health from the perspectives of both individual and public
                  health.
SC.912.L.15.2     Discuss the use of molecular clocks to estimate how long ago various groups of       Moderate
                  organisms diverged evolutionarily from one another.
SC.912.L.16.10    Evaluate the impact of biotechnology on the individual, society and the              High
                  environment, including medical and ethical issues.
SC.912.L.17.13    Discuss the need for adequate monitoring of environmental parameters when            High
                  making policy decisions.
SC.912.L.17.14    Assess the need for adequate waste management strategies.                            High
SC.912.L.17.15    Discuss the effects of technology on environmental quality.                          Moderate
SC.912.L.17.16    Discuss the large-scale environmental impacts resulting from human activity,         High
                  including waste spills, oil spills, runoff, greenhouse gases, ozone depletion, and
                  surface and groundwater pollution.
SC.912.L.17.17    Assess the effectiveness of innovative methods of protecting the environment.        High
MA.912.S.1.2      Determine appropriate and consistent standards of measurement for the data to Moderate
                  be collected in a survey or experiment.
MA.912.S.3.2      Collect, organize, and analyze data sets, determine the best format for the data     High
                  and present visual summaries from the following:
LA.910.4.2.2      The student will record information and ideas from primary and/or secondary
                  sources accurately and coherently, noting the validity and reliability of these
                  sources and attributing sources of information;
LA.910.2.2.3      The student will organize information to show understanding or relationships
                  among facts, ideas, and events (e.g., representing key points within text through
                  charting, mapping, paraphrasing, summarizing, comparing, contrasting, or
                  outlining);
               Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code    Access Point Descriptor
SC.912.N.1.In.a       Identify a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, including life science, earth
                      and space science, or physical science, and do the following: 1. Identify a scientific
                      question 2. Examine reliable sources of informtion to identify what is already k
SC.912.N.1.Su.b       Identify the basic process used in scientific investigations, including questioning,
                      observing, recording, determining, and sharing results.
SC.912.N.1.Pa.c       Recognize that when a variety of common activities are repeated the same way, the
                      outcomes are the same.
SC.912.N.2.In.a       Identify examples of investigations that involve science.
SC.912.N.2.Su.b       Recognize that what is known about science can change based on new information.
SC.912.N.3.In.a       Recognize that a scientific theory is developed by repeated investigations of many
                      scientists and agreement on the likely explanation.
SC.912.N.3.In.b       Identify examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in the natural world, such
                      as Newton’s laws.
SC.912.N.3.Su.b       Recognize examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in nature, such as
                      Newton’s laws.
SC.912.N.3.Su.c       Recognize ways models are used in the study of science.
                                                          146


SC.912.N.4.In.a        Identify ways scientific knowledge and problem solving benefit people.
SC.912.N.4.Su.b        Recognize that some strategies may cost more to solve a problem.
SC.912.E.5.In.a        Recognize that the Milky Way is part of the expanding universe.
SC.912.E.5.Su.b        Recognize that stars are made of burning gases.
SC.912.E.5.Pa.c        Observe and recognize effects of the Sun on Earth, such as temperature changes.
SC.912.E.7.In.a        Identify cycles that occur on Earth, such as the water and carbon cycles, and the role
                       energy plays in them.
SC.912.E.7.Su.b        Recognize that currents move the ocean water around Earth.
SC.912.E.7.Pa.c        Recognize that humans, plants, and animals live on the Earth (biosphere).
SC.912.P.8.In.a        Classify states of matter as solid, liquid, and gaseous.
SC.912.P.8.Su.b        Identify examples of physical and chemical changes.
SC.912.P.8.Pa.c        Recognize that the parts of an object can be put together to make a whole.
SC.912.P.10.In.a       Identify examples of energy being transformed from one form to another (conserved
                       quantity).
SC.912.P.10.Su.b       Recognize the relationship between work and power, such as power is the amount of
                       work a person or machine does.
SC.912.P.10.Pa.c       Recognize the source and recipient of heat transfer.
SC.912.P.12.In.a       Recognize that scalar quantities describe the magnitude of the measurement, such as
                       size, weight, volume, area, temperature, or speed.
SC.912.P.12.Su.b       Recognize that acceleration generally involves a change in speed.
SC.912.P.12.Pa.c       Identify the source of the force moving an object.
SC.912.L.14.In.a       Identify that all living things are made of cells and cells function in similar ways (cell
                       theory).
SC.912.L.14.Su.b       Recognize that cells have different parts and each has a function.
SC.912.L.14.Pa.c       Identify ways to prevent infection from bacteria and viruses, such as hand washing and
                       first aid.
SC.912.L.16.In.a       Identify that genes are sets of instructions that determine which characteristics are passed
                       from parent to offspring.
SC.912.L.16.Su.b       Recognize that all organisms have a substance called DNA with unique information.
SC.912.L.16.Pa.c       Recognize that illness can result when parts of our bodies are not working properly.
                                      2003310 Physical Science
Section: Basic and Adult Education                           Grade Group: Secondary Grades 9-12
Subject: Science                                             Domain: Physical Sciences
Course Length: Year                                          Level: 2
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                   Benchmarks
                                                                                                         Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                      Knowledge
SC.912.N.1.1       Define a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, for example: biology, High
                   chemistry, physics, and earth/space science, and do the following:
SC.912.N.1.2       Describe and explain what characterizes science and its methods.                      Moderate
                                                           147


SC.912.N.1.3 Recognize that the strength or usefulness of a scientific claim is evaluated         Low
             through scientific argumentation, which depends on critical and logical
             thinking, and the active consideration of alternative scientific explanations to
             explain the data present
SC.912.N.1.4 Identify sources of information and assess their reliability according to the strict High
             standards of scientific investigation.
SC.912.N.1.5 Describe and provide examples of how similar investigations conducted in many        Moderate
             parts of the world result in the same outcome.
SC.912.N.1.6 Describe how scientific inferences are drawn from scientific observations and        Moderate
             provide examples from the content being studied.
SC.912.N.1.7 Recognize the role of creativity in constructing scientific questions, methods and   Low
             explanations.
SC.912.N.2.1 Identify what is science, what clearly is not science, and what superficially        High
             resembles science (but fails to meet the criteria for science).
SC.912.N.2.2 Identify which questions can be answered through science and which questions         High
             are outside the boundaries of scientific investigation, such as questions
             addressed by other ways of knowing, such as art, philosophy, and religion.
SC.912.N.2.3 Identify examples of pseudoscience (such as astrology, phrenology) in society.       Low
SC.912.N.2.4 Explain that scientific knowledge is both durable and robust and open to change.     High
             Scientific knowledge can change because it is often examined and re-examined
             by new investigations and scientific argumentation. Because of these frequent
             examinations, scien
SC.912.N.2.5 Describe instances in which scientists' varied backgrounds, talents, interests, and  High
             goals influence the inferences and thus the explanations that they make about
             observations of natural phenomena and describe that competing interpretations
             (explanations)
SC.912.N.3.1 Explain that a scientific theory is the culmination of many scientific               High
             investigations drawing together all the current evidence concerning a substantial
             range of phenomena; thus, a scientific theory represents the most powerful
             explanation scientists have
SC.912.N.3.2 Describe the role consensus plays in the historical development of a theory in       Moderate
             any one of the disciplines of science.
SC.912.N.3.3 Explain that scientific laws are descriptions of specific relationships under given  Moderate
             conditions in nature, but do not offer explanations for those relationships.
SC.912.N.3.4 Recognize that theories do not become laws, nor do laws become theories;             Moderate
             theories are well supported explanations and laws are well supported
             descriptions.
SC.912.N.3.5 Describe the function of models in science, and identify the wide range of           Moderate
             models used in science.
SC.912.N.4.1 Explain how scientific knowledge and reasoning provide an empirically-based          Moderate
             perspective to inform society's decision making.
SC.912.N.4.2 Weigh the merits of alternative strategies for solving a specific societal problem   High
             by comparing a number of different costs and benefits, such as human,
             economic, and environmental.
SC.912.P.8.1 Differentiate among the four states of matter.                                       Moderate
SC.912.P.8.2 Differentiate between physical and chemical properties and physical and              Moderate
             chemical changes of matter.
SC.912.P.8.4 Explore the scientific theory of atoms (also known as atomic theory) by              High
             describing the structure of atoms in terms of protons, neutrons and electrons, and
             differentiate among these particles in terms of their mass, electrical charges and
             locations within
                                                     148


SC.912.P.8.5   Relate properties of atoms and their position in the periodic table to the        Moderate
               arrangement of their electrons.
SC.912.P.8.7   Interpret formula representations of molecules and compounds in terms of          Moderate
               composition and structure.
SC.912.P.8.8   Characterize types of chemical reactions, for example: redox, acid-base,          Moderate
               synthesis, and single and double replacement reactions.
SC.912.P.8.11  Relate acidity and basicity to hydronium and hydroxyl ion concentration and pH.   Moderate
SC.912.P.10.1  Differentiate among the various forms of energy and recognize that they can be    Moderate
               transformed from one form to others.
SC.912.P.10.2  Explore the Law of Conservation of Energy by differentiating among open,          High
               closed, and isolated systems and explain that the total energy in an isolated
               system is a conserved quantity.
SC.912.P.10.3  Compare and contrast work and power qualitatively and quantitatively.             Moderate
SC.912.P.10.4  Describe heat as the energy transferred by convection, conduction, and            High
               radiation, and explain the connection of heat to change in temperature or states
               of matter.
SC.912.P.10.5  Relate temperature to the average molecular kinetic energy.                       Moderate
SC.912.P.10.7  Distinguish between endothermic and exothermic chemical processes.                Moderate
SC.912.P.10.10 Compare the magnitude and range of the four fundamental forces (gravitational, Moderate
               electromagnetic, weak nuclear, strong nuclear).
SC.912.P.10.11 Explain and compare nuclear reactions (radioactive decay, fission and fusion), High
               the energy changes associated with them and their associated safety issues.
SC.912.P.10.12 Differentiate between chemical and nuclear reactions.                             Moderate
SC.912.P.10.14 Differentiate among conductors, semiconductors, and insulators.                   Moderate
SC.912.P.10.15 Investigate and explain the relationships among current, voltage, resistance, and High
               power.
SC.912.P.10.18 Explore the theory of electromagnetism by comparing and contrasting the           High
               different parts of the electromagnetic spectrum in terms of wavelength,
               frequency, and energy, and relate them to phenomena and applications.
SC.912.P.10.21 Qualitatively describe the shift in frequency in sound or electromagnetic waves   Moderate
               due to the relative motion of a source or a receiver.
SC.912.P.12.2  Analyze the motion of an object in terms of its position, velocity, and           High
               acceleration (with respect to a frame of reference) as functions of time.
SC.912.P.12.3  Interpret and apply Newton's three laws of motion.                                High
SC.912.P.12.4  Describe how the gravitational force between two objects depends on their         Moderate
               masses and the distance between them.
SC.912.P.12.7  Recognize that nothing travels faster than the speed of light in vacuum which is  Low
               the same for all observers no matter how they or the light source are moving.
SC.912.P.12.10 Interpret the behavior of ideal gases in terms of kinetic molecular theory.       High
SC.912.P.12.11 Describe phase transitions in terms of kinetic molecular theory.                  Moderate
SC.912.P.12.12 Explain how various factors, such as concentration, temperature, and presence of  High
               a catalyst affect the rate of a chemical reaction.
SC.912.L.15.2  Discuss the use of molecular clocks to estimate how long ago various groups of    Moderate
               organisms diverged evolutionarily from one another.
SC.912.L.16.10 Evaluate the impact of biotechnology on the individual, society and the           High
               environment, including medical and ethical issues.
SC.912.L.17.11 Evaluate the costs and benefits of renewable and nonrenewable resources, such     High
               as water, energy, fossil fuels, wildlife, and forests.
SC.912.L.17.15 Discuss the effects of technology on environmental quality.                       Moderate
                                                       149


SC.912.L.17.16    Discuss the large-scale environmental impacts resulting from human activity,         High
                  including waste spills, oil spills, runoff, greenhouse gases, ozone depletion, and
                  surface and groundwater pollution.
SC.912.L.17.19    Describe how different natural resources are produced and how their rates of use     Moderate
                  and renewal limit availability.
SC.912.L.17.20    Predict the impact of individuals on environmental systems and examine how           High
                  human lifestyles affect sustainability.
SC.912.L.18.12    Discuss the special properties of water that contribute to Earth's suitability as an Moderate
                  environment for life: cohesive behavior, ability to moderate temperature,
                  expansion upon freezing, and versatility as a solvent.
MA.912.S.1.2      Determine appropriate and consistent standards of measurement for the data to        Moderate
                  be collected in a survey or experiment.
MA.912.S.3.2      Collect, organize, and analyze data sets, determine the best format for the data     High
                  and present visual summaries from the following:
LA.910.4.2.2      The student will record information and ideas from primary and/or secondary
                  sources accurately and coherently, noting the validity and reliability of these
                  sources and attributing sources of information;
LA.910.2.2.3      The student will organize information to show understanding or relationships
                  among facts, ideas, and events (e.g., representing key points within text through
                  charting, mapping, paraphrasing, summarizing, comparing, contrasting, or
                  outlining);
               Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code    Access Point Descriptor
SC.912.N.1.In.a       Identify a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, including life science, earth
                      and space science, or physical science, and do the following: 1. Identify a scientific
                      question 2. Examine reliable sources of informtion to identify what is already k
SC.912.N.1.Su.b       Identify the basic process used in scientific investigations, including questioning,
                      observing, recording, determining, and sharing results.
SC.912.N.1.Pa.c       Recognize that when a variety of common activities are repeated the same way, the
                      outcomes are the same.
SC.912.N.2.In.a       Identify examples of investigations that involve science.
SC.912.N.2.Su.b       Recognize that what is known about science can change based on new information.
SC.912.N.3.In.a       Recognize that a scientific theory is developed by repeated investigations of many
                      scientists and agreement on the likely explanation.
SC.912.N.3.In.b       Identify examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in the natural world, such
                      as Newton’s laws.
SC.912.N.3.Su.b       Recognize examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in nature, such as
                      Newton’s laws.
SC.912.N.3.Su.c       Recognize ways models are used in the study of science.
SC.912.N.4.In.a       Identify ways scientific knowledge and problem solving benefit people.
SC.912.N.4.Su.b       Recognize that some strategies may cost more to solve a problem.
SC.912.P.8.In.a       Classify states of matter as solid, liquid, and gaseous.
SC.912.P.8.Su.b       Identify examples of physical and chemical changes.
SC.912.P.8.Pa.c       Recognize that the parts of an object can be put together to make a whole.
SC.912.P.10.In.a      Identify examples of energy being transformed from one form to another (conserved
                      quantity).
                                                          150


SC.912.P.10.Su.b       Recognize the relationship between work and power, such as power is the amount of
                       work a person or machine does.
SC.912.P.10.Pa.c       Recognize the source and recipient of heat transfer.
SC.912.P.12.In.a       Recognize that scalar quantities describe the magnitude of the measurement, such as
                       size, weight, volume, area, temperature, or speed.
SC.912.P.12.Su.b       Recognize that acceleration generally involves a change in speed.
SC.912.P.12.Pa.c       Identify the source of the force moving an object.
SC.912.L.16.In.a       Identify that genes are sets of instructions that determine which characteristics are passed
                       from parent to offspring.
SC.912.L.16.Su.b       Recognize that all organisms have a substance called DNA with unique information.
SC.912.L.16.Pa.c       Recognize that illness can result when parts of our bodies are not working properly.
SC.912.L.17.In.a       Recognize that living things in oceans and fresh water are affected by the location,
                       availability of light, depth of the water, and temperature.
SC.912.L.17.Su.b       Recognize how animals and plants in an ecosystem may be affected by changes to the
                       food supply or climate.
SC.912.L.17.Pa.c       Recognize examples of mutual relationships between people and other living things.
SC.912.L.18.In.a       Identify that carbohydrates, fats, proteins, and nucleic acids (macromolecules) are
                       important for human organisms.
SC.912.L.18.Su.b       Recognize that the function of photosynthesis is to produce food for plants.
SC.912.L.18.Pa.c       Identify that food is a source of energy.
                                2003320 Physical Science Honors
Section: Basic and Adult Education                          Grade Group: Secondary Grades 9-12
Subject: Science                                            Domain: Physical Sciences
Course Length: Year                                         Level: 3
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                   Benchmarks
                                                                                                        Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                     Knowledge
SC.912.N.1.1       Define a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, for example: biology, High
                   chemistry, physics, and earth/space science, and do the following:
SC.912.N.1.2       Describe and explain what characterizes science and its methods.                     Moderate
SC.912.N.1.3       Recognize that the strength or usefulness of a scientific claim is evaluated         Low
                   through scientific argumentation, which depends on critical and logical
                   thinking, and the active consideration of alternative scientific explanations to
                   explain the data present
SC.912.N.1.4       Identify sources of information and assess their reliability according to the strict High
                   standards of scientific investigation.
SC.912.N.1.5       Describe and provide examples of how similar investigations conducted in many        Moderate
                   parts of the world result in the same outcome.
SC.912.N.1.6       Describe how scientific inferences are drawn from scientific observations and        Moderate
                   provide examples from the content being studied.
SC.912.N.1.7       Recognize the role of creativity in constructing scientific questions, methods and   Low
                   explanations.
SC.912.N.2.1       Identify what is science, what clearly is not science, and what superficially        High
                   resembles science (but fails to meet the criteria for science).
                                                           151


SC.912.N.2.2  Identify which questions can be answered through science and which questions        High
              are outside the boundaries of scientific investigation, such as questions
              addressed by other ways of knowing, such as art, philosophy, and religion.
SC.912.N.2.3  Identify examples of pseudoscience (such as astrology, phrenology) in society.      Low
SC.912.N.2.4  Explain that scientific knowledge is both durable and robust and open to change.    High
              Scientific knowledge can change because it is often examined and re-examined
              by new investigations and scientific argumentation. Because of these frequent
              examinations, scien
SC.912.N.2.5  Describe instances in which scientists' varied backgrounds, talents, interests, and High
              goals influence the inferences and thus the explanations that they make about
              observations of natural phenomena and describe that competing interpretations
              (explanations)
SC.912.N.3.1  Explain that a scientific theory is the culmination of many scientific              High
              investigations drawing together all the current evidence concerning a substantial
              range of phenomena; thus, a scientific theory represents the most powerful
              explanation scientists have
SC.912.N.3.2  Describe the role consensus plays in the historical development of a theory in      Moderate
              any one of the disciplines of science.
SC.912.N.3.3  Explain that scientific laws are descriptions of specific relationships under given Moderate
              conditions in nature, but do not offer explanations for those relationships.
SC.912.N.3.4  Recognize that theories do not become laws, nor do laws become theories;            Moderate
              theories are well supported explanations and laws are well supported
              descriptions.
SC.912.N.3.5  Describe the function of models in science, and identify the wide range of          Moderate
              models used in science.
SC.912.N.4.1  Explain how scientific knowledge and reasoning provide an empirically-based         Moderate
              perspective to inform society's decision making.
SC.912.N.4.2  Weigh the merits of alternative strategies for solving a specific societal problem  High
              by comparing a number of different costs and benefits, such as human,
              economic, and environmental.
SC.912.P.8.1  Differentiate among the four states of matter.                                      Moderate
SC.912.P.8.2  Differentiate between physical and chemical properties and physical and             Moderate
              chemical changes of matter.
SC.912.P.8.3  Explore the scientific theory of atoms (also known as atomic theory) by             High
              describing changes in the atomic model over time and why those changes were
              necessitated by experimental evidence.
SC.912.P.8.4  Explore the scientific theory of atoms (also known as atomic theory) by             High
              describing the structure of atoms in terms of protons, neutrons and electrons, and
              differentiate among these particles in terms of their mass, electrical charges and
              locations within
SC.912.P.8.5  Relate properties of atoms and their position in the periodic table to the          Moderate
              arrangement of their electrons.
SC.912.P.8.7  Interpret formula representations of molecules and compounds in terms of            Moderate
              composition and structure.
SC.912.P.8.8  Characterize types of chemical reactions, for example: redox, acid-base,            Moderate
              synthesis, and single and double replacement reactions.
SC.912.P.8.11 Relate acidity and basicity to hydronium and hydroxyl ion concentration and pH.     Moderate
SC.912.P.10.1 Differentiate among the various forms of energy and recognize that they can be      Moderate
              transformed from one form to others.
                                                      152


SC.912.P.10.2  Explore the Law of Conservation of Energy by differentiating among open,          High
               closed, and isolated systems and explain that the total energy in an isolated
               system is a conserved quantity.
SC.912.P.10.3  Compare and contrast work and power qualitatively and quantitatively.             Moderate
SC.912.P.10.4  Describe heat as the energy transferred by convection, conduction, and            High
               radiation, and explain the connection of heat to change in temperature or states
               of matter.
SC.912.P.10.5  Relate temperature to the average molecular kinetic energy.                       Moderate
SC.912.P.10.6  Create and interpret potential energy diagrams, for example: chemical reactions, High
               orbits around a central body, motion of a pendulum.
SC.912.P.10.7  Distinguish between endothermic and exothermic chemical processes.                Moderate
SC.912.P.10.10 Compare the magnitude and range of the four fundamental forces (gravitational, Moderate
               electromagnetic, weak nuclear, strong nuclear).
SC.912.P.10.11 Explain and compare nuclear reactions (radioactive decay, fission and fusion), High
               the energy changes associated with them and their associated safety issues.
SC.912.P.10.12 Differentiate between chemical and nuclear reactions.                             Moderate
SC.912.P.10.14 Differentiate among conductors, semiconductors, and insulators.                   Moderate
SC.912.P.10.15 Investigate and explain the relationships among current, voltage, resistance, and High
               power.
SC.912.P.10.18 Explore the theory of electromagnetism by comparing and contrasting the           High
               different parts of the electromagnetic spectrum in terms of wavelength,
               frequency, and energy, and relate them to phenomena and applications.
SC.912.P.10.21 Qualitatively describe the shift in frequency in sound or electromagnetic waves   Moderate
               due to the relative motion of a source or a receiver.
SC.912.P.12.1  Distinguish between scalar and vector quantities and assess which should be       High
               used to describe an event.
SC.912.P.12.2  Analyze the motion of an object in terms of its position, velocity, and           High
               acceleration (with respect to a frame of reference) as functions of time.
SC.912.P.12.3  Interpret and apply Newton's three laws of motion.                                High
SC.912.P.12.4  Describe how the gravitational force between two objects depends on their         Moderate
               masses and the distance between them.
SC.912.P.12.5  Apply the law of conservation of linear momentum to interactions, such as         High
               collisions between objects.
SC.912.P.12.6  Qualitatively apply the concept of angular momentum.                              High
SC.912.P.12.7  Recognize that nothing travels faster than the speed of light in vacuum which is  Low
               the same for all observers no matter how they or the light source are moving.
SC.912.P.12.10 Interpret the behavior of ideal gases in terms of kinetic molecular theory.       High
SC.912.P.12.11 Describe phase transitions in terms of kinetic molecular theory.                  Moderate
SC.912.P.12.12 Explain how various factors, such as concentration, temperature, and presence of  High
               a catalyst affect the rate of a chemical reaction.
SC.912.L.15.2  Discuss the use of molecular clocks to estimate how long ago various groups of    Moderate
               organisms diverged evolutionarily from one another.
SC.912.L.16.10 Evaluate the impact of biotechnology on the individual, society and the           High
               environment, including medical and ethical issues.
SC.912.L.17.11 Evaluate the costs and benefits of renewable and nonrenewable resources, such     High
               as water, energy, fossil fuels, wildlife, and forests.
SC.912.L.17.13 Discuss the need for adequate monitoring of environmental parameters when         High
               making policy decisions.
SC.912.L.17.15 Discuss the effects of technology on environmental quality.                       Moderate
                                                       153


SC.912.L.17.16    Discuss the large-scale environmental impacts resulting from human activity,         High
                  including waste spills, oil spills, runoff, greenhouse gases, ozone depletion, and
                  surface and groundwater pollution.
SC.912.L.17.19    Describe how different natural resources are produced and how their rates of use     Moderate
                  and renewal limit availability.
SC.912.L.17.20    Predict the impact of individuals on environmental systems and examine how           High
                  human lifestyles affect sustainability.
SC.912.L.18.12    Discuss the special properties of water that contribute to Earth's suitability as an Moderate
                  environment for life: cohesive behavior, ability to moderate temperature,
                  expansion upon freezing, and versatility as a solvent.
MA.912.S.1.2      Determine appropriate and consistent standards of measurement for the data to        Moderate
                  be collected in a survey or experiment.
MA.912.S.3.2      Collect, organize, and analyze data sets, determine the best format for the data     High
                  and present visual summaries from the following:
LA.910.4.2.2      The student will record information and ideas from primary and/or secondary
                  sources accurately and coherently, noting the validity and reliability of these
                  sources and attributing sources of information;
LA.910.2.2.3      The student will organize information to show understanding or relationships
                  among facts, ideas, and events (e.g., representing key points within text through
                  charting, mapping, paraphrasing, summarizing, comparing, contrasting, or
                  outlining);
               Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code    Access Point Descriptor
SC.912.N.1.In.a       Identify a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, including life science, earth
                      and space science, or physical science, and do the following: 1. Identify a scientific
                      question 2. Examine reliable sources of informtion to identify what is already k
SC.912.N.1.Su.b       Identify the basic process used in scientific investigations, including questioning,
                      observing, recording, determining, and sharing results.
SC.912.N.1.Pa.c       Recognize that when a variety of common activities are repeated the same way, the
                      outcomes are the same.
SC.912.N.2.In.a       Identify examples of investigations that involve science.
SC.912.N.2.Su.b       Recognize that what is known about science can change based on new information.
SC.912.N.3.In.a       Recognize that a scientific theory is developed by repeated investigations of many
                      scientists and agreement on the likely explanation.
SC.912.N.3.In.b       Identify examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in the natural world, such
                      as Newton’s laws.
SC.912.N.3.Su.b       Recognize examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in nature, such as
                      Newton’s laws.
SC.912.N.3.Su.c       Recognize ways models are used in the study of science.
SC.912.N.4.In.a       Identify ways scientific knowledge and problem solving benefit people.
SC.912.N.4.Su.b       Recognize that some strategies may cost more to solve a problem.
SC.912.P.8.In.a       Classify states of matter as solid, liquid, and gaseous.
SC.912.P.8.Su.b       Identify examples of physical and chemical changes.
SC.912.P.8.Pa.c       Recognize that the parts of an object can be put together to make a whole.
SC.912.P.10.In.a      Identify examples of energy being transformed from one form to another (conserved
                      quantity).
                                                          154


SC.912.P.10.Su.b       Recognize the relationship between work and power, such as power is the amount of
                       work a person or machine does.
SC.912.P.10.Pa.c       Recognize the source and recipient of heat transfer.
SC.912.P.12.In.a       Recognize that scalar quantities describe the magnitude of the measurement, such as
                       size, weight, volume, area, temperature, or speed.
SC.912.P.12.Su.b       Recognize that acceleration generally involves a change in speed.
SC.912.P.12.Pa.c       Identify the source of the force moving an object.
SC.912.L.16.In.a       Identify that genes are sets of instructions that determine which characteristics are passed
                       from parent to offspring.
SC.912.L.16.Su.b       Recognize that all organisms have a substance called DNA with unique information.
SC.912.L.16.Pa.c       Recognize that illness can result when parts of our bodies are not working properly.
SC.912.L.17.In.a       Recognize that living things in oceans and fresh water are affected by the location,
                       availability of light, depth of the water, and temperature.
SC.912.L.17.Su.b       Recognize how animals and plants in an ecosystem may be affected by changes to the
                       food supply or climate.
SC.912.L.17.Pa.c       Recognize examples of mutual relationships between people and other living things.
SC.912.L.18.In.a       Identify that carbohydrates, fats, proteins, and nucleic acids (macromolecules) are
                       important for human organisms.
SC.912.L.18.Su.b       Recognize that the function of photosynthesis is to produce food for plants.
SC.912.L.18.Pa.c       Identify that food is a source of energy.
                                             2003380 Physics I
Section: Basic and Adult Education                          Grade Group: Secondary Grades 9-12
Subject: Science                                            Domain: Physical Sciences
Course Length: Year                                         Level: 2
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                   Benchmarks
                                                                                                        Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                     Knowledge
SC.912.N.1.1       Define a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, for example: biology, High
                   chemistry, physics, and earth/space science, and do the following:
SC.912.N.1.2       Describe and explain what characterizes science and its methods.                     Moderate
SC.912.N.1.3       Recognize that the strength or usefulness of a scientific claim is evaluated         Low
                   through scientific argumentation, which depends on critical and logical
                   thinking, and the active consideration of alternative scientific explanations to
                   explain the data present
SC.912.N.1.4       Identify sources of information and assess their reliability according to the strict High
                   standards of scientific investigation.
SC.912.N.1.5       Describe and provide examples of how similar investigations conducted in many        Moderate
                   parts of the world result in the same outcome.
SC.912.N.1.6       Describe how scientific inferences are drawn from scientific observations and        Moderate
                   provide examples from the content being studied.
SC.912.N.1.7       Recognize the role of creativity in constructing scientific questions, methods and   Low
                   explanations.
SC.912.N.2.1       Identify what is science, what clearly is not science, and what superficially        High
                   resembles science (but fails to meet the criteria for science).
                                                           155


SC.912.N.2.2  Identify which questions can be answered through science and which questions        High
              are outside the boundaries of scientific investigation, such as questions
              addressed by other ways of knowing, such as art, philosophy, and religion.
SC.912.N.2.3  Identify examples of pseudoscience (such as astrology, phrenology) in society.      Low
SC.912.N.2.4  Explain that scientific knowledge is both durable and robust and open to change.    High
              Scientific knowledge can change because it is often examined and re-examined
              by new investigations and scientific argumentation. Because of these frequent
              examinations, scien
SC.912.N.2.5  Describe instances in which scientists' varied backgrounds, talents, interests, and High
              goals influence the inferences and thus the explanations that they make about
              observations of natural phenomena and describe that competing interpretations
              (explanations)
SC.912.N.3.1  Explain that a scientific theory is the culmination of many scientific              High
              investigations drawing together all the current evidence concerning a substantial
              range of phenomena; thus, a scientific theory represents the most powerful
              explanation scientists have
SC.912.N.3.2  Describe the role consensus plays in the historical development of a theory in      Moderate
              any one of the disciplines of science.
SC.912.N.3.3  Explain that scientific laws are descriptions of specific relationships under given Moderate
              conditions in nature, but do not offer explanations for those relationships.
SC.912.N.3.4  Recognize that theories do not become laws, nor do laws become theories;            Moderate
              theories are well supported explanations and laws are well supported
              descriptions.
SC.912.N.3.5  Describe the function of models in science, and identify the wide range of          Moderate
              models used in science.
SC.912.N.4.1  Explain how scientific knowledge and reasoning provide an empirically-based         Moderate
              perspective to inform society's decision making.
SC.912.N.4.2  Weigh the merits of alternative strategies for solving a specific societal problem  High
              by comparing a number of different costs and benefits, such as human,
              economic, and environmental.
SC.912.E.5.1  Cite evidence used to develop and verify the scientific theory of the Big Bang      High
              (also known as the Big Bang Theory) of the origin of the universe.
SC.912.E.5.6  Develop logical connections through physical principles, including Kepler's and     High
              Newton's Laws about the relationships and the effects of Earth, Moon, and Sun
              on each other.
SC.912.P.8.1  Differentiate among the four states of matter.                                      Moderate
SC.912.P.8.3  Explore the scientific theory of atoms (also known as atomic theory) by             High
              describing changes in the atomic model over time and why those changes were
              necessitated by experimental evidence.
SC.912.P.8.4  Explore the scientific theory of atoms (also known as atomic theory) by             High
              describing the structure of atoms in terms of protons, neutrons and electrons, and
              differentiate among these particles in terms of their mass, electrical charges and
              locations within
SC.912.P.10.1 Differentiate among the various forms of energy and recognize that they can be      Moderate
              transformed from one form to others.
SC.912.P.10.2 Explore the Law of Conservation of Energy by differentiating among open,            High
              closed, and isolated systems and explain that the total energy in an isolated
              system is a conserved quantity.
SC.912.P.10.3 Compare and contrast work and power qualitatively and quantitatively.               Moderate
                                                      156


SC.912.P.10.4  Describe heat as the energy transferred by convection, conduction, and               High
               radiation, and explain the connection of heat to change in temperature or states
               of matter.
SC.912.P.10.5  Relate temperature to the average molecular kinetic energy.                          Moderate
SC.912.P.10.9  Describe the quantization of energy at the atomic level.                             Moderate
SC.912.P.10.10 Compare the magnitude and range of the four fundamental forces (gravitational, Moderate
               electromagnetic, weak nuclear, strong nuclear).
SC.912.P.10.13 Relate the configuration of static charges to the electric field, electric force,    High
               electric potential, and electric potential energy.
SC.912.P.10.14 Differentiate among conductors, semiconductors, and insulators.                      Moderate
SC.912.P.10.15 Investigate and explain the relationships among current, voltage, resistance, and    High
               power.
SC.912.P.10.18 Explore the theory of electromagnetism by comparing and contrasting the              High
               different parts of the electromagnetic spectrum in terms of wavelength,
               frequency, and energy, and relate them to phenomena and applications.
SC.912.P.10.20 Describe the measurable properties of waves and explain the relationships            High
               among them and how these properties change when the wave moves from one
               medium to another.
SC.912.P.10.21 Qualitatively describe the shift in frequency in sound or electromagnetic waves      Moderate
               due to the relative motion of a source or a receiver.
SC.912.P.10.22 Construct ray diagrams and use thin lens and mirror equations to locate the          High
               images formed by lenses and mirrors.
SC.912.P.12.1  Distinguish between scalar and vector quantities and assess which should be          High
               used to describe an event.
SC.912.P.12.2  Analyze the motion of an object in terms of its position, velocity, and              High
               acceleration (with respect to a frame of reference) as functions of time.
SC.912.P.12.3  Interpret and apply Newton's three laws of motion.                                   High
SC.912.P.12.4  Describe how the gravitational force between two objects depends on their            Moderate
               masses and the distance between them.
SC.912.P.12.5  Apply the law of conservation of linear momentum to interactions, such as            High
               collisions between objects.
SC.912.P.12.7  Recognize that nothing travels faster than the speed of light in vacuum which is     Low
               the same for all observers no matter how they or the light source are moving.
SC.912.P.12.8  Recognize that Newton's Laws are a limiting case of Einstein's Special Theory        Low
               of Relativity at speeds that are much smaller than the speed of light.
SC.912.P.12.9  Recognize that time, length, and energy depend on the frame of reference.            Low
SC.912.P.12.10 Interpret the behavior of ideal gases in terms of kinetic molecular theory.          High
SC.912.P.12.11 Describe phase transitions in terms of kinetic molecular theory.                     Moderate
SC.912.L.17.11 Evaluate the costs and benefits of renewable and nonrenewable resources, such        High
               as water, energy, fossil fuels, wildlife, and forests.
SC.912.L.17.15 Discuss the effects of technology on environmental quality.                          Moderate
SC.912.L.18.12 Discuss the special properties of water that contribute to Earth's suitability as an Moderate
               environment for life: cohesive behavior, ability to moderate temperature,
               expansion upon freezing, and versatility as a solvent.
MA.912.S.1.2   Determine appropriate and consistent standards of measurement for the data to Moderate
               be collected in a survey or experiment.
MA.912.S.3.2   Collect, organize, and analyze data sets, determine the best format for the data     High
               and present visual summaries from the following:
                                                       157


LA.910.4.2.2      The student will record information and ideas from primary and/or secondary
                  sources accurately and coherently, noting the validity and reliability of these
                  sources and attributing sources of information;
LA.910.2.2.3      The student will organize information to show understanding or relationships
                  among facts, ideas, and events (e.g., representing key points within text through
                  charting, mapping, paraphrasing, summarizing, comparing, contrasting, or
                  outlining);
               Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code    Access Point Descriptor
SC.912.N.1.In.a       Identify a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, including life science, earth
                      and space science, or physical science, and do the following: 1. Identify a scientific
                      question 2. Examine reliable sources of informtion to identify what is already k
SC.912.N.1.Su.b       Identify the basic process used in scientific investigations, including questioning,
                      observing, recording, determining, and sharing results.
SC.912.N.1.Pa.c       Recognize that when a variety of common activities are repeated the same way, the
                      outcomes are the same.
SC.912.N.2.In.a       Identify examples of investigations that involve science.
SC.912.N.2.Su.b       Recognize that what is known about science can change based on new information.
SC.912.N.3.In.a       Recognize that a scientific theory is developed by repeated investigations of many
                      scientists and agreement on the likely explanation.
SC.912.N.3.In.b       Identify examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in the natural world, such
                      as Newton’s laws.
SC.912.N.3.Su.b       Recognize examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in nature, such as
                      Newton’s laws.
SC.912.N.3.Su.c       Recognize ways models are used in the study of science.
SC.912.N.4.In.a       Identify ways scientific knowledge and problem solving benefit people.
SC.912.N.4.Su.b       Recognize that some strategies may cost more to solve a problem.
SC.912.E.5.In.a       Recognize that the Milky Way is part of the expanding universe.
SC.912.E.5.Su.b       Recognize that stars are made of burning gases.
SC.912.E.5.Pa.c       Observe and recognize effects of the Sun on Earth, such as temperature changes.
SC.912.P.8.In.a       Classify states of matter as solid, liquid, and gaseous.
SC.912.P.8.Su.b       Identify examples of physical and chemical changes.
SC.912.P.8.Pa.c       Recognize that the parts of an object can be put together to make a whole.
SC.912.P.10.In.a      Identify examples of energy being transformed from one form to another (conserved
                      quantity).
SC.912.P.10.Su.b      Recognize the relationship between work and power, such as power is the amount of
                      work a person or machine does.
SC.912.P.10.Pa.c      Recognize the source and recipient of heat transfer.
SC.912.P.12.In.a      Recognize that scalar quantities describe the magnitude of the measurement, such as
                      size, weight, volume, area, temperature, or speed.
SC.912.P.12.Su.b      Recognize that acceleration generally involves a change in speed.
SC.912.P.12.Pa.c      Identify the source of the force moving an object.
SC.912.L.17.In.a      Recognize that living things in oceans and fresh water are affected by the location,
                      availability of light, depth of the water, and temperature.
                                                          158


SC.912.L.17.Su.b       Recognize how animals and plants in an ecosystem may be affected by changes to the
                       food supply or climate.
SC.912.L.17.Pa.c       Recognize examples of mutual relationships between people and other living things.
SC.912.L.18.In.a       Identify that carbohydrates, fats, proteins, and nucleic acids (macromolecules) are
                       important for human organisms.
SC.912.L.18.Su.b       Recognize that the function of photosynthesis is to produce food for plants.
SC.912.L.18.Pa.c       Identify that food is a source of energy.
                                      2003390 Physics I Honors
Section: Basic and Adult Education                          Grade Group: Secondary Grades 9-12
Subject: Science                                            Domain: Physical Sciences
Course Length: Year                                         Level: 3
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                  Benchmarks
                                                                                                        Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                     Knowledge
SC.912.N.1.1       Define a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, for example: biology, High
                   chemistry, physics, and earth/space science, and do the following:
SC.912.N.1.2       Describe and explain what characterizes science and its methods.                     Moderate
SC.912.N.1.3       Recognize that the strength or usefulness of a scientific claim is evaluated         Low
                   through scientific argumentation, which depends on critical and logical
                   thinking, and the active consideration of alternative scientific explanations to
                   explain the data present
SC.912.N.1.4       Identify sources of information and assess their reliability according to the strict High
                   standards of scientific investigation.
SC.912.N.1.5       Describe and provide examples of how similar investigations conducted in many        Moderate
                   parts of the world result in the same outcome.
SC.912.N.1.6       Describe how scientific inferences are drawn from scientific observations and        Moderate
                   provide examples from the content being studied.
SC.912.N.1.7       Recognize the role of creativity in constructing scientific questions, methods and   Low
                   explanations.
SC.912.N.2.1       Identify what is science, what clearly is not science, and what superficially        High
                   resembles science (but fails to meet the criteria for science).
SC.912.N.2.2       Identify which questions can be answered through science and which questions         High
                   are outside the boundaries of scientific investigation, such as questions
                   addressed by other ways of knowing, such as art, philosophy, and religion.
SC.912.N.2.3       Identify examples of pseudoscience (such as astrology, phrenology) in society.       Low
SC.912.N.2.4       Explain that scientific knowledge is both durable and robust and open to change.     High
                   Scientific knowledge can change because it is often examined and re-examined
                   by new investigations and scientific argumentation. Because of these frequent
                   examinations, scien
SC.912.N.2.5       Describe instances in which scientists' varied backgrounds, talents, interests, and  High
                   goals influence the inferences and thus the explanations that they make about
                   observations of natural phenomena and describe that competing interpretations
                   (explanations)
                                                           159


SC.912.N.3.1   Explain that a scientific theory is the culmination of many scientific              High
               investigations drawing together all the current evidence concerning a substantial
               range of phenomena; thus, a scientific theory represents the most powerful
               explanation scientists have
SC.912.N.3.2   Describe the role consensus plays in the historical development of a theory in      Moderate
               any one of the disciplines of science.
SC.912.N.3.3   Explain that scientific laws are descriptions of specific relationships under given Moderate
               conditions in nature, but do not offer explanations for those relationships.
SC.912.N.3.4   Recognize that theories do not become laws, nor do laws become theories;            Moderate
               theories are well supported explanations and laws are well supported
               descriptions.
SC.912.N.3.5   Describe the function of models in science, and identify the wide range of          Moderate
               models used in science.
SC.912.N.4.1   Explain how scientific knowledge and reasoning provide an empirically-based         Moderate
               perspective to inform society's decision making.
SC.912.N.4.2   Weigh the merits of alternative strategies for solving a specific societal problem  High
               by comparing a number of different costs and benefits, such as human,
               economic, and environmental.
SC.912.E.5.1   Cite evidence used to develop and verify the scientific theory of the Big Bang      High
               (also known as the Big Bang Theory) of the origin of the universe.
SC.912.E.5.6   Develop logical connections through physical principles, including Kepler's and     High
               Newton's Laws about the relationships and the effects of Earth, Moon, and Sun
               on each other.
SC.912.E.5.8   Connect the concepts of radiation and the electromagnetic spectrum to the use of    High
               historical and newly-developed observational tools.
SC.912.P.8.1   Differentiate among the four states of matter.                                      Moderate
SC.912.P.8.3   Explore the scientific theory of atoms (also known as atomic theory) by             High
               describing changes in the atomic model over time and why those changes were
               necessitated by experimental evidence.
SC.912.P.8.4   Explore the scientific theory of atoms (also known as atomic theory) by             High
               describing the structure of atoms in terms of protons, neutrons and electrons, and
               differentiate among these particles in terms of their mass, electrical charges and
               locations within
SC.912.P.10.1  Differentiate among the various forms of energy and recognize that they can be      Moderate
               transformed from one form to others.
SC.912.P.10.2  Explore the Law of Conservation of Energy by differentiating among open,            High
               closed, and isolated systems and explain that the total energy in an isolated
               system is a conserved quantity.
SC.912.P.10.3  Compare and contrast work and power qualitatively and quantitatively.               Moderate
SC.912.P.10.4  Describe heat as the energy transferred by convection, conduction, and              High
               radiation, and explain the connection of heat to change in temperature or states
               of matter.
SC.912.P.10.5  Relate temperature to the average molecular kinetic energy.                         Moderate
SC.912.P.10.6  Create and interpret potential energy diagrams, for example: chemical reactions, High
               orbits around a central body, motion of a pendulum.
SC.912.P.10.8  Explain entropy's role in determining the efficiency of processes that convert      High
               energy to work.
SC.912.P.10.9  Describe the quantization of energy at the atomic level.                            Moderate
SC.912.P.10.10 Compare the magnitude and range of the four fundamental forces (gravitational, Moderate
               electromagnetic, weak nuclear, strong nuclear).
                                                       160


SC.912.P.10.13 Relate the configuration of static charges to the electric field, electric force,    High
               electric potential, and electric potential energy.
SC.912.P.10.14 Differentiate among conductors, semiconductors, and insulators.                      Moderate
SC.912.P.10.15 Investigate and explain the relationships among current, voltage, resistance, and    High
               power.
SC.912.P.10.16 Explain the relationship between moving charges and magnetic fields, as well as      High
               changing magnetic fields and electric fields, and their application to modern
               technologies.
SC.912.P.10.18 Explore the theory of electromagnetism by comparing and contrasting the              High
               different parts of the electromagnetic spectrum in terms of wavelength,
               frequency, and energy, and relate them to phenomena and applications.
SC.912.P.10.20 Describe the measurable properties of waves and explain the relationships            High
               among them and how these properties change when the wave moves from one
               medium to another.
SC.912.P.10.21 Qualitatively describe the shift in frequency in sound or electromagnetic waves      Moderate
               due to the relative motion of a source or a receiver.
SC.912.P.10.22 Construct ray diagrams and use thin lens and mirror equations to locate the          High
               images formed by lenses and mirrors.
SC.912.P.12.1  Distinguish between scalar and vector quantities and assess which should be          High
               used to describe an event.
SC.912.P.12.2  Analyze the motion of an object in terms of its position, velocity, and              High
               acceleration (with respect to a frame of reference) as functions of time.
SC.912.P.12.3  Interpret and apply Newton's three laws of motion.                                   High
SC.912.P.12.4  Describe how the gravitational force between two objects depends on their            Moderate
               masses and the distance between them.
SC.912.P.12.5  Apply the law of conservation of linear momentum to interactions, such as            High
               collisions between objects.
SC.912.P.12.6  Qualitatively apply the concept of angular momentum.                                 High
SC.912.P.12.7  Recognize that nothing travels faster than the speed of light in vacuum which is     Low
               the same for all observers no matter how they or the light source are moving.
SC.912.P.12.8  Recognize that Newton's Laws are a limiting case of Einstein's Special Theory        Low
               of Relativity at speeds that are much smaller than the speed of light.
SC.912.P.12.9  Recognize that time, length, and energy depend on the frame of reference.            Low
SC.912.P.12.10 Interpret the behavior of ideal gases in terms of kinetic molecular theory.          High
SC.912.P.12.11 Describe phase transitions in terms of kinetic molecular theory.                     Moderate
SC.912.L.17.11 Evaluate the costs and benefits of renewable and nonrenewable resources, such        High
               as water, energy, fossil fuels, wildlife, and forests.
SC.912.L.17.15 Discuss the effects of technology on environmental quality.                          Moderate
SC.912.L.18.12 Discuss the special properties of water that contribute to Earth's suitability as an Moderate
               environment for life: cohesive behavior, ability to moderate temperature,
               expansion upon freezing, and versatility as a solvent.
MA.912.S.1.2   Determine appropriate and consistent standards of measurement for the data to Moderate
               be collected in a survey or experiment.
MA.912.S.3.2   Collect, organize, and analyze data sets, determine the best format for the data     High
               and present visual summaries from the following:
LA.910.4.2.2   The student will record information and ideas from primary and/or secondary
               sources accurately and coherently, noting the validity and reliability of these
               sources and attributing sources of information;
                                                       161


LA.910.2.2.3      The student will organize information to show understanding or relationships
                  among facts, ideas, and events (e.g., representing key points within text through
                  charting, mapping, paraphrasing, summarizing, comparing, contrasting, or
                  outlining);
               Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code    Access Point Descriptor
SC.912.N.1.In.a       Identify a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, including life science, earth
                      and space science, or physical science, and do the following: 1. Identify a scientific
                      question 2. Examine reliable sources of informtion to identify what is already k
SC.912.N.1.Su.b       Identify the basic process used in scientific investigations, including questioning,
                      observing, recording, determining, and sharing results.
SC.912.N.1.Pa.c       Recognize that when a variety of common activities are repeated the same way, the
                      outcomes are the same.
SC.912.N.2.In.a       Identify examples of investigations that involve science.
SC.912.N.2.Su.b       Recognize that what is known about science can change based on new information.
SC.912.N.3.In.a       Recognize that a scientific theory is developed by repeated investigations of many
                      scientists and agreement on the likely explanation.
SC.912.N.3.In.b       Identify examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in the natural world, such
                      as Newton’s laws.
SC.912.N.3.Su.b       Recognize examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in nature, such as
                      Newton’s laws.
SC.912.N.3.Su.c       Recognize ways models are used in the study of science.
SC.912.N.4.In.a       Identify ways scientific knowledge and problem solving benefit people.
SC.912.N.4.Su.b       Recognize that some strategies may cost more to solve a problem.
SC.912.E.5.In.a       Recognize that the Milky Way is part of the expanding universe.
SC.912.E.5.Su.b       Recognize that stars are made of burning gases.
SC.912.E.5.Pa.c       Observe and recognize effects of the Sun on Earth, such as temperature changes.
SC.912.P.8.In.a       Classify states of matter as solid, liquid, and gaseous.
SC.912.P.8.Su.b       Identify examples of physical and chemical changes.
SC.912.P.8.Pa.c       Recognize that the parts of an object can be put together to make a whole.
SC.912.P.10.In.a      Identify examples of energy being transformed from one form to another (conserved
                      quantity).
SC.912.P.10.Su.b      Recognize the relationship between work and power, such as power is the amount of
                      work a person or machine does.
SC.912.P.10.Pa.c      Recognize the source and recipient of heat transfer.
SC.912.P.12.In.a      Recognize that scalar quantities describe the magnitude of the measurement, such as
                      size, weight, volume, area, temperature, or speed.
SC.912.P.12.Su.b      Recognize that acceleration generally involves a change in speed.
SC.912.P.12.Pa.c      Identify the source of the force moving an object.
SC.912.L.17.In.a      Recognize that living things in oceans and fresh water are affected by the location,
                      availability of light, depth of the water, and temperature.
SC.912.L.17.Su.b      Recognize how animals and plants in an ecosystem may be affected by changes to the
                      food supply or climate.
SC.912.L.17.Pa.c      Recognize examples of mutual relationships between people and other living things.
                                                          162


SC.912.L.18.In.a       Identify that carbohydrates, fats, proteins, and nucleic acids (macromolecules) are
                       important for human organisms.
SC.912.L.18.Su.b       Recognize that the function of photosynthesis is to produce food for plants.
SC.912.L.18.Pa.c       Identify that food is a source of energy.
                                            2003410 Physics II
Section: Basic and Adult Education                          Grade Group: Secondary Grades 9-12
Subject: Science                                            Domain: Physical Sciences
Course Length: Year                                         Level: 3
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                  Benchmarks
                                                                                                        Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                     Knowledge
SC.912.N.1.1       Define a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, for example: biology, High
                   chemistry, physics, and earth/space science, and do the following:
SC.912.N.1.2       Describe and explain what characterizes science and its methods.                     Moderate
SC.912.N.1.3       Recognize that the strength or usefulness of a scientific claim is evaluated         Low
                   through scientific argumentation, which depends on critical and logical
                   thinking, and the active consideration of alternative scientific explanations to
                   explain the data present
SC.912.N.1.4       Identify sources of information and assess their reliability according to the strict High
                   standards of scientific investigation.
SC.912.N.1.5       Describe and provide examples of how similar investigations conducted in many        Moderate
                   parts of the world result in the same outcome.
SC.912.N.1.6       Describe how scientific inferences are drawn from scientific observations and        Moderate
                   provide examples from the content being studied.
SC.912.N.1.7       Recognize the role of creativity in constructing scientific questions, methods and   Low
                   explanations.
SC.912.N.2.1       Identify what is science, what clearly is not science, and what superficially        High
                   resembles science (but fails to meet the criteria for science).
SC.912.N.2.2       Identify which questions can be answered through science and which questions         High
                   are outside the boundaries of scientific investigation, such as questions
                   addressed by other ways of knowing, such as art, philosophy, and religion.
SC.912.N.2.3       Identify examples of pseudoscience (such as astrology, phrenology) in society.       Low
SC.912.N.2.4       Explain that scientific knowledge is both durable and robust and open to change.     High
                   Scientific knowledge can change because it is often examined and re-examined
                   by new investigations and scientific argumentation. Because of these frequent
                   examinations, scien
SC.912.N.2.5       Describe instances in which scientists' varied backgrounds, talents, interests, and  High
                   goals influence the inferences and thus the explanations that they make about
                   observations of natural phenomena and describe that competing interpretations
                   (explanations)
SC.912.N.3.1       Explain that a scientific theory is the culmination of many scientific               High
                   investigations drawing together all the current evidence concerning a substantial
                   range of phenomena; thus, a scientific theory represents the most powerful
                   explanation scientists have
SC.912.N.3.2       Describe the role consensus plays in the historical development of a theory in       Moderate
                   any one of the disciplines of science.
                                                           163


SC.912.N.3.3   Explain that scientific laws are descriptions of specific relationships under given Moderate
               conditions in nature, but do not offer explanations for those relationships.
SC.912.N.3.4   Recognize that theories do not become laws, nor do laws become theories;            Moderate
               theories are well supported explanations and laws are well supported
               descriptions.
SC.912.N.3.5   Describe the function of models in science, and identify the wide range of          Moderate
               models used in science.
SC.912.N.4.1   Explain how scientific knowledge and reasoning provide an empirically-based         Moderate
               perspective to inform society's decision making.
SC.912.N.4.2   Weigh the merits of alternative strategies for solving a specific societal problem  High
               by comparing a number of different costs and benefits, such as human,
               economic, and environmental.
SC.912.E.5.1   Cite evidence used to develop and verify the scientific theory of the Big Bang      High
               (also known as the Big Bang Theory) of the origin of the universe.
SC.912.E.5.2   Identify patterns in the organization and distribution of matter in the universe    Moderate
               and the forces that determine them.
SC.912.E.5.3   Describe and predict how the initial mass of a star determines its evolution.       Moderate
SC.912.E.5.4   Explain the physical properties of the Sun and its dynamic nature and connect       High
               them to conditions and events on Earth.
SC.912.E.5.5   Explain the formation of planetary systems based on our knowledge of our Solar      High
               System and apply this knowledge to newly discovered planetary systems.
SC.912.E.5.7   Relate the history of and explain the justification for future space exploration    High
               and continuing technology development.
SC.912.E.5.8   Connect the concepts of radiation and the electromagnetic spectrum to the use of    High
               historical and newly-developed observational tools.
SC.912.E.5.9   Analyze the broad effects of space exploration on the economy and culture of        High
               Florida.
SC.912.E.5.10  Describe and apply the coordinate system used to locate objects in the sky.         Moderate
SC.912.E.5.11  Distinguish the various methods of measuring astronomical distances and apply       High
               each in appropriate situations.
SC.912.E.6.6   Analyze past, present, and potential future consequences to the environment         High
               resulting from various energy production technologies.
SC.912.E.7.7   Identify, analyze, and relate the internal (Earth system) and external              High
               (astronomical) conditions that contribute to global climate change.
SC.912.P.10.4  Describe heat as the energy transferred by convection, conduction, and              High
               radiation, and explain the connection of heat to change in temperature or states
               of matter.
SC.912.P.10.6  Create and interpret potential energy diagrams, for example: chemical reactions,    High
               orbits around a central body, motion of a pendulum.
SC.912.P.10.8  Explain entropy's role in determining the efficiency of processes that convert      High
               energy to work.
SC.912.P.10.9  Describe the quantization of energy at the atomic level.                            Moderate
SC.912.P.10.10 Compare the magnitude and range of the four fundamental forces (gravitational, Moderate
               electromagnetic, weak nuclear, strong nuclear).
SC.912.P.10.11 Explain and compare nuclear reactions (radioactive decay, fission and fusion), High
               the energy changes associated with them and their associated safety issues.
SC.912.P.10.12 Differentiate between chemical and nuclear reactions.                               Moderate
SC.912.P.10.16 Explain the relationship between moving charges and magnetic fields, as well as High
               changing magnetic fields and electric fields, and their application to modern
               technologies.
                                                       164


SC.912.P.10.17    Explore the theory of electromagnetism by explaining electromagnetic waves in        High
                  terms of oscillating electric and magnetic fields.
SC.912.P.10.18    Explore the theory of electromagnetism by comparing and contrasting the              High
                  different parts of the electromagnetic spectrum in terms of wavelength,
                  frequency, and energy, and relate them to phenomena and applications.
SC.912.P.10.19    Explain that all objects emit and absorb electromagnetic radiation and               High
                  distinguish between objects that are blackbody radiators and those that are not.
SC.912.P.10.21    Qualitatively describe the shift in frequency in sound or electromagnetic waves      Moderate
                  due to the relative motion of a source or a receiver.
SC.912.P.12.5     Apply the law of conservation of linear momentum to interactions, such as            High
                  collisions between objects.
SC.912.P.12.6     Qualitatively apply the concept of angular momentum.                                 High
SC.912.P.12.8     Recognize that Newton's Laws are a limiting case of Einstein's Special Theory        Low
                  of Relativity at speeds that are much smaller than the speed of light.
SC.912.P.12.9     Recognize that time, length, and energy depend on the frame of reference.            Low
SC.912.P.12.10    Interpret the behavior of ideal gases in terms of kinetic molecular theory.          High
SC.912.L.15.2     Discuss the use of molecular clocks to estimate how long ago various groups of       Moderate
                  organisms diverged evolutionarily from one another.
SC.912.L.16.10    Evaluate the impact of biotechnology on the individual, society and the              High
                  environment, including medical and ethical issues.
SC.912.L.17.11    Evaluate the costs and benefits of renewable and nonrenewable resources, such        High
                  as water, energy, fossil fuels, wildlife, and forests.
SC.912.L.17.15    Discuss the effects of technology on environmental quality.                          Moderate
SC.912.L.18.12    Discuss the special properties of water that contribute to Earth's suitability as an Moderate
                  environment for life: cohesive behavior, ability to moderate temperature,
                  expansion upon freezing, and versatility as a solvent.
MA.912.S.1.2      Determine appropriate and consistent standards of measurement for the data to Moderate
                  be collected in a survey or experiment.
MA.912.S.3.2      Collect, organize, and analyze data sets, determine the best format for the data     High
                  and present visual summaries from the following:
LA.910.4.2.2      The student will record information and ideas from primary and/or secondary
                  sources accurately and coherently, noting the validity and reliability of these
                  sources and attributing sources of information;
LA.910.2.2.3      The student will organize information to show understanding or relationships
                  among facts, ideas, and events (e.g., representing key points within text through
                  charting, mapping, paraphrasing, summarizing, comparing, contrasting, or
                  outlining);
               Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code    Access Point Descriptor
SC.912.N.1.In.a       Identify a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, including life science, earth
                      and space science, or physical science, and do the following: 1. Identify a scientific
                      question 2. Examine reliable sources of informtion to identify what is already k
SC.912.N.1.Su.b       Identify the basic process used in scientific investigations, including questioning,
                      observing, recording, determining, and sharing results.
SC.912.N.1.Pa.c       Recognize that when a variety of common activities are repeated the same way, the
                      outcomes are the same.
SC.912.N.2.In.a       Identify examples of investigations that involve science.
SC.912.N.2.Su.b       Recognize that what is known about science can change based on new information.
                                                          165


SC.912.N.3.In.a  Recognize that a scientific theory is developed by repeated investigations of many
                 scientists and agreement on the likely explanation.
SC.912.N.3.In.b  Identify examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in the natural world, such
                 as Newton’s laws.
SC.912.N.3.Su.b  Recognize examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in nature, such as
                 Newton’s laws.
SC.912.N.3.Su.c  Recognize ways models are used in the study of science.
SC.912.N.4.In.a  Identify ways scientific knowledge and problem solving benefit people.
SC.912.N.4.Su.b  Recognize that some strategies may cost more to solve a problem.
SC.912.E.5.In.a  Recognize that the Milky Way is part of the expanding universe.
SC.912.E.5.Su.b  Recognize that stars are made of burning gases.
SC.912.E.5.Pa.c  Observe and recognize effects of the Sun on Earth, such as temperature changes.
SC.912.E.7.In.a  Identify cycles that occur on Earth, such as the water and carbon cycles, and the role
                 energy plays in them.
SC.912.E.7.Su.b  Recognize that currents move the ocean water around Earth.
SC.912.E.7.Pa.c  Recognize that humans, plants, and animals live on the Earth (biosphere).
SC.912.P.10.In.a Identify examples of energy being transformed from one form to another (conserved
                 quantity).
SC.912.P.10.Su.b Recognize the relationship between work and power, such as power is the amount of
                 work a person or machine does.
SC.912.P.10.Pa.c Recognize the source and recipient of heat transfer.
SC.912.P.12.In.a Recognize that scalar quantities describe the magnitude of the measurement, such as
                 size, weight, volume, area, temperature, or speed.
SC.912.P.12.Su.b Recognize that acceleration generally involves a change in speed.
SC.912.P.12.Pa.c Identify the source of the force moving an object.
SC.912.L.16.In.a Identify that genes are sets of instructions that determine which characteristics are passed
                 from parent to offspring.
SC.912.L.16.Su.b Recognize that all organisms have a substance called DNA with unique information.
SC.912.L.16.Pa.c Recognize that illness can result when parts of our bodies are not working properly.
SC.912.L.17.In.a Recognize that living things in oceans and fresh water are affected by the location,
                 availability of light, depth of the water, and temperature.
SC.912.L.17.Su.b Recognize how animals and plants in an ecosystem may be affected by changes to the
                 food supply or climate.
SC.912.L.17.Pa.c Recognize examples of mutual relationships between people and other living things.
SC.912.L.18.In.a Identify that carbohydrates, fats, proteins, and nucleic acids (macromolecules) are
                 important for human organisms.
SC.912.L.18.Su.b Recognize that the function of photosynthesis is to produce food for plants.
SC.912.L.18.Pa.c Identify that food is a source of energy.
                                                     166


                              2003600 Principles of Technology I
Section: Basic and Adult Education                          Grade Group: Secondary Grades 9-12
Subject: Science                                            Domain: Physical Sciences
Course Length: Year                                         Level: 2
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                  Benchmarks
                                                                                                        Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                     Knowledge
SC.912.N.1.1       Define a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, for example: biology, High
                   chemistry, physics, and earth/space science, and do the following:
SC.912.N.1.2       Describe and explain what characterizes science and its methods.                     Moderate
SC.912.N.1.3       Recognize that the strength or usefulness of a scientific claim is evaluated         Low
                   through scientific argumentation, which depends on critical and logical
                   thinking, and the active consideration of alternative scientific explanations to
                   explain the data present
SC.912.N.1.4       Identify sources of information and assess their reliability according to the strict High
                   standards of scientific investigation.
SC.912.N.1.5       Describe and provide examples of how similar investigations conducted in many        Moderate
                   parts of the world result in the same outcome.
SC.912.N.1.6       Describe how scientific inferences are drawn from scientific observations and        Moderate
                   provide examples from the content being studied.
SC.912.N.1.7       Recognize the role of creativity in constructing scientific questions, methods and   Low
                   explanations.
SC.912.N.2.1       Identify what is science, what clearly is not science, and what superficially        High
                   resembles science (but fails to meet the criteria for science).
SC.912.N.2.2       Identify which questions can be answered through science and which questions         High
                   are outside the boundaries of scientific investigation, such as questions
                   addressed by other ways of knowing, such as art, philosophy, and religion.
SC.912.N.2.3       Identify examples of pseudoscience (such as astrology, phrenology) in society.       Low
SC.912.N.2.4       Explain that scientific knowledge is both durable and robust and open to change.     High
                   Scientific knowledge can change because it is often examined and re-examined
                   by new investigations and scientific argumentation. Because of these frequent
                   examinations, scien
SC.912.N.2.5       Describe instances in which scientists' varied backgrounds, talents, interests, and  High
                   goals influence the inferences and thus the explanations that they make about
                   observations of natural phenomena and describe that competing interpretations
                   (explanations)
SC.912.N.3.1       Explain that a scientific theory is the culmination of many scientific               High
                   investigations drawing together all the current evidence concerning a substantial
                   range of phenomena; thus, a scientific theory represents the most powerful
                   explanation scientists have
SC.912.N.3.2       Describe the role consensus plays in the historical development of a theory in       Moderate
                   any one of the disciplines of science.
SC.912.N.3.3       Explain that scientific laws are descriptions of specific relationships under given  Moderate
                   conditions in nature, but do not offer explanations for those relationships.
SC.912.N.3.4       Recognize that theories do not become laws, nor do laws become theories;             Moderate
                   theories are well supported explanations and laws are well supported
                   descriptions.
                                                           167


SC.912.N.3.5   Describe the function of models in science, and identify the wide range of         Moderate
               models used in science.
SC.912.N.4.1   Explain how scientific knowledge and reasoning provide an empirically-based        Moderate
               perspective to inform society's decision making.
SC.912.N.4.2   Weigh the merits of alternative strategies for solving a specific societal problem High
               by comparing a number of different costs and benefits, such as human,
               economic, and environmental.
SC.912.E.5.7   Relate the history of and explain the justification for future space exploration   High
               and continuing technology development.
SC.912.E.5.9   Analyze the broad effects of space exploration on the economy and culture of       High
               Florida.
SC.912.E.6.6   Analyze past, present, and potential future consequences to the environment        High
               resulting from various energy production technologies.
SC.912.P.8.1   Differentiate among the four states of matter.                                     Moderate
SC.912.P.8.4   Explore the scientific theory of atoms (also known as atomic theory) by            High
               describing the structure of atoms in terms of protons, neutrons and electrons, and
               differentiate among these particles in terms of their mass, electrical charges and
               locations within
SC.912.P.10.1  Differentiate among the various forms of energy and recognize that they can be     Moderate
               transformed from one form to others.
SC.912.P.10.2  Explore the Law of Conservation of Energy by differentiating among open,           High
               closed, and isolated systems and explain that the total energy in an isolated
               system is a conserved quantity.
SC.912.P.10.3  Compare and contrast work and power qualitatively and quantitatively.              Moderate
SC.912.P.10.4  Describe heat as the energy transferred by convection, conduction, and             High
               radiation, and explain the connection of heat to change in temperature or states
               of matter.
SC.912.P.10.5  Relate temperature to the average molecular kinetic energy.                        Moderate
SC.912.P.10.6  Create and interpret potential energy diagrams, for example: chemical reactions,   High
               orbits around a central body, motion of a pendulum.
SC.912.P.10.10 Compare the magnitude and range of the four fundamental forces (gravitational,     Moderate
               electromagnetic, weak nuclear, strong nuclear).
SC.912.P.10.13 Relate the configuration of static charges to the electric field, electric force,  High
               electric potential, and electric potential energy.
SC.912.P.10.14 Differentiate among conductors, semiconductors, and insulators.                    Moderate
SC.912.P.10.15 Investigate and explain the relationships among current, voltage, resistance, and  High
               power.
SC.912.P.12.1  Distinguish between scalar and vector quantities and assess which should be        High
               used to describe an event.
SC.912.P.12.2  Analyze the motion of an object in terms of its position, velocity, and            High
               acceleration (with respect to a frame of reference) as functions of time.
SC.912.P.12.3  Interpret and apply Newton's three laws of motion.                                 High
SC.912.P.12.4  Describe how the gravitational force between two objects depends on their          Moderate
               masses and the distance between them.
SC.912.P.12.5  Apply the law of conservation of linear momentum to interactions, such as          High
               collisions between objects.
SC.912.L.17.11 Evaluate the costs and benefits of renewable and nonrenewable resources, such      High
               as water, energy, fossil fuels, wildlife, and forests.
SC.912.L.17.15 Discuss the effects of technology on environmental quality.                        Moderate
                                                       168


MA.912.S.1.2      Determine appropriate and consistent standards of measurement for the data to Moderate
                  be collected in a survey or experiment.
MA.912.S.3.2      Collect, organize, and analyze data sets, determine the best format for the data     High
                  and present visual summaries from the following:
LA.910.4.2.2      The student will record information and ideas from primary and/or secondary
                  sources accurately and coherently, noting the validity and reliability of these
                  sources and attributing sources of information;
LA.910.2.2.3      The student will organize information to show understanding or relationships
                  among facts, ideas, and events (e.g., representing key points within text through
                  charting, mapping, paraphrasing, summarizing, comparing, contrasting, or
                  outlining);
               Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code    Access Point Descriptor
SC.912.N.1.In.a       Identify a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, including life science, earth
                      and space science, or physical science, and do the following: 1. Identify a scientific
                      question 2. Examine reliable sources of informtion to identify what is already k
SC.912.N.1.Su.b       Identify the basic process used in scientific investigations, including questioning,
                      observing, recording, determining, and sharing results.
SC.912.N.1.Pa.c       Recognize that when a variety of common activities are repeated the same way, the
                      outcomes are the same.
SC.912.N.2.In.a       Identify examples of investigations that involve science.
SC.912.N.2.Su.b       Recognize that what is known about science can change based on new information.
SC.912.N.3.In.a       Recognize that a scientific theory is developed by repeated investigations of many
                      scientists and agreement on the likely explanation.
SC.912.N.3.In.b       Identify examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in the natural world, such
                      as Newton’s laws.
SC.912.N.3.Su.b       Recognize examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in nature, such as
                      Newton’s laws.
SC.912.N.3.Su.c       Recognize ways models are used in the study of science.
SC.912.N.4.In.a       Identify ways scientific knowledge and problem solving benefit people.
SC.912.N.4.Su.b       Recognize that some strategies may cost more to solve a problem.
SC.912.E.5.In.a       Recognize that the Milky Way is part of the expanding universe.
SC.912.E.5.Su.b       Recognize that stars are made of burning gases.
SC.912.E.5.Pa.c       Observe and recognize effects of the Sun on Earth, such as temperature changes.
SC.912.P.8.In.a       Classify states of matter as solid, liquid, and gaseous.
SC.912.P.8.Su.b       Identify examples of physical and chemical changes.
SC.912.P.8.Pa.c       Recognize that the parts of an object can be put together to make a whole.
SC.912.P.10.In.a      Identify examples of energy being transformed from one form to another (conserved
                      quantity).
SC.912.P.10.Su.b      Recognize the relationship between work and power, such as power is the amount of
                      work a person or machine does.
SC.912.P.10.Pa.c      Recognize the source and recipient of heat transfer.
SC.912.P.12.In.a      Recognize that scalar quantities describe the magnitude of the measurement, such as
                      size, weight, volume, area, temperature, or speed.
SC.912.P.12.Su.b      Recognize that acceleration generally involves a change in speed.
                                                          169


SC.912.P.12.Pa.c       Identify the source of the force moving an object.
SC.912.L.17.In.a       Recognize that living things in oceans and fresh water are affected by the location,
                       availability of light, depth of the water, and temperature.
SC.912.L.17.Su.b       Recognize how animals and plants in an ecosystem may be affected by changes to the
                       food supply or climate.
SC.912.L.17.Pa.c       Recognize examples of mutual relationships between people and other living things.
                              2003610 Principles of Technology II
Section: Basic and Adult Education                          Grade Group: Secondary Grades 9-12
Subject: Science                                            Domain: Physical Sciences
Course Length: Year                                         Level: 2
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                   Benchmarks
                                                                                                        Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                     Knowledge
SC.912.N.1.1       Define a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, for example: biology, High
                   chemistry, physics, and earth/space science, and do the following:
SC.912.N.1.2       Describe and explain what characterizes science and its methods.                     Moderate
SC.912.N.1.3       Recognize that the strength or usefulness of a scientific claim is evaluated         Low
                   through scientific argumentation, which depends on critical and logical
                   thinking, and the active consideration of alternative scientific explanations to
                   explain the data present
SC.912.N.1.4       Identify sources of information and assess their reliability according to the strict High
                   standards of scientific investigation.
SC.912.N.1.5       Describe and provide examples of how similar investigations conducted in many        Moderate
                   parts of the world result in the same outcome.
SC.912.N.1.6       Describe how scientific inferences are drawn from scientific observations and        Moderate
                   provide examples from the content being studied.
SC.912.N.1.7       Recognize the role of creativity in constructing scientific questions, methods and   Low
                   explanations.
SC.912.N.2.1       Identify what is science, what clearly is not science, and what superficially        High
                   resembles science (but fails to meet the criteria for science).
SC.912.N.2.2       Identify which questions can be answered through science and which questions         High
                   are outside the boundaries of scientific investigation, such as questions
                   addressed by other ways of knowing, such as art, philosophy, and religion.
SC.912.N.2.3       Identify examples of pseudoscience (such as astrology, phrenology) in society.       Low
SC.912.N.2.4       Explain that scientific knowledge is both durable and robust and open to change. High
                   Scientific knowledge can change because it is often examined and re-examined
                   by new investigations and scientific argumentation. Because of these frequent
                   examinations, scien
SC.912.N.2.5       Describe instances in which scientists' varied backgrounds, talents, interests, and High
                   goals influence the inferences and thus the explanations that they make about
                   observations of natural phenomena and describe that competing interpretations
                   (explanations)
SC.912.N.3.1       Explain that a scientific theory is the culmination of many scientific               High
                   investigations drawing together all the current evidence concerning a substantial
                   range of phenomena; thus, a scientific theory represents the most powerful
                   explanation scientists have
                                                           170


SC.912.N.3.2   Describe the role consensus plays in the historical development of a theory in      Moderate
               any one of the disciplines of science.
SC.912.N.3.3   Explain that scientific laws are descriptions of specific relationships under given Moderate
               conditions in nature, but do not offer explanations for those relationships.
SC.912.N.3.4   Recognize that theories do not become laws, nor do laws become theories;            Moderate
               theories are well supported explanations and laws are well supported
               descriptions.
SC.912.N.3.5   Describe the function of models in science, and identify the wide range of          Moderate
               models used in science.
SC.912.N.4.1   Explain how scientific knowledge and reasoning provide an empirically-based         Moderate
               perspective to inform society's decision making.
SC.912.N.4.2   Weigh the merits of alternative strategies for solving a specific societal problem  High
               by comparing a number of different costs and benefits, such as human,
               economic, and environmental.
SC.912.E.5.7   Relate the history of and explain the justification for future space exploration    High
               and continuing technology development.
SC.912.E.5.8   Connect the concepts of radiation and the electromagnetic spectrum to the use of    High
               historical and newly-developed observational tools.
SC.912.E.5.9   Analyze the broad effects of space exploration on the economy and culture of        High
               Florida.
SC.912.E.6.6   Analyze past, present, and potential future consequences to the environment         High
               resulting from various energy production technologies.
SC.912.P.8.1   Differentiate among the four states of matter.                                      Moderate
SC.912.P.8.4   Explore the scientific theory of atoms (also known as atomic theory) by             High
               describing the structure of atoms in terms of protons, neutrons and electrons, and
               differentiate among these particles in terms of their mass, electrical charges and
               locations within
SC.912.P.10.1  Differentiate among the various forms of energy and recognize that they can be      Moderate
               transformed from one form to others.
SC.912.P.10.2  Explore the Law of Conservation of Energy by differentiating among open,            High
               closed, and isolated systems and explain that the total energy in an isolated
               system is a conserved quantity.
SC.912.P.10.4  Describe heat as the energy transferred by convection, conduction, and              High
               radiation, and explain the connection of heat to change in temperature or states
               of matter.
SC.912.P.10.5  Relate temperature to the average molecular kinetic energy.                         Moderate
SC.912.P.10.6  Create and interpret potential energy diagrams, for example: chemical reactions,    High
               orbits around a central body, motion of a pendulum.
SC.912.P.10.10 Compare the magnitude and range of the four fundamental forces (gravitational,      Moderate
               electromagnetic, weak nuclear, strong nuclear).
SC.912.P.10.13 Relate the configuration of static charges to the electric field, electric force,   High
               electric potential, and electric potential energy.
SC.912.P.10.15 Investigate and explain the relationships among current, voltage, resistance, and   High
               power.
SC.912.P.10.16 Explain the relationship between moving charges and magnetic fields, as well as     High
               changing magnetic fields and electric fields, and their application to modern
               technologies.
SC.912.P.10.17 Explore the theory of electromagnetism by explaining electromagnetic waves in       High
               terms of oscillating electric and magnetic fields.
                                                       171


SC.912.P.10.18    Explore the theory of electromagnetism by comparing and contrasting the              High
                  different parts of the electromagnetic spectrum in terms of wavelength,
                  frequency, and energy, and relate them to phenomena and applications.
SC.912.P.10.20    Describe the measurable properties of waves and explain the relationships            High
                  among them and how these properties change when the wave moves from one
                  medium to another.
SC.912.P.10.21    Qualitatively describe the shift in frequency in sound or electromagnetic waves      Moderate
                  due to the relative motion of a source or a receiver.
SC.912.P.10.22    Construct ray diagrams and use thin lens and mirror equations to locate the          High
                  images formed by lenses and mirrors.
SC.912.P.12.7     Recognize that nothing travels faster than the speed of light in vacuum which is     Low
                  the same for all observers no matter how they or the light source are moving.
SC.912.L.17.11    Evaluate the costs and benefits of renewable and nonrenewable resources, such        High
                  as water, energy, fossil fuels, wildlife, and forests.
SC.912.L.17.15    Discuss the effects of technology on environmental quality.                          Moderate
MA.912.S.1.2      Determine appropriate and consistent standards of measurement for the data to Moderate
                  be collected in a survey or experiment.
MA.912.S.3.2      Collect, organize, and analyze data sets, determine the best format for the data     High
                  and present visual summaries from the following:
LA.910.4.2.2      The student will record information and ideas from primary and/or secondary
                  sources accurately and coherently, noting the validity and reliability of these
                  sources and attributing sources of information;
LA.910.2.2.3      The student will organize information to show understanding or relationships
                  among facts, ideas, and events (e.g., representing key points within text through
                  charting, mapping, paraphrasing, summarizing, comparing, contrasting, or
                  outlining);
               Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code    Access Point Descriptor
SC.912.N.1.In.a       Identify a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, including life science, earth
                      and space science, or physical science, and do the following: 1. Identify a scientific
                      question 2. Examine reliable sources of informtion to identify what is already k
SC.912.N.1.Su.b       Identify the basic process used in scientific investigations, including questioning,
                      observing, recording, determining, and sharing results.
SC.912.N.1.Pa.c       Recognize that when a variety of common activities are repeated the same way, the
                      outcomes are the same.
SC.912.N.2.In.a       Identify examples of investigations that involve science.
SC.912.N.2.Su.b       Recognize that what is known about science can change based on new information.
SC.912.N.3.In.a       Recognize that a scientific theory is developed by repeated investigations of many
                      scientists and agreement on the likely explanation.
SC.912.N.3.In.b       Identify examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in the natural world, such
                      as Newton’s laws.
SC.912.N.3.Su.b       Recognize examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in nature, such as
                      Newton’s laws.
SC.912.N.3.Su.c       Recognize ways models are used in the study of science.
SC.912.N.4.In.a       Identify ways scientific knowledge and problem solving benefit people.
SC.912.N.4.Su.b       Recognize that some strategies may cost more to solve a problem.
SC.912.E.5.In.a       Recognize that the Milky Way is part of the expanding universe.
                                                          172


SC.912.E.5.Su.b        Recognize that stars are made of burning gases.
SC.912.E.5.Pa.c        Observe and recognize effects of the Sun on Earth, such as temperature changes.
SC.912.P.8.In.a        Classify states of matter as solid, liquid, and gaseous.
SC.912.P.8.Su.b        Identify examples of physical and chemical changes.
SC.912.P.8.Pa.c        Recognize that the parts of an object can be put together to make a whole.
SC.912.P.10.In.a       Identify examples of energy being transformed from one form to another (conserved
                       quantity).
SC.912.P.10.Su.b       Recognize the relationship between work and power, such as power is the amount of
                       work a person or machine does.
SC.912.P.10.Pa.c       Recognize the source and recipient of heat transfer.
SC.912.P.12.In.a       Recognize that scalar quantities describe the magnitude of the measurement, such as
                       size, weight, volume, area, temperature, or speed.
SC.912.P.12.Su.b       Recognize that acceleration generally involves a change in speed.
SC.912.P.12.Pa.c       Identify the source of the force moving an object.
SC.912.L.17.In.a       Recognize that living things in oceans and fresh water are affected by the location,
                       availability of light, depth of the water, and temperature.
SC.912.L.17.Su.b       Recognize how animals and plants in an ecosystem may be affected by changes to the
                       food supply or climate.
SC.912.L.17.Pa.c       Recognize examples of mutual relationships between people and other living things.
                                       3027010 Biotechnology 1
Section: Basic and Adult Education                           Grade Group: Secondary Grades 9-12
Subject: Science                                             Domain: Integrated Sciences
Course Length: Year                                          Level: 3
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                   Benchmarks
                                                                                                        Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                     Knowledge
SC.912.N.1.1       Define a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, for example: biology, High
                   chemistry, physics, and earth/space science, and do the following:
SC.912.N.1.2       Describe and explain what characterizes science and its methods.                     Moderate
SC.912.N.1.3       Recognize that the strength or usefulness of a scientific claim is evaluated         Low
                   through scientific argumentation, which depends on critical and logical
                   thinking, and the active consideration of alternative scientific explanations to
                   explain the data present
SC.912.N.1.4       Identify sources of information and assess their reliability according to the strict High
                   standards of scientific investigation.
SC.912.N.1.6       Describe how scientific inferences are drawn from scientific observations and        Moderate
                   provide examples from the content being studied.
SC.912.N.2.1       Identify what is science, what clearly is not science, and what superficially        High
                   resembles science (but fails to meet the criteria for science).
SC.912.N.2.2       Identify which questions can be answered through science and which questions         High
                   are outside the boundaries of scientific investigation, such as questions
                   addressed by other ways of knowing, such as art, philosophy, and religion.
                                                           173


SC.912.N.3.1   Explain that a scientific theory is the culmination of many scientific              High
               investigations drawing together all the current evidence concerning a substantial
               range of phenomena; thus, a scientific theory represents the most powerful
               explanation scientists have
SC.912.N.3.4   Recognize that theories do not become laws, nor do laws become theories;            Moderate
               theories are well supported explanations and laws are well supported
               descriptions.
SC.912.N.4.1   Explain how scientific knowledge and reasoning provide an empirically-based         Moderate
               perspective to inform society's decision making.
SC.912.N.4.2   Weigh the merits of alternative strategies for solving a specific societal problem  High
               by comparing a number of different costs and benefits, such as human,
               economic, and environmental.
SC.912.E.6.6   Analyze past, present, and potential future consequences to the environment         High
               resulting from various energy production technologies.
SC.912.P.8.12  Describe the properties of the carbon atom that make the diversity of carbon        Moderate
               compounds possible.
SC.912.P.10.15 Investigate and explain the relationships among current, voltage, resistance, and   High
               power.
SC.912.P.12.12 Explain how various factors, such as concentration, temperature, and presence of    High
               a catalyst affect the rate of a chemical reaction.
SC.912.L.14.1  Describe the scientific theory of cells (cell theory) and relate the history of its Moderate
               discovery to the process of science.
SC.912.L.14.2  Relate structure to function for the components of plant and animal cells.          Moderate
               Explain the role of cell membranes as a highly selective barrier (passive and
               active transport).
SC.912.L.14.3  Compare and contrast the general structures of plant and animal cells. Compare      Moderate
               and contrast the general structures of prokaryotic and eukaryotic cells.
SC.912.L.14.4  Compare and contrast structure and function of various types of microscopes.        Moderate
SC.912.L.14.6  Explain the significance of genetic factors, environmental factors, and             High
               pathogenic agents to health from the perspectives of both individual and public
               health.
SC.912.L.15.1  Explain how the scientific theory of evolution is supported by the fossil record,   High
               comparative anatomy, comparative embryology, biogeography, molecular
               biology, and observed evolutionary change.
SC.912.L.15.4  Describe how and why organisms are hierarchically classified and based on           High
               evolutionary relationships.
SC.912.L.15.5  Explain the reasons for changes in how organisms are classified.                    High
SC.912.L.15.6  Discuss distinguishing characteristics of the domains and kingdoms of living        Moderate
               organisms.
SC.912.L.15.8  Describe the scientific explanations of the origin of life on Earth.                Moderate
SC.912.L.15.15 Describe how mutation and genetic recombination increase genetic variation.         Moderate
SC.912.L.16.1  Use Mendel's laws of segregation and independent assortment to analyze              High
               patterns of inheritance.
SC.912.L.16.2  Discuss observed inheritance patterns caused by various modes of inheritance,       High
               including dominant, recessive, codominant, sex-linked, polygenic, and multiple
               alleles.
SC.912.L.16.3  Describe the basic process of DNA replication and how it relates to the             High
               transmission and conservation of the genetic information.
SC.912.L.16.4  Explain how mutations in the DNA sequence may or may not result in                  High
               phenotypic change. Explain how mutations in gametes may result in phenotypic
               changes in offspring.
                                                       174


SC.912.L.16.5  Explain the basic processes of transcription and translation, and how they result    High
               in the expression of genes.
SC.912.L.16.6  Discuss the mechanisms for regulation of gene expression in prokaryotes and          High
               eukaryotes at transcription and translation level.
SC.912.L.16.7  Describe how viruses and bacteria transfer genetic material between cells and        High
               the role of this process in biotechnology.
SC.912.L.16.8  Explain the relationship between mutation, cell cycle, and uncontrolled cell         Moderate
               growth potentially resulting in cancer.
SC.912.L.16.9  Explain how and why the genetic code is universal and is common to almost all        Moderate
               organisms.
SC.912.L.16.10 Evaluate the impact of biotechnology on the individual, society and the              High
               environment, including medical and ethical issues.
SC.912.L.16.11 Discuss the technologies associated with forensic medicine and DNA                   High
               identification, including restriction fragment length polymorphism (RFLP)
               analysis.
SC.912.L.16.12 Describe how basic DNA technology (restriction digestion by endonucleases,           Moderate
               gel electrophoresis, polymerase chain reaction, ligation, and transformation) is
               used to construct recombinant DNA molecules (DNA cloning).
SC.912.L.16.14 Describe the cell cycle, including the process of mitosis. Explain the role of       Moderate
               mitosis in the formation of new cells and its importance in maintaining
               chromosome number during asexual reproduction.
SC.912.L.16.16 Describe the process of meiosis, including independent assortment and crossing       Moderate
               over. Explain how reduction division results in the formation of haploid gametes
               or spores.
SC.912.L.16.17 Compare and contrast mitosis and meiosis and relate to the processes of sexual       High
               and asexual reproduction and their consequences for genetic variation.
SC.912.L.17.17 Assess the effectiveness of innovative methods of protecting the environment.        High
SC.912.L.18.1  Describe the basic molecular structures and primary functions of the four major      Moderate
               categories of biological macromolecules.
SC.912.L.18.4  Describe the structures of proteins and amino acids. Explain the functions of        Moderate
               proteins in living organisms. Identify some reactions that amino acids undergo.
               Relate the structure and function of enzymes.
SC.912.L.18.6  Discuss the role of anaerobic respiration in living things and in human society.     Moderate
SC.912.L.18.7  Identify the reactants, products, and basic functions of photosynthesis.             Moderate
SC.912.L.18.8  Identify the reactants, products, and basic functions of aerobic and anaerobic       Moderate
               cellular respiration.
SC.912.L.18.10 Connect the role of adenosine triphosphate (ATP) to energy transfers within a        High
               cell.
SC.912.L.18.11 Explain the role of enzymes as catalysts that lower the activation energy of         Moderate
               biochemical reactions. Identify factors, such as pH and temperature, and their
               effect on enzyme activity.
SC.912.L.18.12 Discuss the special properties of water that contribute to Earth's suitability as an Moderate
               environment for life: cohesive behavior, ability to moderate temperature,
               expansion upon freezing, and versatility as a solvent.
MA.912.S.1.2   Determine appropriate and consistent standards of measurement for the data to        Moderate
               be collected in a survey or experiment.
MA.912.S.3.2   Collect, organize, and analyze data sets, determine the best format for the data     High
               and present visual summaries from the following:
LA.910.4.2.2   The student will record information and ideas from primary and/or secondary
               sources accurately and coherently, noting the validity and reliability of these
               sources and attributing sources of information;
                                                       175


LA.910.2.2.3      The student will organize information to show understanding or relationships
                  among facts, ideas, and events (e.g., representing key points within text through
                  charting, mapping, paraphrasing, summarizing, comparing, contrasting, or
                  outlining);
HE.912.C.1.3      Evaluate how environment and personal health are interrelated.
HE.912.C.1.4      Analyze how heredity and family history can impact personal health.
               Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code    Access Point Descriptor
SC.912.N.1.In.a       Identify a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, including life science, earth
                      and space science, or physical science, and do the following: 1. Identify a scientific
                      question 2. Examine reliable sources of informtion to identify what is already k
SC.912.N.1.Su.b       Identify the basic process used in scientific investigations, including questioning,
                      observing, recording, determining, and sharing results.
SC.912.N.1.Pa.c       Recognize that when a variety of common activities are repeated the same way, the
                      outcomes are the same.
SC.912.N.2.In.a       Identify examples of investigations that involve science.
SC.912.N.2.Su.b       Recognize that what is known about science can change based on new information.
SC.912.N.3.In.a       Recognize that a scientific theory is developed by repeated investigations of many
                      scientists and agreement on the likely explanation.
SC.912.N.3.In.b       Identify examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in the natural world, such
                      as Newton’s laws.
SC.912.N.3.Su.b       Recognize examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in nature, such as
                      Newton’s laws.
SC.912.N.3.Su.c       Recognize ways models are used in the study of science.
SC.912.N.4.In.a       Identify ways scientific knowledge and problem solving benefit people.
SC.912.N.4.Su.b       Recognize that some strategies may cost more to solve a problem.
SC.912.P.8.In.a       Classify states of matter as solid, liquid, and gaseous.
SC.912.P.8.Su.b       Identify examples of physical and chemical changes.
SC.912.P.8.Pa.c       Recognize that the parts of an object can be put together to make a whole.
SC.912.P.10.In.a      Identify examples of energy being transformed from one form to another (conserved
                      quantity).
SC.912.P.10.Su.b      Recognize the relationship between work and power, such as power is the amount of
                      work a person or machine does.
SC.912.P.10.Pa.c      Recognize the source and recipient of heat transfer.
SC.912.L.14.In.a      Identify that all living things are made of cells and cells function in similar ways (cell
                      theory).
SC.912.L.14.Su.b      Recognize that cells have different parts and each has a function.
SC.912.L.14.Pa.c      Identify ways to prevent infection from bacteria and viruses, such as hand washing and
                      first aid.
SC.912.L.15.In.a      Identify that prehistoric plants and animals changed over time (evolved) or became
                      extinct.
SC.912.L.15.Su.b      Match organisms to the animal, plant, and fungus kingdoms.
SC.912.L.15.Pa.c      Recognize that animals produce offspring.
SC.912.L.16.In.a      Identify that genes are sets of instructions that determine which characteristics are passed
                      from parent to offspring.
                                                          176


SC.912.L.16.Su.b       Recognize that all organisms have a substance called DNA with unique information.
SC.912.L.16.Pa.c       Recognize that illness can result when parts of our bodies are not working properly.
SC.912.L.18.In.a       Identify that carbohydrates, fats, proteins, and nucleic acids (macromolecules) are
                       important for human organisms.
SC.912.L.18.Su.b       Recognize that the function of photosynthesis is to produce food for plants.
SC.912.L.18.Pa.c       Identify that food is a source of energy.
                                       3027020 Biotechnology 2
Section: Basic and Adult Education                          Grade Group: Secondary Grades 9-12
Subject: Science                                            Domain: Integrated Sciences
Course Length: Year                                         Level: 3
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                   Benchmarks
                                                                                                        Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                     Knowledge
SC.912.N.1.1       Define a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, for example: biology,        High
                   chemistry, physics, and earth/space science, and do the following:
SC.912.N.1.3       Recognize that the strength or usefulness of a scientific claim is evaluated         Low
                   through scientific argumentation, which depends on critical and logical
                   thinking, and the active consideration of alternative scientific explanations to
                   explain the data present
SC.912.N.1.4       Identify sources of information and assess their reliability according to the strict High
                   standards of scientific investigation.
SC.912.N.1.5       Describe and provide examples of how similar investigations conducted in many        Moderate
                   parts of the world result in the same outcome.
SC.912.N.1.6       Describe how scientific inferences are drawn from scientific observations and        Moderate
                   provide examples from the content being studied.
SC.912.N.1.7       Recognize the role of creativity in constructing scientific questions, methods and   Low
                   explanations.
SC.912.N.4.1       Explain how scientific knowledge and reasoning provide an empirically-based          Moderate
                   perspective to inform society's decision making.
SC.912.N.4.2       Weigh the merits of alternative strategies for solving a specific societal problem   High
                   by comparing a number of different costs and benefits, such as human,
                   economic, and environmental.
SC.912.E.6.6       Analyze past, present, and potential future consequences to the environment          High
                   resulting from various energy production technologies.
SC.912.E.7.1       Analyze the movement of matter and energy through the different                      High
                   biogeochemical cycles, including water and carbon.
SC.912.P.12.12     Explain how various factors, such as concentration, temperature, and presence of     High
                   a catalyst affect the rate of a chemical reaction.
SC.912.L.14.1      Describe the scientific theory of cells (cell theory) and relate the history of its  Moderate
                   discovery to the process of science.
SC.912.L.14.2      Relate structure to function for the components of plant and animal cells.           Moderate
                   Explain the role of cell membranes as a highly selective barrier (passive and
                   active transport).
SC.912.L.14.3      Compare and contrast the general structures of plant and animal cells. Compare       Moderate
                   and contrast the general structures of prokaryotic and eukaryotic cells.
SC.912.L.14.4      Compare and contrast structure and function of various types of microscopes.         Moderate
                                                           177


SC.912.L.14.6  Explain the significance of genetic factors, environmental factors, and           High
               pathogenic agents to health from the perspectives of both individual and public
               health.
SC.912.L.14.7  Relate the structure of each of the major plant organs and tissues to             Moderate
               physiological processes.
SC.912.L.14.26 Identify the major parts of the brain on diagrams or models.                      Low
SC.912.L.14.36 Describe the factors affecting blood flow through the cardiovascular system.      Moderate
SC.912.L.14.37 Explain the components of an electrocardiogram.                                   Low
SC.912.L.14.52 Explain the basic functions of the human immune system, including specific and    Moderate
               nonspecific immune response, vaccines, and antibiotics.
SC.912.L.15.1  Explain how the scientific theory of evolution is supported by the fossil record, High
               comparative anatomy, comparative embryology, biogeography, molecular
               biology, and observed evolutionary change.
SC.912.L.15.10 Identify basic trends in hominid evolution from early ancestors six million years Moderate
               ago to modern humans, including brain size, jaw size, language, and
               manufacture of tools.
SC.912.L.15.13 Describe the conditions required for natural selection, including: overproduction Moderate
               of offspring, inherited variation, and the struggle to survive, which result in
               differential reproductive success.
SC.912.L.15.14 Discuss mechanisms of evolutionary change other than natural selection such as    Moderate
               genetic drift and gene flow.
SC.912.L.16.3  Describe the basic process of DNA replication and how it relates to the           High
               transmission and conservation of the genetic information.
SC.912.L.16.4  Explain how mutations in the DNA sequence may or may not result in                High
               phenotypic change. Explain how mutations in gametes may result in phenotypic
               changes in offspring.
SC.912.L.16.5  Explain the basic processes of transcription and translation, and how they result High
               in the expression of genes.
SC.912.L.16.6  Discuss the mechanisms for regulation of gene expression in prokaryotes and       High
               eukaryotes at transcription and translation level.
SC.912.L.16.7  Describe how viruses and bacteria transfer genetic material between cells and     High
               the role of this process in biotechnology.
SC.912.L.16.10 Evaluate the impact of biotechnology on the individual, society and the           High
               environment, including medical and ethical issues.
SC.912.L.16.11 Discuss the technologies associated with forensic medicine and DNA                High
               identification, including restriction fragment length polymorphism (RFLP)
               analysis.
SC.912.L.16.12 Describe how basic DNA technology (restriction digestion by endonucleases,        Moderate
               gel electrophoresis, polymerase chain reaction, ligation, and transformation) is
               used to construct recombinant DNA molecules (DNA cloning).
SC.912.L.16.13 Describe the basic anatomy and physiology of the human reproductive system.       Moderate
               Describe the process of human development from fertilization to birth and major
               changes that occur in each trimester of pregnancy.
SC.912.L.17.2  Explain the general distribution of life in aquatic systems as a function of      High
               chemistry, geography, light, depth, salinity, and temperature.
SC.912.L.17.3  Discuss how various oceanic and freshwater processes, such as currents, tides,    Moderate
               and waves, affect the abundance of aquatic organisms.
SC.912.L.17.4  Describe changes in ecosystems resulting from seasonal variations, climate        Moderate
               change and succession.
                                                       178


SC.912.L.17.5     Analyze how population size is determined by births, deaths, immigration,           High
                  emigration, and limiting factors (biotic and abiotic) that determine carrying
                  capacity.
SC.912.L.17.8     Recognize the consequences of the losses of biodiversity due to catastrophic        High
                  events, climate changes, human activity, and the introduction of invasive, non
                  native species.
SC.912.L.17.9     Use a food web to identify and distinguish producers, consumers, and                Moderate
                  decomposers. Explain the pathway of energy transfer through trophic levels and
                  the reduction of available energy at successive trophic levels.
SC.912.L.17.10    Diagram and explain the biogeochemical cycles of an ecosystem, including            Moderate
                  water, carbon, and nitrogen cycle.
SC.912.L.17.11    Evaluate the costs and benefits of renewable and nonrenewable resources, such       High
                  as water, energy, fossil fuels, wildlife, and forests.
SC.912.L.17.12    Discuss the political, social, and environmental consequences of sustainable use    High
                  of land.
SC.912.L.17.13    Discuss the need for adequate monitoring of environmental parameters when           High
                  making policy decisions.
SC.912.L.17.14    Assess the need for adequate waste management strategies.                           High
SC.912.L.17.15    Discuss the effects of technology on environmental quality.                         Moderate
SC.912.L.17.16    Discuss the large-scale environmental impacts resulting from human activity,        High
                  including waste spills, oil spills, runoff, greenhouse gases, ozone depletion, and
                  surface and groundwater pollution.
SC.912.L.17.20    Predict the impact of individuals on environmental systems and examine how          High
                  human lifestyles affect sustainability.
SC.912.L.18.1     Describe the basic molecular structures and primary functions of the four major     Moderate
                  categories of biological macromolecules.
SC.912.L.18.6     Discuss the role of anaerobic respiration in living things and in human society.    Moderate
SC.912.L.18.9     Explain the interrelated nature of photosynthesis and cellular respiration.         Moderate
SC.912.L.18.11    Explain the role of enzymes as catalysts that lower the activation energy of        Moderate
                  biochemical reactions. Identify factors, such as pH and temperature, and their
                  effect on enzyme activity.
MA.912.S.1.2      Determine appropriate and consistent standards of measurement for the data to Moderate
                  be collected in a survey or experiment.
MA.912.S.3.2      Collect, organize, and analyze data sets, determine the best format for the data    High
                  and present visual summaries from the following:
LA.910.4.2.2      The student will record information and ideas from primary and/or secondary
                  sources accurately and coherently, noting the validity and reliability of these
                  sources and attributing sources of information;
LA.910.2.2.3      The student will organize information to show understanding or relationships
                  among facts, ideas, and events (e.g., representing key points within text through
                  charting, mapping, paraphrasing, summarizing, comparing, contrasting, or
                  outlining);
HE.912.C.1.3      Evaluate how environment and personal health are interrelated.
HE.912.C.1.4      Analyze how heredity and family history can impact personal health.
               Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code    Access Point Descriptor
SC.912.N.1.In.a       Identify a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, including life science, earth
                      and space science, or physical science, and do the following: 1. Identify a scientific
                                                          179


                       question 2. Examine reliable sources of informtion to identify what is already k
SC.912.N.1.Su.b        Identify the basic process used in scientific investigations, including questioning,
                       observing, recording, determining, and sharing results.
SC.912.N.1.Pa.c        Recognize that when a variety of common activities are repeated the same way, the
                       outcomes are the same.
SC.912.N.4.In.a        Identify ways scientific knowledge and problem solving benefit people.
SC.912.N.4.Su.b        Recognize that some strategies may cost more to solve a problem.
SC.912.E.7.In.a        Identify cycles that occur on Earth, such as the water and carbon cycles, and the role
                       energy plays in them.
SC.912.E.7.Su.b        Recognize that currents move the ocean water around Earth.
SC.912.E.7.Pa.c        Recognize that humans, plants, and animals live on the Earth (biosphere).
SC.912.L.14.In.a       Identify that all living things are made of cells and cells function in similar ways (cell
                       theory).
SC.912.L.14.Su.b       Recognize that cells have different parts and each has a function.
SC.912.L.14.Pa.c       Identify ways to prevent infection from bacteria and viruses, such as hand washing and
                       first aid.
SC.912.L.15.In.a       Identify that prehistoric plants and animals changed over time (evolved) or became
                       extinct.
SC.912.L.15.Su.b       Match organisms to the animal, plant, and fungus kingdoms.
SC.912.L.15.Pa.c       Recognize that animals produce offspring.
SC.912.L.16.In.a       Identify that genes are sets of instructions that determine which characteristics are passed
                       from parent to offspring.
SC.912.L.16.Su.b       Recognize that all organisms have a substance called DNA with unique information.
SC.912.L.16.Pa.c       Recognize that illness can result when parts of our bodies are not working properly.
SC.912.L.17.In.a       Recognize that living things in oceans and fresh water are affected by the location,
                       availability of light, depth of the water, and temperature.
SC.912.L.17.Su.b       Recognize how animals and plants in an ecosystem may be affected by changes to the
                       food supply or climate.
SC.912.L.17.Pa.c       Recognize examples of mutual relationships between people and other living things.
SC.912.L.18.In.a       Identify that carbohydrates, fats, proteins, and nucleic acids (macromolecules) are
                       important for human organisms.
SC.912.L.18.Su.b       Recognize that the function of photosynthesis is to produce food for plants.
SC.912.L.18.Pa.c       Identify that food is a source of energy.
                                  2001340 Environmental Science
Section: Basic and Adult Education                          Grade Group: Secondary Grades 9-12
Subject: Science                                            Domain: Integrated Sciences
Course Length: Year                                         Level: 2
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                   Benchmarks
                                                                                                         Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                      Knowledge
SC.912.N.1.1       Define a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, for example: biology, High
                   chemistry, physics, and earth/space science, and do the following:
                                                           180


SC.912.N.1.2  Describe and explain what characterizes science and its methods.                     Moderate
SC.912.N.1.3  Recognize that the strength or usefulness of a scientific claim is evaluated         Low
              through scientific argumentation, which depends on critical and logical
              thinking, and the active consideration of alternative scientific explanations to
              explain the data present
SC.912.N.1.4  Identify sources of information and assess their reliability according to the strict High
              standards of scientific investigation.
SC.912.N.1.5  Describe and provide examples of how similar investigations conducted in many        Moderate
              parts of the world result in the same outcome.
SC.912.N.1.6  Describe how scientific inferences are drawn from scientific observations and        Moderate
              provide examples from the content being studied.
SC.912.N.1.7  Recognize the role of creativity in constructing scientific questions, methods and   Low
              explanations.
SC.912.N.2.1  Identify what is science, what clearly is not science, and what superficially        High
              resembles science (but fails to meet the criteria for science).
SC.912.N.2.2  Identify which questions can be answered through science and which questions         High
              are outside the boundaries of scientific investigation, such as questions
              addressed by other ways of knowing, such as art, philosophy, and religion.
SC.912.N.2.4  Explain that scientific knowledge is both durable and robust and open to change.     High
              Scientific knowledge can change because it is often examined and re-examined
              by new investigations and scientific argumentation. Because of these frequent
              examinations, scien
SC.912.N.2.5  Describe instances in which scientists' varied backgrounds, talents, interests, and  High
              goals influence the inferences and thus the explanations that they make about
              observations of natural phenomena and describe that competing interpretations
              (explanations)
SC.912.N.3.1  Explain that a scientific theory is the culmination of many scientific               High
              investigations drawing together all the current evidence concerning a substantial
              range of phenomena; thus, a scientific theory represents the most powerful
              explanation scientists have
SC.912.N.3.5  Describe the function of models in science, and identify the wide range of           Moderate
              models used in science.
SC.912.N.4.1  Explain how scientific knowledge and reasoning provide an empirically-based          Moderate
              perspective to inform society's decision making.
SC.912.N.4.2  Weigh the merits of alternative strategies for solving a specific societal problem   High
              by comparing a number of different costs and benefits, such as human,
              economic, and environmental.
SC.912.E.6.6  Analyze past, present, and potential future consequences to the environment          High
              resulting from various energy production technologies.
SC.912.E.7.7  Identify, analyze, and relate the internal (Earth system) and external               High
              (astronomical) conditions that contribute to global climate change.
SC.912.E.7.8  Explain how various atmospheric, oceanic, and hydrologic conditions in Florida       High
              have influenced and can influence human behavior, both individually and
              collectively.
SC.912.E.7.9  Cite evidence that the ocean has had a significant influence on climate change by    High
              absorbing, storing, and moving heat, carbon, and water.
SC.912.P.10.1 Differentiate among the various forms of energy and recognize that they can be       Moderate
              transformed from one form to others.
SC.912.P.10.2 Explore the Law of Conservation of Energy by differentiating among open,             High
              closed, and isolated systems and explain that the total energy in an isolated
              system is a conserved quantity.
                                                      181


SC.912.L.14.6  Explain the significance of genetic factors, environmental factors, and            High
               pathogenic agents to health from the perspectives of both individual and public
               health.
SC.912.L.15.3  Describe how biological diversity is increased by the origin of new species and    Moderate
               how it is decreased by the natural process of extinction.
SC.912.L.15.13 Describe the conditions required for natural selection, including: overproduction  Moderate
               of offspring, inherited variation, and the struggle to survive, which result in
               differential reproductive success.
SC.912.L.16.10 Evaluate the impact of biotechnology on the individual, society and the            High
               environment, including medical and ethical issues.
SC.912.L.17.1  Discuss the characteristics of populations, such as number of individuals, age     Moderate
               structure, density, and pattern of distribution.
SC.912.L.17.4  Describe changes in ecosystems resulting from seasonal variations, climate         Moderate
               change and succession.
SC.912.L.17.5  Analyze how population size is determined by births, deaths, immigration,          High
               emigration, and limiting factors (biotic and abiotic) that determine carrying
               capacity.
SC.912.L.17.6  Compare and contrast the relationships among organisms, including predation,       Moderate
               parasitism, competition, commensalism, and mutualism.
SC.912.L.17.7  Characterize the biotic and abiotic components that define freshwater systems,     Moderate
               marine systems and terrestrial systems.
SC.912.L.17.8  Recognize the consequences of the losses of biodiversity due to catastrophic       High
               events, climate changes, human activity, and the introduction of invasive, non
               native species.
SC.912.L.17.9  Use a food web to identify and distinguish producers, consumers, and               Moderate
               decomposers. Explain the pathway of energy transfer through trophic levels and
               the reduction of available energy at successive trophic levels.
SC.912.L.17.10 Diagram and explain the biogeochemical cycles of an ecosystem, including           Moderate
               water, carbon, and nitrogen cycle.
SC.912.L.17.11 Evaluate the costs and benefits of renewable and nonrenewable resources, such      High
               as water, energy, fossil fuels, wildlife, and forests.
SC.912.L.17.12 Discuss the political, social, and environmental consequences of sustainable use   High
               of land.
SC.912.L.17.13 Discuss the need for adequate monitoring of environmental parameters when          High
               making policy decisions.
SC.912.L.17.14 Assess the need for adequate waste management strategies.                          High
SC.912.L.17.15 Discuss the effects of technology on environmental quality.                        Moderate
SC.912.L.17.16 Discuss the large-scale environmental impacts resulting from human activity,       High
               including waste spills, oil spills, runoff, greenhouse gases, ozone depletion, and
               surface and groundwater pollution.
SC.912.L.17.18 Describe how human population size and resource use relate to environmental        Moderate
               quality.
SC.912.L.17.19 Describe how different natural resources are produced and how their rates of use   Moderate
               and renewal limit availability.
SC.912.L.17.20 Predict the impact of individuals on environmental systems and examine how         High
               human lifestyles affect sustainability.
MA.912.S.1.2   Determine appropriate and consistent standards of measurement for the data to      Moderate
               be collected in a survey or experiment.
MA.912.S.3.2   Collect, organize, and analyze data sets, determine the best format for the data   High
               and present visual summaries from the following:
                                                       182


LA.910.4.2.2      The student will record information and ideas from primary and/or secondary
                  sources accurately and coherently, noting the validity and reliability of these
                  sources and attributing sources of information;
LA.910.2.2.3      The student will organize information to show understanding or relationships
                  among facts, ideas, and events (e.g., representing key points within text through
                  charting, mapping, paraphrasing, summarizing, comparing, contrasting, or
                  outlining);
HE.912.C.1.3      Evaluate how environment and personal health are interrelated.
HE.912.C.1.4      Analyze how heredity and family history can impact personal health.
               Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code    Access Point Descriptor
SC.912.N.1.In.a       Identify a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, including life science, earth
                      and space science, or physical science, and do the following: 1. Identify a scientific
                      question 2. Examine reliable sources of informtion to identify what is already k
SC.912.N.1.Su.b       Identify the basic process used in scientific investigations, including questioning,
                      observing, recording, determining, and sharing results.
SC.912.N.1.Pa.c       Recognize that when a variety of common activities are repeated the same way, the
                      outcomes are the same.
SC.912.N.2.In.a       Identify examples of investigations that involve science.
SC.912.N.2.Su.b       Recognize that what is known about science can change based on new information.
SC.912.N.3.In.a       Recognize that a scientific theory is developed by repeated investigations of many
                      scientists and agreement on the likely explanation.
SC.912.N.3.Su.b       Recognize examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in nature, such as
                      Newton’s laws.
SC.912.N.4.In.a       Identify ways scientific knowledge and problem solving benefit people.
SC.912.N.4.Su.b       Recognize that some strategies may cost more to solve a problem.
SC.912.E.7.In.a       Identify cycles that occur on Earth, such as the water and carbon cycles, and the role
                      energy plays in them.
SC.912.E.7.Su.b       Recognize that currents move the ocean water around Earth.
SC.912.E.7.Pa.c       Recognize that humans, plants, and animals live on the Earth (biosphere).
SC.912.P.10.In.a      Identify examples of energy being transformed from one form to another (conserved
                      quantity).
SC.912.P.10.Su.b      Recognize the relationship between work and power, such as power is the amount of
                      work a person or machine does.
SC.912.P.10.Pa.c      Recognize the source and recipient of heat transfer.
SC.912.L.14.In.a      Identify that all living things are made of cells and cells function in similar ways (cell
                      theory).
SC.912.L.14.Su.b      Recognize that cells have different parts and each has a function.
SC.912.L.14.Pa.c      Identify ways to prevent infection from bacteria and viruses, such as hand washing and
                      first aid.
SC.912.L.15.In.a      Identify that prehistoric plants and animals changed over time (evolved) or became
                      extinct.
SC.912.L.15.Su.b      Match organisms to the animal, plant, and fungus kingdoms.
SC.912.L.15.Pa.c      Recognize that animals produce offspring.
SC.912.L.16.In.a      Identify that genes are sets of instructions that determine which characteristics are passed
                      from parent to offspring.
                                                          183


SC.912.L.16.Su.b       Recognize that all organisms have a substance called DNA with unique information.
SC.912.L.16.Pa.c       Recognize that illness can result when parts of our bodies are not working properly.
SC.912.L.17.In.a       Recognize that living things in oceans and fresh water are affected by the location,
                       availability of light, depth of the water, and temperature.
SC.912.L.17.Su.b       Recognize how animals and plants in an ecosystem may be affected by changes to the
                       food supply or climate.
SC.912.L.17.Pa.c       Recognize examples of mutual relationships between people and other living things.
                                     2002480 Forensic Sciences I
Section: Basic and Adult Education                          Grade Group: Secondary Grades 9-12
Subject: Science                                            Domain: Integrated Sciences
Course Length: Year                                         Level: 2
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                   Benchmarks
                                                                                                        Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                     Knowledge
SC.912.N.1.1       Define a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, for example: biology, High
                   chemistry, physics, and earth/space science, and do the following:
SC.912.N.1.2       Describe and explain what characterizes science and its methods.                     Moderate
SC.912.N.1.3       Recognize that the strength or usefulness of a scientific claim is evaluated         Low
                   through scientific argumentation, which depends on critical and logical
                   thinking, and the active consideration of alternative scientific explanations to
                   explain the data present
SC.912.N.1.4       Identify sources of information and assess their reliability according to the strict High
                   standards of scientific investigation.
SC.912.N.1.6       Describe how scientific inferences are drawn from scientific observations and        Moderate
                   provide examples from the content being studied.
SC.912.N.2.1       Identify what is science, what clearly is not science, and what superficially        High
                   resembles science (but fails to meet the criteria for science).
SC.912.N.2.4       Explain that scientific knowledge is both durable and robust and open to change.     High
                   Scientific knowledge can change because it is often examined and re-examined
                   by new investigations and scientific argumentation. Because of these frequent
                   examinations, scien
SC.912.N.3.1       Explain that a scientific theory is the culmination of many scientific               High
                   investigations drawing together all the current evidence concerning a substantial
                   range of phenomena; thus, a scientific theory represents the most powerful
                   explanation scientists have
SC.912.N.3.2       Describe the role consensus plays in the historical development of a theory in       Moderate
                   any one of the disciplines of science.
SC.912.N.3.5       Describe the function of models in science, and identify the wide range of           Moderate
                   models used in science.
SC.912.N.4.1       Explain how scientific knowledge and reasoning provide an empirically-based          Moderate
                   perspective to inform society's decision making.
SC.912.N.4.2       Weigh the merits of alternative strategies for solving a specific societal problem   High
                   by comparing a number of different costs and benefits, such as human,
                   economic, and environmental.
SC.912.E.7.4       Summarize the conditions that contribute to the climate of a geographic area,        Moderate
                   including the relationships to lakes and oceans.
                                                           184


SC.912.P.8.1   Differentiate among the four states of matter.                                      Moderate
SC.912.P.8.2   Differentiate between physical and chemical properties and physical and             Moderate
               chemical changes of matter.
SC.912.P.8.7   Interpret formula representations of molecules and compounds in terms of            Moderate
               composition and structure.
SC.912.P.8.11  Relate acidity and basicity to hydronium and hydroxyl ion concentration and pH.     Moderate
SC.912.P.8.12  Describe the properties of the carbon atom that make the diversity of carbon        Moderate
               compounds possible.
SC.912.P.10.1  Differentiate among the various forms of energy and recognize that they can be      Moderate
               transformed from one form to others.
SC.912.P.10.18 Explore the theory of electromagnetism by comparing and contrasting the             High
               different parts of the electromagnetic spectrum in terms of wavelength,
               frequency, and energy, and relate them to phenomena and applications.
SC.912.P.10.20 Describe the measurable properties of waves and explain the relationships           High
               among them and how these properties change when the wave moves from one
               medium to another.
SC.912.P.10.21 Qualitatively describe the shift in frequency in sound or electromagnetic waves     Moderate
               due to the relative motion of a source or a receiver.
SC.912.P.12.1  Distinguish between scalar and vector quantities and assess which should be         High
               used to describe an event.
SC.912.P.12.2  Analyze the motion of an object in terms of its position, velocity, and             High
               acceleration (with respect to a frame of reference) as functions of time.
SC.912.P.12.3  Interpret and apply Newton's three laws of motion.                                  High
SC.912.P.12.5  Apply the law of conservation of linear momentum to interactions, such as           High
               collisions between objects.
SC.912.P.12.7  Recognize that nothing travels faster than the speed of light in vacuum which is    Low
               the same for all observers no matter how they or the light source are moving.
SC.912.P.12.9  Recognize that time, length, and energy depend on the frame of reference.           Low
SC.912.P.12.12 Explain how various factors, such as concentration, temperature, and presence of    High
               a catalyst affect the rate of a chemical reaction.
SC.912.L.14.1  Describe the scientific theory of cells (cell theory) and relate the history of its Moderate
               discovery to the process of science.
SC.912.L.14.2  Relate structure to function for the components of plant and animal cells.          Moderate
               Explain the role of cell membranes as a highly selective barrier (passive and
               active transport).
SC.912.L.14.4  Compare and contrast structure and function of various types of microscopes.        Moderate
SC.912.L.14.6  Explain the significance of genetic factors, environmental factors, and             High
               pathogenic agents to health from the perspectives of both individual and public
               health.
SC.912.L.14.11 Classify and state the defining characteristics of epithelial tissue, connective    Moderate
               tissue, muscle tissue, and nervous tissue.
SC.912.L.14.12 Describe the anatomy and histology of bone tissue.                                  Low
SC.912.L.14.34 Describe the composition and physiology of blood, including that of the plasma Moderate
               and the formed elements.
SC.912.L.14.35 Describe the steps in hemostasis, including the mechanism of coagulation.           Moderate
               Include the basis for blood typing and transfusion reactions.
SC.912.L.14.51 Describe the function of the vertebrate integumentary system.                       Low
SC.912.L.15.15 Describe how mutation and genetic recombination increase genetic variation.         Moderate
                                                       185


SC.912.L.16.2     Discuss observed inheritance patterns caused by various modes of inheritance,        High
                  including dominant, recessive, codominant, sex-linked, polygenic, and multiple
                  alleles.
SC.912.L.16.9     Explain how and why the genetic code is universal and is common to almost all        Moderate
                  organisms.
SC.912.L.16.10    Evaluate the impact of biotechnology on the individual, society and the              High
                  environment, including medical and ethical issues.
SC.912.L.16.11    Discuss the technologies associated with forensic medicine and DNA                   High
                  identification, including restriction fragment length polymorphism (RFLP)
                  analysis.
SC.912.L.16.12    Describe how basic DNA technology (restriction digestion by endonucleases,           Moderate
                  gel electrophoresis, polymerase chain reaction, ligation, and transformation) is
                  used to construct recombinant DNA molecules (DNA cloning).
SC.912.L.17.1     Discuss the characteristics of populations, such as number of individuals, age       Moderate
                  structure, density, and pattern of distribution.
SC.912.L.18.1     Describe the basic molecular structures and primary functions of the four major      Moderate
                  categories of biological macromolecules.
MA.912.S.1.2      Determine appropriate and consistent standards of measurement for the data to        Moderate
                  be collected in a survey or experiment.
MA.912.S.3.2      Collect, organize, and analyze data sets, determine the best format for the data     High
                  and present visual summaries from the following:
LA.910.4.2.2      The student will record information and ideas from primary and/or secondary
                  sources accurately and coherently, noting the validity and reliability of these
                  sources and attributing sources of information;
LA.910.2.2.3      The student will organize information to show understanding or relationships
                  among facts, ideas, and events (e.g., representing key points within text through
                  charting, mapping, paraphrasing, summarizing, comparing, contrasting, or
                  outlining);
               Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code    Access Point Descriptor
SC.912.N.1.In.a       Identify a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, including life science, earth
                      and space science, or physical science, and do the following: 1. Identify a scientific
                      question 2. Examine reliable sources of informtion to identify what is already k
SC.912.N.1.Su.b       Identify the basic process used in scientific investigations, including questioning,
                      observing, recording, determining, and sharing results.
SC.912.N.1.Pa.c       Recognize that when a variety of common activities are repeated the same way, the
                      outcomes are the same.
SC.912.N.2.In.a       Identify examples of investigations that involve science.
SC.912.N.2.Su.b       Recognize that what is known about science can change based on new information.
SC.912.N.3.In.a       Recognize that a scientific theory is developed by repeated investigations of many
                      scientists and agreement on the likely explanation.
SC.912.N.3.Su.b       Recognize examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in nature, such as
                      Newton’s laws.
SC.912.N.4.In.a       Identify ways scientific knowledge and problem solving benefit people.
SC.912.N.4.Su.b       Recognize that some strategies may cost more to solve a problem.
SC.912.E.7.In.a       Identify cycles that occur on Earth, such as the water and carbon cycles, and the role
                      energy plays in them.
SC.912.E.7.Su.b       Recognize that currents move the ocean water around Earth.
                                                          186


SC.912.E.7.Pa.c        Recognize that humans, plants, and animals live on the Earth (biosphere).
SC.912.P.8.In.a        Classify states of matter as solid, liquid, and gaseous.
SC.912.P.8.Su.b        Identify examples of physical and chemical changes.
SC.912.P.8.Pa.c        Recognize that the parts of an object can be put together to make a whole.
SC.912.P.10.In.a       Identify examples of energy being transformed from one form to another (conserved
                       quantity).
SC.912.P.10.Su.b       Recognize the relationship between work and power, such as power is the amount of
                       work a person or machine does.
SC.912.P.10.Pa.c       Recognize the source and recipient of heat transfer.
SC.912.P.12.In.a       Recognize that scalar quantities describe the magnitude of the measurement, such as
                       size, weight, volume, area, temperature, or speed.
SC.912.P.12.Su.b       Recognize that acceleration generally involves a change in speed.
SC.912.P.12.Pa.c       Identify the source of the force moving an object.
SC.912.L.14.In.a       Identify that all living things are made of cells and cells function in similar ways (cell
                       theory).
SC.912.L.14.Su.b       Recognize that cells have different parts and each has a function.
SC.912.L.14.Pa.c       Identify ways to prevent infection from bacteria and viruses, such as hand washing and
                       first aid.
SC.912.L.15.In.a       Identify that prehistoric plants and animals changed over time (evolved) or became
                       extinct.
SC.912.L.15.Su.b       Match organisms to the animal, plant, and fungus kingdoms.
SC.912.L.15.Pa.c       Recognize that animals produce offspring.
SC.912.L.16.In.a       Identify that genes are sets of instructions that determine which characteristics are passed
                       from parent to offspring.
SC.912.L.16.Su.b       Recognize that all organisms have a substance called DNA with unique information.
SC.912.L.16.Pa.c       Recognize that illness can result when parts of our bodies are not working properly.
SC.912.L.18.In.a       Identify that carbohydrates, fats, proteins, and nucleic acids (macromolecules) are
                       important for human organisms.
SC.912.L.18.Su.b       Recognize that the function of photosynthesis is to produce food for plants.
SC.912.L.18.Pa.c       Identify that food is a source of energy.
                                    2002490 Forensic Sciences II
Section: Basic and Adult Education                           Grade Group: Secondary Grades 9-12
Subject: Science                                             Domain: Integrated Sciences
Course Length: Year                                          Level: 2
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                   Benchmarks
                                                                                                         Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                      Knowledge
SC.912.N.1.1       Define a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, for example: biology, High
                   chemistry, physics, and earth/space science, and do the following:
SC.912.N.1.2       Describe and explain what characterizes science and its methods.                      Moderate
                                                           187


SC.912.N.1.3   Recognize that the strength or usefulness of a scientific claim is evaluated         Low
               through scientific argumentation, which depends on critical and logical
               thinking, and the active consideration of alternative scientific explanations to
               explain the data present
SC.912.N.1.4   Identify sources of information and assess their reliability according to the strict High
               standards of scientific investigation.
SC.912.N.1.5   Describe and provide examples of how similar investigations conducted in many        Moderate
               parts of the world result in the same outcome.
SC.912.N.1.6   Describe how scientific inferences are drawn from scientific observations and        Moderate
               provide examples from the content being studied.
SC.912.N.2.4   Explain that scientific knowledge is both durable and robust and open to change.     High
               Scientific knowledge can change because it is often examined and re-examined
               by new investigations and scientific argumentation. Because of these frequent
               examinations, scien
SC.912.N.3.5   Describe the function of models in science, and identify the wide range of           Moderate
               models used in science.
SC.912.N.4.1   Explain how scientific knowledge and reasoning provide an empirically-based          Moderate
               perspective to inform society's decision making.
SC.912.N.4.2   Weigh the merits of alternative strategies for solving a specific societal problem   High
               by comparing a number of different costs and benefits, such as human,
               economic, and environmental.
SC.912.E.5.8   Connect the concepts of radiation and the electromagnetic spectrum to the use of     High
               historical and newly-developed observational tools.
SC.912.E.7.4   Summarize the conditions that contribute to the climate of a geographic area,        Moderate
               including the relationships to lakes and oceans.
SC.912.P.8.7   Interpret formula representations of molecules and compounds in terms of             Moderate
               composition and structure.
SC.912.P.8.8   Characterize types of chemical reactions, for example: redox, acid-base,             Moderate
               synthesis, and single and double replacement reactions.
SC.912.P.8.10  Describe oxidation-reduction reactions in living and non-living systems.             Moderate
SC.912.P.8.13  Identify selected functional groups and relate how they contribute to properties     High
               of carbon compounds.
SC.912.P.10.4  Describe heat as the energy transferred by convection, conduction, and               High
               radiation, and explain the connection of heat to change in temperature or states
               of matter.
SC.912.P.10.7  Distinguish between endothermic and exothermic chemical processes.                   Moderate
SC.912.P.10.13 Relate the configuration of static charges to the electric field, electric force,    High
               electric potential, and electric potential energy.
SC.912.P.10.14 Differentiate among conductors, semiconductors, and insulators.                      Moderate
SC.912.P.10.15 Investigate and explain the relationships among current, voltage, resistance, and    High
               power.
SC.912.P.10.18 Explore the theory of electromagnetism by comparing and contrasting the              High
               different parts of the electromagnetic spectrum in terms of wavelength,
               frequency, and energy, and relate them to phenomena and applications.
SC.912.P.12.1  Distinguish between scalar and vector quantities and assess which should be          High
               used to describe an event.
SC.912.P.12.2  Analyze the motion of an object in terms of its position, velocity, and              High
               acceleration (with respect to a frame of reference) as functions of time.
SC.912.P.12.3  Interpret and apply Newton's three laws of motion.                                   High
SC.912.P.12.5  Apply the law of conservation of linear momentum to interactions, such as            High
               collisions between objects.
                                                       188


SC.912.P.12.6  Qualitatively apply the concept of angular momentum.                                High
SC.912.P.12.12 Explain how various factors, such as concentration, temperature, and presence of High
               a catalyst affect the rate of a chemical reaction.
SC.912.L.14.4  Compare and contrast structure and function of various types of microscopes.        Moderate
SC.912.L.14.6  Explain the significance of genetic factors, environmental factors, and             High
               pathogenic agents to health from the perspectives of both individual and public
               health.
SC.912.L.14.11 Classify and state the defining characteristics of epithelial tissue, connective    Moderate
               tissue, muscle tissue, and nervous tissue.
SC.912.L.14.12 Describe the anatomy and histology of bone tissue.                                  Low
SC.912.L.14.13 Distinguish between bones of the axial skeleton and the appendicular skeleton.      Low
SC.912.L.14.14 Identify the major bones of the axial and appendicular skeleton.                    Low
SC.912.L.14.15 Identify major markings (such as foramina, fossae, tubercles, etc.) on a skeleton. Moderate
               Explain why these markings are important.
SC.912.L.14.16 Describe the anatomy and histology, including ultrastructure, of muscle tissue. Moderate
SC.912.L.14.36 Describe the factors affecting blood flow through the cardiovascular system.        Moderate
SC.912.L.14.43 Describe the histology of the respiratory system.                                   Moderate
SC.912.L.14.44 Describe the physiology of the respiratory system including the mechanisms of Moderate
               ventilation, gas exchange, gas transport and the mechanisms that control the rate
               of ventilation.
SC.912.L.14.46 Describe the physiology of the digestive system, including mechanical digestion, Moderate
               chemical digestion, absorption and the neural and hormonal mechanisms of
               control.
SC.912.L.14.47 Describe the physiology of urine formation by the kidney.                           Moderate
SC.912.L.16.3  Describe the basic process of DNA replication and how it relates to the             High
               transmission and conservation of the genetic information.
SC.912.L.16.4  Explain how mutations in the DNA sequence may or may not result in                  High
               phenotypic change. Explain how mutations in gametes may result in phenotypic
               changes in offspring.
SC.912.L.16.5  Explain the basic processes of transcription and translation, and how they result   High
               in the expression of genes.
SC.912.L.16.9  Explain how and why the genetic code is universal and is common to almost all       Moderate
               organisms.
SC.912.L.16.10 Evaluate the impact of biotechnology on the individual, society and the             High
               environment, including medical and ethical issues.
SC.912.L.16.11 Discuss the technologies associated with forensic medicine and DNA                  High
               identification, including restriction fragment length polymorphism (RFLP)
               analysis.
SC.912.L.16.12 Describe how basic DNA technology (restriction digestion by endonucleases,          Moderate
               gel electrophoresis, polymerase chain reaction, ligation, and transformation) is
               used to construct recombinant DNA molecules (DNA cloning).
SC.912.L.17.6  Compare and contrast the relationships among organisms, including predation,        Moderate
               parasitism, competition, commensalism, and mutualism.
SC.912.L.17.9  Use a food web to identify and distinguish producers, consumers, and                Moderate
               decomposers. Explain the pathway of energy transfer through trophic levels and
               the reduction of available energy at successive trophic levels.
SC.912.L.18.3  Describe the structures of fatty acids, triglycerides, phospholipids, and steroids. Moderate
               Explain the functions of lipids in living organisms. Identify some reactions that
               fatty acids undergo. Relate the structure and function of cell membranes.
                                                       189


SC.912.L.18.4     Describe the structures of proteins and amino acids. Explain the functions of        Moderate
                  proteins in living organisms. Identify some reactions that amino acids undergo.
                  Relate the structure and function of enzymes.
SC.912.L.18.10    Connect the role of adenosine triphosphate (ATP) to energy transfers within a        High
                  cell.
SC.912.L.18.11    Explain the role of enzymes as catalysts that lower the activation energy of         Moderate
                  biochemical reactions. Identify factors, such as pH and temperature, and their
                  effect on enzyme activity.
SC.912.L.18.12    Discuss the special properties of water that contribute to Earth's suitability as an Moderate
                  environment for life: cohesive behavior, ability to moderate temperature,
                  expansion upon freezing, and versatility as a solvent.
MA.912.S.1.2      Determine appropriate and consistent standards of measurement for the data to        Moderate
                  be collected in a survey or experiment.
MA.912.S.3.2      Collect, organize, and analyze data sets, determine the best format for the data     High
                  and present visual summaries from the following:
LA.910.4.2.2      The student will record information and ideas from primary and/or secondary
                  sources accurately and coherently, noting the validity and reliability of these
                  sources and attributing sources of information;
LA.910.2.2.3      The student will organize information to show understanding or relationships
                  among facts, ideas, and events (e.g., representing key points within text through
                  charting, mapping, paraphrasing, summarizing, comparing, contrasting, or
                  outlining);
               Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code    Access Point Descriptor
SC.912.N.1.In.a       Identify a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, including life science, earth
                      and space science, or physical science, and do the following: 1. Identify a scientific
                      question 2. Examine reliable sources of informtion to identify what is already k
SC.912.N.1.Su.b       Identify the basic process used in scientific investigations, including questioning,
                      observing, recording, determining, and sharing results.
SC.912.N.1.Pa.c       Recognize that when a variety of common activities are repeated the same way, the
                      outcomes are the same.
SC.912.N.2.In.a       Identify examples of investigations that involve science.
SC.912.N.2.Su.b       Recognize that what is known about science can change based on new information.
SC.912.N.3.In.a       Recognize that a scientific theory is developed by repeated investigations of many
                      scientists and agreement on the likely explanation.
SC.912.N.3.Su.b       Recognize examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in nature, such as
                      Newton’s laws.
SC.912.N.4.In.a       Identify ways scientific knowledge and problem solving benefit people.
SC.912.N.4.Su.b       Recognize that some strategies may cost more to solve a problem.
SC.912.E.5.In.a       Recognize that the Milky Way is part of the expanding universe.
SC.912.E.5.Su.b       Recognize that stars are made of burning gases.
SC.912.E.5.Pa.c       Observe and recognize effects of the Sun on Earth, such as temperature changes.
SC.912.E.7.In.a       Identify cycles that occur on Earth, such as the water and carbon cycles, and the role
                      energy plays in them.
SC.912.E.7.Su.b       Recognize that currents move the ocean water around Earth.
SC.912.E.7.Pa.c       Recognize that humans, plants, and animals live on the Earth (biosphere).
SC.912.P.8.In.a       Classify states of matter as solid, liquid, and gaseous.
                                                          190


SC.912.P.8.Su.b        Identify examples of physical and chemical changes.
SC.912.P.8.Pa.c        Recognize that the parts of an object can be put together to make a whole.
SC.912.P.10.In.a       Identify examples of energy being transformed from one form to another (conserved
                       quantity).
SC.912.P.10.Su.b       Recognize the relationship between work and power, such as power is the amount of
                       work a person or machine does.
SC.912.P.10.Pa.c       Recognize the source and recipient of heat transfer.
SC.912.P.12.In.a       Recognize that scalar quantities describe the magnitude of the measurement, such as
                       size, weight, volume, area, temperature, or speed.
SC.912.P.12.Su.b       Recognize that acceleration generally involves a change in speed.
SC.912.P.12.Pa.c       Identify the source of the force moving an object.
SC.912.L.14.In.a       Identify that all living things are made of cells and cells function in similar ways (cell
                       theory).
SC.912.L.14.Su.b       Recognize that cells have different parts and each has a function.
SC.912.L.14.Pa.c       Identify ways to prevent infection from bacteria and viruses, such as hand washing and
                       first aid.
SC.912.L.16.In.a       Identify that genes are sets of instructions that determine which characteristics are passed
                       from parent to offspring.
SC.912.L.16.Su.b       Recognize that all organisms have a substance called DNA with unique information.
SC.912.L.16.Pa.c       Recognize that illness can result when parts of our bodies are not working properly.
SC.912.L.17.In.a       Recognize that living things in oceans and fresh water are affected by the location,
                       availability of light, depth of the water, and temperature.
SC.912.L.17.Su.b       Recognize how animals and plants in an ecosystem may be affected by changes to the
                       food supply or climate.
SC.912.L.17.Pa.c       Recognize examples of mutual relationships between people and other living things.
SC.912.L.18.In.a       Identify that carbohydrates, fats, proteins, and nucleic acids (macromolecules) are
                       important for human organisms.
SC.912.L.18.Su.b       Recognize that the function of photosynthesis is to produce food for plants.
SC.912.L.18.Pa.c       Identify that food is a source of energy.
                                      2002500 Marine Science I
Section: Basic and Adult Education                          Grade Group: Secondary Grades 9-12
Subject: Science                                            Domain: Integrated Sciences
Course Length: Year                                         Level: 2
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                   Benchmarks
                                                                                                         Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                      Knowledge
SC.912.N.1.1       Define a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, for example: biology,         High
                   chemistry, physics, and earth/space science, and do the following:
SC.912.N.1.2       Describe and explain what characterizes science and its methods.                      Moderate
SC.912.N.1.3       Recognize that the strength or usefulness of a scientific claim is evaluated          Low
                   through scientific argumentation, which depends on critical and logical
                   thinking, and the active consideration of alternative scientific explanations to
                   explain the data present
                                                           191


SC.912.N.1.4   Identify sources of information and assess their reliability according to the strict High
               standards of scientific investigation.
SC.912.N.1.5   Describe and provide examples of how similar investigations conducted in many        Moderate
               parts of the world result in the same outcome.
SC.912.N.1.6   Describe how scientific inferences are drawn from scientific observations and        Moderate
               provide examples from the content being studied.
SC.912.N.1.7   Recognize the role of creativity in constructing scientific questions, methods and   Low
               explanations.
SC.912.N.2.1   Identify what is science, what clearly is not science, and what superficially        High
               resembles science (but fails to meet the criteria for science).
SC.912.N.2.4   Explain that scientific knowledge is both durable and robust and open to change.     High
               Scientific knowledge can change because it is often examined and re-examined
               by new investigations and scientific argumentation. Because of these frequent
               examinations, scien
SC.912.N.2.5   Describe instances in which scientists' varied backgrounds, talents, interests, and  High
               goals influence the inferences and thus the explanations that they make about
               observations of natural phenomena and describe that competing interpretations
               (explanations)
SC.912.N.3.1   Explain that a scientific theory is the culmination of many scientific               High
               investigations drawing together all the current evidence concerning a substantial
               range of phenomena; thus, a scientific theory represents the most powerful
               explanation scientists have
SC.912.N.3.5   Describe the function of models in science, and identify the wide range of           Moderate
               models used in science.
SC.912.N.4.1   Explain how scientific knowledge and reasoning provide an empirically-based          Moderate
               perspective to inform society's decision making.
SC.912.N.4.2   Weigh the merits of alternative strategies for solving a specific societal problem   High
               by comparing a number of different costs and benefits, such as human,
               economic, and environmental.
SC.912.E.6.3   Analyze the scientific theory of plate tectonics and identify related major          High
               processes and features as a result of moving plates.
SC.912.E.6.5   Describe the geologic development of the present day oceans and identify             Moderate
               commonly found features.
SC.912.E.7.1   Analyze the movement of matter and energy through the different                      High
               biogeochemical cycles, including water and carbon.
SC.912.E.7.4   Summarize the conditions that contribute to the climate of a geographic area,        Moderate
               including the relationships to lakes and oceans.
SC.912.E.7.6   Relate the formation of severe weather to the various physical factors.              Moderate
SC.912.E.7.9   Cite evidence that the ocean has had a significant influence on climate change by    High
               absorbing, storing, and moving heat, carbon, and water.
SC.912.P.10.2  Explore the Law of Conservation of Energy by differentiating among open,             High
               closed, and isolated systems and explain that the total energy in an isolated
               system is a conserved quantity.
SC.912.P.10.20 Describe the measurable properties of waves and explain the relationships            High
               among them and how these properties change when the wave moves from one
               medium to another.
SC.912.L.14.6  Explain the significance of genetic factors, environmental factors, and              High
               pathogenic agents to health from the perspectives of both individual and public
               health.
                                                       192


SC.912.L.15.13    Describe the conditions required for natural selection, including: overproduction    Moderate
                  of offspring, inherited variation, and the struggle to survive, which result in
                  differential reproductive success.
SC.912.L.17.1     Discuss the characteristics of populations, such as number of individuals, age       Moderate
                  structure, density, and pattern of distribution.
SC.912.L.17.2     Explain the general distribution of life in aquatic systems as a function of         High
                  chemistry, geography, light, depth, salinity, and temperature.
SC.912.L.17.3     Discuss how various oceanic and freshwater processes, such as currents, tides,       Moderate
                  and waves, affect the abundance of aquatic organisms.
SC.912.L.17.4     Describe changes in ecosystems resulting from seasonal variations, climate           Moderate
                  change and succession.
SC.912.L.17.6     Compare and contrast the relationships among organisms, including predation,         Moderate
                  parasitism, competition, commensalism, and mutualism.
SC.912.L.17.7     Characterize the biotic and abiotic components that define freshwater systems,       Moderate
                  marine systems and terrestrial systems.
SC.912.L.17.8     Recognize the consequences of the losses of biodiversity due to catastrophic         High
                  events, climate changes, human activity, and the introduction of invasive, non
                  native species.
SC.912.L.17.9     Use a food web to identify and distinguish producers, consumers, and                 Moderate
                  decomposers. Explain the pathway of energy transfer through trophic levels and
                  the reduction of available energy at successive trophic levels.
SC.912.L.17.10    Diagram and explain the biogeochemical cycles of an ecosystem, including             Moderate
                  water, carbon, and nitrogen cycle.
SC.912.L.17.11    Evaluate the costs and benefits of renewable and nonrenewable resources, such        High
                  as water, energy, fossil fuels, wildlife, and forests.
SC.912.L.17.16    Discuss the large-scale environmental impacts resulting from human activity,         High
                  including waste spills, oil spills, runoff, greenhouse gases, ozone depletion, and
                  surface and groundwater pollution.
SC.912.L.18.12    Discuss the special properties of water that contribute to Earth's suitability as an Moderate
                  environment for life: cohesive behavior, ability to moderate temperature,
                  expansion upon freezing, and versatility as a solvent.
MA.912.S.1.2      Determine appropriate and consistent standards of measurement for the data to        Moderate
                  be collected in a survey or experiment.
MA.912.S.3.2      Collect, organize, and analyze data sets, determine the best format for the data     High
                  and present visual summaries from the following:
LA.910.4.2.2      The student will record information and ideas from primary and/or secondary
                  sources accurately and coherently, noting the validity and reliability of these
                  sources and attributing sources of information;
LA.910.2.2.3      The student will organize information to show understanding or relationships
                  among facts, ideas, and events (e.g., representing key points within text through
                  charting, mapping, paraphrasing, summarizing, comparing, contrasting, or
                  outlining);
               Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code    Access Point Descriptor
SC.912.N.1.In.a       Identify a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, including life science, earth
                      and space science, or physical science, and do the following: 1. Identify a scientific
                      question 2. Examine reliable sources of informtion to identify what is already k
SC.912.N.1.Su.b       Identify the basic process used in scientific investigations, including questioning,
                      observing, recording, determining, and sharing results.
                                                          193


SC.912.N.1.Pa.c  Recognize that when a variety of common activities are repeated the same way, the
                 outcomes are the same.
SC.912.N.2.In.a  Identify examples of investigations that involve science.
SC.912.N.2.Su.b  Recognize that what is known about science can change based on new information.
SC.912.N.3.In.a  Recognize that a scientific theory is developed by repeated investigations of many
                 scientists and agreement on the likely explanation.
SC.912.N.3.Su.b  Recognize examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in nature, such as
                 Newton’s laws.
SC.912.N.4.In.a  Identify ways scientific knowledge and problem solving benefit people.
SC.912.N.4.Su.b  Recognize that some strategies may cost more to solve a problem.
SC.912.E.6.In.a  Describe the three layers of Earth (core, mantle, and crust).
SC.912.E.6.Su.b  Identify types of surface features, such as hills and valleys.
SC.912.E.7.In.a  Identify cycles that occur on Earth, such as the water and carbon cycles, and the role
                 energy plays in them.
SC.912.E.7.Su.b  Recognize that currents move the ocean water around Earth.
SC.912.E.7.Pa.c  Recognize that humans, plants, and animals live on the Earth (biosphere).
SC.912.P.10.In.a Identify examples of energy being transformed from one form to another (conserved
                 quantity).
SC.912.P.10.Su.b Recognize the relationship between work and power, such as power is the amount of
                 work a person or machine does.
SC.912.P.10.Pa.c Recognize the source and recipient of heat transfer.
SC.912.L.14.In.a Identify that all living things are made of cells and cells function in similar ways (cell
                 theory).
SC.912.L.14.Su.b Recognize that cells have different parts and each has a function.
SC.912.L.14.Pa.c Identify ways to prevent infection from bacteria and viruses, such as hand washing and
                 first aid.
SC.912.L.15.In.a Identify that prehistoric plants and animals changed over time (evolved) or became
                 extinct.
SC.912.L.15.Su.b Match organisms to the animal, plant, and fungus kingdoms.
SC.912.L.15.Pa.c Recognize that animals produce offspring.
SC.912.L.17.In.a Recognize that living things in oceans and fresh water are affected by the location,
                 availability of light, depth of the water, and temperature.
SC.912.L.17.Su.b Recognize how animals and plants in an ecosystem may be affected by changes to the
                 food supply or climate.
SC.912.L.17.Pa.c Recognize examples of mutual relationships between people and other living things.
SC.912.L.18.In.a Identify that carbohydrates, fats, proteins, and nucleic acids (macromolecules) are
                 important for human organisms.
SC.912.L.18.Su.b Recognize that the function of photosynthesis is to produce food for plants.
SC.912.L.18.Pa.c Identify that food is a source of energy.
                                                     194


                               2002510 Marine Science I Honors
Section: Basic and Adult Education                          Grade Group: Secondary Grades 9-12
Subject: Science                                            Domain: Integrated Sciences
Course Length: Year                                         Level: 3
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                  Benchmarks
                                                                                                        Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                     Knowledge
SC.912.N.1.1       Define a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, for example: biology, High
                   chemistry, physics, and earth/space science, and do the following:
SC.912.N.1.2       Describe and explain what characterizes science and its methods.                     Moderate
SC.912.N.1.3       Recognize that the strength or usefulness of a scientific claim is evaluated         Low
                   through scientific argumentation, which depends on critical and logical
                   thinking, and the active consideration of alternative scientific explanations to
                   explain the data present
SC.912.N.1.4       Identify sources of information and assess their reliability according to the strict High
                   standards of scientific investigation.
SC.912.N.1.5       Describe and provide examples of how similar investigations conducted in many        Moderate
                   parts of the world result in the same outcome.
SC.912.N.1.6       Describe how scientific inferences are drawn from scientific observations and        Moderate
                   provide examples from the content being studied.
SC.912.N.1.7       Recognize the role of creativity in constructing scientific questions, methods and   Low
                   explanations.
SC.912.N.2.1       Identify what is science, what clearly is not science, and what superficially        High
                   resembles science (but fails to meet the criteria for science).
SC.912.N.2.4       Explain that scientific knowledge is both durable and robust and open to change.     High
                   Scientific knowledge can change because it is often examined and re-examined
                   by new investigations and scientific argumentation. Because of these frequent
                   examinations, scien
SC.912.N.2.5       Describe instances in which scientists' varied backgrounds, talents, interests, and  High
                   goals influence the inferences and thus the explanations that they make about
                   observations of natural phenomena and describe that competing interpretations
                   (explanations)
SC.912.N.3.1       Explain that a scientific theory is the culmination of many scientific               High
                   investigations drawing together all the current evidence concerning a substantial
                   range of phenomena; thus, a scientific theory represents the most powerful
                   explanation scientists have
SC.912.N.3.5       Describe the function of models in science, and identify the wide range of           Moderate
                   models used in science.
SC.912.N.4.1       Explain how scientific knowledge and reasoning provide an empirically-based          Moderate
                   perspective to inform society's decision making.
SC.912.N.4.2       Weigh the merits of alternative strategies for solving a specific societal problem   High
                   by comparing a number of different costs and benefits, such as human,
                   economic, and environmental.
SC.912.E.6.3       Analyze the scientific theory of plate tectonics and identify related major          High
                   processes and features as a result of moving plates.
SC.912.E.6.5       Describe the geologic development of the present day oceans and identify             Moderate
                   commonly found features.
                                                           195


SC.912.E.6.6   Analyze past, present, and potential future consequences to the environment        High
               resulting from various energy production technologies.
SC.912.E.7.1   Analyze the movement of matter and energy through the different                    High
               biogeochemical cycles, including water and carbon.
SC.912.E.7.4   Summarize the conditions that contribute to the climate of a geographic area,      Moderate
               including the relationships to lakes and oceans.
SC.912.E.7.6   Relate the formation of severe weather to the various physical factors.            Moderate
SC.912.E.7.9   Cite evidence that the ocean has had a significant influence on climate change by  High
               absorbing, storing, and moving heat, carbon, and water.
SC.912.P.10.2  Explore the Law of Conservation of Energy by differentiating among open,           High
               closed, and isolated systems and explain that the total energy in an isolated
               system is a conserved quantity.
SC.912.P.10.20 Describe the measurable properties of waves and explain the relationships          High
               among them and how these properties change when the wave moves from one
               medium to another.
SC.912.L.14.6  Explain the significance of genetic factors, environmental factors, and            High
               pathogenic agents to health from the perspectives of both individual and public
               health.
SC.912.L.15.13 Describe the conditions required for natural selection, including: overproduction  Moderate
               of offspring, inherited variation, and the struggle to survive, which result in
               differential reproductive success.
SC.912.L.16.10 Evaluate the impact of biotechnology on the individual, society and the            High
               environment, including medical and ethical issues.
SC.912.L.17.1  Discuss the characteristics of populations, such as number of individuals, age     Moderate
               structure, density, and pattern of distribution.
SC.912.L.17.2  Explain the general distribution of life in aquatic systems as a function of       High
               chemistry, geography, light, depth, salinity, and temperature.
SC.912.L.17.3  Discuss how various oceanic and freshwater processes, such as currents, tides,     Moderate
               and waves, affect the abundance of aquatic organisms.
SC.912.L.17.4  Describe changes in ecosystems resulting from seasonal variations, climate         Moderate
               change and succession.
SC.912.L.17.6  Compare and contrast the relationships among organisms, including predation,       Moderate
               parasitism, competition, commensalism, and mutualism.
SC.912.L.17.7  Characterize the biotic and abiotic components that define freshwater systems,     Moderate
               marine systems and terrestrial systems.
SC.912.L.17.8  Recognize the consequences of the losses of biodiversity due to catastrophic       High
               events, climate changes, human activity, and the introduction of invasive, non
               native species.
SC.912.L.17.9  Use a food web to identify and distinguish producers, consumers, and               Moderate
               decomposers. Explain the pathway of energy transfer through trophic levels and
               the reduction of available energy at successive trophic levels.
SC.912.L.17.10 Diagram and explain the biogeochemical cycles of an ecosystem, including           Moderate
               water, carbon, and nitrogen cycle.
SC.912.L.17.11 Evaluate the costs and benefits of renewable and nonrenewable resources, such      High
               as water, energy, fossil fuels, wildlife, and forests.
SC.912.L.17.16 Discuss the large-scale environmental impacts resulting from human activity,       High
               including waste spills, oil spills, runoff, greenhouse gases, ozone depletion, and
               surface and groundwater pollution.
SC.912.L.17.17 Assess the effectiveness of innovative methods of protecting the environment.      High
SC.912.L.17.18 Describe how human population size and resource use relate to environmental        Moderate
               quality.
                                                       196


SC.912.L.18.12    Discuss the special properties of water that contribute to Earth's suitability as an Moderate
                  environment for life: cohesive behavior, ability to moderate temperature,
                  expansion upon freezing, and versatility as a solvent.
MA.912.S.1.2      Determine appropriate and consistent standards of measurement for the data to Moderate
                  be collected in a survey or experiment.
MA.912.S.3.2      Collect, organize, and analyze data sets, determine the best format for the data      High
                  and present visual summaries from the following:
LA.910.4.2.2      The student will record information and ideas from primary and/or secondary
                  sources accurately and coherently, noting the validity and reliability of these
                  sources and attributing sources of information;
LA.910.2.2.3      The student will organize information to show understanding or relationships
                  among facts, ideas, and events (e.g., representing key points within text through
                  charting, mapping, paraphrasing, summarizing, comparing, contrasting, or
                  outlining);
               Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code    Access Point Descriptor
SC.912.N.1.In.a       Identify a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, including life science, earth
                      and space science, or physical science, and do the following: 1. Identify a scientific
                      question 2. Examine reliable sources of informtion to identify what is already k
SC.912.N.1.Su.b       Identify the basic process used in scientific investigations, including questioning,
                      observing, recording, determining, and sharing results.
SC.912.N.1.Pa.c       Recognize that when a variety of common activities are repeated the same way, the
                      outcomes are the same.
SC.912.N.2.In.a       Identify examples of investigations that involve science.
SC.912.N.2.Su.b       Recognize that what is known about science can change based on new information.
SC.912.N.3.In.a       Recognize that a scientific theory is developed by repeated investigations of many
                      scientists and agreement on the likely explanation.
SC.912.N.3.Su.b       Recognize examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in nature, such as
                      Newton’s laws.
SC.912.N.4.In.a       Identify ways scientific knowledge and problem solving benefit people.
SC.912.N.4.Su.b       Recognize that some strategies may cost more to solve a problem.
SC.912.E.6.In.a       Describe the three layers of Earth (core, mantle, and crust).
SC.912.E.6.Su.b       Identify types of surface features, such as hills and valleys.
SC.912.E.7.In.a       Identify cycles that occur on Earth, such as the water and carbon cycles, and the role
                      energy plays in them.
SC.912.E.7.Su.b       Recognize that currents move the ocean water around Earth.
SC.912.E.7.Pa.c       Recognize that humans, plants, and animals live on the Earth (biosphere).
SC.912.P.10.In.a      Identify examples of energy being transformed from one form to another (conserved
                      quantity).
SC.912.P.10.Su.b      Recognize the relationship between work and power, such as power is the amount of
                      work a person or machine does.
SC.912.P.10.Pa.c      Recognize the source and recipient of heat transfer.
SC.912.L.14.In.a      Identify that all living things are made of cells and cells function in similar ways (cell
                      theory).
SC.912.L.14.Su.b      Recognize that cells have different parts and each has a function.
                                                          197


SC.912.L.14.Pa.c       Identify ways to prevent infection from bacteria and viruses, such as hand washing and
                       first aid.
SC.912.L.15.In.a       Identify that prehistoric plants and animals changed over time (evolved) or became
                       extinct.
SC.912.L.15.Su.b       Match organisms to the animal, plant, and fungus kingdoms.
SC.912.L.15.Pa.c       Recognize that animals produce offspring.
SC.912.L.16.In.a       Identify that genes are sets of instructions that determine which characteristics are passed
                       from parent to offspring.
SC.912.L.16.Su.b       Recognize that all organisms have a substance called DNA with unique information.
SC.912.L.16.Pa.c       Recognize that illness can result when parts of our bodies are not working properly.
SC.912.L.17.In.a       Recognize that living things in oceans and fresh water are affected by the location,
                       availability of light, depth of the water, and temperature.
SC.912.L.17.Su.b       Recognize how animals and plants in an ecosystem may be affected by changes to the
                       food supply or climate.
SC.912.L.17.Pa.c       Recognize examples of mutual relationships between people and other living things.
SC.912.L.18.In.a       Identify that carbohydrates, fats, proteins, and nucleic acids (macromolecules) are
                       important for human organisms.
SC.912.L.18.Su.b       Recognize that the function of photosynthesis is to produce food for plants.
SC.912.L.18.Pa.c       Identify that food is a source of energy.
                                     2002520 Marine Science II
Section: Basic and Adult Education                          Grade Group: Secondary Grades 9-12
Subject: Science                                            Domain: Integrated Sciences
Course Length: Year                                         Level: 2
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                   Benchmarks
                                                                                                        Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                     Knowledge
SC.912.N.1.1       Define a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, for example: biology, High
                   chemistry, physics, and earth/space science, and do the following:
SC.912.N.1.2       Describe and explain what characterizes science and its methods.                     Moderate
SC.912.N.1.3       Recognize that the strength or usefulness of a scientific claim is evaluated         Low
                   through scientific argumentation, which depends on critical and logical
                   thinking, and the active consideration of alternative scientific explanations to
                   explain the data present
SC.912.N.1.4       Identify sources of information and assess their reliability according to the strict High
                   standards of scientific investigation.
SC.912.N.1.5       Describe and provide examples of how similar investigations conducted in many        Moderate
                   parts of the world result in the same outcome.
SC.912.N.1.6       Describe how scientific inferences are drawn from scientific observations and        Moderate
                   provide examples from the content being studied.
SC.912.N.1.7       Recognize the role of creativity in constructing scientific questions, methods and   Low
                   explanations.
SC.912.N.2.1       Identify what is science, what clearly is not science, and what superficially        High
                   resembles science (but fails to meet the criteria for science).
                                                           198


SC.912.N.2.4   Explain that scientific knowledge is both durable and robust and open to change.    High
               Scientific knowledge can change because it is often examined and re-examined
               by new investigations and scientific argumentation. Because of these frequent
               examinations, scien
SC.912.N.2.5   Describe instances in which scientists' varied backgrounds, talents, interests, and High
               goals influence the inferences and thus the explanations that they make about
               observations of natural phenomena and describe that competing interpretations
               (explanations)
SC.912.N.3.1   Explain that a scientific theory is the culmination of many scientific              High
               investigations drawing together all the current evidence concerning a substantial
               range of phenomena; thus, a scientific theory represents the most powerful
               explanation scientists have
SC.912.N.3.5   Describe the function of models in science, and identify the wide range of          Moderate
               models used in science.
SC.912.N.4.1   Explain how scientific knowledge and reasoning provide an empirically-based         Moderate
               perspective to inform society's decision making.
SC.912.N.4.2   Weigh the merits of alternative strategies for solving a specific societal problem  High
               by comparing a number of different costs and benefits, such as human,
               economic, and environmental.
SC.912.E.6.4   Analyze how specific geologic processes and features are expressed in Florida       High
               and elsewhere.
SC.912.E.6.5   Describe the geologic development of the present day oceans and identify            Moderate
               commonly found features.
SC.912.E.6.6   Analyze past, present, and potential future consequences to the environment         High
               resulting from various energy production technologies.
SC.912.E.7.2   Analyze the causes of the various kinds of surface and deep water motion within     High
               the oceans and their impacts on the transfer of energy between the poles and the
               equator.
SC.912.E.7.3   Differentiate and describe the various interactions among Earth systems,            High
               including: atmosphere, hydrosphere, cryosphere, geosphere, and biosphere.
SC.912.E.7.4   Summarize the conditions that contribute to the climate of a geographic area,       Moderate
               including the relationships to lakes and oceans.
SC.912.E.7.8   Explain how various atmospheric, oceanic, and hydrologic conditions in Florida      High
               have influenced and can influence human behavior, both individually and
               collectively.
SC.912.E.7.9   Cite evidence that the ocean has had a significant influence on climate change by   High
               absorbing, storing, and moving heat, carbon, and water.
SC.912.P.10.2  Explore the Law of Conservation of Energy by differentiating among open,            High
               closed, and isolated systems and explain that the total energy in an isolated
               system is a conserved quantity.
SC.912.P.10.20 Describe the measurable properties of waves and explain the relationships           High
               among them and how these properties change when the wave moves from one
               medium to another.
SC.912.L.17.4  Describe changes in ecosystems resulting from seasonal variations, climate          Moderate
               change and succession.
SC.912.L.17.5  Analyze how population size is determined by births, deaths, immigration,           High
               emigration, and limiting factors (biotic and abiotic) that determine carrying
               capacity.
SC.912.L.17.7  Characterize the biotic and abiotic components that define freshwater systems,      Moderate
               marine systems and terrestrial systems.
SC.912.L.17.10 Diagram and explain the biogeochemical cycles of an ecosystem, including            Moderate
               water, carbon, and nitrogen cycle.
                                                       199


SC.912.L.17.11    Evaluate the costs and benefits of renewable and nonrenewable resources, such        High
                  as water, energy, fossil fuels, wildlife, and forests.
SC.912.L.17.13    Discuss the need for adequate monitoring of environmental parameters when            High
                  making policy decisions.
SC.912.L.17.16    Discuss the large-scale environmental impacts resulting from human activity,         High
                  including waste spills, oil spills, runoff, greenhouse gases, ozone depletion, and
                  surface and groundwater pollution.
SC.912.L.18.12    Discuss the special properties of water that contribute to Earth's suitability as an Moderate
                  environment for life: cohesive behavior, ability to moderate temperature,
                  expansion upon freezing, and versatility as a solvent.
MA.912.S.1.2      Determine appropriate and consistent standards of measurement for the data to        Moderate
                  be collected in a survey or experiment.
MA.912.S.3.2      Collect, organize, and analyze data sets, determine the best format for the data     High
                  and present visual summaries from the following:
LA.910.4.2.2      The student will record information and ideas from primary and/or secondary
                  sources accurately and coherently, noting the validity and reliability of these
                  sources and attributing sources of information;
LA.910.2.2.3      The student will organize information to show understanding or relationships
                  among facts, ideas, and events (e.g., representing key points within text through
                  charting, mapping, paraphrasing, summarizing, comparing, contrasting, or
                  outlining);
               Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code    Access Point Descriptor
SC.912.N.1.In.a       Identify a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, including life science, earth
                      and space science, or physical science, and do the following: 1. Identify a scientific
                      question 2. Examine reliable sources of informtion to identify what is already k
SC.912.N.1.Su.b       Identify the basic process used in scientific investigations, including questioning,
                      observing, recording, determining, and sharing results.
SC.912.N.1.Pa.c       Recognize that when a variety of common activities are repeated the same way, the
                      outcomes are the same.
SC.912.N.2.In.a       Identify examples of investigations that involve science.
SC.912.N.2.Su.b       Recognize that what is known about science can change based on new information.
SC.912.N.3.In.a       Recognize that a scientific theory is developed by repeated investigations of many
                      scientists and agreement on the likely explanation.
SC.912.N.3.Su.b       Recognize examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in nature, such as
                      Newton’s laws.
SC.912.N.4.In.a       Identify ways scientific knowledge and problem solving benefit people.
SC.912.N.4.Su.b       Recognize that some strategies may cost more to solve a problem.
SC.912.E.6.In.a       Describe the three layers of Earth (core, mantle, and crust).
SC.912.E.6.Su.b       Identify types of surface features, such as hills and valleys.
SC.912.E.7.In.a       Identify cycles that occur on Earth, such as the water and carbon cycles, and the role
                      energy plays in them.
SC.912.E.7.Su.b       Recognize that currents move the ocean water around Earth.
SC.912.E.7.Pa.c       Recognize that humans, plants, and animals live on the Earth (biosphere).
SC.912.P.10.In.a      Identify examples of energy being transformed from one form to another (conserved
                      quantity).
                                                          200


SC.912.P.10.Su.b       Recognize the relationship between work and power, such as power is the amount of
                       work a person or machine does.
SC.912.P.10.Pa.c       Recognize the source and recipient of heat transfer.
SC.912.L.17.In.a       Recognize that living things in oceans and fresh water are affected by the location,
                       availability of light, depth of the water, and temperature.
SC.912.L.17.Su.b       Recognize how animals and plants in an ecosystem may be affected by changes to the
                       food supply or climate.
SC.912.L.17.Pa.c       Recognize examples of mutual relationships between people and other living things.
SC.912.L.18.In.a       Identify that carbohydrates, fats, proteins, and nucleic acids (macromolecules) are
                       important for human organisms.
SC.912.L.18.Su.b       Recognize that the function of photosynthesis is to produce food for plants.
SC.912.L.18.Pa.c       Identify that food is a source of energy.
                               2002530 Marine Science II Honors
Section: Basic and Adult Education                          Grade Group: Secondary Grades 9-12
Subject: Science                                            Domain: Integrated Sciences
Course Length: Year                                         Level: 3
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                   Benchmarks
                                                                                                        Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                     Knowledge
SC.912.N.1.1       Define a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, for example: biology, High
                   chemistry, physics, and earth/space science, and do the following:
SC.912.N.1.2       Describe and explain what characterizes science and its methods.                     Moderate
SC.912.N.1.3       Recognize that the strength or usefulness of a scientific claim is evaluated         Low
                   through scientific argumentation, which depends on critical and logical
                   thinking, and the active consideration of alternative scientific explanations to
                   explain the data present
SC.912.N.1.4       Identify sources of information and assess their reliability according to the strict High
                   standards of scientific investigation.
SC.912.N.1.5       Describe and provide examples of how similar investigations conducted in many        Moderate
                   parts of the world result in the same outcome.
SC.912.N.1.6       Describe how scientific inferences are drawn from scientific observations and        Moderate
                   provide examples from the content being studied.
SC.912.N.1.7       Recognize the role of creativity in constructing scientific questions, methods and   Low
                   explanations.
SC.912.N.2.1       Identify what is science, what clearly is not science, and what superficially        High
                   resembles science (but fails to meet the criteria for science).
SC.912.N.2.4       Explain that scientific knowledge is both durable and robust and open to change.     High
                   Scientific knowledge can change because it is often examined and re-examined
                   by new investigations and scientific argumentation. Because of these frequent
                   examinations, scien
SC.912.N.2.5       Describe instances in which scientists' varied backgrounds, talents, interests, and  High
                   goals influence the inferences and thus the explanations that they make about
                   observations of natural phenomena and describe that competing interpretations
                   (explanations)
                                                           201


SC.912.N.3.1   Explain that a scientific theory is the culmination of many scientific             High
               investigations drawing together all the current evidence concerning a substantial
               range of phenomena; thus, a scientific theory represents the most powerful
               explanation scientists have
SC.912.N.3.5   Describe the function of models in science, and identify the wide range of         Moderate
               models used in science.
SC.912.N.4.1   Explain how scientific knowledge and reasoning provide an empirically-based        Moderate
               perspective to inform society's decision making.
SC.912.N.4.2   Weigh the merits of alternative strategies for solving a specific societal problem High
               by comparing a number of different costs and benefits, such as human,
               economic, and environmental.
SC.912.E.6.3   Analyze the scientific theory of plate tectonics and identify related major        High
               processes and features as a result of moving plates.
SC.912.E.6.4   Analyze how specific geologic processes and features are expressed in Florida      High
               and elsewhere.
SC.912.E.6.5   Describe the geologic development of the present day oceans and identify           Moderate
               commonly found features.
SC.912.E.6.6   Analyze past, present, and potential future consequences to the environment        High
               resulting from various energy production technologies.
SC.912.E.7.1   Analyze the movement of matter and energy through the different                    High
               biogeochemical cycles, including water and carbon.
SC.912.E.7.2   Analyze the causes of the various kinds of surface and deep water motion within    High
               the oceans and their impacts on the transfer of energy between the poles and the
               equator.
SC.912.E.7.3   Differentiate and describe the various interactions among Earth systems,           High
               including: atmosphere, hydrosphere, cryosphere, geosphere, and biosphere.
SC.912.E.7.4   Summarize the conditions that contribute to the climate of a geographic area,      Moderate
               including the relationships to lakes and oceans.
SC.912.E.7.5   Predict future weather conditions based on present observations and conceptual     High
               models and recognize limitations and uncertainties of such predictions.
SC.912.E.7.8   Explain how various atmospheric, oceanic, and hydrologic conditions in Florida     High
               have influenced and can influence human behavior, both individually and
               collectively.
SC.912.E.7.9   Cite evidence that the ocean has had a significant influence on climate change by  High
               absorbing, storing, and moving heat, carbon, and water.
SC.912.P.10.2  Explore the Law of Conservation of Energy by differentiating among open,           High
               closed, and isolated systems and explain that the total energy in an isolated
               system is a conserved quantity.
SC.912.P.10.20 Describe the measurable properties of waves and explain the relationships          High
               among them and how these properties change when the wave moves from one
               medium to another.
SC.912.L.17.4  Describe changes in ecosystems resulting from seasonal variations, climate         Moderate
               change and succession.
SC.912.L.17.5  Analyze how population size is determined by births, deaths, immigration,          High
               emigration, and limiting factors (biotic and abiotic) that determine carrying
               capacity.
SC.912.L.17.7  Characterize the biotic and abiotic components that define freshwater systems,     Moderate
               marine systems and terrestrial systems.
SC.912.L.17.10 Diagram and explain the biogeochemical cycles of an ecosystem, including           Moderate
               water, carbon, and nitrogen cycle.
                                                       202


SC.912.L.17.11    Evaluate the costs and benefits of renewable and nonrenewable resources, such        High
                  as water, energy, fossil fuels, wildlife, and forests.
SC.912.L.17.13    Discuss the need for adequate monitoring of environmental parameters when            High
                  making policy decisions.
SC.912.L.17.15    Discuss the effects of technology on environmental quality.                          Moderate
SC.912.L.17.16    Discuss the large-scale environmental impacts resulting from human activity,         High
                  including waste spills, oil spills, runoff, greenhouse gases, ozone depletion, and
                  surface and groundwater pollution.
SC.912.L.18.12    Discuss the special properties of water that contribute to Earth's suitability as an Moderate
                  environment for life: cohesive behavior, ability to moderate temperature,
                  expansion upon freezing, and versatility as a solvent.
MA.912.S.1.2      Determine appropriate and consistent standards of measurement for the data to        Moderate
                  be collected in a survey or experiment.
MA.912.S.3.2      Collect, organize, and analyze data sets, determine the best format for the data     High
                  and present visual summaries from the following:
LA.910.4.2.2      The student will record information and ideas from primary and/or secondary
                  sources accurately and coherently, noting the validity and reliability of these
                  sources and attributing sources of information;
LA.910.2.2.3      The student will organize information to show understanding or relationships
                  among facts, ideas, and events (e.g., representing key points within text through
                  charting, mapping, paraphrasing, summarizing, comparing, contrasting, or
                  outlining);
               Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code    Access Point Descriptor
SC.912.N.1.In.a       Identify a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, including life science, earth
                      and space science, or physical science, and do the following: 1. Identify a scientific
                      question 2. Examine reliable sources of informtion to identify what is already k
SC.912.N.1.Su.b       Identify the basic process used in scientific investigations, including questioning,
                      observing, recording, determining, and sharing results.
SC.912.N.1.Pa.c       Recognize that when a variety of common activities are repeated the same way, the
                      outcomes are the same.
SC.912.N.2.In.a       Identify examples of investigations that involve science.
SC.912.N.2.Su.b       Recognize that what is known about science can change based on new information.
SC.912.N.3.In.a       Recognize that a scientific theory is developed by repeated investigations of many
                      scientists and agreement on the likely explanation.
SC.912.N.3.Su.b       Recognize examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in nature, such as
                      Newton’s laws.
SC.912.N.4.In.a       Identify ways scientific knowledge and problem solving benefit people.
SC.912.N.4.Su.b       Recognize that some strategies may cost more to solve a problem.
SC.912.E.6.In.a       Describe the three layers of Earth (core, mantle, and crust).
SC.912.E.6.Su.b       Identify types of surface features, such as hills and valleys.
SC.912.E.7.In.a       Identify cycles that occur on Earth, such as the water and carbon cycles, and the role
                      energy plays in them.
SC.912.E.7.Su.b       Recognize that currents move the ocean water around Earth.
SC.912.E.7.Pa.c       Recognize that humans, plants, and animals live on the Earth (biosphere).
SC.912.P.10.In.a      Identify examples of energy being transformed from one form to another (conserved
                      quantity).
                                                          203


SC.912.P.10.Su.b       Recognize the relationship between work and power, such as power is the amount of
                       work a person or machine does.
SC.912.P.10.Pa.c       Recognize the source and recipient of heat transfer.
SC.912.L.17.In.a       Recognize that living things in oceans and fresh water are affected by the location,
                       availability of light, depth of the water, and temperature.
SC.912.L.17.Su.b       Recognize how animals and plants in an ecosystem may be affected by changes to the
                       food supply or climate.
SC.912.L.17.Pa.c       Recognize examples of mutual relationships between people and other living things.
SC.912.L.18.In.a       Identify that carbohydrates, fats, proteins, and nucleic acids (macromolecules) are
                       important for human organisms.
SC.912.L.18.Su.b       Recognize that the function of photosynthesis is to produce food for plants.
SC.912.L.18.Pa.c       Identify that food is a source of energy.
                                         2002540 Solar Energy I
Section: Basic and Adult Education                          Grade Group: Secondary Grades 9-12
Subject: Science                                            Domain: Integrated Sciences
Course Length: Year                                         Level: 3
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                   Benchmarks
                                                                                                        Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                     Knowledge
SC.912.N.1.1       Define a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, for example: biology, High
                   chemistry, physics, and earth/space science, and do the following:
SC.912.N.1.2       Describe and explain what characterizes science and its methods.                     Moderate
SC.912.N.1.3       Recognize that the strength or usefulness of a scientific claim is evaluated         Low
                   through scientific argumentation, which depends on critical and logical
                   thinking, and the active consideration of alternative scientific explanations to
                   explain the data present
SC.912.N.1.4       Identify sources of information and assess their reliability according to the strict High
                   standards of scientific investigation.
SC.912.N.1.5       Describe and provide examples of how similar investigations conducted in many        Moderate
                   parts of the world result in the same outcome.
SC.912.N.1.6       Describe how scientific inferences are drawn from scientific observations and        Moderate
                   provide examples from the content being studied.
SC.912.N.1.7       Recognize the role of creativity in constructing scientific questions, methods and   Low
                   explanations.
SC.912.N.2.1       Identify what is science, what clearly is not science, and what superficially        High
                   resembles science (but fails to meet the criteria for science).
SC.912.N.2.2       Identify which questions can be answered through science and which questions         High
                   are outside the boundaries of scientific investigation, such as questions
                   addressed by other ways of knowing, such as art, philosophy, and religion.
SC.912.N.2.3       Identify examples of pseudoscience (such as astrology, phrenology) in society.       Low
SC.912.N.2.4       Explain that scientific knowledge is both durable and robust and open to change. High
                   Scientific knowledge can change because it is often examined and re-examined
                   by new investigations and scientific argumentation. Because of these frequent
                   examinations, scien
                                                           204


SC.912.N.2.5   Describe instances in which scientists' varied backgrounds, talents, interests, and High
               goals influence the inferences and thus the explanations that they make about
               observations of natural phenomena and describe that competing interpretations
               (explanations)
SC.912.N.3.1   Explain that a scientific theory is the culmination of many scientific              High
               investigations drawing together all the current evidence concerning a substantial
               range of phenomena; thus, a scientific theory represents the most powerful
               explanation scientists have
SC.912.N.3.5   Describe the function of models in science, and identify the wide range of          Moderate
               models used in science.
SC.912.N.4.1   Explain how scientific knowledge and reasoning provide an empirically-based         Moderate
               perspective to inform society's decision making.
SC.912.N.4.2   Weigh the merits of alternative strategies for solving a specific societal problem  High
               by comparing a number of different costs and benefits, such as human,
               economic, and environmental.
SC.912.E.5.4   Explain the physical properties of the Sun and its dynamic nature and connect       High
               them to conditions and events on Earth.
SC.912.E.6.6   Analyze past, present, and potential future consequences to the environment         High
               resulting from various energy production technologies.
SC.912.E.7.1   Analyze the movement of matter and energy through the different                     High
               biogeochemical cycles, including water and carbon.
SC.912.E.7.2   Analyze the causes of the various kinds of surface and deep water motion within     High
               the oceans and their impacts on the transfer of energy between the poles and the
               equator.
SC.912.E.7.9   Cite evidence that the ocean has had a significant influence on climate change by   High
               absorbing, storing, and moving heat, carbon, and water.
SC.912.P.8.12  Describe the properties of the carbon atom that make the diversity of carbon        Moderate
               compounds possible.
SC.912.P.8.13  Identify selected functional groups and relate how they contribute to properties    High
               of carbon compounds.
SC.912.P.10.1  Differentiate among the various forms of energy and recognize that they can be      Moderate
               transformed from one form to others.
SC.912.P.10.2  Explore the Law of Conservation of Energy by differentiating among open,            High
               closed, and isolated systems and explain that the total energy in an isolated
               system is a conserved quantity.
SC.912.P.10.3  Compare and contrast work and power qualitatively and quantitatively.               Moderate
SC.912.P.10.9  Describe the quantization of energy at the atomic level.                            Moderate
SC.912.L.17.11 Evaluate the costs and benefits of renewable and nonrenewable resources, such       High
               as water, energy, fossil fuels, wildlife, and forests.
SC.912.L.17.12 Discuss the political, social, and environmental consequences of sustainable use    High
               of land.
SC.912.L.17.13 Discuss the need for adequate monitoring of environmental parameters when           High
               making policy decisions.
SC.912.L.17.15 Discuss the effects of technology on environmental quality.                         Moderate
SC.912.L.17.17 Assess the effectiveness of innovative methods of protecting the environment.       High
SC.912.L.17.18 Describe how human population size and resource use relate to environmental         Moderate
               quality.
SC.912.L.17.19 Describe how different natural resources are produced and how their rates of use Moderate
               and renewal limit availability.
SC.912.L.17.20 Predict the impact of individuals on environmental systems and examine how          High
               human lifestyles affect sustainability.
                                                       205


MA.912.S.1.2      Determine appropriate and consistent standards of measurement for the data to Moderate
                  be collected in a survey or experiment.
MA.912.S.3.2      Collect, organize, and analyze data sets, determine the best format for the data     High
                  and present visual summaries from the following:
LA.910.4.2.2      The student will record information and ideas from primary and/or secondary
                  sources accurately and coherently, noting the validity and reliability of these
                  sources and attributing sources of information;
LA.910.2.2.3      The student will organize information to show understanding or relationships
                  among facts, ideas, and events (e.g., representing key points within text through
                  charting, mapping, paraphrasing, summarizing, comparing, contrasting, or
                  outlining);
               Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code    Access Point Descriptor
SC.912.N.1.In.a       Identify a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, including life science, earth
                      and space science, or physical science, and do the following: 1. Identify a scientific
                      question 2. Examine reliable sources of informtion to identify what is already k
SC.912.N.1.Su.b       Identify the basic process used in scientific investigations, including questioning,
                      observing, recording, determining, and sharing results.
SC.912.N.1.Pa.c       Recognize that when a variety of common activities are repeated the same way, the
                      outcomes are the same.
SC.912.N.2.In.a       Identify examples of investigations that involve science.
SC.912.N.2.Su.b       Recognize that what is known about science can change based on new information.
SC.912.N.3.In.a       Recognize that a scientific theory is developed by repeated investigations of many
                      scientists and agreement on the likely explanation.
SC.912.N.3.Su.b       Recognize examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in nature, such as
                      Newton’s laws.
SC.912.N.4.In.a       Identify ways scientific knowledge and problem solving benefit people.
SC.912.N.4.Su.b       Recognize that some strategies may cost more to solve a problem.
SC.912.E.5.In.a       Recognize that the Milky Way is part of the expanding universe.
SC.912.E.5.Su.b       Recognize that stars are made of burning gases.
SC.912.E.5.Pa.c       Observe and recognize effects of the Sun on Earth, such as temperature changes.
SC.912.E.7.In.a       Identify cycles that occur on Earth, such as the water and carbon cycles, and the role
                      energy plays in them.
SC.912.E.7.Su.b       Recognize that currents move the ocean water around Earth.
SC.912.E.7.Pa.c       Recognize that humans, plants, and animals live on the Earth (biosphere).
SC.912.P.8.In.a       Classify states of matter as solid, liquid, and gaseous.
SC.912.P.8.Su.b       Identify examples of physical and chemical changes.
SC.912.P.8.Pa.c       Recognize that the parts of an object can be put together to make a whole.
SC.912.P.10.In.a      Identify examples of energy being transformed from one form to another (conserved
                      quantity).
SC.912.P.10.Su.b      Recognize the relationship between work and power, such as power is the amount of
                      work a person or machine does.
SC.912.P.10.Pa.c      Recognize the source and recipient of heat transfer.
SC.912.L.17.In.a      Recognize that living things in oceans and fresh water are affected by the location,
                      availability of light, depth of the water, and temperature.
                                                          206


SC.912.L.17.Su.b       Recognize how animals and plants in an ecosystem may be affected by changes to the
                       food supply or climate.
SC.912.L.17.Pa.c       Recognize examples of mutual relationships between people and other living things.
                                       2002550 Solar Energy II
Section: Basic and Adult Education                          Grade Group: Secondary Grades 9-12
Subject: Science                                            Domain: Integrated Sciences
Course Length: Year                                         Level: 3
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                  Benchmarks
                                                                                                        Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                     Knowledge
SC.912.N.1.1       Define a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, for example: biology, High
                   chemistry, physics, and earth/space science, and do the following:
SC.912.N.1.2       Describe and explain what characterizes science and its methods.                     Moderate
SC.912.N.1.3       Recognize that the strength or usefulness of a scientific claim is evaluated         Low
                   through scientific argumentation, which depends on critical and logical
                   thinking, and the active consideration of alternative scientific explanations to
                   explain the data present
SC.912.N.1.4       Identify sources of information and assess their reliability according to the strict High
                   standards of scientific investigation.
SC.912.N.1.5       Describe and provide examples of how similar investigations conducted in many        Moderate
                   parts of the world result in the same outcome.
SC.912.N.1.6       Describe how scientific inferences are drawn from scientific observations and        Moderate
                   provide examples from the content being studied.
SC.912.N.1.7       Recognize the role of creativity in constructing scientific questions, methods and   Low
                   explanations.
SC.912.N.2.1       Identify what is science, what clearly is not science, and what superficially        High
                   resembles science (but fails to meet the criteria for science).
SC.912.N.2.4       Explain that scientific knowledge is both durable and robust and open to change.     High
                   Scientific knowledge can change because it is often examined and re-examined
                   by new investigations and scientific argumentation. Because of these frequent
                   examinations, scien
SC.912.N.2.5       Describe instances in which scientists' varied backgrounds, talents, interests, and  High
                   goals influence the inferences and thus the explanations that they make about
                   observations of natural phenomena and describe that competing interpretations
                   (explanations)
SC.912.N.3.1       Explain that a scientific theory is the culmination of many scientific               High
                   investigations drawing together all the current evidence concerning a substantial
                   range of phenomena; thus, a scientific theory represents the most powerful
                   explanation scientists have
SC.912.N.3.5       Describe the function of models in science, and identify the wide range of           Moderate
                   models used in science.
SC.912.N.4.1       Explain how scientific knowledge and reasoning provide an empirically-based          Moderate
                   perspective to inform society's decision making.
SC.912.N.4.2       Weigh the merits of alternative strategies for solving a specific societal problem   High
                   by comparing a number of different costs and benefits, such as human,
                   economic, and environmental.
                                                           207


SC.912.E.6.6      Analyze past, present, and potential future consequences to the environment          High
                  resulting from various energy production technologies.
SC.912.E.7.1      Analyze the movement of matter and energy through the different                      High
                  biogeochemical cycles, including water and carbon.
SC.912.P.8.12     Describe the properties of the carbon atom that make the diversity of carbon         Moderate
                  compounds possible.
SC.912.P.8.13     Identify selected functional groups and relate how they contribute to properties     High
                  of carbon compounds.
SC.912.P.10.1     Differentiate among the various forms of energy and recognize that they can be       Moderate
                  transformed from one form to others.
SC.912.P.10.2     Explore the Law of Conservation of Energy by differentiating among open,             High
                  closed, and isolated systems and explain that the total energy in an isolated
                  system is a conserved quantity.
SC.912.P.10.3     Compare and contrast work and power qualitatively and quantitatively.                Moderate
SC.912.P.10.8     Explain entropy's role in determining the efficiency of processes that convert       High
                  energy to work.
SC.912.L.17.11    Evaluate the costs and benefits of renewable and nonrenewable resources, such        High
                  as water, energy, fossil fuels, wildlife, and forests.
SC.912.L.17.17    Assess the effectiveness of innovative methods of protecting the environment.        High
SC.912.L.17.20    Predict the impact of individuals on environmental systems and examine how           High
                  human lifestyles affect sustainability.
MA.912.S.1.2      Determine appropriate and consistent standards of measurement for the data to Moderate
                  be collected in a survey or experiment.
MA.912.S.3.2      Collect, organize, and analyze data sets, determine the best format for the data     High
                  and present visual summaries from the following:
LA.910.4.2.2      The student will record information and ideas from primary and/or secondary
                  sources accurately and coherently, noting the validity and reliability of these
                  sources and attributing sources of information;
LA.910.2.2.3      The student will organize information to show understanding or relationships
                  among facts, ideas, and events (e.g., representing key points within text through
                  charting, mapping, paraphrasing, summarizing, comparing, contrasting, or
                  outlining);
               Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code    Access Point Descriptor
SC.912.N.1.In.a       Identify a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, including life science, earth
                      and space science, or physical science, and do the following: 1. Identify a scientific
                      question 2. Examine reliable sources of informtion to identify what is already k
SC.912.N.1.Su.b       Identify the basic process used in scientific investigations, including questioning,
                      observing, recording, determining, and sharing results.
SC.912.N.1.Pa.c       Recognize that when a variety of common activities are repeated the same way, the
                      outcomes are the same.
SC.912.N.2.In.a       Identify examples of investigations that involve science.
SC.912.N.2.Su.b       Recognize that what is known about science can change based on new information.
SC.912.N.3.In.a       Recognize that a scientific theory is developed by repeated investigations of many
                      scientists and agreement on the likely explanation.
SC.912.N.3.Su.b       Recognize examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in nature, such as
                      Newton’s laws.
SC.912.N.4.In.a       Identify ways scientific knowledge and problem solving benefit people.
                                                          208


SC.912.N.4.Su.b        Recognize that some strategies may cost more to solve a problem.
SC.912.E.7.In.a        Identify cycles that occur on Earth, such as the water and carbon cycles, and the role
                       energy plays in them.
SC.912.E.7.Su.b        Recognize that currents move the ocean water around Earth.
SC.912.E.7.Pa.c        Recognize that humans, plants, and animals live on the Earth (biosphere).
SC.912.P.8.In.a        Classify states of matter as solid, liquid, and gaseous.
SC.912.P.8.Su.b        Identify examples of physical and chemical changes.
SC.912.P.8.Pa.c        Recognize that the parts of an object can be put together to make a whole.
SC.912.P.10.In.a       Identify examples of energy being transformed from one form to another (conserved
                       quantity).
SC.912.P.10.Su.b       Recognize the relationship between work and power, such as power is the amount of
                       work a person or machine does.
SC.912.P.10.Pa.c       Recognize the source and recipient of heat transfer.
SC.912.L.17.In.a       Recognize that living things in oceans and fresh water are affected by the location,
                       availability of light, depth of the water, and temperature.
SC.912.L.17.Su.b       Recognize how animals and plants in an ecosystem may be affected by changes to the
                       food supply or climate.
SC.912.L.17.Pa.c       Recognize examples of mutual relationships between people and other living things.
                                   2002400 Integrated Science I
Section: Basic and Adult Education                           Grade Group: Secondary Grades 9-12
Subject: Science                                             Domain: Integrated Sciences
Course Length: Year                                          Level: 2
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                   Benchmarks
                                                                                                        Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                     Knowledge
SC.912.N.1.1       Define a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, for example: biology, High
                   chemistry, physics, and earth/space science, and do the following:
SC.912.N.1.2       Describe and explain what characterizes science and its methods.                     Moderate
SC.912.N.1.4       Identify sources of information and assess their reliability according to the strict High
                   standards of scientific investigation.
SC.912.N.1.7       Recognize the role of creativity in constructing scientific questions, methods and   Low
                   explanations.
SC.912.N.3.2       Describe the role consensus plays in the historical development of a theory in       Moderate
                   any one of the disciplines of science.
SC.912.N.3.3       Explain that scientific laws are descriptions of specific relationships under given  Moderate
                   conditions in nature, but do not offer explanations for those relationships.
SC.912.N.3.4       Recognize that theories do not become laws, nor do laws become theories;             Moderate
                   theories are well supported explanations and laws are well supported
                   descriptions.
SC.912.N.3.5       Describe the function of models in science, and identify the wide range of           Moderate
                   models used in science.
SC.912.E.5.1       Cite evidence used to develop and verify the scientific theory of the Big Bang       High
                   (also known as the Big Bang Theory) of the origin of the universe.
                                                           209


SC.912.E.5.2   Identify patterns in the organization and distribution of matter in the universe    Moderate
               and the forces that determine them.
SC.912.E.5.4   Explain the physical properties of the Sun and its dynamic nature and connect       High
               them to conditions and events on Earth.
SC.912.E.5.7   Relate the history of and explain the justification for future space exploration    High
               and continuing technology development.
SC.912.E.5.8   Connect the concepts of radiation and the electromagnetic spectrum to the use of    High
               historical and newly-developed observational tools.
SC.912.E.6.1   Describe and differentiate the layers of Earth and the interactions among them.     Moderate
SC.912.E.6.2   Connect surface features to surface processes that are responsible for their        Moderate
               formation.
SC.912.E.6.3   Analyze the scientific theory of plate tectonics and identify related major         High
               processes and features as a result of moving plates.
SC.912.E.7.1   Analyze the movement of matter and energy through the different                     High
               biogeochemical cycles, including water and carbon.
SC.912.E.7.3   Differentiate and describe the various interactions among Earth systems,            High
               including: atmosphere, hydrosphere, cryosphere, geosphere, and biosphere.
SC.912.P.8.1   Differentiate among the four states of matter.                                      Moderate
SC.912.P.8.2   Differentiate between physical and chemical properties and physical and             Moderate
               chemical changes of matter.
SC.912.P.8.3   Explore the scientific theory of atoms (also known as atomic theory) by             High
               describing changes in the atomic model over time and why those changes were
               necessitated by experimental evidence.
SC.912.P.8.4   Explore the scientific theory of atoms (also known as atomic theory) by             High
               describing the structure of atoms in terms of protons, neutrons and electrons, and
               differentiate among these particles in terms of their mass, electrical charges and
               locations within
SC.912.P.8.5   Relate properties of atoms and their position in the periodic table to the          Moderate
               arrangement of their electrons.
SC.912.P.8.7   Interpret formula representations of molecules and compounds in terms of            Moderate
               composition and structure.
SC.912.P.10.1  Differentiate among the various forms of energy and recognize that they can be      Moderate
               transformed from one form to others.
SC.912.P.10.4  Describe heat as the energy transferred by convection, conduction, and              High
               radiation, and explain the connection of heat to change in temperature or states
               of matter.
SC.912.P.10.7  Distinguish between endothermic and exothermic chemical processes.                  Moderate
SC.912.P.10.20 Describe the measurable properties of waves and explain the relationships           High
               among them and how these properties change when the wave moves from one
               medium to another.
SC.912.P.12.3  Interpret and apply Newton's three laws of motion.                                  High
SC.912.L.14.1  Describe the scientific theory of cells (cell theory) and relate the history of its Moderate
               discovery to the process of science.
SC.912.L.14.2  Relate structure to function for the components of plant and animal cells.          Moderate
               Explain the role of cell membranes as a highly selective barrier (passive and
               active transport).
SC.912.L.14.3  Compare and contrast the general structures of plant and animal cells. Compare      Moderate
               and contrast the general structures of prokaryotic and eukaryotic cells.
SC.912.L.14.7  Relate the structure of each of the major plant organs and tissues to               Moderate
               physiological processes.
                                                      210


SC.912.L.15.1     Explain how the scientific theory of evolution is supported by the fossil record,    High
                  comparative anatomy, comparative embryology, biogeography, molecular
                  biology, and observed evolutionary change.
SC.912.L.15.4     Describe how and why organisms are hierarchically classified and based on            High
                  evolutionary relationships.
SC.912.L.15.6     Discuss distinguishing characteristics of the domains and kingdoms of living         Moderate
                  organisms.
SC.912.L.15.8     Describe the scientific explanations of the origin of life on Earth.                 Moderate
SC.912.L.16.1     Use Mendel's laws of segregation and independent assortment to analyze               High
                  patterns of inheritance.
SC.912.L.17.2     Explain the general distribution of life in aquatic systems as a function of         High
                  chemistry, geography, light, depth, salinity, and temperature.
SC.912.L.17.3     Discuss how various oceanic and freshwater processes, such as currents, tides,       Moderate
                  and waves, affect the abundance of aquatic organisms.
SC.912.L.17.4     Describe changes in ecosystems resulting from seasonal variations, climate           Moderate
                  change and succession.
SC.912.L.17.11    Evaluate the costs and benefits of renewable and nonrenewable resources, such        High
                  as water, energy, fossil fuels, wildlife, and forests.
SC.912.L.18.7     Identify the reactants, products, and basic functions of photosynthesis.             Moderate
MA.912.S.1.2      Determine appropriate and consistent standards of measurement for the data to Moderate
                  be collected in a survey or experiment.
MA.912.S.3.2      Collect, organize, and analyze data sets, determine the best format for the data     High
                  and present visual summaries from the following:
LA.910.4.2.2      The student will record information and ideas from primary and/or secondary
                  sources accurately and coherently, noting the validity and reliability of these
                  sources and attributing sources of information;
LA.910.2.2.3      The student will organize information to show understanding or relationships
                  among facts, ideas, and events (e.g., representing key points within text through
                  charting, mapping, paraphrasing, summarizing, comparing, contrasting, or
                  outlining);
               Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code    Access Point Descriptor
SC.912.N.1.In.a       Identify a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, including life science, earth
                      and space science, or physical science, and do the following: 1. Identify a scientific
                      question 2. Examine reliable sources of informtion to identify what is already k
SC.912.N.1.Su.b       Identify the basic process used in scientific investigations, including questioning,
                      observing, recording, determining, and sharing results.
SC.912.N.1.Pa.c       Recognize that when a variety of common activities are repeated the same way, the
                      outcomes are the same.
SC.912.N.3.In.a       Recognize that a scientific theory is developed by repeated investigations of many
                      scientists and agreement on the likely explanation.
SC.912.N.3.In.b       Identify examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in the natural world, such
                      as Newton’s laws.
SC.912.N.3.Su.b       Recognize examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in nature, such as
                      Newton’s laws.
SC.912.N.3.Su.c       Recognize ways models are used in the study of science.
SC.912.E.5.In.a       Recognize that the Milky Way is part of the expanding universe.
SC.912.E.5.Su.b       Recognize that stars are made of burning gases.
                                                          211


SC.912.E.5.Pa.c  Observe and recognize effects of the Sun on Earth, such as temperature changes.
SC.912.E.6.In.a  Describe the three layers of Earth (core, mantle, and crust).
SC.912.E.6.Su.b  Identify types of surface features, such as hills and valleys.
SC.912.E.7.In.a  Identify cycles that occur on Earth, such as the water and carbon cycles, and the role
                 energy plays in them.
SC.912.E.7.Su.b  Recognize that currents move the ocean water around Earth.
SC.912.E.7.Pa.c  Recognize that humans, plants, and animals live on the Earth (biosphere).
SC.912.P.8.In.a  Classify states of matter as solid, liquid, and gaseous.
SC.912.P.8.Su.b  Identify examples of physical and chemical changes.
SC.912.P.8.Pa.c  Recognize that the parts of an object can be put together to make a whole.
SC.912.P.10.In.a Identify examples of energy being transformed from one form to another (conserved
                 quantity).
SC.912.P.10.Su.b Recognize the relationship between work and power, such as power is the amount of
                 work a person or machine does.
SC.912.P.10.Pa.c Recognize the source and recipient of heat transfer.
SC.912.P.12.In.a Recognize that scalar quantities describe the magnitude of the measurement, such as
                 size, weight, volume, area, temperature, or speed.
SC.912.P.12.Su.b Recognize that acceleration generally involves a change in speed.
SC.912.P.12.Pa.c Identify the source of the force moving an object.
SC.912.L.14.In.a Identify that all living things are made of cells and cells function in similar ways (cell
                 theory).
SC.912.L.14.Su.b Recognize that cells have different parts and each has a function.
SC.912.L.14.Pa.c Identify ways to prevent infection from bacteria and viruses, such as hand washing and
                 first aid.
SC.912.L.15.In.a Identify that prehistoric plants and animals changed over time (evolved) or became
                 extinct.
SC.912.L.15.Su.b Match organisms to the animal, plant, and fungus kingdoms.
SC.912.L.15.Pa.c Recognize that animals produce offspring.
SC.912.L.16.In.a Identify that genes are sets of instructions that determine which characteristics are passed
                 from parent to offspring.
SC.912.L.16.Su.b Recognize that all organisms have a substance called DNA with unique information.
SC.912.L.16.Pa.c Recognize that illness can result when parts of our bodies are not working properly.
SC.912.L.17.In.a Recognize that living things in oceans and fresh water are affected by the location,
                 availability of light, depth of the water, and temperature.
SC.912.L.17.Su.b Recognize how animals and plants in an ecosystem may be affected by changes to the
                 food supply or climate.
SC.912.L.17.Pa.c Recognize examples of mutual relationships between people and other living things.
SC.912.L.18.In.a Identify that carbohydrates, fats, proteins, and nucleic acids (macromolecules) are
                 important for human organisms.
SC.912.L.18.Su.b Recognize that the function of photosynthesis is to produce food for plants.
SC.912.L.18.Pa.c Identify that food is a source of energy.
                                                     212


                                   2002420 Integrated Science II
Section: Basic and Adult Education                          Grade Group: Secondary Grades 9-12
Subject: Science                                            Domain: Integrated Sciences
Course Length: Year                                         Level: 2
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                  Benchmarks
                                                                                                      Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                   Knowledge
SC.912.N.1.1       Define a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, for example: biology, High
                   chemistry, physics, and earth/space science, and do the following:
SC.912.N.1.2       Describe and explain what characterizes science and its methods.                   Moderate
SC.912.N.1.5       Describe and provide examples of how similar investigations conducted in many      Moderate
                   parts of the world result in the same outcome.
SC.912.N.1.7       Recognize the role of creativity in constructing scientific questions, methods and Low
                   explanations.
SC.912.N.2.1       Identify what is science, what clearly is not science, and what superficially      High
                   resembles science (but fails to meet the criteria for science).
SC.912.N.2.3       Identify examples of pseudoscience (such as astrology, phrenology) in society.     Low
SC.912.N.3.1       Explain that a scientific theory is the culmination of many scientific             High
                   investigations drawing together all the current evidence concerning a substantial
                   range of phenomena; thus, a scientific theory represents the most powerful
                   explanation scientists have
SC.912.E.5.3       Describe and predict how the initial mass of a star determines its evolution.      Moderate
SC.912.E.5.5       Explain the formation of planetary systems based on our knowledge of our Solar     High
                   System and apply this knowledge to newly discovered planetary systems.
SC.912.E.5.6       Develop logical connections through physical principles, including Kepler's and    High
                   Newton's Laws about the relationships and the effects of Earth, Moon, and Sun
                   on each other.
SC.912.E.7.4       Summarize the conditions that contribute to the climate of a geographic area,      Moderate
                   including the relationships to lakes and oceans.
SC.912.E.7.7       Identify, analyze, and relate the internal (Earth system) and external             High
                   (astronomical) conditions that contribute to global climate change.
SC.912.P.8.6       Distinguish between bonding forces holding compounds together and other            Moderate
                   attractive forces, including hydrogen bonding and van der Waals forces.
SC.912.P.8.8       Characterize types of chemical reactions, for example: redox, acid-base,           Moderate
                   synthesis, and single and double replacement reactions.
SC.912.P.8.9       Apply the mole concept and the law of conservation of mass to calculate            High
                   quantities of chemicals participating in reactions.
SC.912.P.8.11      Relate acidity and basicity to hydronium and hydroxyl ion concentration and pH.    Moderate
SC.912.P.8.12      Describe the properties of the carbon atom that make the diversity of carbon       Moderate
                   compounds possible.
SC.912.P.8.13      Identify selected functional groups and relate how they contribute to properties   High
                   of carbon compounds.
SC.912.P.10.5      Relate temperature to the average molecular kinetic energy.                        Moderate
SC.912.P.10.10     Compare the magnitude and range of the four fundamental forces (gravitational, Moderate
                   electromagnetic, weak nuclear, strong nuclear).
SC.912.P.10.12     Differentiate between chemical and nuclear reactions.                              Moderate
                                                           213


SC.912.P.10.14 Differentiate among conductors, semiconductors, and insulators.                   Moderate
SC.912.P.10.15 Investigate and explain the relationships among current, voltage, resistance, and High
               power.
SC.912.P.12.1  Distinguish between scalar and vector quantities and assess which should be       High
               used to describe an event.
SC.912.P.12.2  Analyze the motion of an object in terms of its position, velocity, and           High
               acceleration (with respect to a frame of reference) as functions of time.
SC.912.P.12.4  Describe how the gravitational force between two objects depends on their         Moderate
               masses and the distance between them.
SC.912.L.14.5  Explain the evidence supporting the scientific theory of the origin of eukaryotic High
               cells (endosymbiosis).
SC.912.L.14.6  Explain the significance of genetic factors, environmental factors, and           High
               pathogenic agents to health from the perspectives of both individual and public
               health.
SC.912.L.15.8  Describe the scientific explanations of the origin of life on Earth.              Moderate
SC.912.L.16.2  Discuss observed inheritance patterns caused by various modes of inheritance,     High
               including dominant, recessive, codominant, sex-linked, polygenic, and multiple
               alleles.
SC.912.L.16.3  Describe the basic process of DNA replication and how it relates to the           High
               transmission and conservation of the genetic information.
SC.912.L.16.5  Explain the basic processes of transcription and translation, and how they result High
               in the expression of genes.
SC.912.L.16.9  Explain how and why the genetic code is universal and is common to almost all     Moderate
               organisms.
SC.912.L.16.14 Describe the cell cycle, including the process of mitosis. Explain the role of    Moderate
               mitosis in the formation of new cells and its importance in maintaining
               chromosome number during asexual reproduction.
SC.912.L.16.16 Describe the process of meiosis, including independent assortment and crossing    Moderate
               over. Explain how reduction division results in the formation of haploid gametes
               or spores.
SC.912.L.16.17 Compare and contrast mitosis and meiosis and relate to the processes of sexual    High
               and asexual reproduction and their consequences for genetic variation.
SC.912.L.17.9  Use a food web to identify and distinguish producers, consumers, and              Moderate
               decomposers. Explain the pathway of energy transfer through trophic levels and
               the reduction of available energy at successive trophic levels.
SC.912.L.17.10 Diagram and explain the biogeochemical cycles of an ecosystem, including          Moderate
               water, carbon, and nitrogen cycle.
SC.912.L.18.1  Describe the basic molecular structures and primary functions of the four major   Moderate
               categories of biological macromolecules.
SC.912.L.18.8  Identify the reactants, products, and basic functions of aerobic and anaerobic    Moderate
               cellular respiration.
SC.912.L.18.9  Explain the interrelated nature of photosynthesis and cellular respiration.       Moderate
MA.912.S.1.2   Determine appropriate and consistent standards of measurement for the data to     Moderate
               be collected in a survey or experiment.
MA.912.S.3.2   Collect, organize, and analyze data sets, determine the best format for the data  High
               and present visual summaries from the following:
LA.910.4.2.2   The student will record information and ideas from primary and/or secondary
               sources accurately and coherently, noting the validity and reliability of these
               sources and attributing sources of information;
                                                      214


LA.910.2.2.3      The student will organize information to show understanding or relationships
                  among facts, ideas, and events (e.g., representing key points within text through
                  charting, mapping, paraphrasing, summarizing, comparing, contrasting, or
                  outlining);
HE.912.B.3.6      Employ the healthiest choice when considering all factors in making a decision.
HE.912.C.1.3      Evaluate how environment and personal health are interrelated.
HE.912.C.1.4      Analyze how heredity and family history can impact personal health.
               Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code    Access Point Descriptor
SC.912.N.1.In.a       Identify a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, including life science, earth
                      and space science, or physical science, and do the following: 1. Identify a scientific
                      question 2. Examine reliable sources of informtion to identify what is already k
SC.912.N.1.Su.b       Identify the basic process used in scientific investigations, including questioning,
                      observing, recording, determining, and sharing results.
SC.912.N.1.Pa.c       Recognize that when a variety of common activities are repeated the same way, the
                      outcomes are the same.
SC.912.N.2.In.a       Identify examples of investigations that involve science.
SC.912.N.2.Su.b       Recognize that what is known about science can change based on new information.
SC.912.N.3.In.a       Recognize that a scientific theory is developed by repeated investigations of many
                      scientists and agreement on the likely explanation.
SC.912.N.3.Su.b       Recognize examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in nature, such as
                      Newton’s laws.
SC.912.E.5.In.a       Recognize that the Milky Way is part of the expanding universe.
SC.912.E.5.Su.b       Recognize that stars are made of burning gases.
SC.912.E.5.Pa.c       Observe and recognize effects of the Sun on Earth, such as temperature changes.
SC.912.E.7.In.a       Identify cycles that occur on Earth, such as the water and carbon cycles, and the role
                      energy plays in them.
SC.912.E.7.Su.b       Recognize that currents move the ocean water around Earth.
SC.912.E.7.Pa.c       Recognize that humans, plants, and animals live on the Earth (biosphere).
SC.912.P.8.In.a       Classify states of matter as solid, liquid, and gaseous.
SC.912.P.8.Su.b       Identify examples of physical and chemical changes.
SC.912.P.8.Pa.c       Recognize that the parts of an object can be put together to make a whole.
SC.912.P.10.In.a      Identify examples of energy being transformed from one form to another (conserved
                      quantity).
SC.912.P.10.Su.b      Recognize the relationship between work and power, such as power is the amount of
                      work a person or machine does.
SC.912.P.10.Pa.c      Recognize the source and recipient of heat transfer.
SC.912.P.12.In.a      Recognize that scalar quantities describe the magnitude of the measurement, such as
                      size, weight, volume, area, temperature, or speed.
SC.912.P.12.Su.b      Recognize that acceleration generally involves a change in speed.
SC.912.P.12.Pa.c      Identify the source of the force moving an object.
SC.912.L.14.In.a      Identify that all living things are made of cells and cells function in similar ways (cell
                      theory).
SC.912.L.14.Su.b      Recognize that cells have different parts and each has a function.
                                                          215


SC.912.L.14.Pa.c       Identify ways to prevent infection from bacteria and viruses, such as hand washing and
                       first aid.
SC.912.L.15.In.a       Identify that prehistoric plants and animals changed over time (evolved) or became
                       extinct.
SC.912.L.15.Su.b       Match organisms to the animal, plant, and fungus kingdoms.
SC.912.L.15.Pa.c       Recognize that animals produce offspring.
SC.912.L.16.In.a       Identify that genes are sets of instructions that determine which characteristics are passed
                       from parent to offspring.
SC.912.L.16.Su.b       Recognize that all organisms have a substance called DNA with unique information.
SC.912.L.16.Pa.c       Recognize that illness can result when parts of our bodies are not working properly.
SC.912.L.17.In.a       Recognize that living things in oceans and fresh water are affected by the location,
                       availability of light, depth of the water, and temperature.
SC.912.L.17.Su.b       Recognize how animals and plants in an ecosystem may be affected by changes to the
                       food supply or climate.
SC.912.L.17.Pa.c       Recognize examples of mutual relationships between people and other living things.
SC.912.L.18.In.a       Identify that carbohydrates, fats, proteins, and nucleic acids (macromolecules) are
                       important for human organisms.
SC.912.L.18.Su.b       Recognize that the function of photosynthesis is to produce food for plants.
SC.912.L.18.Pa.c       Identify that food is a source of energy.
                                  2002440 Integrated Science III
Section: Basic and Adult Education                          Grade Group: Secondary Grades 9-12
Subject: Science                                            Domain: Integrated Sciences
Course Length: Year                                         Level: 2
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                   Benchmarks
                                                                                                        Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                     Knowledge
SC.912.N.1.1       Define a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, for example: biology, High
                   chemistry, physics, and earth/space science, and do the following:
SC.912.N.1.2       Describe and explain what characterizes science and its methods.                     Moderate
SC.912.N.1.3       Recognize that the strength or usefulness of a scientific claim is evaluated         Low
                   through scientific argumentation, which depends on critical and logical
                   thinking, and the active consideration of alternative scientific explanations to
                   explain the data present
SC.912.N.1.6       Describe how scientific inferences are drawn from scientific observations and        Moderate
                   provide examples from the content being studied.
SC.912.N.1.7       Recognize the role of creativity in constructing scientific questions, methods and   Low
                   explanations.
SC.912.N.2.2       Identify which questions can be answered through science and which questions         High
                   are outside the boundaries of scientific investigation, such as questions
                   addressed by other ways of knowing, such as art, philosophy, and religion.
SC.912.N.2.5       Describe instances in which scientists' varied backgrounds, talents, interests, and  High
                   goals influence the inferences and thus the explanations that they make about
                   observations of natural phenomena and describe that competing interpretations
                   (explanations)
                                                           216


SC.912.N.4.1   Explain how scientific knowledge and reasoning provide an empirically-based        Moderate
               perspective to inform society's decision making.
SC.912.N.4.2   Weigh the merits of alternative strategies for solving a specific societal problem High
               by comparing a number of different costs and benefits, such as human,
               economic, and environmental.
SC.912.E.5.9   Analyze the broad effects of space exploration on the economy and culture of       High
               Florida.
SC.912.E.6.4   Analyze how specific geologic processes and features are expressed in Florida      High
               and elsewhere.
SC.912.E.7.5   Predict future weather conditions based on present observations and conceptual     High
               models and recognize limitations and uncertainties of such predictions.
SC.912.E.7.6   Relate the formation of severe weather to the various physical factors.            Moderate
SC.912.E.7.8   Explain how various atmospheric, oceanic, and hydrologic conditions in Florida High
               have influenced and can influence human behavior, both individually and
               collectively.
SC.912.E.7.9   Cite evidence that the ocean has had a significant influence on climate change by High
               absorbing, storing, and moving heat, carbon, and water.
SC.912.P.8.10  Describe oxidation-reduction reactions in living and non-living systems.           Moderate
SC.912.P.10.2  Explore the Law of Conservation of Energy by differentiating among open,           High
               closed, and isolated systems and explain that the total energy in an isolated
               system is a conserved quantity.
SC.912.P.10.3  Compare and contrast work and power qualitatively and quantitatively.              Moderate
SC.912.P.10.6  Create and interpret potential energy diagrams, for example: chemical reactions, High
               orbits around a central body, motion of a pendulum.
SC.912.P.10.9  Describe the quantization of energy at the atomic level.                           Moderate
SC.912.P.10.11 Explain and compare nuclear reactions (radioactive decay, fission and fusion),     High
               the energy changes associated with them and their associated safety issues.
SC.912.P.10.16 Explain the relationship between moving charges and magnetic fields, as well as    High
               changing magnetic fields and electric fields, and their application to modern
               technologies.
SC.912.P.10.18 Explore the theory of electromagnetism by comparing and contrasting the            High
               different parts of the electromagnetic spectrum in terms of wavelength,
               frequency, and energy, and relate them to phenomena and applications.
SC.912.P.10.21 Qualitatively describe the shift in frequency in sound or electromagnetic waves    Moderate
               due to the relative motion of a source or a receiver.
SC.912.P.12.5  Apply the law of conservation of linear momentum to interactions, such as          High
               collisions between objects.
SC.912.P.12.6  Qualitatively apply the concept of angular momentum.                               High
SC.912.P.12.7  Recognize that nothing travels faster than the speed of light in vacuum which is   Low
               the same for all observers no matter how they or the light source are moving.
SC.912.P.12.10 Interpret the behavior of ideal gases in terms of kinetic molecular theory.        High
SC.912.L.15.10 Identify basic trends in hominid evolution from early ancestors six million years  Moderate
               ago to modern humans, including brain size, jaw size, language, and
               manufacture of tools.
SC.912.L.15.13 Describe the conditions required for natural selection, including: overproduction  Moderate
               of offspring, inherited variation, and the struggle to survive, which result in
               differential reproductive success.
SC.912.L.15.14 Discuss mechanisms of evolutionary change other than natural selection such as     Moderate
               genetic drift and gene flow.
SC.912.L.15.15 Describe how mutation and genetic recombination increase genetic variation.        Moderate
                                                       217


SC.912.L.16.4     Explain how mutations in the DNA sequence may or may not result in                   High
                  phenotypic change. Explain how mutations in gametes may result in phenotypic
                  changes in offspring.
SC.912.L.16.8     Explain the relationship between mutation, cell cycle, and uncontrolled cell         Moderate
                  growth potentially resulting in cancer.
SC.912.L.16.10    Evaluate the impact of biotechnology on the individual, society and the              High
                  environment, including medical and ethical issues.
SC.912.L.16.13    Describe the basic anatomy and physiology of the human reproductive system.          Moderate
                  Describe the process of human development from fertilization to birth and major
                  changes that occur in each trimester of pregnancy.
SC.912.L.17.5     Analyze how population size is determined by births, deaths, immigration,            High
                  emigration, and limiting factors (biotic and abiotic) that determine carrying
                  capacity.
SC.912.L.17.6     Compare and contrast the relationships among organisms, including predation,         Moderate
                  parasitism, competition, commensalism, and mutualism.
SC.912.L.17.8     Recognize the consequences of the losses of biodiversity due to catastrophic         High
                  events, climate changes, human activity, and the introduction of invasive, non
                  native species.
SC.912.L.17.20    Predict the impact of individuals on environmental systems and examine how           High
                  human lifestyles affect sustainability.
SC.912.L.18.10    Connect the role of adenosine triphosphate (ATP) to energy transfers within a        High
                  cell.
SC.912.L.18.11    Explain the role of enzymes as catalysts that lower the activation energy of         Moderate
                  biochemical reactions. Identify factors, such as pH and temperature, and their
                  effect on enzyme activity.
SC.912.L.18.12    Discuss the special properties of water that contribute to Earth's suitability as an Moderate
                  environment for life: cohesive behavior, ability to moderate temperature,
                  expansion upon freezing, and versatility as a solvent.
MA.912.S.1.2      Determine appropriate and consistent standards of measurement for the data to        Moderate
                  be collected in a survey or experiment.
MA.912.S.3.2      Collect, organize, and analyze data sets, determine the best format for the data     High
                  and present visual summaries from the following:
LA.1112.4.2.2     The student will record information and ideas from primary and/or secondary
                  sources accurately and coherently, noting the validity and reliability of these
                  sources and attributing sources of information;
LA.1112.2.2.3     The student will organize information to show understanding or relationships
                  among facts, ideas, and events (e.g., representing key points within text through
                  charting, mapping, paraphrasing, summarizing, comparing, contrasting,
                  outlining);
               Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code    Access Point Descriptor
SC.912.N.1.In.a       Identify a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, including life science, earth
                      and space science, or physical science, and do the following: 1. Identify a scientific
                      question 2. Examine reliable sources of informtion to identify what is already k
SC.912.N.1.Su.b       Identify the basic process used in scientific investigations, including questioning,
                      observing, recording, determining, and sharing results.
SC.912.N.1.Pa.c       Recognize that when a variety of common activities are repeated the same way, the
                      outcomes are the same.
SC.912.N.2.In.a       Identify examples of investigations that involve science.
                                                          218


SC.912.N.2.Su.b  Recognize that what is known about science can change based on new information.
SC.912.N.4.In.a  Identify ways scientific knowledge and problem solving benefit people.
SC.912.N.4.Su.b  Recognize that some strategies may cost more to solve a problem.
SC.912.E.5.In.a  Recognize that the Milky Way is part of the expanding universe.
SC.912.E.5.Su.b  Recognize that stars are made of burning gases.
SC.912.E.5.Pa.c  Observe and recognize effects of the Sun on Earth, such as temperature changes.
SC.912.E.6.In.a  Describe the three layers of Earth (core, mantle, and crust).
SC.912.E.6.Su.b  Identify types of surface features, such as hills and valleys.
SC.912.E.7.In.a  Identify cycles that occur on Earth, such as the water and carbon cycles, and the role
                 energy plays in them.
SC.912.E.7.Su.b  Recognize that currents move the ocean water around Earth.
SC.912.E.7.Pa.c  Recognize that humans, plants, and animals live on the Earth (biosphere).
SC.912.P.8.In.a  Classify states of matter as solid, liquid, and gaseous.
SC.912.P.8.Su.b  Identify examples of physical and chemical changes.
SC.912.P.8.Pa.c  Recognize that the parts of an object can be put together to make a whole.
SC.912.P.10.In.a Identify examples of energy being transformed from one form to another (conserved
                 quantity).
SC.912.P.10.Su.b Recognize the relationship between work and power, such as power is the amount of
                 work a person or machine does.
SC.912.P.10.Pa.c Recognize the source and recipient of heat transfer.
SC.912.P.12.In.a Recognize that scalar quantities describe the magnitude of the measurement, such as
                 size, weight, volume, area, temperature, or speed.
SC.912.P.12.Su.b Recognize that acceleration generally involves a change in speed.
SC.912.P.12.Pa.c Identify the source of the force moving an object.
SC.912.L.15.In.a Identify that prehistoric plants and animals changed over time (evolved) or became
                 extinct.
SC.912.L.15.Su.b Match organisms to the animal, plant, and fungus kingdoms.
SC.912.L.15.Pa.c Recognize that animals produce offspring.
SC.912.L.16.In.a Identify that genes are sets of instructions that determine which characteristics are passed
                 from parent to offspring.
SC.912.L.16.Su.b Recognize that all organisms have a substance called DNA with unique information.
SC.912.L.16.Pa.c Recognize that illness can result when parts of our bodies are not working properly.
SC.912.L.17.In.a Recognize that living things in oceans and fresh water are affected by the location,
                 availability of light, depth of the water, and temperature.
SC.912.L.17.Su.b Recognize how animals and plants in an ecosystem may be affected by changes to the
                 food supply or climate.
SC.912.L.17.Pa.c Recognize examples of mutual relationships between people and other living things.
SC.912.L.18.In.a Identify that carbohydrates, fats, proteins, and nucleic acids (macromolecules) are
                 important for human organisms.
SC.912.L.18.Su.b Recognize that the function of photosynthesis is to produce food for plants.
SC.912.L.18.Pa.c Identify that food is a source of energy.
                                                     219


                                 2002460 Integrated Science IV
Section: Basic and Adult Education                          Grade Group: Secondary Grades 9-12
Subject: Science                                            Domain: Integrated Sciences
Course Length: Year                                         Level: 3
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                  Benchmarks
                                                                                                        Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                     Knowledge
SC.912.N.1.1       Define a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, for example: biology, High
                   chemistry, physics, and earth/space science, and do the following:
SC.912.N.1.2       Describe and explain what characterizes science and its methods.                     Moderate
SC.912.N.1.3       Recognize that the strength or usefulness of a scientific claim is evaluated         Low
                   through scientific argumentation, which depends on critical and logical
                   thinking, and the active consideration of alternative scientific explanations to
                   explain the data present
SC.912.N.1.4       Identify sources of information and assess their reliability according to the strict High
                   standards of scientific investigation.
SC.912.N.1.5       Describe and provide examples of how similar investigations conducted in many        Moderate
                   parts of the world result in the same outcome.
SC.912.N.1.6       Describe how scientific inferences are drawn from scientific observations and        Moderate
                   provide examples from the content being studied.
SC.912.N.1.7       Recognize the role of creativity in constructing scientific questions, methods and   Low
                   explanations.
SC.912.N.2.1       Identify what is science, what clearly is not science, and what superficially        High
                   resembles science (but fails to meet the criteria for science).
SC.912.N.2.2       Identify which questions can be answered through science and which questions         High
                   are outside the boundaries of scientific investigation, such as questions
                   addressed by other ways of knowing, such as art, philosophy, and religion.
SC.912.N.2.3       Identify examples of pseudoscience (such as astrology, phrenology) in society.       Low
SC.912.N.2.4       Explain that scientific knowledge is both durable and robust and open to change.     High
                   Scientific knowledge can change because it is often examined and re-examined
                   by new investigations and scientific argumentation. Because of these frequent
                   examinations, scien
SC.912.N.2.5       Describe instances in which scientists' varied backgrounds, talents, interests, and  High
                   goals influence the inferences and thus the explanations that they make about
                   observations of natural phenomena and describe that competing interpretations
                   (explanations)
SC.912.N.3.1       Explain that a scientific theory is the culmination of many scientific               High
                   investigations drawing together all the current evidence concerning a substantial
                   range of phenomena; thus, a scientific theory represents the most powerful
                   explanation scientists have
SC.912.N.3.2       Describe the role consensus plays in the historical development of a theory in       Moderate
                   any one of the disciplines of science.
SC.912.N.3.3       Explain that scientific laws are descriptions of specific relationships under given  Moderate
                   conditions in nature, but do not offer explanations for those relationships.
SC.912.N.3.4       Recognize that theories do not become laws, nor do laws become theories;             Moderate
                   theories are well supported explanations and laws are well supported
                   descriptions.
                                                           220


SC.912.N.3.5   Describe the function of models in science, and identify the wide range of          Moderate
               models used in science.
SC.912.N.4.1   Explain how scientific knowledge and reasoning provide an empirically-based         Moderate
               perspective to inform society's decision making.
SC.912.N.4.2   Weigh the merits of alternative strategies for solving a specific societal problem  High
               by comparing a number of different costs and benefits, such as human,
               economic, and environmental.
SC.912.E.5.10  Describe and apply the coordinate system used to locate objects in the sky.         Moderate
SC.912.E.5.11  Distinguish the various methods of measuring astronomical distances and apply       High
               each in appropriate situations.
SC.912.E.6.5   Describe the geologic development of the present day oceans and identify            Moderate
               commonly found features.
SC.912.E.7.8   Explain how various atmospheric, oceanic, and hydrologic conditions in Florida      High
               have influenced and can influence human behavior, both individually and
               collectively.
SC.912.P.8.8   Characterize types of chemical reactions, for example: redox, acid-base,            Moderate
               synthesis, and single and double replacement reactions.
SC.912.P.8.9   Apply the mole concept and the law of conservation of mass to calculate             High
               quantities of chemicals participating in reactions.
SC.912.P.8.12  Describe the properties of the carbon atom that make the diversity of carbon        Moderate
               compounds possible.
SC.912.P.10.8  Explain entropy's role in determining the efficiency of processes that convert      High
               energy to work.
SC.912.P.10.17 Explore the theory of electromagnetism by explaining electromagnetic waves in       High
               terms of oscillating electric and magnetic fields.
SC.912.P.12.9  Recognize that time, length, and energy depend on the frame of reference.           Low
SC.912.L.14.1  Describe the scientific theory of cells (cell theory) and relate the history of its Moderate
               discovery to the process of science.
SC.912.L.14.2  Relate structure to function for the components of plant and animal cells.          Moderate
               Explain the role of cell membranes as a highly selective barrier (passive and
               active transport).
SC.912.L.14.3  Compare and contrast the general structures of plant and animal cells. Compare      Moderate
               and contrast the general structures of prokaryotic and eukaryotic cells.
SC.912.L.14.5  Explain the evidence supporting the scientific theory of the origin of eukaryotic   High
               cells (endosymbiosis).
SC.912.L.15.3  Describe how biological diversity is increased by the origin of new species and     Moderate
               how it is decreased by the natural process of extinction.
SC.912.L.15.4  Describe how and why organisms are hierarchically classified and based on           High
               evolutionary relationships.
SC.912.L.15.5  Explain the reasons for changes in how organisms are classified.                    High
SC.912.L.15.6  Discuss distinguishing characteristics of the domains and kingdoms of living        Moderate
               organisms.
SC.912.L.15.7  Discuss distinguishing characteristics of vertebrate and representative             Moderate
               invertebrate phyla, and chordate classes using typical examples.
SC.912.L.15.8  Describe the scientific explanations of the origin of life on Earth.                Moderate
SC.912.L.15.9  Explain the role of reproductive isolation in the process of speciation.            Moderate
SC.912.L.15.13 Describe the conditions required for natural selection, including: overproduction Moderate
               of offspring, inherited variation, and the struggle to survive, which result in
               differential reproductive success.
                                                       221


SC.912.L.15.14    Discuss mechanisms of evolutionary change other than natural selection such as Moderate
                  genetic drift and gene flow.
SC.912.L.15.15    Describe how mutation and genetic recombination increase genetic variation.         Moderate
SC.912.L.16.6     Discuss the mechanisms for regulation of gene expression in prokaryotes and         High
                  eukaryotes at transcription and translation level.
SC.912.L.16.7     Describe how viruses and bacteria transfer genetic material between cells and       High
                  the role of this process in biotechnology.
SC.912.L.16.10    Evaluate the impact of biotechnology on the individual, society and the             High
                  environment, including medical and ethical issues.
SC.912.L.17.1     Discuss the characteristics of populations, such as number of individuals, age      Moderate
                  structure, density, and pattern of distribution.
SC.912.L.17.7     Characterize the biotic and abiotic components that define freshwater systems,      Moderate
                  marine systems and terrestrial systems.
SC.912.L.17.12    Discuss the political, social, and environmental consequences of sustainable use    High
                  of land.
SC.912.L.17.13    Discuss the need for adequate monitoring of environmental parameters when           High
                  making policy decisions.
SC.912.L.17.14    Assess the need for adequate waste management strategies.                           High
SC.912.L.17.15    Discuss the effects of technology on environmental quality.                         Moderate
SC.912.L.17.16    Discuss the large-scale environmental impacts resulting from human activity,        High
                  including waste spills, oil spills, runoff, greenhouse gases, ozone depletion, and
                  surface and groundwater pollution.
SC.912.L.17.17    Assess the effectiveness of innovative methods of protecting the environment.       High
SC.912.L.17.18    Describe how human population size and resource use relate to environmental         Moderate
                  quality.
SC.912.L.17.19    Describe how different natural resources are produced and how their rates of use    Moderate
                  and renewal limit availability.
SC.912.L.17.20    Predict the impact of individuals on environmental systems and examine how          High
                  human lifestyles affect sustainability.
SC.912.L.18.4     Describe the structures of proteins and amino acids. Explain the functions of       Moderate
                  proteins in living organisms. Identify some reactions that amino acids undergo.
                  Relate the structure and function of enzymes.
MA.912.S.1.2      Determine appropriate and consistent standards of measurement for the data to       Moderate
                  be collected in a survey or experiment.
MA.912.S.3.2      Collect, organize, and analyze data sets, determine the best format for the data    High
                  and present visual summaries from the following:
LA.910.4.2.2      The student will record information and ideas from primary and/or secondary
                  sources accurately and coherently, noting the validity and reliability of these
                  sources and attributing sources of information;
LA.910.2.2.3      The student will organize information to show understanding or relationships
                  among facts, ideas, and events (e.g., representing key points within text through
                  charting, mapping, paraphrasing, summarizing, comparing, contrasting, or
                  outlining);
               Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code    Access Point Descriptor
SC.912.N.1.In.a       Identify a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, including life science, earth
                      and space science, or physical science, and do the following: 1. Identify a scientific
                      question 2. Examine reliable sources of informtion to identify what is already k
                                                          222


SC.912.N.1.Su.b  Identify the basic process used in scientific investigations, including questioning,
                 observing, recording, determining, and sharing results.
SC.912.N.1.Pa.c  Recognize that when a variety of common activities are repeated the same way, the
                 outcomes are the same.
SC.912.N.2.In.a  Identify examples of investigations that involve science.
SC.912.N.2.Su.b  Recognize that what is known about science can change based on new information.
SC.912.N.3.In.a  Recognize that a scientific theory is developed by repeated investigations of many
                 scientists and agreement on the likely explanation.
SC.912.N.3.In.b  Identify examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in the natural world, such
                 as Newton’s laws.
SC.912.N.3.Su.b  Recognize examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in nature, such as
                 Newton’s laws.
SC.912.N.3.Su.c  Recognize ways models are used in the study of science.
SC.912.N.4.In.a  Identify ways scientific knowledge and problem solving benefit people.
SC.912.N.4.Su.b  Recognize that some strategies may cost more to solve a problem.
SC.912.E.7.In.a  Identify cycles that occur on Earth, such as the water and carbon cycles, and the role
                 energy plays in them.
SC.912.E.7.Su.b  Recognize that currents move the ocean water around Earth.
SC.912.E.7.Pa.c  Recognize that humans, plants, and animals live on the Earth (biosphere).
SC.912.P.8.In.a  Classify states of matter as solid, liquid, and gaseous.
SC.912.P.8.Su.b  Identify examples of physical and chemical changes.
SC.912.P.8.Pa.c  Recognize that the parts of an object can be put together to make a whole.
SC.912.L.14.In.a Identify that all living things are made of cells and cells function in similar ways (cell
                 theory).
SC.912.L.14.Su.b Recognize that cells have different parts and each has a function.
SC.912.L.14.Pa.c Identify ways to prevent infection from bacteria and viruses, such as hand washing and
                 first aid.
SC.912.L.15.In.a Identify that prehistoric plants and animals changed over time (evolved) or became
                 extinct.
SC.912.L.15.Su.b Match organisms to the animal, plant, and fungus kingdoms.
SC.912.L.15.Pa.c Recognize that animals produce offspring.
SC.912.L.16.In.a Identify that genes are sets of instructions that determine which characteristics are passed
                 from parent to offspring.
SC.912.L.16.Su.b Recognize that all organisms have a substance called DNA with unique information.
SC.912.L.16.Pa.c Recognize that illness can result when parts of our bodies are not working properly.
SC.912.L.17.In.a Recognize that living things in oceans and fresh water are affected by the location,
                 availability of light, depth of the water, and temperature.
SC.912.L.17.Su.b Recognize how animals and plants in an ecosystem may be affected by changes to the
                 food supply or climate.
SC.912.L.17.Pa.c Recognize examples of mutual relationships between people and other living things.
                                                     223


                                  2002470 Integrated Science V
Section: Basic and Adult Education                          Grade Group: Secondary Grades 9-12
Subject: Science                                            Domain: Integrated Sciences
Course Length: Year                                         Level: 3
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                  Benchmarks
                                                                                                        Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                     Knowledge
SC.912.N.1.1       Define a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, for example: biology, High
                   chemistry, physics, and earth/space science, and do the following:
SC.912.N.1.2       Describe and explain what characterizes science and its methods.                     Moderate
SC.912.N.1.3       Recognize that the strength or usefulness of a scientific claim is evaluated         Low
                   through scientific argumentation, which depends on critical and logical
                   thinking, and the active consideration of alternative scientific explanations to
                   explain the data present
SC.912.N.1.4       Identify sources of information and assess their reliability according to the strict High
                   standards of scientific investigation.
SC.912.N.1.5       Describe and provide examples of how similar investigations conducted in many        Moderate
                   parts of the world result in the same outcome.
SC.912.N.1.6       Describe how scientific inferences are drawn from scientific observations and        Moderate
                   provide examples from the content being studied.
SC.912.N.1.7       Recognize the role of creativity in constructing scientific questions, methods and   Low
                   explanations.
SC.912.N.2.1       Identify what is science, what clearly is not science, and what superficially        High
                   resembles science (but fails to meet the criteria for science).
SC.912.N.2.2       Identify which questions can be answered through science and which questions         High
                   are outside the boundaries of scientific investigation, such as questions
                   addressed by other ways of knowing, such as art, philosophy, and religion.
SC.912.N.2.3       Identify examples of pseudoscience (such as astrology, phrenology) in society.       Low
SC.912.N.2.4       Explain that scientific knowledge is both durable and robust and open to change.     High
                   Scientific knowledge can change because it is often examined and re-examined
                   by new investigations and scientific argumentation. Because of these frequent
                   examinations, scien
SC.912.N.2.5       Describe instances in which scientists' varied backgrounds, talents, interests, and  High
                   goals influence the inferences and thus the explanations that they make about
                   observations of natural phenomena and describe that competing interpretations
                   (explanations)
SC.912.N.3.1       Explain that a scientific theory is the culmination of many scientific               High
                   investigations drawing together all the current evidence concerning a substantial
                   range of phenomena; thus, a scientific theory represents the most powerful
                   explanation scientists have
SC.912.N.3.2       Describe the role consensus plays in the historical development of a theory in       Moderate
                   any one of the disciplines of science.
SC.912.N.3.3       Explain that scientific laws are descriptions of specific relationships under given  Moderate
                   conditions in nature, but do not offer explanations for those relationships.
SC.912.N.3.4       Recognize that theories do not become laws, nor do laws become theories;             Moderate
                   theories are well supported explanations and laws are well supported
                   descriptions.
                                                           224


SC.912.N.3.5   Describe the function of models in science, and identify the wide range of         Moderate
               models used in science.
SC.912.N.4.1   Explain how scientific knowledge and reasoning provide an empirically-based        Moderate
               perspective to inform society's decision making.
SC.912.N.4.2   Weigh the merits of alternative strategies for solving a specific societal problem High
               by comparing a number of different costs and benefits, such as human,
               economic, and environmental.
SC.912.E.5.1   Cite evidence used to develop and verify the scientific theory of the Big Bang     High
               (also known as the Big Bang Theory) of the origin of the universe.
SC.912.E.5.2   Identify patterns in the organization and distribution of matter in the universe   Moderate
               and the forces that determine them.
SC.912.E.5.6   Develop logical connections through physical principles, including Kepler's and    High
               Newton's Laws about the relationships and the effects of Earth, Moon, and Sun
               on each other.
SC.912.E.5.7   Relate the history of and explain the justification for future space exploration   High
               and continuing technology development.
SC.912.E.5.9   Analyze the broad effects of space exploration on the economy and culture of       High
               Florida.
SC.912.E.6.6   Analyze past, present, and potential future consequences to the environment        High
               resulting from various energy production technologies.
SC.912.E.7.1   Analyze the movement of matter and energy through the different                    High
               biogeochemical cycles, including water and carbon.
SC.912.E.7.2   Analyze the causes of the various kinds of surface and deep water motion within    High
               the oceans and their impacts on the transfer of energy between the poles and the
               equator.
SC.912.E.7.4   Summarize the conditions that contribute to the climate of a geographic area,      Moderate
               including the relationships to lakes and oceans.
SC.912.P.8.7   Interpret formula representations of molecules and compounds in terms of           Moderate
               composition and structure.
SC.912.P.8.8   Characterize types of chemical reactions, for example: redox, acid-base,           Moderate
               synthesis, and single and double replacement reactions.
SC.912.P.8.9   Apply the mole concept and the law of conservation of mass to calculate            High
               quantities of chemicals participating in reactions.
SC.912.P.8.12  Describe the properties of the carbon atom that make the diversity of carbon       Moderate
               compounds possible.
SC.912.P.8.13  Identify selected functional groups and relate how they contribute to properties   High
               of carbon compounds.
SC.912.P.10.13 Relate the configuration of static charges to the electric field, electric force,  High
               electric potential, and electric potential energy.
SC.912.P.10.19 Explain that all objects emit and absorb electromagnetic radiation and             High
               distinguish between objects that are blackbody radiators and those that are not.
SC.912.P.10.22 Construct ray diagrams and use thin lens and mirror equations to locate the        High
               images formed by lenses and mirrors.
SC.912.P.12.11 Describe phase transitions in terms of kinetic molecular theory.                   Moderate
SC.912.P.12.12 Explain how various factors, such as concentration, temperature, and presence of High
               a catalyst affect the rate of a chemical reaction.
SC.912.P.12.13 Explain the concept of dynamic equilibrium in terms of reversible processes        High
               occurring at the same rates.
SC.912.L.14.6  Explain the significance of genetic factors, environmental factors, and            High
               pathogenic agents to health from the perspectives of both individual and public
               health.
                                                       225


SC.912.L.15.1  Explain how the scientific theory of evolution is supported by the fossil record,   High
               comparative anatomy, comparative embryology, biogeography, molecular
               biology, and observed evolutionary change.
SC.912.L.15.2  Discuss the use of molecular clocks to estimate how long ago various groups of      Moderate
               organisms diverged evolutionarily from one another.
SC.912.L.15.8  Describe the scientific explanations of the origin of life on Earth.                Moderate
SC.912.L.15.10 Identify basic trends in hominid evolution from early ancestors six million years Moderate
               ago to modern humans, including brain size, jaw size, language, and
               manufacture of tools.
SC.912.L.15.11 Discuss specific fossil hominids and what they show about human evolution.          Moderate
SC.912.L.15.12 List the conditions for Hardy-Weinberg equilibrium in a population and why          High
               these conditions are not likely to appear in nature. Use the Hardy-Weinberg
               equation to predict genotypes in a population from observed phenotypes.
SC.912.L.15.13 Describe the conditions required for natural selection, including: overproduction   Moderate
               of offspring, inherited variation, and the struggle to survive, which result in
               differential reproductive success.
SC.912.L.15.14 Discuss mechanisms of evolutionary change other than natural selection such as      Moderate
               genetic drift and gene flow.
SC.912.L.15.15 Describe how mutation and genetic recombination increase genetic variation.         Moderate
SC.912.L.16.6  Discuss the mechanisms for regulation of gene expression in prokaryotes and         High
               eukaryotes at transcription and translation level.
SC.912.L.16.7  Describe how viruses and bacteria transfer genetic material between cells and       High
               the role of this process in biotechnology.
SC.912.L.16.11 Discuss the technologies associated with forensic medicine and DNA                  High
               identification, including restriction fragment length polymorphism (RFLP)
               analysis.
SC.912.L.16.12 Describe how basic DNA technology (restriction digestion by endonucleases,          Moderate
               gel electrophoresis, polymerase chain reaction, ligation, and transformation) is
               used to construct recombinant DNA molecules (DNA cloning).
SC.912.L.17.20 Predict the impact of individuals on environmental systems and examine how          High
               human lifestyles affect sustainability.
SC.912.L.18.2  Describe the important structural characteristics of monosaccharides,               Moderate
               disaccharides, and polysaccharides and explain the functions of carbohydrates in
               living things.
SC.912.L.18.3  Describe the structures of fatty acids, triglycerides, phospholipids, and steroids. Moderate
               Explain the functions of lipids in living organisms. Identify some reactions that
               fatty acids undergo. Relate the structure and function of cell membranes.
SC.912.L.18.6  Discuss the role of anaerobic respiration in living things and in human society.    Moderate
MA.912.S.1.2   Determine appropriate and consistent standards of measurement for the data to Moderate
               be collected in a survey or experiment.
MA.912.S.3.2   Collect, organize, and analyze data sets, determine the best format for the data    High
               and present visual summaries from the following:
LA.1112.4.2.2  The student will record information and ideas from primary and/or secondary
               sources accurately and coherently, noting the validity and reliability of these
               sources and attributing sources of information;
LA.1112.2.2.3  The student will organize information to show understanding or relationships
               among facts, ideas, and events (e.g., representing key points within text through
               charting, mapping, paraphrasing, summarizing, comparing, contrasting,
               outlining);
                                                       226


               Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code    Access Point Descriptor
SC.912.N.1.In.a       Identify a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, including life science, earth
                      and space science, or physical science, and do the following: 1. Identify a scientific
                      question 2. Examine reliable sources of informtion to identify what is already k
SC.912.N.1.Su.b       Identify the basic process used in scientific investigations, including questioning,
                      observing, recording, determining, and sharing results.
SC.912.N.1.Pa.c       Recognize that when a variety of common activities are repeated the same way, the
                      outcomes are the same.
SC.912.N.2.In.a       Identify examples of investigations that involve science.
SC.912.N.2.Su.b       Recognize that what is known about science can change based on new information.
SC.912.N.3.In.a       Recognize that a scientific theory is developed by repeated investigations of many
                      scientists and agreement on the likely explanation.
SC.912.N.3.In.b       Identify examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in the natural world, such
                      as Newton’s laws.
SC.912.N.3.Su.b       Recognize examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in nature, such as
                      Newton’s laws.
SC.912.N.3.Su.c       Recognize ways models are used in the study of science.
SC.912.N.4.In.a       Identify ways scientific knowledge and problem solving benefit people.
SC.912.N.4.Su.b       Recognize that some strategies may cost more to solve a problem.
SC.912.E.5.In.a       Recognize that the Milky Way is part of the expanding universe.
SC.912.E.5.Su.b       Recognize that stars are made of burning gases.
SC.912.E.5.Pa.c       Observe and recognize effects of the Sun on Earth, such as temperature changes.
SC.912.E.7.In.a       Identify cycles that occur on Earth, such as the water and carbon cycles, and the role
                      energy plays in them.
SC.912.E.7.Su.b       Recognize that currents move the ocean water around Earth.
SC.912.E.7.Pa.c       Recognize that humans, plants, and animals live on the Earth (biosphere).
SC.912.P.8.In.a       Classify states of matter as solid, liquid, and gaseous.
SC.912.P.8.Su.b       Identify examples of physical and chemical changes.
SC.912.P.8.Pa.c       Recognize that the parts of an object can be put together to make a whole.
SC.912.L.14.In.a      Identify that all living things are made of cells and cells function in similar ways (cell
                      theory).
SC.912.L.14.Su.b      Recognize that cells have different parts and each has a function.
SC.912.L.14.Pa.c      Identify ways to prevent infection from bacteria and viruses, such as hand washing and
                      first aid.
SC.912.L.15.In.a      Identify that prehistoric plants and animals changed over time (evolved) or became
                      extinct.
SC.912.L.15.Su.b      Match organisms to the animal, plant, and fungus kingdoms.
SC.912.L.15.Pa.c      Recognize that animals produce offspring.
SC.912.L.17.In.a      Recognize that living things in oceans and fresh water are affected by the location,
                      availability of light, depth of the water, and temperature.
SC.912.L.17.Su.b      Recognize how animals and plants in an ecosystem may be affected by changes to the
                      food supply or climate.
SC.912.L.17.Pa.c      Recognize examples of mutual relationships between people and other living things.
                                                          227


                             2002410 Integrated Science I Honors
Section: Basic and Adult Education                         Grade Group: Secondary Grades 9-12
Subject: Science                                           Domain: Integrated Sciences
Course Length: Year                                        Level: 3
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                  Benchmarks
                                                                                                        Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                     Knowledge
SC.912.N.1.1       Define a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, for example: biology, High
                   chemistry, physics, and earth/space science, and do the following:
SC.912.N.1.2       Describe and explain what characterizes science and its methods.                     Moderate
SC.912.N.1.4       Identify sources of information and assess their reliability according to the strict High
                   standards of scientific investigation.
SC.912.N.1.7       Recognize the role of creativity in constructing scientific questions, methods and   Low
                   explanations.
SC.912.N.2.1       Identify what is science, what clearly is not science, and what superficially        High
                   resembles science (but fails to meet the criteria for science).
SC.912.N.3.2       Describe the role consensus plays in the historical development of a theory in       Moderate
                   any one of the disciplines of science.
SC.912.N.3.3       Explain that scientific laws are descriptions of specific relationships under given  Moderate
                   conditions in nature, but do not offer explanations for those relationships.
SC.912.N.3.4       Recognize that theories do not become laws, nor do laws become theories;             Moderate
                   theories are well supported explanations and laws are well supported
                   descriptions.
SC.912.N.3.5       Describe the function of models in science, and identify the wide range of           Moderate
                   models used in science.
SC.912.E.5.1       Cite evidence used to develop and verify the scientific theory of the Big Bang       High
                   (also known as the Big Bang Theory) of the origin of the universe.
SC.912.E.5.2       Identify patterns in the organization and distribution of matter in the universe     Moderate
                   and the forces that determine them.
SC.912.E.5.4       Explain the physical properties of the Sun and its dynamic nature and connect        High
                   them to conditions and events on Earth.
SC.912.E.5.7       Relate the history of and explain the justification for future space exploration     High
                   and continuing technology development.
SC.912.E.5.8       Connect the concepts of radiation and the electromagnetic spectrum to the use of     High
                   historical and newly-developed observational tools.
SC.912.E.6.1       Describe and differentiate the layers of Earth and the interactions among them.      Moderate
SC.912.E.6.2       Connect surface features to surface processes that are responsible for their         Moderate
                   formation.
SC.912.E.6.3       Analyze the scientific theory of plate tectonics and identify related major          High
                   processes and features as a result of moving plates.
SC.912.E.6.6       Analyze past, present, and potential future consequences to the environment          High
                   resulting from various energy production technologies.
SC.912.E.7.1       Analyze the movement of matter and energy through the different                      High
                   biogeochemical cycles, including water and carbon.
SC.912.E.7.3       Differentiate and describe the various interactions among Earth systems,             High
                   including: atmosphere, hydrosphere, cryosphere, geosphere, and biosphere.
                                                          228


SC.912.P.8.1   Differentiate among the four states of matter.                                      Moderate
SC.912.P.8.2   Differentiate between physical and chemical properties and physical and             Moderate
               chemical changes of matter.
SC.912.P.8.3   Explore the scientific theory of atoms (also known as atomic theory) by             High
               describing changes in the atomic model over time and why those changes were
               necessitated by experimental evidence.
SC.912.P.8.4   Explore the scientific theory of atoms (also known as atomic theory) by             High
               describing the structure of atoms in terms of protons, neutrons and electrons, and
               differentiate among these particles in terms of their mass, electrical charges and
               locations within
SC.912.P.8.5   Relate properties of atoms and their position in the periodic table to the          Moderate
               arrangement of their electrons.
SC.912.P.8.7   Interpret formula representations of molecules and compounds in terms of            Moderate
               composition and structure.
SC.912.P.10.1  Differentiate among the various forms of energy and recognize that they can be      Moderate
               transformed from one form to others.
SC.912.P.10.4  Describe heat as the energy transferred by convection, conduction, and              High
               radiation, and explain the connection of heat to change in temperature or states
               of matter.
SC.912.P.10.7  Distinguish between endothermic and exothermic chemical processes.                  Moderate
SC.912.P.10.19 Explain that all objects emit and absorb electromagnetic radiation and              High
               distinguish between objects that are blackbody radiators and those that are not.
SC.912.P.10.20 Describe the measurable properties of waves and explain the relationships           High
               among them and how these properties change when the wave moves from one
               medium to another.
SC.912.P.12.3  Interpret and apply Newton's three laws of motion.                                  High
SC.912.L.14.1  Describe the scientific theory of cells (cell theory) and relate the history of its Moderate
               discovery to the process of science.
SC.912.L.14.2  Relate structure to function for the components of plant and animal cells.          Moderate
               Explain the role of cell membranes as a highly selective barrier (passive and
               active transport).
SC.912.L.14.7  Relate the structure of each of the major plant organs and tissues to               Moderate
               physiological processes.
SC.912.L.15.1  Explain how the scientific theory of evolution is supported by the fossil record,   High
               comparative anatomy, comparative embryology, biogeography, molecular
               biology, and observed evolutionary change.
SC.912.L.15.4  Describe how and why organisms are hierarchically classified and based on           High
               evolutionary relationships.
SC.912.L.15.6  Discuss distinguishing characteristics of the domains and kingdoms of living        Moderate
               organisms.
SC.912.L.15.8  Describe the scientific explanations of the origin of life on Earth.                Moderate
SC.912.L.16.1  Use Mendel's laws of segregation and independent assortment to analyze              High
               patterns of inheritance.
SC.912.L.17.2  Explain the general distribution of life in aquatic systems as a function of        High
               chemistry, geography, light, depth, salinity, and temperature.
SC.912.L.17.3  Discuss how various oceanic and freshwater processes, such as currents, tides,      Moderate
               and waves, affect the abundance of aquatic organisms.
SC.912.L.17.4  Describe changes in ecosystems resulting from seasonal variations, climate          Moderate
               change and succession.
SC.912.L.17.11 Evaluate the costs and benefits of renewable and nonrenewable resources, such       High
               as water, energy, fossil fuels, wildlife, and forests.
                                                       229


SC.912.L.18.6     Discuss the role of anaerobic respiration in living things and in human society.     Moderate
SC.912.L.18.7     Identify the reactants, products, and basic functions of photosynthesis.             Moderate
MA.912.S.1.2      Determine appropriate and consistent standards of measurement for the data to Moderate
                  be collected in a survey or experiment.
MA.912.S.3.2      Collect, organize, and analyze data sets, determine the best format for the data     High
                  and present visual summaries from the following:
LA.1112.4.2.2     The student will record information and ideas from primary and/or secondary
                  sources accurately and coherently, noting the validity and reliability of these
                  sources and attributing sources of information;
LA.1112.2.2.3     The student will organize information to show understanding or relationships
                  among facts, ideas, and events (e.g., representing key points within text through
                  charting, mapping, paraphrasing, summarizing, comparing, contrasting,
                  outlining);
               Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code    Access Point Descriptor
SC.912.N.1.In.a       Identify a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, including life science, earth
                      and space science, or physical science, and do the following: 1. Identify a scientific
                      question 2. Examine reliable sources of informtion to identify what is already k
SC.912.N.1.Su.b       Identify the basic process used in scientific investigations, including questioning,
                      observing, recording, determining, and sharing results.
SC.912.N.1.Pa.c       Recognize that when a variety of common activities are repeated the same way, the
                      outcomes are the same.
SC.912.N.2.In.a       Identify examples of investigations that involve science.
SC.912.N.2.Su.b       Recognize that what is known about science can change based on new information.
SC.912.N.3.In.a       Recognize that a scientific theory is developed by repeated investigations of many
                      scientists and agreement on the likely explanation.
SC.912.N.3.In.b       Identify examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in the natural world, such
                      as Newton’s laws.
SC.912.N.3.Su.b       Recognize examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in nature, such as
                      Newton’s laws.
SC.912.N.3.Su.c       Recognize ways models are used in the study of science.
SC.912.E.5.In.a       Recognize that the Milky Way is part of the expanding universe.
SC.912.E.5.Su.b       Recognize that stars are made of burning gases.
SC.912.E.5.Pa.c       Observe and recognize effects of the Sun on Earth, such as temperature changes.
SC.912.E.6.In.a       Describe the three layers of Earth (core, mantle, and crust).
SC.912.E.6.Su.b       Identify types of surface features, such as hills and valleys.
SC.912.E.7.In.a       Identify cycles that occur on Earth, such as the water and carbon cycles, and the role
                      energy plays in them.
SC.912.E.7.Su.b       Recognize that currents move the ocean water around Earth.
SC.912.E.7.Pa.c       Recognize that humans, plants, and animals live on the Earth (biosphere).
SC.912.P.8.In.a       Classify states of matter as solid, liquid, and gaseous.
SC.912.P.8.Su.b       Identify examples of physical and chemical changes.
SC.912.P.8.Pa.c       Recognize that the parts of an object can be put together to make a whole.
SC.912.P.10.In.a      Identify examples of energy being transformed from one form to another (conserved
                      quantity).
                                                          230


SC.912.P.10.Su.b       Recognize the relationship between work and power, such as power is the amount of
                       work a person or machine does.
SC.912.P.10.Pa.c       Recognize the source and recipient of heat transfer.
SC.912.P.12.In.a       Recognize that scalar quantities describe the magnitude of the measurement, such as
                       size, weight, volume, area, temperature, or speed.
SC.912.P.12.Su.b       Recognize that acceleration generally involves a change in speed.
SC.912.P.12.Pa.c       Identify the source of the force moving an object.
SC.912.L.14.In.a       Identify that all living things are made of cells and cells function in similar ways (cell
                       theory).
SC.912.L.14.Su.b       Recognize that cells have different parts and each has a function.
SC.912.L.14.Pa.c       Identify ways to prevent infection from bacteria and viruses, such as hand washing and
                       first aid.
SC.912.L.15.In.a       Identify that prehistoric plants and animals changed over time (evolved) or became
                       extinct.
SC.912.L.15.Su.b       Match organisms to the animal, plant, and fungus kingdoms.
SC.912.L.15.Pa.c       Recognize that animals produce offspring.
SC.912.L.16.In.a       Identify that genes are sets of instructions that determine which characteristics are passed
                       from parent to offspring.
SC.912.L.16.Su.b       Recognize that all organisms have a substance called DNA with unique information.
SC.912.L.16.Pa.c       Recognize that illness can result when parts of our bodies are not working properly.
SC.912.L.17.In.a       Recognize that living things in oceans and fresh water are affected by the location,
                       availability of light, depth of the water, and temperature.
SC.912.L.17.Su.b       Recognize how animals and plants in an ecosystem may be affected by changes to the
                       food supply or climate.
SC.912.L.17.Pa.c       Recognize examples of mutual relationships between people and other living things.
SC.912.L.18.In.a       Identify that carbohydrates, fats, proteins, and nucleic acids (macromolecules) are
                       important for human organisms.
SC.912.L.18.Su.b       Recognize that the function of photosynthesis is to produce food for plants.
SC.912.L.18.Pa.c       Identify that food is a source of energy.
                             2002430 Integrated Science II Honors
Section: Basic and Adult Education                          Grade Group: Secondary Grades 9-12
Subject: Science                                            Domain: Integrated Sciences
Course Length: Year                                         Level: 3
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                   Benchmarks
                                                                                                         Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                      Knowledge
SC.912.N.1.1       Define a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, for example: biology,         High
                   chemistry, physics, and earth/space science, and do the following:
SC.912.N.1.5       Describe and provide examples of how similar investigations conducted in many         Moderate
                   parts of the world result in the same outcome.
SC.912.N.1.7       Recognize the role of creativity in constructing scientific questions, methods and    Low
                   explanations.
                                                           231


SC.912.N.2.1   Identify what is science, what clearly is not science, and what superficially     High
               resembles science (but fails to meet the criteria for science).
SC.912.N.2.3   Identify examples of pseudoscience (such as astrology, phrenology) in society.    Low
SC.912.N.2.4   Explain that scientific knowledge is both durable and robust and open to change. High
               Scientific knowledge can change because it is often examined and re-examined
               by new investigations and scientific argumentation. Because of these frequent
               examinations, scien
SC.912.N.3.1   Explain that a scientific theory is the culmination of many scientific            High
               investigations drawing together all the current evidence concerning a substantial
               range of phenomena; thus, a scientific theory represents the most powerful
               explanation scientists have
SC.912.E.5.3   Describe and predict how the initial mass of a star determines its evolution.     Moderate
SC.912.E.5.5   Explain the formation of planetary systems based on our knowledge of our Solar    High
               System and apply this knowledge to newly discovered planetary systems.
SC.912.E.5.6   Develop logical connections through physical principles, including Kepler's and   High
               Newton's Laws about the relationships and the effects of Earth, Moon, and Sun
               on each other.
SC.912.E.7.2   Analyze the causes of the various kinds of surface and deep water motion within   High
               the oceans and their impacts on the transfer of energy between the poles and the
               equator.
SC.912.E.7.4   Summarize the conditions that contribute to the climate of a geographic area,     Moderate
               including the relationships to lakes and oceans.
SC.912.E.7.7   Identify, analyze, and relate the internal (Earth system) and external            High
               (astronomical) conditions that contribute to global climate change.
SC.912.P.8.6   Distinguish between bonding forces holding compounds together and other           Moderate
               attractive forces, including hydrogen bonding and van der Waals forces.
SC.912.P.8.8   Characterize types of chemical reactions, for example: redox, acid-base,          Moderate
               synthesis, and single and double replacement reactions.
SC.912.P.8.9   Apply the mole concept and the law of conservation of mass to calculate           High
               quantities of chemicals participating in reactions.
SC.912.P.8.11  Relate acidity and basicity to hydronium and hydroxyl ion concentration and pH.   Moderate
SC.912.P.8.12  Describe the properties of the carbon atom that make the diversity of carbon      Moderate
               compounds possible.
SC.912.P.8.13  Identify selected functional groups and relate how they contribute to properties  High
               of carbon compounds.
SC.912.P.10.5  Relate temperature to the average molecular kinetic energy.                       Moderate
SC.912.P.10.10 Compare the magnitude and range of the four fundamental forces (gravitational, Moderate
               electromagnetic, weak nuclear, strong nuclear).
SC.912.P.10.12 Differentiate between chemical and nuclear reactions.                             Moderate
SC.912.P.10.14 Differentiate among conductors, semiconductors, and insulators.                   Moderate
SC.912.P.10.15 Investigate and explain the relationships among current, voltage, resistance, and High
               power.
SC.912.P.12.1  Distinguish between scalar and vector quantities and assess which should be       High
               used to describe an event.
SC.912.P.12.2  Analyze the motion of an object in terms of its position, velocity, and           High
               acceleration (with respect to a frame of reference) as functions of time.
SC.912.P.12.4  Describe how the gravitational force between two objects depends on their         Moderate
               masses and the distance between them.
SC.912.P.12.11 Describe phase transitions in terms of kinetic molecular theory.                  Moderate
                                                       232


SC.912.P.12.12 Explain how various factors, such as concentration, temperature, and presence of  High
               a catalyst affect the rate of a chemical reaction.
SC.912.L.14.5  Explain the evidence supporting the scientific theory of the origin of eukaryotic High
               cells (endosymbiosis).
SC.912.L.14.6  Explain the significance of genetic factors, environmental factors, and           High
               pathogenic agents to health from the perspectives of both individual and public
               health.
SC.912.L.16.2  Discuss observed inheritance patterns caused by various modes of inheritance,     High
               including dominant, recessive, codominant, sex-linked, polygenic, and multiple
               alleles.
SC.912.L.16.3  Describe the basic process of DNA replication and how it relates to the           High
               transmission and conservation of the genetic information.
SC.912.L.16.5  Explain the basic processes of transcription and translation, and how they result High
               in the expression of genes.
SC.912.L.16.7  Describe how viruses and bacteria transfer genetic material between cells and     High
               the role of this process in biotechnology.
SC.912.L.16.9  Explain how and why the genetic code is universal and is common to almost all     Moderate
               organisms.
SC.912.L.16.14 Describe the cell cycle, including the process of mitosis. Explain the role of    Moderate
               mitosis in the formation of new cells and its importance in maintaining
               chromosome number during asexual reproduction.
SC.912.L.16.16 Describe the process of meiosis, including independent assortment and crossing    Moderate
               over. Explain how reduction division results in the formation of haploid gametes
               or spores.
SC.912.L.16.17 Compare and contrast mitosis and meiosis and relate to the processes of sexual    High
               and asexual reproduction and their consequences for genetic variation.
SC.912.L.17.9  Use a food web to identify and distinguish producers, consumers, and              Moderate
               decomposers. Explain the pathway of energy transfer through trophic levels and
               the reduction of available energy at successive trophic levels.
SC.912.L.17.10 Diagram and explain the biogeochemical cycles of an ecosystem, including          Moderate
               water, carbon, and nitrogen cycle.
SC.912.L.18.1  Describe the basic molecular structures and primary functions of the four major   Moderate
               categories of biological macromolecules.
SC.912.L.18.8  Identify the reactants, products, and basic functions of aerobic and anaerobic    Moderate
               cellular respiration.
SC.912.L.18.9  Explain the interrelated nature of photosynthesis and cellular respiration.       Moderate
MA.912.S.1.2   Determine appropriate and consistent standards of measurement for the data to Moderate
               be collected in a survey or experiment.
MA.912.S.3.2   Collect, organize, and analyze data sets, determine the best format for the data  High
               and present visual summaries from the following:
LA.910.4.2.2   The student will record information and ideas from primary and/or secondary
               sources accurately and coherently, noting the validity and reliability of these
               sources and attributing sources of information;
LA.910.2.2.3   The student will organize information to show understanding or relationships
               among facts, ideas, and events (e.g., representing key points within text through
               charting, mapping, paraphrasing, summarizing, comparing, contrasting, or
               outlining);
HE.912.C.1.3   Evaluate how environment and personal health are interrelated.
HE.912.C.1.4   Analyze how heredity and family history can impact personal health.
                                                       233


               Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code    Access Point Descriptor
SC.912.N.1.In.a       Identify a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, including life science, earth
                      and space science, or physical science, and do the following: 1. Identify a scientific
                      question 2. Examine reliable sources of informtion to identify what is already k
SC.912.N.1.Su.b       Identify the basic process used in scientific investigations, including questioning,
                      observing, recording, determining, and sharing results.
SC.912.N.1.Pa.c       Recognize that when a variety of common activities are repeated the same way, the
                      outcomes are the same.
SC.912.N.2.In.a       Identify examples of investigations that involve science.
SC.912.N.2.Su.b       Recognize that what is known about science can change based on new information.
SC.912.N.3.In.a       Recognize that a scientific theory is developed by repeated investigations of many
                      scientists and agreement on the likely explanation.
SC.912.N.3.Su.b       Recognize examples of scientific laws that describe relationships in nature, such as
                      Newton’s laws.
SC.912.E.5.In.a       Recognize that the Milky Way is part of the expanding universe.
SC.912.E.5.Su.b       Recognize that stars are made of burning gases.
SC.912.E.5.Pa.c       Observe and recognize effects of the Sun on Earth, such as temperature changes.
SC.912.E.7.In.a       Identify cycles that occur on Earth, such as the water and carbon cycles, and the role
                      energy plays in them.
SC.912.E.7.Su.b       Recognize that currents move the ocean water around Earth.
SC.912.E.7.Pa.c       Recognize that humans, plants, and animals live on the Earth (biosphere).
SC.912.P.8.In.a       Classify states of matter as solid, liquid, and gaseous.
SC.912.P.8.Su.b       Identify examples of physical and chemical changes.
SC.912.P.8.Pa.c       Recognize that the parts of an object can be put together to make a whole.
SC.912.P.10.In.a      Identify examples of energy being transformed from one form to another (conserved
                      quantity).
SC.912.P.10.Su.b      Recognize the relationship between work and power, such as power is the amount of
                      work a person or machine does.
SC.912.P.10.Pa.c      Recognize the source and recipient of heat transfer.
SC.912.P.12.In.a      Recognize that scalar quantities describe the magnitude of the measurement, such as
                      size, weight, volume, area, temperature, or speed.
SC.912.P.12.Su.b      Recognize that acceleration generally involves a change in speed.
SC.912.P.12.Pa.c      Identify the source of the force moving an object.
SC.912.L.14.In.a      Identify that all living things are made of cells and cells function in similar ways (cell
                      theory).
SC.912.L.14.Su.b      Recognize that cells have different parts and each has a function.
SC.912.L.14.Pa.c      Identify ways to prevent infection from bacteria and viruses, such as hand washing and
                      first aid.
SC.912.L.16.In.a      Identify that genes are sets of instructions that determine which characteristics are passed
                      from parent to offspring.
SC.912.L.16.Su.b      Recognize that all organisms have a substance called DNA with unique information.
SC.912.L.16.Pa.c      Recognize that illness can result when parts of our bodies are not working properly.
SC.912.L.17.In.a      Recognize that living things in oceans and fresh water are affected by the location,
                      availability of light, depth of the water, and temperature.
                                                          234


SC.912.L.17.Su.b       Recognize how animals and plants in an ecosystem may be affected by changes to the
                       food supply or climate.
SC.912.L.17.Pa.c       Recognize examples of mutual relationships between people and other living things.
SC.912.L.18.In.a       Identify that carbohydrates, fats, proteins, and nucleic acids (macromolecules) are
                       important for human organisms.
SC.912.L.18.Su.b       Recognize that the function of photosynthesis is to produce food for plants.
SC.912.L.18.Pa.c       Identify that food is a source of energy.
                           2002450 Integrated Science III Honors
Section: Basic and Adult Education                          Grade Group: Secondary Grades 9-12
Subject: Science                                            Domain: Integrated Sciences
Course Length: Year                                         Level: 3
     This course description incorporates the following Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for
     standards-based teaching and learning.
                                                  Benchmarks
                                                                                                       Depth of
Benchmark Code Benchmark Descriptor                                                                    Knowledge
SC.912.N.1.1       Define a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, for example: biology, High
                   chemistry, physics, and earth/space science, and do the following:
SC.912.N.1.2       Describe and explain what characterizes science and its methods.                    Moderate
SC.912.N.1.3       Recognize that the strength or usefulness of a scientific claim is evaluated        Low
                   through scientific argumentation, which depends on critical and logical
                   thinking, and the active consideration of alternative scientific explanations to
                   explain the data present
SC.912.N.1.6       Describe how scientific inferences are drawn from scientific observations and       Moderate
                   provide examples from the content being studied.
SC.912.N.1.7       Recognize the role of creativity in constructing scientific questions, methods and  Low
                   explanations.
SC.912.N.2.5       Describe instances in which scientists' varied backgrounds, talents, interests, and High
                   goals influence the inferences and thus the explanations that they make about
                   observations of natural phenomena and describe that competing interpretations
                   (explanations)
SC.912.N.4.1       Explain how scientific knowledge and reasoning provide an empirically-based         Moderate
                   perspective to inform society's decision making.
SC.912.N.4.2       Weigh the merits of alternative strategies for solving a specific societal problem  High
                   by comparing a number of different costs and benefits, such as human,
                   economic, and environmental.
SC.912.E.5.9       Analyze the broad effects of space exploration on the economy and culture of        High
                   Florida.
SC.912.E.6.4       Analyze how specific geologic processes and features are expressed in Florida       High
                   and elsewhere.
SC.912.E.7.5       Predict future weather conditions based on present observations and conceptual      High
                   models and recognize limitations and uncertainties of such predictions.
SC.912.E.7.6       Relate the formation of severe weather to the various physical factors.             Moderate
SC.912.E.7.8       Explain how various atmospheric, oceanic, and hydrologic conditions in Florida      High
                   have influenced and can influence human behavior, both individually and
                   collectively.
SC.912.E.7.9       Cite evidence that the ocean has had a significant influence on climate change by   High
                   absorbing, storing, and moving heat, carbon, and water.
                                                           235


SC.912.P.8.10  Describe oxidation-reduction reactions in living and non-living systems.          Moderate
SC.912.P.10.2  Explore the Law of Conservation of Energy by differentiating among open,          High
               closed, and isolated systems and explain that the total energy in an isolated
               system is a conserved quantity.
SC.912.P.10.3  Compare and contrast work and power qualitatively and quantitatively.             Moderate
SC.912.P.10.6  Create and interpret potential energy diagrams, for example: chemical reactions, High
               orbits around a central body, motion of a pendulum.
SC.912.P.10.9  Describe the quantization of energy at the atomic level.                          Moderate
SC.912.P.10.11 Explain and compare nuclear reactions (radioactive decay, fission and fusion),    High
               the energy changes associated with them and their associated safety issues.
SC.912.P.10.13 Relate the configuration of static charges to the electric field, electric force, High
               electric potential, and electric potential energy.
SC.912.P.10.16 Explain the relationship between moving charges and magnetic fields, as well as   High
               changing magnetic fields and electric fields, and their application to modern
               technologies.
SC.912.P.10.18 Explore the theory of electromagnetism by comparing and contrasting the           High
               different parts of the electromagnetic spectrum in terms of wavelength,
               frequency, and energy, and relate them to phenomena and applications.
SC.912.P.10.21 Qualitatively describe the shift in frequency in sound or electromagnetic waves   Moderate
               due to the relative motion of a source or a receiver.
SC.912.P.10.22 Construct ray diagrams and use thin lens and mirror equations to locate the       High
               images formed by lenses and mirrors.
SC.912.P.12.5  Apply the law of conservation of linear momentum to interactions, such as         High
               collisions between objects.
SC.912.P.12.6  Qualitatively apply the concept of angular momentum.                              High
SC.912.P.12.7  Recognize that nothing travels faster than the speed of light in vacuum which is  Low
               the same for all observers no matter how they or the light source are moving.
SC.912.P.12.10 Interpret the behavior of ideal gases in terms of kinetic molecular theory.       High
SC.912.L.15.10 Identify basic trends in hominid evolution from early ancestors six million years Moderate
               ago to modern humans, including brain size, jaw size, language, and
               manufacture of tools.
SC.912.L.15.13 Describe the conditions required for natural selection, including: overproduction Moderate
               of offspring, inherited variation, and the struggle to survive, which result in
               differential reproductive success.
SC.912.L.15.14 Discuss mechanisms of evolutionary change other than natural selection such as    Moderate
               genetic drift and gene flow.
SC.912.L.15.15 Describe how mutation and genetic recombination increase genetic variation.       Moderate
SC.912.L.16.4  Explain how mutations in the DNA sequence may or may not result in                High
               phenotypic change. Explain how mutations in gametes may result in phenotypic
               changes in offspring.
SC.912.L.16.8  Explain the relationship between mutation, cell cycle, and uncontrolled cell      Moderate
               growth potentially resulting in cancer.
SC.912.L.16.10 Evaluate the impact of biotechnology on the individual, society and the           High
               environment, including medical and ethical issues.
SC.912.L.16.13 Describe the basic anatomy and physiology of the human reproductive system.       Moderate
               Describe the process of human development from fertilization to birth and major
               changes that occur in each trimester of pregnancy.
SC.912.L.17.5  Analyze how population size is determined by births, deaths, immigration,         High
               emigration, and limiting factors (biotic and abiotic) that determine carrying
               capacity.
                                                       236


SC.912.L.17.6     Compare and contrast the relationships among organisms, including predation,         Moderate
                  parasitism, competition, commensalism, and mutualism.
SC.912.L.17.8     Recognize the consequences of the losses of biodiversity due to catastrophic         High
                  events, climate changes, human activity, and the introduction of invasive, non
                  native species.
SC.912.L.17.16    Discuss the large-scale environmental impacts resulting from human activity,         High
                  including waste spills, oil spills, runoff, greenhouse gases, ozone depletion, and
                  surface and groundwater pollution.
SC.912.L.17.20    Predict the impact of individuals on environmental systems and examine how           High
                  human lifestyles affect sustainability.
SC.912.L.18.10    Connect the role of adenosine triphosphate (ATP) to energy transfers within a        High
                  cell.
SC.912.L.18.11    Explain the role of enzymes as catalysts that lower the activation energy of         Moderate
                  biochemical reactions. Identify factors, such as pH and temperature, and their
                  effect on enzyme activity.
SC.912.L.18.12    Discuss the special properties of water that contribute to Earth's suitability as an Moderate
                  environment for life: cohesive behavior, ability to moderate temperature,
                  expansion upon freezing, and versatility as a solvent.
MA.912.S.1.2      Determine appropriate and consistent standards of measurement for the data to        Moderate
                  be collected in a survey or experiment.
MA.912.S.3.2      Collect, organize, and analyze data sets, determine the best format for the data     High
                  and present visual summaries from the following:
LA.1112.4.2.2     The student will record information and ideas from primary and/or secondary
                  sources accurately and coherently, noting the validity and reliability of these
                  sources and attributing sources of information;
LA.1112.2.2.3     The student will organize information to show understanding or relationships
                  among facts, ideas, and events (e.g., representing key points within text through
                  charting, mapping, paraphrasing, summarizing, comparing, contrasting,
                  outlining);
               Access Points for Students with Significant Cognitive Disabilities
Access Point Code    Access Point Descriptor
SC.912.N.1.In.a       Identify a problem based on a specific body of knowledge, including life science, earth
                      and space science, or physical science, and do the following: 1. Identify a scientific
                      question 2. Examine reliable sources of informtion to identify what is already k
SC.912.N.1.Su.b       Identify the basic process used in scientific investigations, including questioning,
                      observing, recording, determining, and sharing results.
SC.912.N.1.Pa.c       Recognize that when a variety of common activities are repeated the same way, the
                      outcomes are the same.
SC.912.N.2.In.a       Identify examples of investigations that involve science.
SC.912.N.2.Su.b       Recognize that what is known about science can change based on new information.
SC.912.N.4.In.a       Identify ways scientific knowledge and problem solving benefit people.
SC.912.N.4.Su.b       Recognize that some strategies may cost more to solve a problem.
SC.912.E.5.In.a       Recognize that the Milky Way is part of the expanding universe.
SC.912.E.5.Su.b       Recognize that stars are made of burning gases.
SC.912.E.5.Pa.c       Observe and recognize effects of the Sun on Earth, such as temperature changes.
SC.912.E.6.In.a       Describe the three layers of Earth (core, mantle, and crust).
SC.912.E.6.Su.b       Identify types of surface features, such as hills and valleys.
                                                          237


SC.912.E.7.In.a         Identify cycles that occur on Earth, such as the water and carbon cycles, and the role
                        energy plays in them.
SC.912.E.7.Su.b         Recognize that currents move the ocean water around Earth.
SC.912.E.7.Pa.c         Recognize that humans, plants, and animals live on the Earth (biosphere).
SC.912.P.8.In.a         Classify states of matter as solid, liquid, and gaseous.
SC.912.P.8.Su.b         Identify examples of physical and chemical changes.
SC.912.P.8.Pa.c         Recognize that the parts of an object can be put together to make a whole.
SC.912.P.10.In.a        Identify examples of energy being transformed from one form to another (conserved
                        quantity).
SC.912.P.10.Su.b        Recognize the relationship between work and power, such as power is the amount of
                        work a person or machine does.
SC.912.P.10.Pa.c        Recognize the source and recipient of heat transfer.
SC.912.P.12.In.a        Recognize that scalar quantities describe the magnitude of the measurement, such as
                        size, weight, volume, area, temperature, or speed.
SC.912.P.12.Su.b        Recognize that acceleration generally involves a change in speed.
SC.912.P.12.Pa.c        Identify the source of the force moving an object.
SC.912.L.15.In.a        Identify that prehistoric plants and animals changed over time (evolved) or became
                        extinct.
SC.912.L.15.Su.b        Match organisms to the animal, plant, and fungus kingdoms.
SC.912.L.15.Pa.c        Recognize that animals produce offspring.
SC.912.L.16.In.a        Identify that genes are sets of instructions that determine which characteristics are passed
                        from parent to offspring.
SC.912.L.16.Su.b        Recognize that all organisms have a substance called DNA with unique information.
SC.912.L.16.Pa.c        Recognize that illness can result when parts of our bodies are not working properly.
SC.912.L.17.In.a        Recognize that living things in oceans and fresh water are affected by the location,
                        availability of light, depth of the water, and temperature.
SC.912.L.17.Su.b        Recognize how animals and plants in an ecosystem may be affected by changes to the
                        food supply or climate.
SC.912.L.17.Pa.c        Recognize examples of mutual relationships between people and other living things.
SC.912.L.18.In.a        Identify that carbohydrates, fats, proteins, and nucleic acids (macromolecules) are
                        important for human organisms.
SC.912.L.18.Su.b        Recognize that the function of photosynthesis is to produce food for plants.
SC.912.L.18.Pa.c        Identify that food is a source of energy.
Advanced Placement (AP) Courses
Course descriptions for AP Biology, AP Chemistry, and AP Physics (B and C) are provided by the
College Board and are available online at this Web site:
http://www.collegeboard.com/student/testing/ap/subjects.html
                                                            238


Major Priorities for Instructional Materials
Content, Presentation, Learning
The priorities as described in this specification document were developed from research findings
about what makes instructional materials effective. These priorities have undergone review by
individuals who have served on state and district committees, by curriculum specialists, by
instructional designers, by evaluation specialists, and by administrators of the statewide adoption
system.
Instructional materials must be effective in three major priority areas: content, presentation, and
learning. The following sections describe essential features for each of these priority areas. These
features generally apply to all formats of instructional materials, whether print or other
media/multiple media formats.
Content
Some features of content coverage have received progressively more attention over the past
decade. These features include:
A. ALIGNMENT WITH CURRICULUM REQUIREMENTS
B. LEVEL OF TREATMENT OF CONTENT
C. EXPERTISE FOR CONTENT DEVELOPMENT
D. ACCURACY OF CONTENT
E. CURRENTNESS OF CONTENT
F. AUTHENTICITY OF CONTENT
G. MULTICULTURAL REPRESENTATION
H. HUMANITY AND COMPASSION
The following sections describe the content features expected for each of these priority
areas.
A. ALIGNMENT WITH CURRICULUM REQUIREMENTS
Content must align with the Next Generation Sunshine State Standards and benchmarks
for Science.
See Florida Statutes 1006.34(2)(a)(b); 1006.38(3)(b); 1006.31(4)
                                                 239


Florida has developed science course descriptions for K-12. These course descriptions can
be found online at
http://www.floridastandards.org/Courses/CourseDescriptionSearch.aspx.
Please note that the science course descriptions are subject to State Board of Education
approval. The draft course descriptions are scheduled for submission to the State Board of
Education in July 2009.
Correlations. Publishers are expected to provide correlation charts in the provided form to show
exactly where and to what extent (mentioned or in-depth) the instructional materials cover the
Sunshine State Standards and benchmarks outlined in the course descriptions.
Scope. The content should address Florida’s required curriculum standards and benchmarks for
the subject, grade level, and learning outcomes, including thinking and learning skills.
Completeness. The content of the major tool should be complete enough to stand on its own. To
be useful for classroom instruction, instructional materials must be adaptable to the instructional
goals and course outlines for individual school districts, as well as the state standards and
benchmarks. Content should have no major omissions in the required content coverage. They
may include concepts and topics that enrich and extend learning, but should be free of unrelated
facts and information that would detract from achievement of Florida’s specified Course
Descriptions and Sunshine State Standards and benchmarks.
B.        LEVEL OF TREATMENT OF CONTENT
The level of complexity or difficulty of content must be appropriate for the standards,
student abilities and grade level, and time periods allowed for teaching.
See Florida Statutes 1006.31(4)(e); 1006.34(2)(a); 1006.34(2)(b)
Objectives. Content should be simple, complex, technical, or nontechnical enough for the
intended objectives.
Students. Content should be developmentally appropriate for the age and maturity level of the
intended students. It should contain sufficient details for students to understand the significance
of the information and to engage in reflection and discussion.
Time. The level of complexity or difficulty of content also should allow for its coverage during
the time periods available for teaching the subject.
C.        EXPERTISE FOR CONTENT DEVELOPMENT
Expertise in the content area and in education of the intended students must be reflected in
the authors, reviewers, and sources that contributed to the development of the materials.
See Florida Statutes 1006.38(15)
Authorship. The authors, consultants, and reviewers must have actually contributed to the
development of the instructional materials and should have credentials that reflect expertise in
                                                240


the subject area, course, course category, grade level, pedagogy, education, teaching, or
classroom instruction. Qualifications may include expertise in educational psychology or
instructional design.
Sources. Primary and secondary sources should reflect expert information for the subject, such
as relevant data from research journals and other recognized scientific sources. The types of
sources considered appropriate will vary with the particular subject area.
D.        ACCURACY OF CONTENT
Content must be accurate in historical context and contemporary facts and concepts.
See Florida Statutes 1006.38(8); 1006.31(4)(e); 1006.35.
Objectivity. Content that is included in the materials should accurately represent the domain of
knowledge and events. It should be factual and objective. It should be free of mistakes, errors,
inconsistencies, contradictions within itself, and biases of interpretation. It should be free of the
biased selection of information. Materials should distinguish between facts and possible
interpretations or opinions expressed about factual information. Visuals or other elements of
instruction should contribute to the accuracy of text or narrative.
Representativeness. The selection of content should not misrepresent the domain of knowledge
and events. It should include the generally accepted and prevalent theories, major concepts, laws,
standards, and models used within the discipline of the subject area.
Correctness. Presentation of content should be free of typographical and visual errors. It should
include correct grammar, spelling, linguistics, terminology, definitions, descriptions, visuals,
graphs, sounds, videos, and all other components of the instructional materials.
E.        CURRENTNESS OF CONTENT
Content must be up to date for the academic discipline and the context in which the content
is presented.
See Florida Statutes 1006.38(8); 1006.(4)(e).
Dates or editions. Copyright dates for photographs and other materials and editions should
suggest sufficient currentness of content. Copyright dates and editions serve as indicators about
currentness. However, neither the copyright date nor the edition guarantees currentness.
Subsequent editions should reflect more up-to-date information than earlier editions. Informed
examination of the text, narrative, and visuals contained in the materials provides the most direct
information about currentness of the materials.
Context. Text or narrative, visuals, photographs, and other features should reflect the time
periods appropriate for the objectives and the intended learners.
                                                 241


    •   Sometimes context should be current. For example, a photograph used to show stages of
        human growth and development will be more relevant when the clothing, hairstyles, and
        activities reflect present-day styles.
    •   Sometimes context should be historical. For example, illustrations and photographs of
        historical events should reflect the historical time period.
    •   Sometimes context should be both current and historical. For example, historic images
        alongside modern ones would convey changes in styles over time.
    •   At all times the context should be relevant to the learners, to the Curriculum Frameworks,
        to the standards and benchmarks, and to the concept presented.
F.        AUTHENTICITY OF CONTENT
Content should include problem-centered connections to life in a context that is meaningful
to students.
See Florida Statutes 1006.31(e); 1006.31(4)(b); 1003.42
Life connections. Instructional materials should include connections to the student’s life
situations to make the content meaningful. Students might be expected to deal with time
constraints, consider risks and trade-offs in decision-making, and work with teams. Connections
may be made to situations of daily home life, careers, vocation, community events and services,
and leisure or recreation.
Interdisciplinary treatment. Instructional materials also should include interdisciplinary
connections to make content meaningful. Examples of situations that connect a variety of subject
areas include building projects, playing sports, retrieving information or objects, balancing
budgets, creating products, and researching information. In addition to subject area connections,
instructional materials should connect the course or course category to other disciplines and
student experiences.
Examples of approaches to interdisciplinary connections include:
    •   explanations and activities for using skills and knowledge from other academic
        disciplines
    •   assignments that require students to relate learning from other disciplines rather than to
        isolated knowledge or skills
    •   the focus on common themes across several subject areas (infusion, parallel,
        transdisciplinary, or multidisciplinary instruction)
                                                  242


G.        MULTICULTURAL REPRESENTATION
Portrayal of gender, ethnicity, age, work situations, and various social groups must include
multicultural fairness and advocacy.
See Florida Statutes 1003.42; 1006.31(4)(a); 1006.34(2)(b).
Multicultural fairness. Through balanced representation of cultures and groups in multiple
settings, occupations, careers, and lifestyles, the materials should support equal opportunity
without regard to age, color, gender, disability, national origin, race, or religion. What matters
most is not the number of pages devoted to diversity, equity, or work roles, but the substance of
what is stated and portrayed. For this reason, it can be misleading to count the number of pages
or illustrations devoted to a social issue or group. It is more important to focus on the integration
of social diversity throughout a set of instructional materials.
In addition to balanced representations, the portrayal of individuals and situations must exclude
biases and stereotypes. These portrayals must promote an understanding and appreciation of the
importance and contributions of diverse cultures and heritage.
Multicultural advocacy. The understanding and appreciation of multiple cultures extends
beyond fair representation. It involves embracing a multicultural context, not just through
pictures, but through information about ways to honor differences and deal with conflicts,
promote a positive self-image for members of all groups, and provide for the development of
healthy attitudes and values.
Effective treatment of multicultural issues requires consideration of the age and ability levels of
students and whether or not it is appropriate to include multicultural issues in the study of a
particular topic, such as the memorization of a formula or equation. Overall, however, materials
should reflect both multicultural fairness and advocacy.
H.        HUMANITY AND COMPASSION
Portrayal of the appropriate care and treatment of people and animals must include
compassion, sympathy, and consideration of their needs and values and exclude hard-core
pornography and inhumane treatment.
See Florida Statutes 1003.42; 1006.31(4)(c); 1006.34(2)(b).
Inclusion of compassion. When providing examples in narrative or visuals, materials sometimes
depict the care and treatment of people and animals. Generally, this means showing in some way
a measure of compassion, sympathy, or consideration of their needs and feelings.
                                                  243


Exclusion of inhumanity. In the context of personal and family values, Florida expressly
prohibits material containing hard-core pornography. In addition, although the definition of
inhumane treatment can sometimes appear to be controversial, as in science research, there is
general agreement that instructional materials should not advocate any form of inhumane
treatment.
As with the evaluation of multicultural representation, it is important to consider the context of
the subject and the age and abilities of the students.
Presentation
Features of presentation affect the practical usefulness of materials and the ease of finding and
understanding content. These features include:
A. COMPREHENSIVENESS OF STUDENT AND
     TEACHER RESOURCES
B.   ALIGNMENT OF INSTRUCTIONAL COMPONENTS
C. ORGANIZATION OF INSTRUCTIONAL MATERIALS
D,   READABILITY OF INSTRUCTIONAL MATERIALS
E. PACING OF CONTENT
F.   EASE OF USE OF MATERIALS
The following sections describe the presentation features expected for each of these areas.
A.       COMPREHENSIVENESS OF STUDENT AND TEACHER RESOURCES
Resources must be complete enough to address the targeted learning outcomes without
requiring the teacher to prepare additional teaching materials for the course.
See Florida Statutes 1006.34(2)(a); 1006.34(2)(b)
Materials should contain support for students in completing instructional activities and
assessments and for teachers in implementing all of the instructional elements. A variety of
components can accomplish this purpose. Typically, materials will include test items, study
guides, outlines and strategies for teaching, media supplements, learning activities, and projects.
The major components generally expected for student and teacher resources are listed below.
Student resources
Student materials typically include the major text or program with text or narration, visuals,
assignments, and assessments. Formats may include print, audio, visual, computer, or other
media like CDs, DVDs, PPTs, or software adaptable for Smart Boards.
                                                  244


Effective instructional materials generally integrate the use of reference aids (e.g., index,
glossary, maps, bibliography, graphic organizers, charts, and pictures) with the topic being
studied. Items that guide students through materials might include clearly labeled materials,
directions and explanations, and assignments with menus of choices.
Review and practice activities may include participation activities such as simulations, role-
playing situations, investigations, and hands-on practice assignments. Review activities may
include self-checks or quizzes. Formats may include worksheets, workbooks, journals, lab books,
lab logs, charts, or maps. Feedback may be in the form of answer keys in student materials or in
teacher materials. Communication is an essential component in the processes of science.
Students must have multiple opportunities to develop skills in technical writing.
Review works best as a logical extension of content, goals, objectives, and lessons, with
increased similarity to real-life situations. Review activities should require students to apply
previously learned knowledge and skills. Frequent short reviews over time improve learning
more than a concentrated review. Assignments and stages of small practice improve speed and
accuracy.
Other components may include enrichment and remediation activities, additional resources, and
tests and assessment tools either in the student materials or in the teacher’s guide or edition.
In addition:
    •   Student materials, other than the major tool, must be copy- or print-ready. Publishers are
        required to provide CDs or web-accessible materials that can be downloaded and
        modified to meet the needs of individual teachers or students.
    •   Student resources must include materials that are designed for student discovery,
        including materials appropriate for laboratory experiments and individual or cooperative
        group work. These materials should be appropriate for a variety of learning styles and
        should include appropriate and specific safety protocols.
    •   The major tool and other materials must include engaging activities requiring the use of
        technology, including calculators, electronic data-collecting laboratory probe-ware,
        interactive software, and websites.
    •   Student resources must include challenging and engaging problems, such as inquiry-
        based investigations that will require persistence over a period of time. These
        investigations should include ample time for student reflection.
    •   Materials should be standards-based, not assessment-based. Materials should not be
        labeled as FCAT preparation materials. The focus of teaching and learning in Florida’s
        science courses comes from the Sunshine State Standards, not from the assessment.
        Instructional materials which provide strong support for mastery of the standards will be
        more likely to lead to students’ success on the state science assessments. Student
        assessment materials should represent a variety of assessment types, including multiple
        opportunities for students to explain their understanding of science concepts.
Teacher resources. Teacher materials typically include a teacher’s edition with the annotated
student text and copies of ancillary written materials with answer keys, worksheets, tests,
diagrams, non-consumables, as well as consumables, etc., so that the teacher has to use only one
guide. In-service training, workshops, and consulting services should be made available by
                                                 245


publishers to support teachers in implementing instructional materials. Professional development
is essential to the success of any program, especially when a program contains non-traditional
elements. Publishers should clearly indicate the recommended amount and types of professional
development that they will provide, and they should work with districts and schools to ensure
that teachers receive the support that they need. The materials for the teacher should support
continued teacher learning.
Support, guidelines, resources, or features such as the ones described below should be available
to help teachers effectively implement materials in classroom and school settings.
    •   Components and materials are easy to use. Examples include clearance, license, or
        agreement for copying and use of materials; clear description and accurate directions for
        use of required equipment, facilities, resources, and environment; clearly labeled grade,
        lesson, content, and other information to identify components; correct specifications for
        making instructional media and electronic programs work effectively.
    •   Materials support lesson planning, teaching, and learning. Examples include
        overview of components and objectives; background for lectures and discussions;
        technical terminology, and reinforcement and review strategies; scope and sequence chart
        for activities and planning; sample lesson plans; suggestions for individualized study,
        small-group and large-group presentations and discussions, school-to-work activities,
        field or laboratory experiences, safety procedures, and other extension activities;
        suggestions for integrating themes across the subject area or course curriculum and
        forming connections to other disciplines; and suggestions for parental and community
        involvement.
    •   Suggestions are provided for adapting instruction for varying needs. Examples
        include alternative approaches to teaching, pacing, and options for varied delivery of
        instruction such as media, tools, equipment, and emerging technology; strategies for
        engaging all students, such as open-ended questions to stimulate thinking, journals,
        hands-on investigations, explorations, and multi-sensory approaches; suggestions for
        addressing common student difficulties or adapting to multiple learning styles; and
        alternative reteaching, enrichment, and remediation strategies.
    •   Guidelines and resources are provided on how to implement and evaluate
        instruction. Examples include answers to work assignments, practice activities, and
        tests; sample projects or research results; suggestions for using learning tasks for
        classroom assessment; guidelines for alternative assessments, such as sample checklists,
        rubrics, peer or performance assessments, and portfolios.
    •   Resources are provided to use in classroom activities. Examples include technology
        resources; lists of resources, Web links, and references; reading strategies; materials for
        displays or photocopies; classroom management strategies and documentation on how to
        manage the entire instructional program; and in-service workshops or consultation
        support from the publisher.
                                                 246


B.         ALIGNMENT OF INSTRUCTIONAL COMPONENTS
All components of an instructional package must align with each other, as well as with the
curriculum.
See Florida Statutes 1006.29(4); 1006.34(2)(b).
All components of an instructional package—teacher’s edition and materials, student’s edition
and materials, workbook, all ancillary materials—must be integrated and interdependent and
must correspond with each other. For example, support materials in the teacher’s edition should
align with student activities or assignments. They must match in content and progression of
instructional activities.
C.         ORGANIZATION OF INSTRUCTIONAL MATERIALS
The structure and format of materials must have enough order and clarity to allow
students and teachers to access content and explicitly identify ideas and sequences.
See Florida Statutes 1006.34(2)(a); 1006.34(2)(b).
Providing an explicit and teachable structure can double the amount of information remembered.
Clear organization allows students and teachers to discriminate important pieces of information
through skimming, reading, or browsing.
Clear organization may be accomplished through a combination of features, but generally not
through one feature alone.
Access to content. Some features help in searching and locating information, such as a table of
contents; 6-12 content scope and sequence chart, menu or map of content; directions on how to
locate information or complete assignments; an index for quick reference; goals and/or
objectives, outlines, lists, or checklists for major sections; bibliographies and lists of resources;
glossaries for quick access to major terms; introductions, key concepts and themes, visual cues,
illustrations, labeled examples, and labeled reviews or summaries.
Visible structure and format. At-a-glance features should signal the organization of content.
The following features are desirable:
    •    chapter or unit titles and/or frames; headings and subheadings;
    •    typographic cues such as bold, italics, or changes in size of type;
    •    divisions of content such as borders, boxes, circles, highlighting, visual signposts, icons,
         or color cues;
    •    diagrams, labels, and visuals placed near the related content; and numbering of pages and
         other components.
                                                  247


Objectives or a content outline may serve a similar purpose by introducing main ideas, providing
guideposts to use in searching for key information, or serving as a checklist for self-assessment.
Certain types of brief narrative sections also contribute to clear organization. For example, the
statement of a clear purpose with content organized around main ideas, principles, concepts, and
logical relationships supports the unity and flow of information. Introductions also play a major
role when they include anchoring ideas, a list of key points, or conceptual schemes such as
metaphors. Summaries also can assist students in understanding the logical order of topics
presented.
Logical organization. The pattern of organization of the content should be consistent and logical
for the type of subject or topic. Patterns of organization may include comparison and contrast,
time sequence, cause-effect or problem-solution-effect, concrete-to-abstract, introduction-
review-extension (spiral structure), simple-to-complex, whole-part or part-whole, generalization-
examples-review-practice, and conflict-inside view-structure.
D.        READABILITY OF INSTRUCTIONAL MATERIALS
Narrative and visuals should engage students in reading or listening as well as in
understanding the content at a level appropriate to the students’ abilities.
See Florida Statutes 1006.31(4)(e); 1006.34(2)(a); 1006.34(2)(b).
Language style. Language style and visual features can influence the readability of materials.
Yet, a popular tool for assessing readability has been the use of a readability formula of one type
or another. These formulas tend to focus only on a few countable characteristics of language
style such as the length of words, sentences, and/or paragraphs.
Other features are more important in establishing the readability of instructional materials, such
as
    •   organized, coherent text
    •   language and concepts familiar to the student
    •   language that clarifies, simplifies, and explains information
    •   transition words such as “yet,” “also,” “next,” “for example,” “moreover,” or “however”
    •   other phrases that create logical connections
    •   words with concrete and specific images
    •   active rather than passive voice
    •   varied sentence structures
    •   avoiding choppy sentences and unnecessary words
    •   specific questions or directions to guide student attention to visuals or key information
                                                  248


Visual features. Visual features that improve readability include
     •  print that is dark and clear, with good contrast
     •  paper with clean-cut edges without glare, or computer screens without glare
     •  margins wide enough on a page or screen to allow easy viewing of the text
     •  chunking text (Sentence ends on same page as it begins.)
     •  visuals that are relevant, clear, vivid, and simple enough for students to understand
     •  quantity of visuals suitable for the intended students (Both lower-ability students and
        higher-ability students tend to require more visuals.)
     •  unjustified text (ragged on the right) rather than justified (lined up on the right)
     •  visuals that contain information in a form different from the text
     •  graphs, charts, maps, and other visual representations integrated at their point of use
     •  colors, size of print, spacing, quantity, and type of visuals suitable for the abilities and
        needs of the intended students
E.       PACING OF CONTENT
The amount of content presented at one time or the pace at which it is presented must be of
a size or rate that allows students to perceive and understand it.
See Florida Statutes 1006.31(4)(e); 1006.34(2)(a); 1006.34(2)(b).
It is important that materials contain “bite-size” chunks or blocks of information. The chunks
should not be so large, nor the pacing so fast, as to overwhelm students. Neither should the
chunks be so small, nor the pacing so slow, as to bore them.
F.       EASE OF USE OF MATERIALS
Both print and other media formats of instructional materials must be easy to use and
replace and be durable enough for multiple uses over time.
See Florida Statutes 1006.29(4); 1006.38(3)(a); 1006.34(2)(a); 1006.34(2)(b); 1006.38(5);
1006.38(6)(7)(8)(9)
Warranty. The actual physical and technical qualities of materials should match the description
contained in the publisher’s warranty.
Use. Materials must be designed for practical use in the classroom and school environments.
They must be easy to identify and store. Teachers and students must be able to access and use the
materials. Some of the factors influencing their ease of use include number of components, size
of components, packaging, quality of materials, equipment requirements, and cost to purchase or
replace components.
                                                   249


The best choice about weight, size, and number of volumes depends on several factors, such as
the organization of the content, how well separate volumes may fit time periods for instruction,
and the ages of students. Technical production requirements, such as page limits or different
types of bindings, may lead to multiple volumes.
Examples of classroom use include repeated copying of consumable materials and repeated use
of other materials by students over time. Students should be able to easily use the materials and
take home, in a convenient form, most of the material they need to learn for the course.
Technology-rich resources should work properly, without the purchase of additional software,
and run without error. Electronic media for student use should be encoded to prevent accidental
or intentional erasure or modification. As with textbooks, electronic media should allow students
to easily access and interact with them without extensive supervision or special assistance.
The physical and technical qualities of materials should match with the resources of the schools.
Materials such as videos, software, CDs, Internet sites, and transparencies may serve
instructional purposes well, but have little value unless they can be implemented with the
school’s equipment. Publishers should include training, in-service, and consultation to help in
effective use of the materials.
Durability. Students and teachers should be able to have materials that will be durable under
conditions of expected use. For example, boxes, books, or other materials should not fall apart
after normal classroom use. The packaging and form of materials should be flexible and durable
enough for multiple uses over time. Durability includes considerations such as
    •   high-quality paper, ink, binding, and cover
    •   strength of back, joints, body block, and individual pages
    •   worry-free technology that runs properly, with easy to hear, see, and control audio and
        visual material
    •   the publisher’s guarantee for replacement conditions and agreements for reproduction
        necessary to effectively use the materials
Cost. Florida’s Commissioner of Education will consider the impact of cost in making final
decisions. Cost, while not a direct factor in ease of use, influences the ease with which materials
can be obtained or replaced. The impact of cost can be complex to estimate. It requires
considering the number of materials available at no additional cost with the purchase of the
major program or text, the cost over the adoption period of several years, and the number of
ongoing free materials to support implementation. Attractive features such as higher quality
paper and visuals and greater use of color may escalate cost, without enhancing learning
effectiveness.
                                                 250


Learning
The following features have been found to promote learning and apply to most types of learning
outcomes.
A. MOTIVATIONAL STRATEGIES
B. TEACHING A FEW “BIG IDEAS”
C. EXPLICIT INSTRUCTION
D. GUIDANCE AND SUPPORT
E. ACTIVE PARTICIPATION
F. TARGETED INSTRUCTIONAL STRATEGIES
G. TARGETED ASSESSMENT STRATEGIES
The following sections describe the learning features expected for each of these priority areas.
A.       MOTIVATIONAL STRATEGIES
Instructional materials must include features to maintain learner motivation.
See Florida Statutes 1006.31(4)(e); 1006.34(2)(a)(b); 1006.38(4).
Expectations. Materials should positively influence the expectations of students. Examples
include:
    •  positive expectations for success
    •  novel tasks or other approaches to stimulate intellectual curiosity
    •  meaningful tasks related to student interests, cultural backgrounds, and developmental
       levels
    •  activities with relevance to the student’s life
    •  thought-provoking challenges such as paradoxes, dilemmas, problems, controversies, and
       questioning of traditional ways of thinking
    •  challenges that are neither too difficult to achieve nor so easy that students become bored
    •  hands-on tasks in a concrete context and images, sounds, analogies, metaphors, or
       humorous anecdotes
    •  variety, including the opportunity for students to ask their own questions, set their own
       goals, and make other choices during learning
                                                  251


Feedback. Materials should include informative and positive feedback on progress. Examples
include
    •   frequent checks on progress, including testing
    •   explanatory feedback with information about correctness of responses, how to avoid or
        correct common mistakes, and/or different approaches to use
    •   varied forms of assessments (self-assessment, peer assessment, and some learning tasks
        without formal assessments)
Appearance. Materials should have an appearance generally considered attractive to the
intended students.
B.        TEACHING A FEW “BIG IDEAS”
Instructional materials should thoroughly teach a few important ideas, concepts, or themes.
See Florida Statutes 1006.31(4)(e); 1006.34(2)(a)(b).
Focus. Thoroughly teaching a few big ideas provides focus for the learners’ attention. It provides
an organizing framework for integrating new information.
Completeness. The thorough teaching of a few big ideas may focus on developing a deeper and
more complete understanding of the major themes of a discipline, the content of the subject area,
relationships to other disciplines, and the thinking and learning skills required for achieving the
specified learning outcomes.
C.        EXPLICIT INSTRUCTION
Instructional materials must contain clear statements of information and outcomes.
See Florida Statutes 1006.31(4)(e); 1006.34(2)(a)(b).
Clarity of directions and explanations. To support success in learning, instructional materials
should include clear presentation and explanations of
    •   purposes, goals, and expected outcomes
    •   concepts, rules, information, and terms
    •   models, examples, questions, and feedback
For example, development of specific thinking skills requires an explicit statement of the
particular thinking skills to be learned, along with the strategies or steps to follow. Explicit
instruction for thinking skills might also involve showing examples of successful thinking
contrasted with examples of poor thinking processes.
                                                 252


Similarly, the development of learning skills requires explicit directions about when and how to
do activities such as note taking, outlining, paraphrasing, abstracting and analyzing,
summarizing, self-coaching, memory strategies, persistence, preview and questioning, reading
and listening, reflecting, and reciting.
Exclusion of ambiguity. Instructional materials should avoid terms and phrases with ambiguous
meanings, confusing directions or descriptions, or inadequate explanations.
D.        GUIDANCE AND SUPPORT
Instructional materials must include guidance and support to help students safely and
successfully become more independent learners and thinkers.
See Florida Statutes 1006.31(4)(e); 1006.34(2)(a).
Level. The type of guidance and support that helps students become more independent learners
and thinkers is sometimes referred to as scaffolding. Scaffolding is a solid structure of support
that can be removed after a job has been completed. As students gain proficiency, support can
diminish, and students can encounter more complex, life-centered problems. Information and
activities should provide guidance and support at the level that is needed—no more and no less.
Too much can squelch student interest, and too little can lead to failure.
Guidance and support can be accomplished by a combination of the following features:
    •   organized routines
    •   advance organizers or models such as
            o condensed outlines or overviews
            o simplified views of information
            o visual representations of new information during initial instruction
            o sample problems
            o questions to focus on key ideas or important features
            o examples of solved problems
            o explanations of how the problems were solved
            o examples of finished products or sample performances
            o analogies, metaphors, or associations to compare one idea to another
    •   prompts or hints during initial practice
    •   step-by-step instructions
                                                 253


    •   immediate and corrective feedback on the accuracy of performance of each step or task,
        on how to learn from mistakes, and on how to reach the correct answer
    •   simulations with features for realistic practice
    •   opportunities for students to do research and to organize and communicate results
Adaptability. Guidance and support must be adaptable to developmental differences and various
learning styles. For example, young children tend to understand concepts in concrete terms and
overgeneralize new concepts. Some students need more time, some tend to be more impulsive
than reflective, some have trouble distinguishing relevant from irrelevant information, and some
have better written than spoken language skills. Approaches for developmental differences and
various learning styles of students include
    •   a variety of activities such as
            o structured and unstructured activities
            o independent and group work
            o teacher-directed and discovery learning
            o visual and narrative instruction
            o hands-on activities
            o open-ended activities
            o practice without extrinsic rewards or grades
            o simple, complex, concrete, and abstract examples
            o variable pacing or visual breaks
    •   a variety of modalities for the various learning styles of students, such as
            o linguistic-verbal
            o logical-mathematical
            o musical
            o spatial
            o bodily-kinesthetic
            o interpersonal
            o intrapersonal
            o naturalist
                                                  254


E.        ACTIVE PARTICIPATION OF STUDENTS
Instructional materials must engage the physical and mental activity of students during the
learning process.
See Florida Statutes 1006.31(4)(e); 1006.34(2)(a).
Assignments. Instructional materials should include organized activities of periodic, frequent,
short assignments that are logical extensions of content, goals, and objectives.
Student responses. Assignments should include questions and application activities during
learning that give students opportunities to respond. Active participation of students can be
accomplished in a variety of ways. For example, information and activities might require
students to accomplish types of activities such as
    •   responding orally or in writing
    •   creating visual representations (charts, graphs, diagrams, and illustrations)
    •   generating products
    •   generating their own questions or examples
    •   thinking of new situations for applying or extending what they learn
    •   completing discovery activities
    •   adding details to big ideas or concepts from prior knowledge
    •   forming their own analogies and metaphors
    •   practicing lesson-related tasks, procedures, behaviors, or skills
    •   choosing from a variety of activities
F.        TARGETED INSTRUCTIONAL STRATEGIES
Instructional materials should include the strategies known to be successful for teaching
the learning outcomes targeted in the curriculum requirements.
See Florida Statutes 1006.31(4)(e); 1006.34(2)(a)(b); 1003.42.
Alignment. Research has documented the strategies that effectively teach different types of
learning outcomes. The learning strategies included in instructional materials should match the
findings of research for the targeted learning outcomes. Different types of learning outcomes
require different strategies. For example, a strategy for memorizing verbal information might be
helpful, but it might not align with the strategies required for learning a concept or for learning
how to solve a problem.
                                                  255


Completeness. Not only should strategies be aligned, but they also should be complete enough
to effectively teach the targeted outcomes. For example, while the explanation of a problem-
solving method or model might be appropriate, other strategies also would be necessary in order
for students to learn how to resolve different types of problems.
Research summary. Researchers sometimes use different terms for some similar outcomes. For
example, thinking skills and metacognition refer to some of the same types of skills. The
following alphabetical list includes terms as they have appeared in research, even though some
terms clearly overlap with each other.
    • attitudes
    •   cognitive strategies
    •   comprehension and understanding
    •   concepts
    •   creativity
    •   critical thinking
    •   insight
    •   metacognition
    •   motor skills
    •   multiple intelligences
    •   problem solving
    •   knowledge of procedures, principles, and rules
    •   scientific inquiry
    •   thinking skills
    •   verbal information, knowledge, or facts
Effective Teaching Strategies to Support the Development of Specific Learning Outcomes
Attitudes
    •   Explain and show consequences of choices, actions, or behaviors.
    •   Provide relevant human or social models that portray the desired choices, actions, or
        behaviors.
                                                 256


Reading
   •   Provide appropriate reading strategies.
   •   Link instruction to effective reading.
Cognitive Strategies
   •   Monitor and reflect upon the effectiveness of the reading process used.
   •   Encourage and/or teach: a) organizing and summarizing information; b) self-questioning,
       self-reflection, and self-evaluation; c) reference skills; and d) when and how to use these
       different skills.
Comprehension and/or Understanding
   •   Outline, explain, or visually show what will be read and/or learned in a simple form.
   •   Explain with concrete examples, metaphors, questions, or visual representations.
   •   Require students to relate new readings to previously learned information.
   •   Require students to paraphrase or summarize new information as it is read.
   •   Require students to construct a visual representation of main ideas (e.g., map, table,
       graphs, Venn diagram, etc.).
   •   Give students opportunities to add details, explanations, or examples to basic
       information.
   •   Require application of knowledge or information.
Concepts
   •   Provide clear understanding of each concept.
   •   Point out important features or ideas.
   •   Point out examples of the concept, showing similarities and differences.
   •   Include practice in organizing and classifying concepts.
   •   Include a wide range of examples in a progressive presentation from simple to more
       complex examples.
   •   Emphasize relationships between concepts.
                                                  257


Creativity
    •   Provide examples of creativity.
    •   Include models, metaphors, and analogies.
    •   Encourage novel approaches to situations and problems.
    •   Show and provide practice in turning a problem upside down or inside out or changing
        perceptions.
    •   Encourage brainstorming.
    •   Include open-ended questions and problems.
    •   Provide opportunities for ungraded, unevaluated creative performance and behavior.
Critical Thinking
    •   Create conflict or perplexity by using paradoxes, dilemmas, or other situations to
        challenge concepts, beliefs, ideas, and attitudes.
    •   Focus on how to recognize and generate proof, logic, argument, and criteria for
        judgments.
    •   Include practice in detecting mistakes, false analogies, relevant versus irrelevant issues,
        contradictions, discrepant events, and predictions.
    •   Provide practice in drawing inferences from observations and making predictions from
        limited information.
    •   Explain and provide practice in recognizing factors or biases that may influence choice
        and interpretations such as culture, experience, preferences, desires, interests, and
        passions, as well as systematic thinking.
    •   Require students to explain how they form new conclusions and how and why present
        conclusions may differ from previous ones.
Inquiry
    •   Emphasize technological design as inquiry and include discovery activities.
    •   Provide opportunities for experimental design.
    •   Provide opportunities for critical thinking.
    •   Facilitate the collection, display, and interpretation of data.
    •   Promote careful observation, analysis, description, and definition.
                                                   258


Metacognition
   •   Explain different types of thinking strategies and when to use them.
   •   Encourage self-evaluation and reflection.
   •   Include questions to prompt students to wonder why they are doing what they are doing.
   •   Guide students in how to do systematic inquiry, detect flaws in thinking, and adjust
       patterns of thinking.
Technology
   •   Provide a mental and physical model of desired performance.
   •   Describe steps in the performance.
   •   Provide practice with kinesthetic and corrective feedback (coaching).
Multiple Intelligences
   •   Use the verbal-linguistic dimension to focus on reasoning with language, rhythms, and
       inflections, such as determining meaning and order of words (stories, readings, humor,
       rhyme, and song).
   •   Use the logical-mathematical dimension to focus on reasoning with patterns and strings
       of symbols (pattern blocks, activities to form numbers and letters).
   •   Use the musical dimension to focus on appreciation and production of musical pitch,
       melody, and tone.
   •    Use the spatial dimension to focus on activities of perceiving and transforming
       perceptions.
   •    Use the bodily kinesthetic dimension to focus on use and control of body and objects.
   •    Use the interpersonal dimension to focus on sensing needs, thoughts, and feelings of
       others.
   •    Use the intrapersonal dimension to focus on recognizing and responding to one’s own
       needs, thoughts, and feelings.
Problem Solving
   •   Assure student readiness by diagnosing and strengthening related concept-, rule-, and
       decision-making skills.
   •   Provide broad problem-solving methods and models.
   •   Include practice in solving different types of problems.
                                                 259


   •   Begin with highly structured problems and then gradually move to less structured ones.
   •   Use questions to guide thinking about problem components, goals, and issues.
   •   Provide guidance in observing and gathering information, asking appropriate questions,
       and generating solutions.
   •   Include practice in finding trouble, inequities, contradictions, or difficulties and in
       reframing problems.
Procedural Knowledge, Principles, and Rules
   •   Define context, problems, situations, or goals and appropriate procedures.
   •   Explain reasons that procedures work for different types of situations.
   •   Define procedures—procedures include rules, principles, and/or steps.
   •   Provide vocabulary and concepts related to procedures.
   •   Demonstrate step-by-step application of procedures.
   •   Explain steps as they are applied.
   •   Include practice in applying procedures.
Scientific Inquiry
   •   Explain processes and methods of scientific inquiry.
   •   Explain and provide examples of: a) hypotheses formation; b) valid procedures; c)
       isolating variables; d) interpretation of data; and e) reporting findings.
   •   Encourage independent thinking and avoidance of dead ends or simplistic answers.
   •   Require students to explain, verify, challenge, and critique the results of their inquiry.
Thinking Skills
   •   Introduce different types of thinking strategies.
   •   Explain context or conditions of applying different strategies.
   •   Provide definitions, steps, and lists to use in strategies.
   •   Include examples of different types of thinking strategies, including how to think with
       open-mindedness, responsibility, and accuracy.
   •   Emphasize persisting when answers are not apparent.
   •   Provide practice in applying, transferring, and elaborating on thinking strategies.
   •   Integrate metacognitive, critical, and creative-thinking skills.
                                                  260


Verbal Information, Knowledge, or Facts
    •   Provide a meaningful context to link new information and past knowledge.
    •   Organize information into coherent groups or themes.
    •   Use devices to improve memory such as mnemonic patterns, maps, charts, comparisons,
        groupings, highlighting of key words or first letters, visual images, and rhymes.
    •   Identify main ideas, patterns, or relationships within information or sets of facts.
G.        TARGETED ASSESSMENT STRATEGIES
Instructional materials should include assessment strategies that are known to be
successful in determining how well students have achieved the targeted learning outcomes.
See Florida Statutes 1006.31(4)(e); 1006.34(2)(a)(b); 1006.38(4).
Alignment. The assessment strategies should match the learner-performance requirements for
the types of learning outcomes that have been targeted for the subject matter, course, or course
category. Different strategies are appropriate for assessing different types of learning outcomes.
For example, a strategy for testing the acquisition of verbal information would not match the
requirements for testing whether or not a student has learned a concept or learned how to solve a
problem.
The term “assessment,” as used in this section, refers to testing or other strategies that assess
student progress as a result of learning activities. The results of such assessment provide
information about where to strengthen instruction. But it is very important to ask the right
questions. If the type of question matches the type of learning outcome, then students and
teachers have relevant information about learning progress.
Completeness. In addition to including assessment strategies that align with the performance
requirements of the targeted learning outcomes, the strategies should be complete enough to
effectively assess the learners’ performance with regard to the targeted outcome. For example, a
test item that requires the student to state a rule does not assess whether or not the student knows
how to use the rule.
Research summary. The research summary for effective assessment strategies for different
types of learning outcomes follows the same alphabetical sequence as the previous section.
Effective Assessment Strategies for Specific Learning Outcomes
NOTE. Students should be provided opportunities to learn from their mistakes without
being penalized, particularly during the initial stages of new instruction.
                                                   261


Attitudes
    •   Provide various situations.
    •   Require choices about behaviors.
Cognitive Strategies
    •   Provide learning tasks.
    •   Require students to choose good strategies for learning and/or to learn new materials
        without teacher guidance.
    •   Require students to discuss and explain methods used for various learning tasks.
Comprehension and Understanding
    •   Provide topic.
    •   Require summary or restatement of information.
    •   Provide new context.
    •   Require application of information.
    •   Provide several statements using words different from the initial teaching.
    •   Require identification of the correct meaning.
Concepts
    •   Provide new examples and non-examples.
    •   Require identification or classification into the correct categories.
Creativity
    •   Provide new problems to “turn upside down,” study, or resolve. These could be
        performances, presentations, or products.
    •   Require products or solutions to fit within the particular functions and resources.
    •   Provide situations requiring novel approaches.
Critical Thinking
    •   Require students to evaluate information or results.
    •   Require the use of analysis and research.
                                                  262


Insight
    •   Provide situations for inquiry and discovery.
    •   Provide situations for manipulation.
Metacognition
    •   Provide different situations or problems.
    •   Require students to identify types of thinking strategies to analyze and evaluate their own
        thinking.
Multiple Intelligences
    •   Provide situations in the modality that is targeted, such as verbal-linguistic, musical, or
        other modality.
    •   Provide situations in several modalities, to allow choice.
    •   Require performance in the targeted or chosen modalities.
Motor Skills
    •   Provide situations and resources for performance of the skill.
    •   Include a checklist for evaluation.
Problem Solving
    •   Require students to choose types of problem-solving strategies for different situations.
    •   Require solutions to structured and unstructured, simple and complex problems.
Procedural Knowledge, Principles, and Rules
    •   Provide situations that require students to recognize the correct use of procedures,
        principles, or rules with routine problems.
    •   Require students to state procedures, principles, or rules.
    •   Require students to choose which procedures, principles, or rules to apply in different
        situations.
    •   Provide situations that require students to demonstrate the correct use of procedures,
        principles, or rules with routine problems.
                                                 263


Scientific Inquiry
   •   Provide situations or problems that require speculation, inquiry, and hypothesis
       formation.
   •   Provide research, hands-on activities, and conclusions.
Thinking Skills
   •   Require students to summarize different types of thinking strategies.
   •   Provide situations that require students to choose the best type of thinking strategy to use.
   •   Require students to detect instances of open versus closed-mindedness.
   •   Require students to detect instances of responsible versus irresponsible and accurate
       versus inaccurate applications of thinking strategies.
   •   Provide situations that require the students’ persistence to discover or analyze
       information to obtain answers to specific questions.
   •   Require students to apply specific thinking strategies to different real-world situations.
Verbal Information, Knowledge, or Facts
   •   Require students to recall information.
   •   Require students to restate information.
   •   Require students to understand information.
                                                264


Criteria for Evaluation
The instructional materials adoption process must be fair to all publishers who take the time and
expense to submit their materials. Applying evaluation criteria consistently to each submission
assures that the materials will be judged fairly.
Regardless of format or technology, effective materials have certain characteristics in common,
and the basic issues, important for the evaluation of instructional materials, apply to all subject
areas and all formats. These issues are addressed in Florida’s list of priorities and the criteria as
detailed in the previous pages of this document. A link to the evaluation instrument used by
adoption committee members is found at the Web site listed below. Evaluators will use the
criteria-based instrument to engage in systematic reflection of the processes they follow and
decisions they make about the quality of materials submitted by publishers.
The extensive research base and review processes used to identify these criteria establish their
validity as an integral part of Florida’s instructional materials adoption system. Applying these
criteria consistently to each submission helps assure that the materials submitted by publishers
will be judged fairly.
The State Instructional Materials Committees will complete a Committee Questionnaire for each
submission at the adoption meetings. The Committee Questionnaire is a compilation of the
criteria in the committee member evaluation instrument and serves as the official record of the
State Instructional Materials Committee. A link to the Committee Questionnaire is found at the
Web site listed below.
http://www.fldoe.org/bii/instruct_mat/eval.asp
                                                  265


Link to Curriculum Requirements/Sunshine
State Standards
The Next Generation Sunshine State Standards for Science can be found at the following link:
http://www.floridastandards.org/Standards/FLStandardSearch.aspx
The Florida Course Descriptions for K-12 Science Education can be found at the following link:
http://www.floridastandards.org/Courses/CourseDescriptionSearch.aspx
                                             266


Requirements for Braille Textbook Production
Instructions for Preparing Computer Diskettes and CDs Required for Automated Braille
Textbook Production
STATUTORY AUTHORIZATION
Chapter 1003.55(5), Florida Statutes, states that, “….any publisher of a textbook adopted
pursuant to the state instructional materials adoption process shall furnish the Department of
Education with a computer file in an electronic format specified by the Department at least 2
years in advance that is readily translatable to Braille and can be used for large print or speech
access. Any textbook reproduced pursuant to the provisions of this subsection shall be
purchased at a price equal to the price paid for the textbook as adopted. The Department of
Education shall not reproduce textbooks obtained pursuant to this subsection in any manner that
would generate revenues for the department from the use of such computer files or that would
preclude the rightful payment of fees to the publisher for use of all or some portion of the
textbook.”
OBJECTIVE
Electronic text (e-text) is needed to accelerate the production of textbooks in Braille and other
accessible formats through the use of translation software. Some embedded publisher formatting
commands help speed the conversion of English text to Braille or other accessible formats.
Therefore, the objective of these instructions is to prompt publishers to provide textbook data in
a format that will be useful to Braille and other accessible format producers while at the same
time allowing each publisher the flexibility of using existing composition or typesetting systems.
Publishers may produce e-text files in one of three formats, as shown in the specifications below.
By April 1, 1998, publishers of adopted student textbooks for literary subjects must be able to
provide the computer diskettes UPON REQUEST. Publishers shall provide nonliterary subjects
when technology becomes available for the conversion of nonliterary materials to the appropriate
format.
The requested computer diskettes shall be provided to the Florida Instructional Materials Center
for the Visually Impaired (FIMC), 5002 North Lois Avenue, Tampa, Florida 33614; (813) 872
5281; in Florida WATS (800) 282-9193 or (813) 872-5284 (FAX). The center will contact each
publisher of an adopted textbook and provide delivery instructions.
                                                 267


SPECIFICATIONS
1. FORMAT (Three Options):
  a. A full implementation of Standard Generalized Markup Language (SGML).
  b. XML-Extensible Markup Language
  c. ASCII – (Last Resort!)
2. OPERATING SYSTEM:             Windows
3. DISKETTE SIZE:                3.5, CD, Zip100
4. DISKETTE CAPACITY:            Double-sided/high density
5. DISKETTE LABELING:
                      a.         Sequential Number/ISBN
                      b.         Book Title
                      c.         File Name
                      d.         Name of Publisher
                      e.         Name of Typesetting Company/Contact Name
                      f.         Format Option and Version
                      g.         Copyright Date
                      h.         Wording such as: “All rights reserved. As described in Chapter 233.0561(5),
                                 Florida Statutes, no use may be made of these diskettes other than the creating of a
                                 Braille, Large Print, or Recorded version of the materials contained on this diskette
                                 for students with visual impairments in the State of Florida.”
6. REQUIRED CONTENTS:
                      a.         Title Page
                      b.         List of Consultants and Reviewers (if appropriate)
                      c.         Table of Contents
                      d.         All Textbook Chapters
                      e.         All Appendices
                      f.         All Glossaries
                      g.         Indices
7. FILE STRUCTURE:               Each chapter of a textbook will be formatted as a separate file.
8. FILE LIST:         A separate file listing the structure of the primary files must be provided. This file should be
labeled DISKLIST TEXT. In addition, all special instructions (e.g., merging of materials kept in a separate file)
should be noted in this file.
9. LOCATION OF SPECIAL DATA:                 Marginal notes, footnotes, captions, and other special items must be
placed consistently within each text file.
10. CORRECTIONS AND CHANGES A conscientious effort should be made to update files to exactly duplicate
the adopted printed version of the textbook (including corrections and changes). If this cannot be accomplished in a
timely and cost effective manner, the publisher will coordinate with the FIMC Supervisor and provide to the
Supervisor one set of marked tearsheets of all corrections and changes not included in the files.
                                                           268


Federal Requirements for the National
Instructional Materials Accessibility Standard
(NIMAS)
National Instructional Materials Accessibility Standard (NIMAS) guides the production and
electronic distribution of digital versions of textbooks and other instructional materials so they
can be more easily converted to accessible formats, including Braille and text-to-speech. A
National Instructional Materials Access Center (NIMAC) has been established to receive and
catalog publishers' electronic files of print instructional materials in the NIMAS format.
These files will be used for the production of alternate formats as permitted under the law for
students with print disabilities. Under these guidelines, “textbook” means the principal tool of
instruction used in the classroom. It is a printed book or books that contain most, if not all, of the
academic content a student needs to learn to meet the State or Local Education Agency’s
curriculum requirements for that subject area. “Related core materials” are printed materials,
other than textbooks, designed for use by students in the classroom in conjunction with a
textbook and which, together with the textbook, are necessary to meet the curriculum
requirements for the intended course. The materials should be directly related to the textbook and
wherever possible they should be published by the publisher of the textbook. Related core
materials do not include materials that are not written and published primarily for use by students
in the classroom (e.g., trade books not bundled with the textbook, newspapers, and reference
works) or ancillary or supplemental materials that are not necessary to meet the curriculum
requirements for the intended course. For purposes of these definitions, the term “curriculum
requirements for the intended course” refers to relevant curriculum standards and requirements
as established by a state educational agency or local educational agency.
The details of the metadata elements required as part of the NIMAS File set will be found at
http://www.nimac.us/docs/Metadata0509.DOC. Please note that some elements are required,
while others are optional. Some fields also allow for multiple entries (e.g., subject terms).
Complete information concerning NIMAS and NIMAC can be found at http://nimas.cast.org and
http://www.nimac.us. (IDEA-2004).
                                                   269


Florida Department of Education